© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We carried out comprehensive structural, magnetic and toxicity studies of Mg1−xZnxFe2O4 and Cu1−xZnxFe2O4 ferrites that we plan to use as contrast agents for magnetic resonance-imaging thermometry. Samples were prepared by a standard ceramic technique. Their structural properties were investigated with an x-ray diffraction system, and data was analyzed using the Rietveld method that allowed us to determine cations distribution. Magnetic properties of MgZn and CuZn ferrites were studied using a superconducting quantum interference device magnetometer, a vibrating sample magnetometer, and Mössbauer spectrometer. Magnetometry measurements were cross-correlated with XRD results and compared with magnetic properties determined by Mössbauer spectroscopy, allowing us to understand the magnetic structure of studied ferrites. The temperature dependent magnetic measurements were used as guidance to select the most suitable MgZn and CuZn ferrites compositions for MRI thermometry near human body temperature. The inflammation studies indicated that MgZn ferrites are more suitable from the toxicology point of view for MRI thermometry.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Efforts to increase the power density and continuous power of electric machines have intensified the request for tailored non-grain oriented electrical steel grades. Possible measures to optimize electrical steel grades are the use of thinner gauges as well as grades with tailor-made microstructural properties. However, these grades are developed mainly focusing on the magnetic and mechanical properties, neglecting the detrimental and strongly material-dependent processing effect on the magnetic properties of electrical steel, especially the cutting influence. In this paper, the microstructure-dependence of the magnetic material deterioration due to guillotine cutting is studied on ten industrial non-grain oriented electrical steels with thicknesses between 0.1mm and 0.35mm, all of which the chemical composition, grain structure and texture is known. This allows a consideration of the interdependence of material thickness, microstructure, alloy content with the cutting effect. The magnetic deterioration is characterized on a single-sheet-tester with samples in rolling as well as transverse direction. The grain size distribution and homogeneity is evaluated and linked to magnetic-loss and magnetization-curve deterioration by means of statistical methods. As a result sheet-thickness-dependent microstructures are evaluated with respect to their cutting influence.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A simple phenomenological approach is used to describe magnetization and magnetoresistance in thin films of oxygen-deficient rutile titanium dioxide (TiO2). Magnetization curves were successfully simulated by considering the ferromagnetic (FM) contribution of magnetically interacting oxygen vacancies (VO's) forming a single-domain using the Stoner-Wohlfarth (SW) model combined with paramagnetic (PM) contribution of isolated VO's described by a Langevin function. Whereas approximately half of the VO's behave as ferromagnetically coupled, rotating coherently with the applied magnetic field, the remaining half of the VO's tend to align individually with the local magnetic field overcoming the thermal fluctuation deviations. The conduction mechanism is described by variable range hopping (VRH) regime with electron hopping between VO's centers in the TiO2-x matrix. The magnetoresistance (MR) curves are consistently simulated through the scaling with square of PM contribution of magnetization, indicating that resistance depends on the relative orientation of the magnetic moments associated with non-interacting VO's dispersed in TiO2 matrix at low temperatures. Density functional theory (DFT) calculations were performed to validate the parametrization of the phenomenological approach used to described the ferromagnetic groundstate of the VO network and spin polarization in the VRH regime in the TiO2-x matrix. Spin-resolved density of states (DOS) calculations consistently reveal that magnetoresistance can be ascribed to electron hopping from defect-states located immediately below Fermi level to the bottom of conduction band states with an opposed spin-polarization.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Material-modulated (Fe20Ni80 and Co20Fe60B20) stripe-patterned thin films were fabricated on naturally oxidized silicon substrates by radio-frequency magnetron sputtering method. The static and dynamic magnetic properties of the samples were studied by magneto-optical Kerr microscopy and vector network analyzer, respectively. Hysteresis loops and magneto-optical Kerr microscopy images show multistep magnetization reversal processes, which can be explained by the asynchronous magnetization reversal of different stripes. The permeability spectra indicate the presence of two resonance peaks whose frequencies shift with the change of the stripe width. Meanwhile, the interval between two resonance frequencies is larger than 1.5 GHz for all samples. This is an excellent candidate material to design microwave devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Highly magnetic FeCo alloy films were deposited on Indium Tin Oxide (ITO) substrates by electrochemical deposition technique using different electrolytes. Synchrotron X-Ray Diffraction studies confirms the formation of pure FeCo films. The films deposited using different electrolytes results in varied morphology viz. flower-like and tilted nano-rod like structures. The magnetic studies of the films reveals that the rod-like structures shows single phase hysteresis loops with low coercivity ~155 Oe in the in-plane and ~337 Oe in the out of plane configuration. The higher coercivity in the out of plane configuration arising due to pinning effects is modelled by Monte-Carlo simulations to estimate the effective anisotropy constant. The domain configurations observed at various fields using Magneto Optic Kerr Effect Microscopy shows that the magnetization reversal process follows 180° domain motion. Such domain motion is a manifestation of higher stiffness constant as explained by the micromagnetic simulations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The ferrohydrodynamic (FHD) and magnetohydrodynamic (MHD) are two important effects of a magnetic field in a liquid. FHD is the results of Kelvin force while MHD is the effect of a magnetic field due to Lorentz force. The present study aimed to evaluate the heat and mass transfer behavior of nanofluids inside a hexagonal enclosure in the presence of a non-uniform magnetic field considering the effects of Ferro-hydrodynamic (FHD) and Magneto-hydrodynamic (MHD). First, the concentration gradient of nanoparticles was captured due to the nanoscale forces. Then, the governing equations, including the continuity of nanofluid and nanoparticles, and momentum for vertical and horizontal direction were introduced, along with energy equation. Besides, the practical boundary condition of zero mass flux in nanoparticles at the walls was employed. Further, the governing equations were transformed into their non-dimensional form and solved numerically by the Finite Element Method (FEM). Furthermore, a systematic grid check was performed, and the results were compared with those of previous studies. Increasing magnetic number (Mnf) results in an increase in the heat and mass transfer rate. Increasing Lorentz force, in the form of Hartmann number (Ha) leads to a decrease in the rate of heat and mass transfer.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents the results of a study of changes in the phase composition, magnetic and electrical properties of Co nanowires during thermal annealing in the temperature range 200–600 °C. The electrochemical deposition method was used as a method for producing Co nanostructures; polymer films with a pore diameter of 400 nm and a thickness of 12 μm were used as templates. In the course of the study, the dependences of the change in structural characteristics and phase composition on the annealing temperature were established. Three stages of evolution of the structural characteristics and phase transformations of nanostructures consisting of thermal annealing of defects and ordering of the crystal structure at low temperatures, the formation of the oxide phase and its domination in the structure with the subsequent phase transition from Co-C/Co-H to Co3O4 are determined. It is established that the appearance of the oxide phase leads to a change in the magnetic properties and the formation of the structure characteristic of paramagnets. In the course of the study of the conductive characteristics, it was found that an increase in the annealing temperature first leads to annealing of defects and an increase in conductivity, however, at a temperature of 600 °C, a deterioration in the conductive properties is observed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, Monte Carlo simulations (MCS) under the Metropolis algorithm and the Ab-initio calculations based on the Quantum espresso code, are used to simulate the structural, the magnetic properties and the diagram phases of the quaternary Heusler compound MnNiCuSb. As far as we know, this alloy has not been neither synthesized nor theoretically studied. We have applied the Ab-initio calculations to investigate the density of states (DOS) of this compound. Such method showed that this material MnNiCuSb, has three magnetic elements: Mn, Ni and Cu. In a first step, we have presented and discussed the ground state phase diagrams in different planes corresponding to different physical parameters. In order to apply the Monte Carlo Simulations, we modeled the three magnetic elements (Mn, Ni and Cu) by the magnetic spin moments: S = 2, σ = 1 and Q = 1/2, respectively. Our calculations showed that for null temperature values, this compound presents interesting properties, when exploring the behavior of the total magnetizations as a function of temperature and external magnetic field. Also, we have studied the effect of varying the crystal magnetic field on the coercive field for fixed temperature and exchange coupling interactions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A garnet, composition of Tb0.2 Er1 Y1.8 Fe5 O12, based nanostructure thin films were prepared by a sol-gel method for a magneto-optical isolator. The films were deposited on a quartz substrate and crystallised at 900 °C under different annealing environments (air, oxygen and argon). Fe2+ concentration-dependent, microstructural, optical and magnetic properties were investigated systematically. This study shows that Fe2+ ions are dominant in the air-annealed film with an atomic percentage of 77.63%, which results in the expansion of the unit cell. In addition, an excess of Fe2+ ions results in much higher optical absorption, remanent magnetisation and saturation magnetisation, caused by the migration of oxygen vacancies due to the reduction of Fe3+ to Fe2+. Conversely, annealing in oxygen and argon gases suppresses the formation of oxygen vacancies, hence improves the optical and magnetic properties of the films. Low saturation magnetisation, combined with low optical absorption, is highly desirable in magneto-optical applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A facile hydrothermal technique with optimized condition used to synthesize single crystalline, α-MnO2 and α-MnO2:Dy nanorods of diameter 40 and 20 nm, respectively. We observe two fold magnitude higher specific capacitance (94 F g−1 at a scan rate of 10 mV/sec) in α-MnO2:Dy than that of α-MnO2 nanorods. X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns while confirm the tetragonal structure in both compounds, decrease in crystallinity as well as aspect ratio of nanorods in α-MnO2:Dy contribute towards high capacitance. A decrease in Neel temperature (TN) from 24.5 K in bulk to 18 K in α-MnO2 nanorods further decreases to 11 K in α-MnO2:Dy nanorods. Addition to TN at 11 K, another magnetic anomaly at 4 K indicates Dy-Dy interaction. Although Dy incorporation enhances the antiferromagnetic strength as indicated from high Curie-Weiss temperature (θcw), exchange bias field significantly decreases and spin-glass behaviour is absent unlike in bare α-MnO2. Such magnetic features are well explained on the basis of core shell structure of nanorods where core is contributed by antiferromagnetic frozen spins and rotatable spins are contributed towards the surface. The competition between core and surface spins depending on the size of nanorods thus decides the spin-glass behaviour, EB field observed in these nanorods. Change in exchange bias field with consecutive cycles showing the training effect has been discussed after fitting with phenomenological models like Power law and multiple exponent function.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.An in-field interaction plot, δMR, has been recently introduced, presenting important advantages over the classical remanence plots. Here a general δMR is proposed, allowing to assess interactions even in systems with shifted and asymmetric major loops. To construct such a plot, a recoil loop (which incorporates a first-order reversal curve, FORC) and the position of the center of the major loop are only needed. Applying the method on exchange-biased Co/IrMn bilayer gives two types of δMR obtained for measuring field either parallel or antiparallel to the exchange-bias direction. This provides valuable information on the reversal mechanism and allows distinguishing between effects coming from coupling into the ferromagnet (Co) and those stemming from interactions in its interface with the antiferromagnet (IrMn). The essentially nonzero general δMR plot obtained from the major loop revealed to be a precise measure of the reversal asymmetry. The technique can readily be adjusted for use in other scientific fields where hysteresis is observed. We provide free software which generates such δMR plot(s).© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Given the increasing demand for three-dimensional (3D) Hall effect sensors, vertical Hall sensors (VHSs), an indispensable part of 3D Hall sensor with low performance, have been increasingly investigated. Previous works on the original VHS named five-contact vertical Hall sensor (5CVHS) have focused on performance improvement. However, the current-related sensitivity of 5CVHS and its influencing factors have been rarely comprehensively investigated. The aim of this paper is to study the influence of the size, structure and technology of 5CVHS on current-related sensitivity so that an optimal solution can be achieved. Besides, the research process and analysis methodology in this study provide an efficient simulation method to substitute tap-outs in iterating the structures of VHS. Thus, this method can reduce the development cycle and deliver real cost savings. Finite element method simulation is used to determine the outstanding current-related sensitivity obtained by optimizing the length, width, and locations of contacts in standard GLOBALFOUNDRIES 0.18 μm BCDlite™ technology. In order to further improve the sensitivity, a covering P-type region is introduced to reduce short-circuit effect by analogy with the cross-like horizontal Hall device. Moreover, the influences of depths of active and P-type regions are studied to obtain optimal sensitivity. Finally, the optimized size, structure, and technology parameters are obtained. Results may serve as reference to the design of the 5CVHS layout.© 2019Spin-dependent transport behavior of functionalized graphene sheet with CrO2 as half-metallic magnet (HMM) electrodes are explored using DFT (density functional theory) in a combination with non-equilibrium Green's function formalism (NEGF). Functionalized graphene sheet with Hydrogen and Fluorine atoms are examined as ultra-thin tunnel barriers in the magnetic tunnel junction devices. Computations based on the DFT for functionalization of graphene sheet with H and F atoms show opening of the band gap in the graphene sheet. A band gap opening of 3.53 eV, 3.16 eV, and 2.64 eV have been observed when Graphene sheet is functionalized with H atoms on both sides, F atoms on both sides, and both F and H atoms on each side of the graphene sheet respectively. The results of all the three functionalized graphene sheet configurations have been compared. On comparison of the results for the three configurations, it is observed that a large value of tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) around 344 × 103% is obtained for the H-Graphene-F device configuration. This suggests that the H-Graphene-F device configuration acts as a perfect ultra-thin insulating barrier for the spin-based devices. Negative differential resistance (NDR) behavior have been observed for F-Graphene-F and H-Graphene-F device configurations in parallel magnetization (PM) case. All the three configurations show perfect spin filtration efficiency of around 100%. Applied voltage dependent transmission spectrum have been plotted for all the three device configurations to validate the current-voltage behaviour. These unique and interesting nature of all the three devices suggest their applications in spintronics domain.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Experimentally, ferromagnetic and metallic behaviors of Nb-doped EuTiO3 were reported. Until now, first-principle computational study has not been carried out to investigate the origin of the FM interactions in doped EuTiO3. Here, structural, electronic and magnetic properties of Nb-doped EuTiO3 are investigated using hybrid density functional theory method. The calculated results show that the entire series of EuTi1−xNbxO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) stabilize in a cubic perovskite structure. EuTi1−xNbxO3 is an antiferromagnetic insulator at x = 0 and a ferromagnetic metal at 0.125 ≤ x ≤ 1, which agrees well with available experiments. Nb doping induces itinerant electrons into the conduction band bottom at 0.125 ≤ x, and the Fermi level moves upward. As a result, the Ruderman-Kittel-Kasuya-Yosida (RKKY)-type interaction, between Eu2+ spins by the itinerant Ti 3d and Nb 4d electrons, can be responsible for ferromagnetism in EuTi1−xNbxO3. The present study provides a theoretical understanding of origin of ferromagnetism in EuTi1−xNbxO3 and is helpful to understand FM interactions of other doped EuTiO3. For EuTi0.5Nb0.5O3, arranging the Ti and Nb atoms into a 1 × 1 EuTiO3/EuNbO3 superlattice along the [0 0 1] direction results in interesting FM metallic properties, which are not present in the parent compound EuTiO3 but similar to those of EuNbO3.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Breast cancer tests are costly, requiring specialized instruments and highly trained operators. Serum protein biomarkers are ideal targets for the development of low cost and non-invasive point-of-care (POC) diagnostic assays such as the lateral flow immunoassay (LFIA). However, these proteins are often present at very low levels relative to other serum proteins, making it very difficult to detect the presence of the cancer biomarker proteins. There is, therefore, a need to improve the sensitivity of LFIAs. In this study, we demonstrate the functionalization of iron oxide magnetic nanoparticles using L-cysteine and conjugated to streptavidin. The functionalized MNPs-streptavidin was in turn conjugated to biotin containing an aptamer with specificity to a breast cancer biomarker protein. The complex was used to isolate MUC 1 proteins from lysates extracted from MCF-7 cells. Characterization was done to ascertain the changes in morphology before and after conjugation of the molecules to the MNPs using high-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), superconducting quantum interference device (SQUID), QUBIT fluorimeter and Matrix-assisted laser desorption ionization/time-of-flight mass spectrometry (MALDI-TOF-MS). The XRD pattern matched JCPDS no.00-039-1346 suggesting that the iron oxide synthesized is maghemite (α-Fe2O3). We quantified the isolated proteins using Qubit fluorimeter and identified them using MALDI-TOF-MS. The concentration of isolated proteins that were isolated from 6 µL of lysate and dispersed in 20 µL of PBS was determined to be 15.63 µg/mL. The concentration was determined after 3 cycles of thorough washing. The application of these MNPs in the design of LFIAs can significantly increase the sensitivity of these diagnostic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The structure and cation distribution in nanoparticles of chromium doped nickel-ferrite synthesized using the solution self-combustion technique has been studied using Mössbauer spectroscopy. Powder XRD analysis of samples confirmed the formation of single-phase pure NiCrFeO4 nanoparticles. The structural parameters were investigated by powder X-ray diffraction followed by Rietveld refinement using the FullProf method. The crystallite size obtained from XRD matches well with the particle size seen in TEM. From the room-temperature Mössbauer study, NiCrFeO4 nanoparticles are found to exhibit superparamagnetism. The low-temperature Mössbauer studies indicate superexchange interaction between A and B sites, novel cation distribution, (Fe0.2Ni0.8)A [CrNi0.2Fe0.8]B with an unusual presence of Ni2+ at A site and spin canting effects.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.High spin-polarized materials are expected for the development of spintronic devices. In this work, we are aiming to find new spintronic materials in Mn-based binary, ternary and quaternary Heusler alloys by using the first-principles calculations. We investigated structures, electronic properties, magnetic, tetragonal distortion and mechanic properties of Mn3Ga, Mn2YGa (Y = V, Nb, Ta) and ScMnVGa. The results show that Mn3Ga, ScMnVGa type-I, and type-II have lower energy in antiferromagnetic (AFM) states than ferromagnetic (FM) and paramagnetic (NM). Mn2YGa (Y = V, Nb, Ta) compounds are more stable in FM states. The results of electronic and magnetic properties indicate that Mn3Ga is a gapless half-metallic antiferromagnet (Gapless HM-AFM). Mn2VGa and Mn2NbGa belong to gapless half-metallic ferrimagnets (Gapless HM-FE). Mn2TaGa is ferrimagnets. ScMnVGa type-I is half-metallic antiferromagnets (HM-AFM) and type-II belongs to spin gapless semiconductors with AFM (SGSs-AFM). Inspired by Ferromagnetic shape memory alloys (FAMAs), we performed tetragonal deformation of those compounds, and we predicted that Mn3Ga, Mn2YGa (Y = V, Nb, Ta) have possible martensitic transformations. Finally, the mechanical stability and elastic properties of above-mentioned in both cubic and tetragonal structures were discussed in detail.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effects of secondary particle size distribution on the electromagnetic properties of the carbonyl iron powder cores have been investigated in this work. For preparing the cores, the iron powders were firstly undergone insulation treatments including phosphorization and organic coating. After granulation, the secondary particles with different size distributions were molded into the final shape and cured at 200 °C. The results show that for the secondary particles with unimodal size distribution, the real part of the complex magnetic permeability of the powder core is in inverse proportion to the particle size. For the cores prepared from the secondary particles with bimodal size distribution, the effects of the size ratio and volume ratio of the coarse particle/fine particle on the magnetic properties are discussed. It is found that the permeability increases with the increasing volume of fine secondary particles. The minimum magnetic loss factor value is obtained at the coarse/fine secondary particles volume ratio of 7:3. The density and magnetic properties including complex permeability and magnetic loss of the cores prepared with coarse/fine particles size ratio of ~3 and ~7 are both in inverse proportional to the volume fraction of coarse secondary particles. The present work indicates that a reasonable size distribution of the secondary particles is required to improve the magnetic properties of the soft magnetic powder cores.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.α″-Fe16N2 had been viewed as a mystery material because of inconclusive arguments in the 1990s, including many controversial reports at two MMM conference symposia, and the topic was then largely dropped by the magnetic research community. The key controversies around this material have now been successfully addressed through our long and persistent efforts from 2002 to 2012, first reported in APS 2010 and then at INTERMAG 2012. Since then, α″-Fe16N2 has been picked up as one of the most promising rare-earth-free magnet candidates because of its use of environment-friendly raw materials, confirmed giant saturation magnetic flux density (2.9 T), and reasonably high magnetic anisotropy constant (1.8 MJ/m3). Its coercivity temperature coefficient (~0.4 Oe/°C) in the range of 27–152 °C is two orders of magnitude lower than that of commercial NdFeB magnets (e.g. N40 ~ −81.9 Oe/K). The iron nitride magnet is of great interest as a magnetic material for applications working at relatively low temperature (<150 °C) and not requesting high coercivity. These applications range from speaker magnets to magnets in hard disk drives, electrical motors, wind turbines, smart phones, audio devices, and other power generation machines. A perspective review on the synthesis of the bulk α″-Fe16N2 compound permanent magnet is presented here on the aspects of material processing and magnetic characterizations. Specifically, we introduce and discuss our efforts to prepare the bulk Fe16N2 compound permanent magnet by using four different approaches, including an ion implantation method, a nanoparticle based approach, a high-temperature nitridation method based on foils, wires, and melt-spun ribbons, and a low-temperature nitridation method based on foils and ribbons. With our recent progress and many on-going activities by researchers worldwide, we believe that the α″-Fe16N2 compound permanent magnet is in an accelerating stage to be an alternative environment-friendly magnet candidate.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Influence of Si layer spacer on the magnetic and magnetotransport properties of the Si/Ni multilayers has been studied. The study is performed by investigating a series of [Si(tSi)/Ni(30Å)]20 multilayers prepared by DC magnetron sputtering process. The structural and microstructural studies suggest that the effective crystallites size increases with the decrease in tSi. The cross sectional TEM data reveal that the Si/Ni multilayers with tSi ≤ 10 Å are of discontinuous form. The magnetization (M20kOe) obtained at 20 kOe increases as tSi decreases and reaches towards the bulk value of Ni. This increase in M20kOe is due to the increase in effective size of the Ni nanocrystallites. The magnetotransport parameters such as saturated anomalous Hall resistance, anomalous Hall coefficient, Hall sensitivity and magnetoresistance ratio are found to gradually increase within 100 Å ≤ tSi ≤ 30 Å and then sharply increase till tSi = 10 Å due to surface and interface scattering. These parameters decrease when tSi further reduces down to 5 Å which is beyond the percolation threshold. The maximum enhancements of about 33 times in anomalous Hall resistance and 24 times in anomalous Hall coefficient are found at tSi = 10 Å when compared with the multilayers having tSi = 100 Å. The skew scattering is the dominant mechanism which is responsible for the anomalous Hall effect phenomena in the Si/Ni multilayers. The Si/Ni multilayers also show anisotropic magnetoresistance.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic refrigeration could ultimately allow the replacement of commonly-used industrial coolers or household refrigerators, mainly for its potential great efficiency and ecological factors. In the search of good magnetocaloric materials, the iron rich Nd2Fe17 intermetallics are regarded as very interesting candidates, due to their significant magnetic properties. To that end, three samples with nominal compositions Nd2Fe17-xSix (x=0,0.25,0.5) were prepared by using an arc furnace, followed by annealing. Structural analysis by Rietveld method on X-ray diffractograms have shown that these alloys crystallize in the rhombohedral Th2Zn17-type structure (Space group R3¯m) and that Fe is being substituted by Si in the 18h Wyckoff position. Magnetic properties measurements revealed that the Curie temperature increases while the magnetization at saturation diminishes with Si content. The magnetic entropy change ΔSM reached a maximum of 3.35 J/kg.K, 2.77 J/kg K and 2.50 J/kg K for an applied field of 1.5 T for x = 0, 0.25 and 0.5 respectively, pointing to a decrease with Si content. The RCP seems however to receive an extensive boost from the Fe to Si substitution. Mössbauer spectra analysis was also performed, in order to confirm the site 18h as the location of Si atoms in Nd2Fe17-xSix and the magnetization at saturation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Using the slave boson Kotliar-Ruckenstein approach (SBMFA) for N level Anderson model, we compare fully symmetric SU(N) Kondo resonances occurring for spin and orbital conserving tunneling with many-body resonances for the dot with broken symmetry caused by spin, orbital or full spin-orbital mixing. As a result of interorbital or spin flip processes new interference paths emerge, which manifests in the occurrence of antibonding Dicke like and bonding Kondo like resonances. The analytical expressions for linear conductances and linear temperature thermopower coefficient for arbitrary N are found.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We studied the static and dynamic magnetic properties of a Y3Fe5O12/Tm2.28Bi0.72Fe4.3Ga0.7O12(TBIG) heterostructure. TBIG nanostructured films were sputtered on 300 nm liquid phase epitaxy Y3Fe5O12 films at 400 °C and post-annealing in air at 800 °C. X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns provide evidence of strain-induced lattice mismatch between the Y3Fe5O12 and the TBIG films. Strain-induced anisotropy produces multipeak ferromagnetic resonance spectra from the Y3Fe5O12 film, and these resonance modes behave differently. Fitting of f-Hr data to the Kittel equation yields the anisotropy fields of each resonance mode, indicating the existence of an out-of-plane anisotropic field which is up to 220.9 Oe. We also observe comb-like spin wave spectra causing by the interaction of elastic waves and spin waves in the in-plane and out-of-plane magnetization with peak separation Δf ≈ 3.24 MHz.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effects of the deposition potential on the structural and magnetic properties of Ni nanowires with a diameter of 40 nm and lengths varying from 16 up to 56 μm have been studied. The results show that very long NWs exhibit a large enhancement of their uniaxial magnetic anisotropy. This anisotropy reaches values as high as 1.6 × 106 erg/cm3 that is comparable with the value due to the magnetostatic anisotropy contribution (≈ 5 × 106 erg/cm3) and as shown from the results this large anisotropy is practically insensitive to the deposition potential. Moreover, as shown on shorter NWs, this enhancement of the anisotropy is not observed and interestingly the potential does induce structural changes that relate to their magnetic properties. The enhanced anisotropy observed in long NWs is a robust effect as it is independent of the potential, making this property attractive for applications where high uniaxial anisotropies are required.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The dominant role of trioctylphosphine (TOP) on the particle size and various properties of CoO nanoparticle (NP) samples having Scherrer size in the range 9.4–42.8 nm is reported here; samples have been characterized in detail systematically. Remarkably, while nanosized CoO or CoO/Co nanocomposites with monoclinic or face-centered cubic (fcc) phase can be prepared depending on the synthesis conditions and particle size systematically decreases with increase in concentration of TOP, there is an increase in optical band gap and electrical resistivity with decrease in particle size. The highly semiconducting electrical resistivity is explained with the variable range hopping and small polaron hopping models that indicate in turn enhanced localized density of states, but decrease in Debye temperature (θD) as the particle size decreases. Curiously, 25.9 nm sample shows anomalous behaviour. Moreover, the silica-coated 9.4 nm CoO NP and bare 10.8 nm CoO NP samples exhibit ferromagnetism at 300 K even though their bulk counterpart is antiferromagnetic, with attractive indications of possible potential biomedical applications of the former.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.It is of interest to explore magnetic configurations and phase transitions at the interfaces between different magnetic materials by employing nondestructive and element-specific methods such as resonant X-ray magnetic reflectometry (RXMR). Using RXMR, we have measured element-specific hysteresis loops of a layered stack of TaO(15 nm)/Ir20Mn80(25 nm)/Co90Fe10(3 nm)/Ni67Cu33(10 nm)/Ni80Fe20(10 nm)/quartz substrate at the Fe и Ni absorption edges. The goal here is to highlight the contribution of the weakly ferromagnetic Ni67Cu33 spacer in this system where the spacer is sandwiched between strong ferromagnets, Ni80Fe20 and Co90Fe10. We find two kinds of the spacer effects on magnetization switching in the system. One of them is that switching of the Co90Fe10 magnetization displays at the Ni absorption edge. Such a behavior of the magnetic reflectivity results from strong exchange coupling of the spacer to the Co90Fe10 surrounding across the interface between them. Another one is that temperature variation around the Curie point of the spacer (TC ≈ 240 K) provides a stronger change of the magnetic contrast at the Ni80Fe20/Ni67Cu33 interface than that at the Co90Fe10/Ni67Cu33 one. This feature indicates weaker exchange coupling across the Ni80Fe20/Ni67Cu33 interface.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this study, new all-d-metal Heusler alloys Fe50−xCr25+xV25 (x = 0–25) were investigated on the behaviors of atomic configuration, lattice constant change, and ferromagnetism from the aspects of theoretical calculations and experiments. The theoretical calculations found that both end-member compounds Fe50Cr25V25 (x = 0) and Cr50Fe25V25 (x = 25) prefer to crystallize in Hg2CuTi-type (space group: 216) structure rather than Cu2MnAl-type (space group: 225) one. During the whole substitution process, the structure of Fe50−xCr25+xV25 alloys remains Hg2CuTi-type structure, taking the path from 216 to 216, but with different degrees of BC-site disorder. Both the experimental and theoretical results reveal that the lattice constant increases first, and then abnormally decreases, showing a maximum at Cr40, due to the enhanced covalent d-d hybridizations between the transition metals. The magnetic moment and Curie temperature tuned by Cr substitution vary remarkably between 3.3 and 1.15 μB/f.u. and between 700 and 170 K, respectively, which indicates that the Cr substitution for Fe alters the spin polarizations and exchange interactions in the system. These results provide new insights into the atomic configuration, magnetism and bonding effect in all-d-metal Heusler alloys based on the d-d hybridizations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Several R3¯c Dirac half-metallic materials have been proposed and investigated based on first principles. A certain energy value in one spin channel with a clear band gap in the other spin channel leads to the half-metallic properties of these materials and multiple linear band dispersions (Dirac-like crossings) around the Fermi level for fast and low energy consumption electron transmission. In this work, a material synthesized in a prior experiment, PrNiO3, was found to be a novel half-metallic material with multiple Dirac-like band dispersions according to the first principles. In this work, four magnetic states, i.e., ferromagnetic (FM), nonmagnetic (NM), and antiferromagnetic (AFM-1 and AFM-2) were considered in the 1 × 1 × 1 unit cell of PrNiO3. Two cases of superlattices, 1 × 1 × 2 and 2 × 2 × 1, were built to study the most stable magnetic state of these systems. We found that the FM is the most stable magnetic state for the 1 × 1 × 1, 1 × 1 × 2, and 2 × 2 × 1 systems. The effects of uniform strain, hole and electron doping, and spin-orbit coupling on its electronic structures were discussed in detail. We hope this work can encourage more experimental and theoretical research on R3¯c-type half-metallic materials with multiple Dirac-like band dispersions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We explore whether it is possible to enhance the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in layered systems, where a refrigerant (weak ferromagnet) is sandwiched by strong ferromagnets, by magnetizing the spacer with the effective field that results from its exchange coupling to the surroundings. Temperature variation around the Curie point of the spacer (TC) leads to a change in interlayer coupling between strongly ferromagnetic surroundings, which manifests in increasing the switching field and/or the coercivity of the softer from the surroundings. In order to verify the hypothesis above, we have prepared layered stacks of Py(10 nm)/Gd(x nm)/Co90Fe10(7 nm)/Ir20Mn80(15 nm) (Py = Ni80Fe20 is permalloy) with the Gd spacer in thickness varied from x = 20 nm to x = 5 nm. In this system we clarified how the magnetization switching in the Py layer was sensitive to temperature varied in the range between 300 K and 50 K. We have found that strong enough exchange between the Py and Gd layers emerges only at low temperatures (T < 100 K) which are far from TC. This feature provides an understanding of the observed magnetocaloric properties of the system under study.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The SrFe12−xTbxO19 (x ≤ 0.10) nanohexaferrites (HFs) have been synthesized via citrate solgel approach. The phase formation, chemical purity, morphology and composition of the products were analyzed by X-ray powder diffractometer (XRD), Scanning and Transmission electron microscopes (SEM and TEM). Electromagnetic properties as such as frequency dependences of the loss tangents and reflection losses were investigated in the range of frequency from 2 to 18 GHz. The set of experimental data allowed to establish the nature of the electromagnetic power losses in SrFe12−xTbxO19 nanohexaferrites (HFs). It was demonstrated two main mechanisms of the electromagnetic radiation absorption in high frequency range (2–18 GHz): 1. Absorption due to natural ferromagnetic resonance (NFMR) and 2. Absorption due to dipole polarization. The results show the promise of using these materials for microwave applications (ensuring electromagnetic compatibility).© 2019The room temperature ferromagnetism in doped and co-doped ZnO is reported here. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy revealed the mixed oxidation states of Cu and Ag in ZnO:Cu and ZnO:Ag films, respectively. However, co-doping of Cu and Ag with Al does not alter their bonding characteristics in ZnO. Al in +3 oxidation state indicates that substitution of Al to Zn site gives an extra electron which increases the conductivity of ZnO:Ag and ZnO:Cu films. Mott variable range hopping dominates the conduction in ZnO:Cu and ZnO:Ag films whereas thermally activated conduction dominates in Al co-doped ZnO:Ag and ZnO:Cu films. We show that Ruderman–Kittel–Kasuya–Yosida mechanism is not responsible for ferromagnetism in Cu and Ag doped ZnO as the increase in carrier concentration due to Al co-doping does not enhance the ferromagnetism. Finally, possible mechanism behind the ferromagnetism is discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We studied the influence of annealing conditions on magnetic and thermal properties of Finemet-type alloys. The evolution of the Curie temperature, Tc, and the change of heat capacity in the vicinity of this magnetic transformation, ΔCp Tc, were investigated using Differential Scanning Calorimetry, DSC. Relaxation of atomic structure of amorphous phase during the annealing was accompanied by an increase in Tc and decrease in ΔCp Tc. Two relaxation processes with different mechanisms take place in amorphous state: topological ordering and chemical ordering. The study of the kinetics of relaxation process allows to estimate the apparent values of activation energy of both relaxation processes: 29 and 87 kJ/mol for ribbon, 37 and 112 kJ/mol for microwire. Precipitation of α-Fe nanocrystallites in amorphous phase leads to gradual degradation of the Tc peak. The Tc peak reduction is correlated to decrease of the amorphous phase as well as lowering of its magnetostriction. The influence of internal stress on the position and shape of the Curie peak was determined by comparing data for the ribbon-shaped alloys and glass coated microwires. Considerable magnetic softening and giant magnetoimpedance effect under heat treatment is observed in the studied Finemet-type microwires. Changes in magnetic properties after heating are associated with devitrification and stresses relaxation. We also study the influence of internal stresses induced by glass coating on the magnetic properties of as-prepared and annealed microwires. The results confirm the previously made conclusion that changes in the thermal and magnetic properties of Finemet-type alloys during heating are interrelated, since they are reflections of the fundamental characteristics of the material.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This work presents the preparation of novel microwave absorbing materials (MAMs) based on a combination of two hard ferrites decorated with MWCNTs, namely (SrFe10CoTiO19@MWCNTs and BaFe10CoTiO19@MWCNTs) with or without coating with polypyrrole (PPY). The hard ferrites cores are prepared using the combustion method, while the shell of PPY is deposited by oxidative polymerization method on the ferrite core. X-ray diffractometry (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and vector network analysis (VNA) are performed for microstructural, magnetic and electromagnetic characterization of the MAMs. Also, this work investigates the influence of the chemical nature of hosting matrix and loading percentage on the microwave absorbing characteristics of the MAMs. Results indicate that MAMs exhibit quite different microwave absorbing characteristics depending on the chemical nature of the hosting matrix (polyester vs paraffin). The presence of polar groups in polyester resin has beneficial effects on the microwave absorbing characteristics by enhancing the minimum reflection loss (RL). The frequency of the minimum RL is also blue-shifted by 0.5 GHz when passing from paraffin to polyester hosting matrix. Also, coating the ferritic core with an appropriate amount of polypyrrole as a dielectric shell reduces the loading percentage necessary to obtain promising RL characteristics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The process of phase formation during short-term (80 and 120 min) high-energy ball milling of Fe84B16, Fe80B20, and Fe70B30 powder mixtures was studied by Mössbauer spectroscopy. Hyperfine field Bhf on the nuclei of resonant atoms as a function of the number of boron atoms (nB) in the nearest neighborhood of Fe atoms was also found to be a linear function of nB and for nB = 5–11: Bhf = 33.7 – 2.7nB.© 2019Magnetic skyrmions are swirling nanometric spin textures, which have attracted extensive attention by virtue of their potential applications as information carriers for future memory technology and spintronic devices. Here, we investigate the effect of strain gradient on the in-plane current-driven motion of magnetic skyrmion in a nanotrack. It is found that a longitudinal strain gradient will induce a transverse velocity with its value linearly proportional to the strain gradient. As well, we find that skyrmions can be accelerated or decelerated by the boundary of nanotrack. This behavior depends on the repulsive force induced by boundary and the topological number of skyrmion. Our results not only explain the effect of strain gradient, but also show the influence of the boundary on the skyrmion motion. This work may provide a guide for designing and developing the racetrack memory based on magnetic skyrmions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This current investigation builds upon previous results (Ma et al., 2018), which have shown that LaMnO3 is a novel Dirac half metal with multiple Dirac-like cones. In this work, a new R3¯c phase material, TbNiO3, with 100% spin-polarization and robust multiple Dirac-cones has been focused on. By means of first-principles and quasi-harmonic Debye model, its electronic, magnetic and thermodynamic properties have been studied, and also, the effects of uniform strain and on-site Coulomb interaction U on its electronic structures have been discussed. Moreover, the magnetic states, including FM, NM, and AFM, were fully considered in a 1 × 1 × 1 unit cell and two superlattice cells, i.e., 1 × 1 × 2 and 2 × 2 × 1 systems. We hope this work will trigger further research about R3¯c type Dirac half-metallic materials with multiple Dirac cones in experimental and theoretical regions.© 2019In this study, we report frequency and temperature dependent dielectric, electrochemical impedance and low temperature magnetic properties of Sol-gel auto-combustion synthesized rare-earth (Ce and Sm) co-substituted cobalt ferrite, CoCexSmyFe2-x-yO4 (x = y = 0.00, 0.1, 0.12 and 0.25). The surface morphology and particle size as obtained by XRD studies was confirmed by HRTEM measurements for a representative sample. The dielectric properties such as dielectric constant, loss tangent and AC conductivity have been measured using LCR meter, variation of dielectric parameters with substituent concentrations, frequency range from 0.1 to 10 MHz at room temperature (RT) and temperatures 100–400 °C have been well supported by Maxwell-Wagner interfacial polarization. The AC conductivity increased with applied frequency suggesting that the conduction mechanism is owing to small polaron hopping between cations. Impedance studies shows that, the addition of RE (Ce and Sm) cause a decrease in the Z′ value, with increasing frequency which can be attributed to the space charge polarization effect in the material. Low temperature magnetic measurements in ZFC-FC mode and magnetic isotherms at 20 and 310 K reveals the ferromagnetic nature of RE (Ce, Sm) substituted cobalt ferrite nano particles. The coercive field has been increased at low temperature 20 K compared to that at 310 K, the samples shows super paramagnetism beyond room temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We present the synthesis and a detailed investigation of structural and magnetic properties of polycrystalline Ba(TiO) Cu4(PO4)4 (BTCPO) via X-ray diffraction, magnetic susceptibility, heat capacity, and 31P Nuclear Magnetic Resonance (NMR) measurements. BTCPO has a 2D layered structure with interlinked Cu4O12 tetramer units. A broad maximum is observed around 16.5 K in our magnetization data accompanied by a sharp anomaly around T = 9.5 K in the heat capacity. An anomaly at about T = 10 K is also found in the temperature dependence of the 31P NMR spin-lattice relaxation rate 1/T1. A power law behavior for the heat capacity as well as for the 31P 1/T1 below the ordering temperature could be obtained. The 31P NMR lineshape is asymmetric and the NMR shift tracks the bulk spin-susceptibility. We estimated the isotropic and axial components of the hyperfine coupling tensor to be as the Ahf iso⋍6794Oe/μB and Ahf ax⋍818Oe/μB, respectively.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, the reverse gate leakage current mechanism of ultrathin InAlN/GaN high-electron mobility transistors on Si (1 1 1) substrate which treated with and without surface treatment process is systematically investigated. Current-voltage (I-V) measurement in temperature range from 273 K to 473 K and capacitance-voltage (C-V) measurement under 300 K are used to analyze the main leakage mechanism. For the whole reverse bias region (−30 V to 0 V), the best reasonable fitting calculation results correspond to the experimental values is based on trap-assisted tunneling (TAT) current mechanism, which indicates the dominant reverse leakage current of the ultrathin InAlN/GaN HEMTs device is derived from TAT current. N2 plasma surface treatment method is proposed to optimize the interface of the Schottky contact, which is an important way to reduce the reverse leakage current examined by the extracted values of trap energy levels (φt) and thermal activation energy (Ea) as well as XPS results. Further, for high reverse bias condition, electric field saturation across the barrier layer is not sufficient to support the slow rise trend of the TAT current, a modified electric field model was proposed to accurately explain this phenomenon.© 2019We present an efficient method to tailor propagating spin waves in quasi-confined systems. We use nanocontact spin-torque nano-oscillators based on NiFe/Cu/Co spin-valves and study the ferromagnetic and spin-wave resonances (FMR and SWR) of both layers. We employ homodyne-detected ferromagnetic resonance spectroscopy, resembling spin-torque FMR, to detect the magnetodynamics. The external field is applied in-plane, giving a parallel configuration of the magnetic layers, which do not provide any spin-transfer torque. Instead, the excitation is caused by the Oersted field. By varying the thickness of the bottom Cu electrode (tCu) of the devices, we tune the current distribution in the samples, and thereby the Oersted field, which governs the spin wave characteristics. Both the average k-vector and the bandwidth of the SWR increases as tCu increases.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of melt-spun Co-Ge intermetallic alloys have been investigated over a wide range of compositions Co62+xGe38−x (x = 0, 1, 2, 3, 4, 4.7, 8 and 18). The research is practically motivated by inconsistencies in the literature data regarding phase equilibria in the Co-rich part of the Co-Ge phase diagram. We resolve these contradictions by showing that the structural and magnetic properties of Co62+xGe38−x melt-spun alloys depend on the cooling rate, the composition, and, as a result, on the lattice parameters of the phases present. A new orthorhombic phase with a high Curie temperature of 805 K has been observed and reported for the first time.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.It is shown that the precise temperature dependence of the spontaneous magnetization depends on the domain structure and, additionally, on the macroscopic dimensions of the sample. In the multi-domain zero-field ground state of cubic ferromagnets (or antiferromagnets) with half-integer spin, thermal decrease of the spontaneous magnetization is by universal T2 function up to crossover to critical power function. Power functions of temperature that hold over a large temperature range and are independent of spin structure are the typical indication that the spin dynamics is controlled by a boson field. For the magnets with half-integer spin, the T2 function means a three-dimensional boson field. In the mono-domain state prepared by ferromagnetic saturation, all moments are oriented parallel to the field axis. For this one-dimensional spin configuration the boson field can be anticipated to be one-dimensional and the spontaneous magnetization should decrease according to universal T5/2 function (for S = half-integer). However, only for sufficiently large samples the T5/2 function is confirmed. For smaller samples successive crossover events in the sequence T2 → T3/2 → T5/2 can occur for increasing temperature. Occurrence of boson fields with a higher dimensionality (T2, T3/2) in the state of ferromagnetic saturation can be explained by scattering processes of the bosons at the inner surface of the sample. When the diameter of the sample is less than the mean free path of the bosons, all bosons will be reflected (or scattered) at the inner surface of the sample and the resulting boson field can become three-dimensional (T2 universality class). A one-dimensional spin orientation due to the applied demagnetization field but a three-dimensional boson field that controls spin dynamics is possible only for the T2 universality class because there is nearly no interaction between boson field and spins (magnons) in this universality class. With increasing temperature the mean free path of the bosons decreases and only a fraction of the bosons gets scattered at the inner surface of the sample. Crossover to T3/2 function and, eventually, to T5/2 function then can occur. A similar situation as for the polarized ferromagnets is observed in the axial-symmetric zero-field ground state of the hcp ferromagnet cobalt. Only for sufficiently large samples scattering of the bosons at the inner surface of the sample is of no importance and the intrinsic T5/2 function, typical for parallel alignment of all spins, shows up. The mean free path of the bosons can be estimated to be of the order of a few mm for T → 0.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents a novel design and fabrication concept for a fully reflective architecture-based focus-tunable micromirror lens without translating constituent mirrors. The lens system consists of two mirror elements: a microelectromechanical-system varifocal spherically deformable convex micromirror and a fixed-focal spherical concave micromirror. After the fabrication and optical characterization of the two individual mirrors, they are vertically integrated 4 cm apart, with their own optical-axis alignment, for the realization of the lens system. The mirror lens system, comprising a 20-mm-diameter concave primary micromirror with a fixed focal length of 70.8 mm and 4-mm-diameter deformable convex secondary micromirror actuated by electromagnetic force as the driving component of the entire system, allows a focal-length tunability of ~74 mm via the application of an input controlling current of 0.8 A to the solenoid. The focusing performance of the realized micromirror lens system is evaluated. Despite speckle noise in the focused images, which possibly originates from the geometry of the mirror components, the varifocal micromirror lens is demonstrated to be feasible with regard to fully reflective and non-movable mirrors.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe report for the first time the implementation of SiGe buried stressors in the context of research and development of an advanced foundry FDSOI process and the observation of improved transconductance and current drive performance of n-channel FDSOI MOSFETs. Epitaxial SiGe stressors grown by CVD at Applied Materials were incorporated under the buried oxide of 300 mm FDSOI wafers by Soitec using lower temperature SOI bonding, splitting and thinning processes and the wafers were subsequently processed through an FDSOI development line at GLOBALFOUNDRIES. The use of FDSOI with buried stressor under the BOX eliminates the risk of extended defects in the epitaxial SiGe layer penetrating up into the SOI channel and also provides an opportunity to obtain a high level of strain in any semiconductor on insulator. A 70 nm thick SiGe buried stressor with 20% Ge is shown to provide a 10% improvement in Idsat at a fixed Ioff for n-FETs with 20 nm gate length and transconductance, gm is correspondingly improved by 15%.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe report that using a high/low p-type junction anode structure results in improved hole injection over a uniformly-doped p-anode layer in GaN pin junction diodes. Quasi-vertical diodes with a 20 nm thick, magnesium concentration of 2 × 1020 cm−3 layer on top of a 480 nm thick layer with a magnesium concentration of 1018 cm−3 show greatly increased forward current density – >100× higher – than those with a 500 nm thick uniformly 3 × 1019 cm−3 Mg-doped p-layer. Forward knee voltage and ideality factor are reduced by a factor of more than two, and reverse leakage current density is also reduced. Additionally, the specific differential series resistance is reduced significantly. With photoluminescence measurements, we found that these improvements are largely due to improved p-GaN material quality of the high/low junction sample with lower average Mg concentration.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper deals with a radiation hardening technology for the logic in a commercial CMOS bulk process and the possibility to develop a radiation-hardened (RH) logic standard cell to design RH-integrated circuits (ICs) for a total ionizing dose (TID) environment. We designed a RH logic structure that can be used in a standard I/O cell form by expanding/modifying the RH I-gate n-MOSFET, which was complemented with the IC design complexity of conventional RH n-MOSFETs with a layout modification technique. The radiation-tolerance characteristics of the RH inverter, NAND and NOR were predicted and verified using the radiation effects 3D modeling and simulation (M&S) technique. The RH logic chip was fabricated in SKhynix/Magnachip 0.18 um CMOS process. The test evaluation of the TID effects on the chip was conducted using Cobalt 60 Gamma-ray of 10 kGy(Si)/h for 2 h. As a result, up to total dose of 20 kGy(Si), a radiation damage of the regular logic and a radiation tolerance characteristics of the proposed logic were confirmed. These results will contribute greatly to the design of ICs for nuclear power plants as well as for military and space applications.© 2019Detecting high-concentration gases is challenging by metal oxide semiconductor (MOX) gas sensors, because the voltage signal would become saturated. In order to solve this problem, the zooming p + n field-effect transistors (FETs) circuit has been designed, combining an n-type enhancement-mode FET (EMFET) and a p-type depletion-mode FET (DMFET). This designed zooming p + n FETs can endow MOX gas sensors with the high signal resolution of ~3.0 V/decade to the 100–2000 ppm (part per million) acetone gas, triple that of MOX gas sensors without FETs (~0.8 V/decade). Meanwhile, this zooming technology is also suitable for detecting other gases at high-concentration, such as 1%–20% LEL (lower explosion limit) methane. The principle of zooming p + n FETs is that with increasing the gas concentration, the suppressing role of the EMFET is firstly induced leading to a reduced signal resolution to the low-concentration target gas; then its suppressing effect becomes saturated and the DMFET starts to switch from ON state to OFF state in the high-concentration target gas, resulting in an amplifying effect herein and thus an enhanced signal resolution. This circuit is promising for the high-concentration gas detection as well as for the multi-functional gas detector design.© 2019In this letter, we propose a unified method to extract the effective mobility (μeff) of In0.52Al0.48As/In0.7Ga0.3As/In0.52Al0.48As single-quantum-well (SQW) metal-insulator-semiconductor field-effect-transistors (MISFETs). The proposed method relies only on the measured high-frequency scattering-parameters (S-parameters) of the MISFETs in the linear regime. Two key metrics of MOS devices, intrinsic output conductance (go_i) and intrinsic gate capacitance (Cg_i), were extracted directly from the measured S-parameters using two-port network parameter theories, allowing us to compute the effective mobility of the MOS devices. Since the method only requires the small-signal S-parameter measurement data, it would be applicable to any kind of FETs and could be fruitful for studying the dependence of the effective mobility on lateral electric field intensity.© 2019 Elsevier LtdDue to the persistent reduction of semiconductor device dimensions, the design has a major influence on the performance characteristics of novel vertical field effect transistor (FET) structures. Thus, one objective of this paper is to design the local connection areas to meet electrical requirements on a minimal area while still providing a large surface area. The considered test structure has electrical connections at the contact bottom and at the sidewall. The electrical properties of two contact trenches, which may realize source and drain areas, their metallization as well as intermediate doped areas are characterized and evaluated based on models and measurements. The proposed method of determining the resistance of both the interface and the diffusion area allows for detecting and preventing significant impurities. In order to realize the required small structure dimensions and their functionality, different diffusion area widths from 0.3 µm to 0.8 µm and different trench depths up to 2.5 µm are investigated. It is shown that the contact sidewalls significantly influence the resistance above the trench depth. On the other hand, it is proved that the contact trench bottom of the considered structure has an influence of 3 Ω on the total resistance of the diffusion region. The results obtained by simulation, Scanning Spreading Resistance Microscopy, and by the model calculation match closely, which thus offer promising approaches for the characterization of FET structures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have provided a new and simple coating strategy to fabricate high-performance metal-based magnetic composites exhibiting both high magnetic inductions and decreased core loss. High-purity submicron FeCo particles have been dispersed into silicone resin to form a magnetic insulating film, which is then coated uniformly on the particle surface of high-purity Fe powders with a particle size of 170 μm to form new-type Fe-based soft magnetic composites (SMCs). These insulated magnetic layers containing submicron FeCo particles in these Fe-based SMCs can maintain very high saturated magnetization (209 A·m2·kg−1) for the composites, and also result in their low core loss. For traditional metal-based SMCs, the low core loss is often obtained accompanying with seriously decreased magnetic inductions. In present work, both high magnetic inductions and decreased core loss in company with high compacted density are achieved in these Fe-based SMCs coated with magnetic insulating coating layers. Specifically, the extremely low eddy current loss occurring in these new Fe-based SMCs enables their latent applications in low-loss and high-power magnetic devices.© 2019 Elsevier LtdMultiple arrays of Si nanowires are required for high performance applications with high current drive requirements. Densely packed arrays are significantly affected by electrostatic screening effects deteriorating the DC and AC performance of the individual nanowire (NW). This study compares the impact of screening effects in single gate, double gate and gate all-around nanowire FETs with nanosheet FETs based on experimental data and calibrated TCAD simulation results. Moreover, evolving the NW array into nanosheet transistors turned out to yield superior performance and thus might be a candidate for future high performance electronics. We identified NW pitches of less than four times the NW diameter to be critical for the performance of an individual NW in the array with a NW performance degradation of up to 50%. However, the performance gain by having more NWs within the same area in a densely packed array overcompensates the performance drop of the individuals NWs in the array.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the correlation between the microstructure and magnetic properties for (Nd0.8Ce0.2)1.6Fe12Co2BTix (x = 0~2 wt%) alloys are investigated. The results reveal that proper Ti addition tends to result in relevant improvements of magnetic properties by microstructure refinement, especially in the coercivity Hcj. It is shown that the enhanced maximum energy products (BH)max of 14.5 MGOe and coercivity Hcj of 6.63 kOe have been obtained with Ti content at x = 0.5 and x = 1.5, respectively. The magnetic domain structures show that the Ti-doped alloy with the regular and homogeneous domains structure with stronger contrast is in charge of the better magnetic performance and give the evidence for the increase of domain width Dw and domain wall energy γw resulting in a strong increase of exchange coupling interaction.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The kagome lattice of copper ions in francisite-type compounds is quite sensitive to external stimuli, being easily affected by temperature and magnetic field. The rare-earth ions inserted between buckled layers of transition metal add new dimension to magnetism in these systems. Neodymium francisites, Cu3Nd(SeO3)2O2X (X = Cl, Br), experience long range magnetic order at TN = 34 K (Cl) or 35.2 K (Br) and spin reorientation transition at TR = 4 K (Cl) or 4.6 K (Br) marked by sharp anomalies in magnetization M, specific heat Cp, and optical spectra. The spin reorientation of Cu2+ ions is due to d-f interaction of transition and rare-earth magnetic subsystems. Under action of modest external field B < 2 T both compounds exhibit metamagnetic phase transition, largely hysteretic in case of Cl compound at T < TR.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we have developed analytical surface potential and threshold voltage model of nanowire reconfigurable Field Effect Transistor (FET) which acts as a biosensor to detect the biomolecules, based on dielectric modulation approach. Due to its reconfigurable behavior, it acts as both p-type and n-type depending on the polarity of the biasing and hence find wide spread applications in the field of Programmable Logic Arrays (PLAs). The same is employed here as a bio sensor device with split gates and a cavity for biomolecules immobilization on a thin layer of silicon dioxide as adhesive layer. When the biosensor interacts with the bio targets of the cavity, the electrostatic properties of the device including variation in potential profile and threshold voltage shift get affected and thus have been identified as detection metric in this present work. The characteristic trends of the biosensor are studied with varying height, dielectric constant and charge of the bio-species as polarity of the applied biases change. In addition to this, sensitivity of nanowire RFET is analyzed by assessing the threshold voltage variation which is further compared with equivalent MOSFET biosensor. All the analytical results obtained are corroborated with technology computer-aided-design (TCAD) simulation data to verify the precision of our model.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe apply the virtual source concept to describe the DC current-voltage characteristics of organic thin-film transistors. The draining of charge carriers from the virtual source is calculated using emission-diffusion theory. The electrical characteristics of organic thin-film transistors are commonly analyzed employing a drift mobility that is enhanced by the transistor overdrive. One possible origin of such a mobility model is charge trapping. We show that the direct parametrization of the fraction of mobile to total charges including trapped ones allows for a straight forward adaptation of the virtual-source emission-diffusion theory to organic electronics capable of describing measured transfer and output curves with a small number of parameters. The resulting model offers an alternative parametrization of well-known bias and temperature dependences. Beyond others, a limited charge injection does not arise from the high-field bulk saturation velocity but from the unidirectional thermal velocity and the charge carrier mean free path is a critical model parameter. Moreover, diffusivity replaces the drift mobility as the current scaling factor, which would lead to slightly different predictions for the current-voltage curves in the case that the Einstein relation is not valid.© 2019 Elsevier LtdBoth traditional dual direction SCR (TDDSCR) and deep well gate-controlled dual direction SCR (DGC-DDSCR) are designed and fabricated in a 0.5 μm CMOS process. The ESD performance of the DDSCR device is predicted and verified by two-dimensional device simulation and transmission line pulse test results. The results show that when the TDDSCR changes the distance between the electrode N+ and the trigger surface P+(D4), the holding voltage increased from 10.1 V to 13.53 V, and the failure current remains stable (13.9A). The RS485 bus requires that the trigger voltage and the holding voltage of the ESD device be greater than 14.4 V, while TDDSCR is still unable to meet the on-chip ESD protection requirements for RS485 bus. However, when DGC-DDSCR increases the gate length (D4) of the anode and cathode, the holding voltage increases from 10.21 V to 15.18 V, and the failure current remains 14.63A. The test data has met the on-chip ESD protection requirements of the RS485 bus, and the size optimization problem of the DGC-DDSCR is discussed. The device has a strong current handling capability (91.25 mA/μm).© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper we investigate the optimized design of a short channel gate-all-around-junctionless (GAAJ) metal-oxidesemiconductor field-effect-transistor (MOSFET), including the source-drain extensions, by means of genetic algorithm solutions applied to a compact current-voltage analytical model. In fact, due to the complex device structure, it seems useful to exploit a metaheuristic-based approach to search the optimal combination of the fundamental geometrical and physical parameters that lead to an improved performance. Through this analysis, different parameter constraints are imposed for the calculation of specific objective functions. In particular, for a fixed gate-drain bias level, the task pursues the maximization of the drain current and cut-off frequency while limiting the short channel (SC) effects. The MOSFET series resistance is also evaluated in the transition region of the Id – Vgs characteristics which appear, however, strongly affected by SC effects. The accuracy of the model is verified by comparison with experimental data reported in literature.© 2019In this paper, the switching noise of Super-junction MOSFET in full bridge converter system has been investigated. According to the experimental results, the largest noise is induced by the steep reverse recovery current variation (dirr/dt) during the Super-junction MOSFET body diode reverse recovery. In order to understand the phenomena, the TCAD simulations and analyses have been carried out. It is found that the reverse recovery currents in the cell region and the termination region combine to result in the steep dirr/dt. The current in cell region aggravates the current variation, however, the current in termination region contributes to alleviate the current variation. Furthermore, it is also shown that increasing the hole injection level in termination region can alleviate the dirr/dt, and then the switching noise is reduced effectively. Finally, an optimized structure with heavily doped main junction in the termination region is proposed for the SJ-MOSFET, which can increase the hole injection efficiency greatly to reduce the switching noise during the Super-junction MOSFET body diode reverse recovery.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe LDMOS-based silicon controlled rectifier (SCR) is commonly used in high voltage (HV) electrostatic discharge (ESD) protection due to its great current handling capability per area and HV protection ability. In this paper, an improved LDMOS-based dual direction SCR (LDMOS-DDSCR) device is designed by replacing floating N+ region with electrically-connected P+, N+ and P+ regions to enhance its ESD robustness, which is verified in a 0.5-μm (1p2m) 18 V HV CDMOS process. The internal mechanism of the proposed device is analyzed using two-dimension (2D) TCAD simulations, and the ESD performance is characterized by means of transmission line pulse (TLP) and very-fast TLP (VFTLP) measurements. Compared with the conventional LDMOS-DDSCR, the failure current of the compact LDMOS-DDSCR raises from 2.00 A to 4.02 A (increased by 101%), and the trigger voltage reduces from 44.28 V to 39.76 V, without sacrificing layout area. Furthermore, the TLP I-V curves of the proposed LDMOS-DDSCR are measured at different temperatures ranging from 25 °C to 125 °C, which proves its reliability and show potential use in the applications of high voltage integrated circuits.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this article, we provide a detailed study of structural, magnetic properties and magnetocaloric effects of the perovskite manganite compound. The preparation of the sample made according to the sol-gel method. The compound stabilizes in the rhombohedral structure with a R3-c space group. The discussion of magnetic properties of this sample is made, depending on the magnetization and the inverse of the susceptibility. Phase transition from a paramagnetic (PM) to a ferromagnetic (FM) was presented by the magnetization measurements as a function of temperature at a Curie temperature Tc = 244 K, under an applied magnetic field of 0.05 T. The associated magnetic entropy change resolution ΔSM as well as the relative cooling power (RCP) are made from the measured magnetization data of La0.67Ca0.33Mn0.98Ni0.02O3 sample depending on the applied magnetic field. The maximum entropy change reaches a significant value of 8 J·kg-1Â·K-1 and RCP = 217 JÂ·kg-1 observed at 5 T magnetic field, Then, 4 J.kg-1Â·K-1and RCP = 43 JÂ·kg-1 reached when a magnetic field of 1 T was applied.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetoelectric (ME) nanocomposite flexible films composed of electroactive poly(vinylidene fluoride-hexafluoropropylene) (P(VDF-HFP)) and ferromagnetic cobalt ferrite (CoFe2O4) are fabricated. Single-phase nano CoFe2O4 with cubic spinel structure, synthesized by sol-gel auto combustion technique, is reinforced in different weight percentages to fabricate P(VDF-HFP)-CoFe2O4 films through spin coating technique. Effect of CoFe2O4 on structural, morphological, magnetic, ferroelectric, magnetoelectric properties, and giant magnetoresistance (GMR) behavior has been investigated. It is observed that the reinforcement of CoFe2O4 in P(VDF-HFP) matrix has strongly influenced the formation of β-phase conformation and the degree of structural order. The co-existence of ferroelectric and ferromagnetic orderings in the films has been demonstrated by the P-E and M-H plots. The variations in the polarization effects in the presence of a magnetic field provide the evidence for magnetoelectric cross-coupling in P(VDF-HFP)-CoFe2O4. The films exhibit a GMR effect from 7% to 100%. In order to demonstrate the use of ME induced GMR in magnetic field sensing, P(VDF-HFP)-CoFe2O4 film (10 wt%) is used in a prototype sensor circuit. A good sensing ability and linear response obtained prove that the prepared film can be used as field sensor.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The present work reports the room temperature crystal and magnetic structure, temperature dependent magnetization, Raman spectroscopy and dielectric studies of the polycrystalline indium doped barium hexaferrite (BaFe10.5In1.5O19). Room temperature neutron diffraction measurement shows that the prepared sample is in single phase and possesses a ferrimagnetic structure. The magnetization versus temperature (χ-T) measurement revealed that the sample undergoes paramagnetic to ferrimagnetic transition at around 410 K. High temperature Raman spectroscopy shows distinct changes in the modes around the magnetic ordering temperature establishing the presence of strong spin phonon coupling. Dielectric studies also showed the anomaly around the magnetic transition, which is a clear signature of magneto dielectric coupling at 410 K. The system thus shows coupling between magnetic and dielectric properties mediated through the spin-phonon coupling.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The influence of P on amorphizing ability, as-quenched microstructure, thermo-physical and soft magnetic properties of Fe–rich (i) Fe81B15-xPxSi2Nb1Cu1 (ii) Fe82B14-xPxSi2Nb1Cu1 and (iii) Fe83B13-xPxSi2Nb1Cu1 (x = 0, 2, 4, 6, 8 at%) melt-spun alloys are investigated. The substitution of P improves amorphization of alloys and restricts the formation of hetero-amorphous microstructure for Fe 83 at% ribbons at around (x = 8). The improvement in short range ordering of P containing clusters with varying Fe content has been discussed within the framework of Cluster-Glue atom model and supported by experimental thermal parameters. The optimal P content in Fe-rich alloys in the range of 4 ≤ x ≤ 6 delivered favourable thermal properties of high primary and secondary crystallization onset temperature viz; Tx1, Tx2 and temperature span ΔT between these onsets. The P substitution drastically restricts the precipitation of secondary crystallites with reduced enthalpy of secondary crystallisation (ΔH2) during annealing and favourably assists in attaining maximum magnetic moment during the primary crystallization stage. Moreover, the P substitution (4–8 at%) effects refinement of α-Fe nanocrystallites and promotes low coercivity (Hc < 20 A/m) in nanocomposite alloys. On contrary, the P substitution linearly reduces saturation magnetization (Ms) by weakening ferromagnetic exchange coupling and ferromagnetic dilution. An optimal content of 4 at% P offers favourable combination of low Hc and High Ms in both amorphous and nanocomposite state.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this study, cobalt ferrite (CoFe2O4) nanoparticles were synthesized by a novel sol-gel auto-combustion in the simultaneous presence of ethylene glycol and agarose as complexing agents, and their effects on the structure, morphology, and magnetic properties of this ferrite were investigated. All synthesized nanoparticles were structurally and morphologically characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), field emission scanning electron microscopy (FE-SEM), and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR) methods. The results confirmed that the single-phase spinel CoFe2O4 nanoparticles were obtained. Analysis of the XRD patterns was carried out by Rietveld refinement technique to estimate the particle size, lattice parameter, and the cation distribution between the tetrahedral and octahedral sites. The Rietveld refinement data revealed that the simultaneous presence of ethylene glycol and agarose reduced the average size of crystallites. Moreover, FE-SEM micrographs showed that the agglomeration of the nanoparticles was reduced by the addition of these agents. Magnetic characteristics of the synthesized nanoparticles were characterized by a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The results revealed that the saturation magnetization and coercivity could simultaneously be increased by the proper addition of ethylene glycol and agarose, so that these magnetic properties can be used to design magnetic coding and sensing devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have carried out a detailed first principles electronic structure calculations for d4 double perovskite iridates Ba2ScIrO6 and Sr2ScIrO6. Our calculations reveal that the ground state of both the systems to be magnetic contrary to the expectation of Jeff=0 nonmagnetic state induced by strong spin-orbit coupling. Our exact diagonalization calculation with two site many body Hamiltonian suggests that hopping induced delocalization of holes leads to the formation of local moments in these systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.CoCrxCuFeMnNi high-entropy alloy powders (HEAPs) with a supersaturated solid solution structure were successfully synthesized via a mechanical alloying technique, and the microstructure and magnetic properties were investigated. After 30 h of milling, one supersaturated solid solution phase with an FCC structure was formed in the CoCuFeMnNi HEAP. The 50 h-ball milled CoCuFeMnNi HEAP had high saturated magnetization (84 emu/g) and low coercivity (6 Oe), indicating that the powder exhibited superior soft magnetic properties. In addition, an asymmetrical displaced hysteresis loop was also observed in the CoCuFeMnNi HEAP, and the shift ΔHs was about 2.3 Oe. When the Cr content increased to 1.5 and 2.0 mol, the structure of HEAPs was composed of FCC and BCC phases. The soft magnetic properties gradually decreased as the Cr content increased because of the decrease in the content of ferromagnetic components and the formation of the BCC phase.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Complex magnetic behavior of pristine, partially reduced graphene oxide aerogel with C/O ratio of 2.35 (EDS) with full analysis of oxygen rich groups attached to the surface is reported. Purity of the system was confirmed by three techniques: elemental analysis, EDS, EPR at 4.2 K none of them detected traces of transition metal ions, especially iron and manganese. Computer tomography reviled the inside foam structure, showing different stacking inside and at the surface, as well as some structural defects. The foams morphology was confirmed by SEM. Electric measurements show linear voltage current relationship and temperature dependences which could be described in the framework of variable range hopping model. Magnetic susceptibility measurements exhibit very weak ferromagnetic behavior modified by antiferromagnetic interactions and paramagnetism. EPR study confirms two component paramagnetism of Curie and Pauli type.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Substitution effects on weak itinerant electron ferromagnetism in Cr-based ternary alloy CrAlGe were investigated. It was found that substitution of Cr by 3d transition metal with more electrons than Cr enhanced the spontaneous magnetization and Curie temperature. In addition, the itinerancy of CrAlGe was suppressed with the increase of electrons. The ferromagnetism of CrAlGe was related to electron number rather than lattice parameters. The origin of change of itinerancy was suggested to be Coulomb force caused by effective nuclear charge.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetism of nano-graphene layer within Ising model was studied. All results were obtained by using Monte Carlo simulation based on Metropolis algorithm. By applying external magnetic field at room temperature, a gradual transition between ferromagnetic and paramagnetic phases was obtained. This indicates to a potentiality of such a monolayer to be used as a magnetic field sensor. The existence of hysteresis, was established, which strongly depends on the type and magnitude of the interaction strength between the nearest neighbor lattice nodes (spins). Gradual two-step transition between ferromagnetic and paramagnetic phases near absolute zero temperature, was obtained. The results of numerical simulations are in agreement with the available experimental works of other authors.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper describes new developments in the positive-feedback model (PFM) of ferromagnetism. An extreme simplification of the model requires only algorithms for the calculation of the major hysteresis loop, the first-order reversal curve (FORC), and one more for nth-order reversal curves (NORCs) where the order can have any integer value n>1. The way in which quantum–mechanical (QM) bistability, domain-scale, and macroscopic processes interact to produce the observed macroscopic behavior is explained in detail. The theory is presented in QM variable-spin form, making it possible to model weakly ferromagnetic and nanoparticle materials as well as the strongly ferromagnetic materials typically used in power engineering. In the latter case, the theoretical expressions are even further simplified. The PFM now incorporates a “built-in” inversion capability, so that it works equally well for either a defined input vector of reversal fields [Hr] or of reversal magnetizations [Mr]. For practical utility, the model also introduces a simple way of incorporating magnetostriction effects, which are especially important in electrical steels.© 2019The control of magnetic properties by electric current in nanoscale devices is critical for advanced applications of spintronics. Here, we study the anomalous Hall effect in amorphous TbFeCo/Ta/MgO structure for various dc sense currents using the Hall bar pattern. The aspect ratio of the Hall bar structure is changed by simply interchanging the current and voltage terminals. It is found that the increase in the sense current decreases both the anomalous Hall resistivity and the coercivity in the TbFeCo. The decreasing trend of resistivity and coercivity with sense current is unusual which is explained on the basis of Joule heating and spin-orbit torque. In addition, a simple analysis is performed to relate the magnetization switching speed as a function of dc sense current.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have measured the magneto-optic (MO) properties of film-type bismuth substituted yttrium iron garnets (Bi1.5:YIG, Bi1.5Y1.5Fe5O12) prepared by using metal-organic-decomposition (MOD) method on glass substrates at the 1310-nm and 1550-nm wavelengths. The Verdet constant of the Bi1.5:YIG film in the unsaturated linear magnetization region has been experimentally determined from a sensitive measurement of the Faraday rotation of the Bi1.5:YIG films with a lock-in amplifier and an auto-balanced photoreceiver under alternating magnetic fields. The Bi:YIG films have been deposited on silica glass substrates without any buffer layer and with one of buffer layers of Bi1Y2Fe5O12 (Bi1:YIG) and Bi1Fe4Ga1Nd2O12 (Bi1:NIGG) which are used to compensate mismatch of the lattice constant and thermal expansion coefficient between the film and substrate. The maximum value of the measured Faraday rotation of the Bi1.5:YIG film was over 94.6 and 156.5 °/cm for an applied unsaturated magnetic field of 100 Gauss at wavelengths of 1310 and 1550 nm, respectively, when it was prepared at annealing temperature of 700 °C and annealing speed of 1 °C/min. The absorption coefficients of the Bi1.5:YIG films were measured to be 70 cm−1 and 330 cm−1, respectively, at each of the wavelengths, and the average Gilbert damping coefficient of the Bi1.5:YIG film with a Bi1:NIGG buffer layer was measured to be 6.42 ± 18.09 × 10−4 (with the minimum value of 0 and the maximum value of 24.51 × 10−4) from a conventional ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) measurement system. Our experimental result indicates that the magneto-optic property of the Bi:YIG films prepared by the MOD method is unstable and fluctuates from run to run although its average magnetic property may be useful for application to compact integrated optical isolators under an easy solution-based fabrication process.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We observe an exchange bias at low temperatures in polycrystalline ferrimagnetic MgFe2O4 (MFO) films grown on Si(100), emerging from Antiferromagnetic (AFM)-like interactions at defect sites, concentrated predominantly at the grain boundaries. In this report, we show it is possible to utilize these AFM interactions to get enhanced spin transport utilizing the spin Seebeck effect (SSE). The temperature dependence of the SSE signal in two films with different defect densities allowed us to identify a unique temperature window for both films where an enhanced SSE signal was observed. Such enhancement has been reported in different Ferromagnet (FM)/AFM bilayer systems, but its observation in a single layer hosting both FM-AFM interactions makes our results attractive. Temperature dependent SQUID magnetometry revealed two distinct regions of strong and weak coupling for the FM-AFM interactions. The weak coupling region is characterized by a distribution of AFM energy barriers (ΔE), which can modify the spin conductance across the FM-AFM boundary and hence, affect the spin transport. Indeed, we find that the same functional form fits both the ΔE distribution and the SSE temperature evolution for both films. This study should aid in the understanding of SSE in the large class of polycrystalline materials with inherent growth induced defect densities and illustrate the significance of magnetically disordered phases in spin transport.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Numerical results of spin-wave resonance excitations and spin-wave propagation in the meander-type YIG waveguide are presented. By the variation of the in-plane magnetization angle, we show that ferromagnetic resonance spectra essentially depend on the total height of the meander in the case of different magnetic field orientation with respect to meander segments. We demonstrate that the gradients of inhomogeneous static magnetic fields can lead to the effective generation of short-wavelength dipole-exchange waves having non-resonant spatial distribution. We show that the collective and localized spin-wave modes can be simultaneously excited in 3D magnonic crystals. We believe that obtained results will provide the basis for the development of 3D-elements for reconfigurable magnonic and spintronic devices with extended frequency tunability.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.New (0.5)Bi0.70A0.30FeO3–(0.5)PbTi0.5Fe0.5O3 (A = Sr2+, Pb2+, and Ba2+; denoted as A30-Fe50) binary solid solutions with multiferroic properties were synthesized via solid-state method. X-ray diffraction and a subsequent Rietveld analysis of the data for solid solutions confirmed the presence of multiphase (R3c, Pm3¯m & P4mm) in the binary systems. Deconvoluted Raman spectra helped us to understand the variation of phonon modes. The overlapping and weakening of modes are ascribed to the structural changes/transformation whereas modes’ shifting is attributed to the changes in average atomic mass at A/B-sites. The magnetic properties of the binary systems showed an increase in average magnetization. We found a systematic increase in magnetization of binary systems which correlates well with the size variance (ri; Ba2+ > Pb2+ > Sr2+ > Bi3+) effect introduced in BiFeO3 phase and the highest magnetization was observed for Ba30-Fe50 binary system. Moreover, Pb30-Fe50 and Ba30-Fe50 systems exhibited enhanced magnetization compared to the sum of constituent phases while the Sr30-Fe50 system exhibited the average trend of saturation magnetization. This improvement in magnetic properties of solid solutions can be attributed to the suppression of spin spiral modulated structure as well as possible changes in Fe–O local environment which effects the superexchange interaction. Moreover, Pb30-Fe50 binary system exhibited improved dielectric and ferroelectric properties which can be attributed to the existence of lone pair ion Pb which has high polarizability and a higher percentage of tetragonal symmetry in the system. Thus, a significantly high magnetization, high value of dielectric constant, small dielectric loss, and a good ferroelectric response of Pb30-Fe50 system makes it the best among the three studied systems and a promising candidate from an application point of view.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetism of Fe-Ni system is calculated from the first-principles. Results show that the atomic magnetic moments are determined by their local surrounding atoms. In both FM and AFM cases, the Fe atomic magnetic moment declines with increasing number of Fe atoms in its local surroundings. The relation between atomic volume and atomic magnetic moment indicates that Fe-rich local surroundings would cause relatively small volumes. Our work is of significance to understanding the relation between the local surroundings with anomalous thermal expansion coefficient in the Invar alloy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The EuTi1−xAlxO3 (x = 0.05, 0.1 and 0.15) compounds exhibit the ferromagnetic state. A giant reversible MCE of EuTi1−xAlxO3 (x = 0.05, 0.1, 0.15) compounds was observed, which was attributed to the increase of ferromagnetic ordering. With increasing the Al content, the value of −ΔSM max is increased from 11.6 J/kg K to15.6 J/kg K for EuTi1−xAlxO3, and the RC values are 48.4 J/kg for EuTi0.95Al0.05O3, 53.1 J/kg for EuTi0.9Al0.1O3 and 58.2 J/kg for EuTi0.85Al0.15O3 with magnetic field change 0–1 T. Additionally, the maximum value of ΔTad is 4.7 K for EuTi0.85Al0.15O3 compound as magnetic field changes 1 T. The EuTi1−xAlxO3 with giant −ΔSM, large RC and large ΔTad suggest an important material for magnetic refrigerant at low-temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper focus on the magnetic fluid levitation force received by a permanent magnet immersed in magnetic fluid under the magnetic field created by the magnet itself. A more understandable equation for calculating the magnetic fluid levitation force is derived using magnetic fluid stress tensor, and the equation concentrates on the boundary interface between magnetic fluid and surroundings. The magnetic fluid spikes appearing over the interface between magnetic fluid and air caused by the surface instability of magnetic fluid is taken into consideration, and the dependence between magnetic fluid levitation force and magnetic fluid spikes is studied. Two groups of experiments are designed, both theoretical analysis and experiments show that the magnetic fluid levitation force relies on the magnetic fluid spikes which indicates that the magnetic fluid spikes can be used to evaluate the magnetic fluid levitation force for the self-levitation of a permanent magnet. The equation presented in this paper are clear in physical meaning and easy to understand.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Discussed in this work are the microstructure, magnetic properties, and exchange bias in (Mn0.7Co0.3)65Sn35 alloy ribbons. After annealing, the crystalline grains grow distinctly from ~0.93 μm to ~8.41 μm. The surface of ribbon samples becomes more regular and dense. The ribbons reveal a ferromagnetism with the Curie temperature TC ~ 169 K, which is determined from the thermomagnetic M(T) measurements. The maximum magnetic entropy change ~4.5 J kg−1 K−1 is obtained around ferromagnetic-paramagnetic transition under the field change of μ0ΔH = 0–7 T. Large exchange bias field of μ0HEB = 80 mT is achieved at T = 2 K when the cooling field is μ0HCF = 0.2 T. The reasons for the appearance of ferromagnetism and large exchange bias effect are discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, we have developed a process to stabilize La2NiMnO6 (LNMO) nanorods via hydrothermal process using cetyl trimethylammonium bromide as a capping agent. One dimensional morphology (nanorods) of LNMO leads to MnO6 octahedral expansion that contributed to the overall expansion in LNMO unit cell. Large shape anisotropy of nanorods carries structural (unit cell) modification in the form of horizontal and vertical tilt of NiO6 and MnO6 octahedra along the c axis. Large saturation magnetization Ms is observed for LNMO nanorods as compared to that of their bulk and nanoparticles. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) analysis confirmed the large Ms values observed for nanorods could be attributed to mixed valence states of magnetic ions at B-site (Mn3+, Mn4+, Ni2+, Ni3+). The optical studies of LNMO nanorods shows that the observed band gap (Eg: 1.9 eV) is considerably larger than band gap reported for bulk LMNO (Eg: 1.2–1.4 eV). The enhanced saturation magnetization of nanorods is consistent with a structurally ordered single phase material with very few antisite defects.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents a GPU-parallelized 2.5D micromagnetic solver for the efficient calculation of the magnetization configuration and hysteresis loop of 3D random distributions of magnetic thin-film objects, strongly interacting in the space. To well-reproduce complex shapes, the exchange field is calculated with a finite difference approach able to handle non-structured meshes. To enable the treatment of many objects, the magnetostatic field is locally separated into two contributions: an internal and an external one. The first term includes the magnetostatic interactions internal to each object and is obtained by numerically solving the Green's integral equation. The second term describes the inter-object magnetostatic interactions and it is determined by approximating each object as a collection of magnetic dipoles, associated with mesh elements. The accuracy and computational efficiency of the solver are analysed by comparison to a standard 3D-FFT code and to a reference code, where all the magnetostatic field terms are evaluated by numerically solving the Green's integral equation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) device employing inverse Heusler alloy as electrode has great potential for application in spintronics. In this work, we performed first-principles calculations combined with nonequilibrium Green's function to study the spin transport properties of Heusler alloy based Ti2CoGe/MgO/Ti2CoGe MTJ with various atomic terminations. The calculated interface free energy (γ) indicates that TiCo-terminated interface could be easily formed than TiGe-terminated interface, and the interface containing pure Ge atom is the most favorable owing to its lowest γ. Spin transport calculations reveal that tunnel magnetoresistance (TMR) ratio in MTJ with natural TiCo terminated interface (1.58 × 104) is higher than that with natural TiGe-terminated interface (2.99 × 103). When the interfacial Ti atom in TiCo-terminated interface is substituted by Co atom, the transport ability of majority spin electrons is promoted. Moreover, our calculation indicates that the MTJ with the interface containing pure Co atom possesses the largest TMR ratio of 9.51 × 105. Our work paves the way for the fabrication of Ti2CoGe based MTJ for practical application in spintronics.© 2019A lattice-based Monte Carlo model is used to investigate the ordering conditions necessary to produce the ordered Co3Pt phase (mm2). In this phase, Co and Co50Pt50 atomic layers alternate along the c-axis of the parent hexagonal structure. It is found that perpendicular ordering where the Co and Co50Pt50 layers alternates, is strongly correlated with in-plane ordering of the Co50Pt50 layers. In these layers the Co atoms and Pt atoms form alternating rows in parallel. Such atomic ordering within the plane is only facilitated by a deformation of the hexagonal lattice such that the ratio between the atomic spacing transverse to the row and along the row, b/a, becomes significantly smaller and the structure becomes orthorhombic. At adequate lattice spacings and b/a ratio, both in-plane ordering and perpendicular ordering occur simultaneously. In addition, the Co50Pt50 layers are also staggered alternately, forming a structure with the Imm2 space group. The ordered Co3Pt with Imm2 symmetry is also found to be sensitive to changes in the Pt composition.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Here, we report the results of structural, magnetic, thermal and magnetocaloric properties of ErCoSn compound. The compound undergoes an antiferromagnetic (AFM) ordering around TN = 4.6 K and magnetic correlation is observed above TN, up to T = 11 K. Below TN, a spin-glass state was observed for ErCoSn due to an apparent coexistence of ferromagnetic (FM) interaction with long-range AFM order. External applied magnetic field induces a first-order-like metamagnetic phase transition from AFM to FM state that is responsible for the large values of the maximum isothermal entropy change (−ΔM max = 16.5 J/kgK@50 kOe) and adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad = 8.2 K). Furthermore, short-range ferromagnetic correlation above TN contributes to the widening of −ΔSM and ΔTad peaks as well as the increase of the ErCoSn compound refrigerant capacity. The results indicate attractive properties of this compound for magnetic refrigeration at cryogenic temperatures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A half-metal is an ideal spin source to realize extremely large magnetoresistance effects because of the completely spin-polarized density of states at the Fermi level, and Heusler alloy is a material class for which several compositions are known to exhibit half-metallic properties. Current perpendicular-to-plane (CPP) giant magnetoresistance (GMR) effect is a resistance change that depends upon the relative angle of the magnetization vectors in magnetic layers separated by thin non-magnetic layer(s), which can be utilized for magnetic sensor applications. Over the last decade, the resistance change of CPP-GMR has been found to enhance greatly when using half-metallic Heusler alloys. In this article, the history of Heusler alloy based CPP-GMR is briefly reviewed, including the authors’ recent results on the analysis of the spin asymmetry coefficients based on the Valet-Fert model. Finally, the degradation of half-metallic spin polarization at interfaces is discussed and a future prospect is described.© 2019The dynamic properties of magnetic vortices in single nanopillars, such as the gyrotropic orbital radius and frequency, have been shown to be well-modeled by the Thiele equation. Similarly, a set of coupled Thiele equations also describe synchronization of two or more interacting free layer vortices. Here the Thiele equations are used to model vortex dynamics in linear chains of alternating radius (where nearest-neighbor free layer have different radii) free layer oscillators, which is a system of interacting non-identical oscillators that can synchronize and lock onto a common frequency. For vortices interacting as magnetic dipoles it is shown that there are critical nanopillar separations below which the oscillator chain will synchronize. As the nanopillar separation increases, it is noticed that there is a narrow region of parameter space where synchronization is temporarily lost owing to phase slips and at larger separation synchronization is lost completely. The relation between the critical separation and the free layer radii difference is also estimated analytically.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this report, structural, electronic, magnetic and transport properties of quaternary Heusler alloys CoRuMnGe and CoRuVZ (Z = Al, Ga) are investigated. All the three alloys are found to crystallize in cubic structure. CoRuMnGe exhibits L21 structure whereas, the other two alloys have B2-type disorder. For CoRuMnGe and CoRuVGa, the experimental magnetic moments are in close agreement with the theory as well as those predicted by the Slater-Pauling rule, while for CoRuVAl, a relatively large deviation is seen. The reduction in the moment in case of CoRuVAl possibly arises due to the anti-site disorder between Co and Ru sites as well as V and Al sites. Among these alloys, CoRuMnGe has the highest TC of 560 K. Resistivity variation with temperature reflects the half-metallic nature in CoRuMnGe alloy. CoRuVAl shows metallic character in both paramagnetic and ferromagnetic states, whereas the temperature dependence of resistivity for CoRuVGa is quite unusual. In the last system, ρ vs. T curve shows an anomaly in the form of a maximum and a region of negative temperature coefficient of resistivity (TCR) in the magnetically ordered state. The ab initio calculations predict nearly half-metallic ferromagnetic state with high spin polarization of 91, 89 and 93% for CoRuMnGe, CoRuVAl and CoRuVGa respectively. In the case of CoRuMnGe, the XRD analysis reveals that the Co and Ru sites are equally probable. Hence, to investigate the electronic properties of the experimentally observed structure, the Co-Ru swap disordered structures of CoRuMnGe alloy are also simulated and it is found that the disordered structures retain half-metallic nature, high spin polarization with almost same magnetic moment as in the ideal structure. Nearly half-metallic character, high TC and high spin polarization make CoRuMnGe alloy promising for room temperature spintronic applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic, magneto-volume properties and bonding analyses of binary intermetallic FeNi and its nitride FeNiN have been investigated within density functional theory DFT. From total energy calculations and establishing the energy-volume equations of states (EOS) the ground state of both compounds is ferromagnetic with a reduced magnetization of the nitrided intermetallic due to spin pairing between Fe/Ni and N. The volume expansion indicates that iron shows itinerant magnetism, whereas Ni exhibits a localized behavior. Important magneto-volume effects are observed whereby saturation of the magnetic moment is reached in FeNi but not in FeNiN. The chemical bonding shows Ni-N and Fe-N contributions to the stability of the nitride systems. However, this bonding, which reduces magnetization around experimental volume, loses its effect at large volumes where magneto-volume influence prevails again as in FeNi.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Two-step grain boundary diffusion processes (GBDP) were carried out to obtain the diffused magnets with excellent magnetic properties and high thermal stability, using Dy and Al coated films as diffused sources in turn, prepared by magnetron sputtering. It is found that through the two-step diffusion with Dy/Al films, the highest coercivity, up to 1382 kA/m is achieved, increasing by 42.3% compared to as-prepared magnet, moreover, the maximum energy product is improved significantly as well. Besides, whether for as-prepared magnets or one-step diffused magnets with Al film and Dy film, respectively, the thermal stability and magnetic properties of two-step diffused magnet with Dy/Al film, are the highest among magnets. Microstructural investigation reveals that Dy is preferred to diffuse along the RE-rich phase and forming the “shell” of (Nd, Pr, Dy)2Fe14B phase around the outer region of main phase, restraining the nucleation of anti-magnetization domain, while the Al tends to locate in the RE-rich region, playing the role of modifying the interface between RE-rich phase and 2:14:1 main phase. Eventually, the temperature coefficient of coercivity (|β|) and remanence (|α|) with 0.65%/K and 0.12%/K, can be obtained, respectively.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.SrTi0.5Mn0.5O3 (STMO) is a chemically disordered perovskite having random distribution of Ti and Mn over 1b site. Striking discrepancies about the structural and magnetic properties of STMO demand detail analysis which is addressed. To explore the magnetic ground state of STMO, static and dynamic magnetic properties were studied over a broad temperature range (2–300 K). The dc and ac magnetization shows a cusp like peak at Tf ~ 14 K, which exhibits field and frequency dependence. The thermoremanent magnetization is characterized by using stretched exponential function and characteristic time suggests the existence of spin clusters. Also, the other features observed in magnetic memory effect, muon spin resonance/rotation and neutron powder diffraction confirm the existence of cluster spin glass state in STMO, rather than the long-range ordered ground state. Intriguingly, the observed spin-relaxation can be attributed to the dilute magnetism due to non-magnetic doping at Mn-site and competing antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic interactions resulting from the site disorder.© 2019The generalized gradient approximation (GGA) scheme in the first-principles calculations is used to study the effect of L21 and XA ordering on the phase stability, half-metallicity and magnetism of Co2FeAl (CFA) Heusler alloy. Various possible hypothetical structures: L21-I, L21-II, XA-I, and XA-II are prepared under the conventional L21 and inverse XA phases by altering the atomic occupancies at their Wyckoff sites. It is found that the XA-II phase of CFA is the most stable phase energetically among all the structures. The electronic structure calculations without U show the presence of half-metallic (HM) ground state only in L21-I structure and the other structures are found to be metallic. However, the electronic structures of CFA are significantly modified in the presence of U, although the total magnetic moments per cell remained the same and consistent with the Slater-Pauling (SP) rule. The metallic ground states of CFA in L21-II and XA-II structures are converted into the half-metallic ground states in presence of U but remained the same (metallic) in XA-I structure. The results indicate that the electronic structures are not only dependent on the L21 and XA ordering of the atoms but also depend on the choice of U values. So experiments may only verify the superiority of GGA + U to GGA.© 2019We present a method to directly obtain the pure inverse spin Hall effect (ISHE) signal without the spin rectification effect (SRE) signal in ferromagnetic metal(FM)/nonmagnetic metal(NM) bilayers. This method is based on a fact that the distribution of the induced microwave current is largely dependent on the geometries of the samples. The ISHE signal can be maximized through shaping the samples and tuning the magnetic field directions, while the SRE signal can be minimized below the detection limit. This provides also a fast and simplified method to measure the ISHE signal in a wide frequency range. The spin Hall angle of Ta in a Py/Ta bilayer is −0.027 ± 0.015 in a wide frequency range.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We present a study about the structural and magnetic properties of Ni-doped yttrium iron garnet nanopowders synthesized by sol-gel. The Rietveld refinement of the X-ray diffractograms indicates the replacement of Fe by Ni in the tetrahedral (d) and octahedral (a) sites of yttrium iron garnet (YIG) structure. The lattice parameter showed variation associated to the effects of Ni inclusion and structural defects, such as, oxygen vacancies. The morphological analysis evidence particles with a cylindrical shape and the Energy Dispersive Spectroscopy results corroborate the presence of Ni. The average porosity suggests that the replacement of Fe by Ni does not substantially change the textural properties of the particles. The Fourier transform infrared and Raman spectroscopies showed the characteristic absorption bands of YIG and confirmed the substitution in the a-sites and d-sites. The saturation magnetization was studied from the hysteresis loops measurements and present variations with the dopant concentration, associated to the replacement of Fe by Ni and to the oxygen vacancies occurrence. Changes in the coercive field for different dopant concentration were associated to the particle size and pinning centers existence.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Molecular spins have shown genuine quantum properties, both as collections of independent units and as individual objects. Their properties and performances can be engineered at molecular level, while advanced technologies to coherently manipulate magnetic objects and to address them with unprecedented spatial and energy resolution have emerged in the last years. Here we address the question on how to exploit quantum features of molecular spins for quantum sensing. To this end, we summarise some basic ideas and discuss some examples where molecular spins can play a role in the field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The diamagnetically levitated electrostatic micromotor (DLEM), in which five degree of freedom of the levitated pyrolytic graphite rotor are stabilized by permanent magnets except its rotational degree of freedom around the main axis, was studied. The DLEMs were fabricated by using Micro-Electro-Mechanical Systems (MEMS) process and precision machining. The levitation properties of DLEM, which have been analyzed by the finite-element method (FEM) software Ansoft Maxwell 3D, were proved by the levitation experiments. Based on our designed measurement and control system, we successfully realized the continuous operation of the axial variable-capacitance motor by open-loop and closed-loop control. For DLEM1 device, under the fixed frequency and variable frequency open-loop logic with driving voltage of 43 V in air, the achieved rotational speed is 15.4 r/min and 70.0 r/min, respectively. For DLEM2 device, under the variable frequency open-loop and closed-loop control with driving voltage of 30 V in air, the achieved rotational speed is 46.9 r/min and 26.8 r/min, respectively. Experimental results show that the motor presents high reliability under the closed-loop rotational control.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ti3C2 MXene is highly desirable as a potential microwave absorbent due to its positive dielectric loss ability. However, lack of magnetic loss for pure Ti3C2 MXene results in unbalanced electromagnetic parameters and poor impedance matching. In this paper, the laminated Ti3C2 MXene was synthesized using HF etching process. Then, the magnetic FeCo-decorated Ti3C2 MXene (FeCo-Ti3C2 MXene) composite was fabricated for the first time via a in-situ hydrothermal method. The incorporation of magnetic FeCo nanoparticles on Ti3C2 MXene can enhance microwave absorption property. Specifically, the FeCo-Ti3C2 MXene composite displayed a broad effective bandwidth (RL < −10 dB) of 8.8 GHz with only 1.6 mm. This excellent microwave absorbing performance was mainly attributed to strong microwave attenuation ability and improved impedance matching. The results of this work confirm that the FeCo-Ti3C2 MXene composite could be favourable as highly competitive microwave absorbent.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The thickness-driven spin-reorientation transition of Co/Au(1 1 1) is studied via in situ Kerr microscopy. On varying the premagnetization conditions in external field of in-plane or normal orientation, the magnetic switching into a final remanent state from an in-plane field is investigated. The quantitative analysis of the Kerr rotation derived from Kerr microscopy images allows the determination of the population of different magnetic phases as a function of thickness. Coexisting magnetic phases with preferred in-plane and out-of-plane magnetization orientation are identified. The overall switching behaviour is explained by thermal activation of magnetic domains. We show that there is a population of orthogonal bistable magnetic domains, which can be remanently switched between out-of-plane and in-plane orientation by the appropriate magnetic field. This quantity is related to the intersection of the population of states for in-plane and out-of-plane magnetization.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Recently, layered silicene with intercalated rare-earth atoms has been successfully fabricated in the experiment and the magnetic property has attracted much attention. We systematically investigated the structural, magnetic and topological properties of silicene with adsorbed rare-earth adatoms by first-principles calculations. The rare-earth adatoms prefer to occupy the hexagonal sites of silicene and the systems possess giant magnetic anisotropy with out-of-plane easy axis. When the on-site Columb repulsion is included, magnetic anisotropy reaches 18.5, 14.7 and 17.2 meV for Nd, Sm and Er adatoms onto silicene respectively. The giant magnetic anisotropy can be explained from the Hamiltonian model of spin excitation. When spin-orbital interaction is included, a topological band-gap of 51.0 meV is opened for the Gd-adsorbed silicene. The system has nontrivially topological phase and possesses quantum anomalous Hall conductivity with C=1. Our study will benefit the future applications of silicene-based systems in spintronics and quantum devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We theoretically study the spin current and spin-transfer torque (STT) generation in a conventional spin-valve hybrid structure of type ferromagnetic/normal metal/ferromagnetic (FM/NM/FM) made of topological insulator (TI), in which a gate voltage is attached to the normal layer. The spin current densities and the STTs are oscillatory functions of the chemical potential and the length of the NM spacer. We investigate the penetration of the spin-transfer torque into the right ferromagnetic layer and show that, unlike the case of graphene FM/NM/FM junction, the spin-transfer torque in TI is very sensitive to the chemical potential of the NM region. As an important result, all STT components can be controlled with varying the chemical potential of the NM spacer and/or varying the magnetization directions. Interestingly, both the resonance spin current and the resonance spin-transfer torque appear for energies determined from a resonance equation. By increasing the chemical potential of the NM spacer the amplitude of the STT oscillations decreases, while in the heavily doped regime, there are intervals of the chemical potential over which the spin current and the spin-transfer torque become zero. As a highlighting feature, we found that a beating pattern of the STT oscillations, occurs for some certain values of the chemical potential of the NM spacer. Our findings could open new perspectives for applications in spin-transfer torque magnetic random access memory (STT-MRAM) devices based on TI.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The critical behavior of the antiperovskite crystal Fe3.4In0.6N has been systematically studied in this paper. We have used a modified Arrott plot, the Kouvel-Fisher method, and critical isotherm analysis to obtain the critical exponents (β, γ and δ) which suggest that a long-range magnetic coupling described by mean-field (MF) theoretical model is dominant in Fe3.4In0.6N. The experimental M−T−H relations below and above Curie temperature (Tc) collapse into two branches by the single scaling equation m = f±(h) (m and h are renormalized magnetization and field), respectively. The critical exponents are confirmed by the Widom scaling law δ = 1 + γβ−1. In addition, it is suggested that the ferromagnetic (FM), anti-ferromagnetic (AFM) interactions and the magnetic disorders result to the exchange distance which is obtained just as J(r)∝r-4.4.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents new investigations of high magnetic field (HMF) effects on phase and structural transformations as well as historical development of the problem. The regularities of structure evolution under simultaneous action of heat treatment and high magnetic field have been studied on different alloys. It was shown, that magnetic field can affect thermodynamics and kinetics of transformation, which results in changes in the phase composition, crystallographic texture, rate of transformation, morphology of precipitating particles, and other effects. The observed phenomena strongly depend on magnetic properties of phases involved into transformation such as magnetic moment, magnetic susceptibility, magneto-crystalline anisotropy, magnetostriction. The review comprises the main results of modern researches into the influence of magnetic field of tens Tesla on the phase and structural transformations in materials with different type of magnetic ordering. Further research directions of HMF effect on the thermally activated transformations are proposed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of polycrystalline La1- xCaxMn0.9Cu0.1O3 (0.02 ≤ x ≤ 0.4) have been investigated in detail. All samples show a clear ferromagnetic-paramagnetic transition. The Curie temperature TC decreases with increasing Ca-dopant. Inverse susceptibility of all the samples deviates from Curie-Weiss law above TC, indicating the presence of a short range ferromagnetic and/or antiferromagnetic ordering state in the paramagnetic background. For 0.02 ≤ x ≤ 0.2, the upward deviation is attributed to antiferromagnetic interactions, while the downward for x ≥ 0.3 samples is caused by a Griffiths-like behavior, which is suppressed by an applied field. A charge ordering transition associated with an antiferromagnetic phase is detected in x ≥ 0.3 samples, the melting of which results in a spin reorientation transition and a new FM phase. Finally, the phase diagrams of this manganite system have been established.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The neutron-scattering measurements and the observation of hyperfine interaction of nuclear moments in Pd2MnGe alloy have prompted a study of disorder in this compound by the density functional theory methods. Two approaches: the coherent-potential approximation (CPA) and supercell modelling were used to gain microscopic insight into the electronic and magnetic properties of disordered Pd2MnGe. The influence of disorder between Pd and Mn sublattices in Pd2MnGe on the magnetic moment of Mn atoms is discussed. The presented CPA studies have shown that the small disorder in Pd2MnGe (between the Pd-Mn sublattices of the L21 structure) does not well describe the experimental evidence of antiparallel alignment of magnetic moment of Mn at positions (A,C) and B positions. However, the appearance of antiparallel moment of Mn at positions A and B was predicted for the Pd2MnGe in the frames of 128-atoms supercell calculations. The generalized gradient approximation (GGA) has been the main basis for the presented supercell first-principles electronic structure calculations. The magnetic moment of Mn(A,C) is found to be small and negative value of −0.177 µB. The values of magnetic moment of Mn(B) are between 3.6 µB and 3.72 µB. The results obtained for the supercell calculations are consistent with available experiments in the literature. The results of presented calculations in the supercell approach have shown that the disordered Pd2MnGe can be predicted as a mixture of several supercells.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The structural, magnetic and transport properties of the layered RBaCo2O5.5±δ cobaltites are sensitive to the oxygen stoichiometry. In this present study, we report the presence of a low-temperature magnetic glassy state in electron-doped polycrystalline YBaCo2O5.5 cobaltite. The ac magnetization studies show the absence of conventional spin glass features, while the various dc magnetization studies demonstrate the presence of non-equilibrium magnetic glassy state at low temperature. The magnetic glassy state of this sample results from the kinetic arrest of the first order ferro (or ferri) to antiferromagnetic transition. The role of electron doping in the occurrence of magnetic glassy phenomena is discussed in terms of magnetic phase separation involving the Co3+/Co2+ clusters of the ferrimagnetic phase in the Co3+/Co3+ antiferromagnetic matrix.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report on temperature dependent magnetization and anisotropy properties, magnetic interactions at low temperatures, high temperature magnetic properties and frequency dependent dielectric properties of 0.3NiFe2O4–0.7Na0.5Bi0.5TiO3 nanocomposites. X-ray diffraction (XRD), Raman spectroscopy, scanning electron microscopy (SEM), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) techniques are employed to study the crystal structure, morphology and the chemical state of the NiFe2O4 (NFO) nanoparticles, Na0.5Bi0.5TiO3 (NBTO) nanorods and nanocomposites. XRD and Raman spectroscopy studies indicate the formation of NFO, NBTO and the nanocomposites in pure phase. SEM and TEM images indicates the presence of both nanoparticles (from NFO) and nanorods (from NBTO) in the 0.3NiFe2O4–0.7Na0.5Bi0.5TiO3 nanocomposites and the lattice planes with respect to both the phases are confirmed from the selected area diffraction pattern. Magnetization measurements at various temperatures (300 K, 40 K, 10 K and 2 K), field cooled (FC) and zero field cooled (ZFC) magnetization from 300 K to 2 K are measured for the nanocomposites. Saturation magnetization value at 300 K and 2 K for the nanocomposites is seen to be 14.62 emu/g and 16.80 emu/g respectively. Existence of spin glass behavior and competing magnetic interactions in the 0.3NiFe2O4–0.7Na0.5Bi0.5TiO3 nanocomposites is confirmed from the ZFC and FC magnetization studies. Curie temperature value for 0.3NiFe2O4–0.7Na0.5Bi0.5TiO3 nanocomposites is observed to be 900 K. Frequency dependent dielectric studies shows the relaxation behavior of the nanocomposites with two relaxation times of 5.803 × 10−2 s and 2.770 × 10−4 s arising from NFO and NBTO phases.© 2019 The AuthorsThe stability of a paramagnetic prolate or oblate spheroidal particle in a precessing magnetic field is studied. The bifurcation diagram is calculated analytically as a function of the magnetic field frequency and the precession angle. The orientation of the particle in the synchronous regime is calculated. The rotational dynamics and the mean rotational frequency in the asynchronous regime are also obtained. The theoretical model we describe enables the analytic calculation of the dynamics of the particle in the limiting case when the motion is periodic. The theoretical models were also compared with experimental results of rod like particle dynamics in a precessing magnetic field. The experimental results are in good agreement with the proposed theory.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the effect of Ni-substitution on the crystalline structure and the critical behavior of Nd0.6Sr0.4Mn1−xNixO3 (0.00 ≤ x ≤ 0.20) perovskite. X-ray diffraction patterns revealed that the major phase in all samples is the orthorhombic structure with space group Pnma. Rietveld refinement revealed a linear reduction in the lattice parameters along with monotonic reduction in the O2-Mn-O2 angel with increasing Ni concentration. The modified Arrott plots and the Kouvel-Fisher method have been used to analyze the magnetization isotherms near the paramagnetic to ferromagnetic (PM-FM) phase transition. The obtained critical exponents (β, γ and δ) revealed that the Ni-free sample is consistent with 3D-Heisenberg like behavior. However, upon Ni-substitution, the critical exponents exhibit a mean field like behavior. The reliability of the obtained critical exponent (β, γ, and δ) values have been confirmed by the universal scaling behavior of the isothermal magnetization near the transition temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we theoretically address the transverse Zeeman magnetic field effects on the frequency-dependent dynamical dielectric function of phosphorene including the refractive index and the absorption coefficient. An effective Hamiltonian model beyond the continuum approximation is employed to obtain the electronic dispersion energy. The linear response theory is applied to calculate the dynamical dielectric function at a certain temperature along both armchair and zigzag edges. Our numerical calculations show that, independent of the direction, the refraction (absorption) intensity decreases (increases) with the optical frequency at all magnetic field strengths. Moreover, we find out that the refraction and absorption processes along the armchair edge do not change after a critical magnetic field and this critical point increases with the optical frequency stemming from the spin-splitting effects. As for the zigzag edge, however, there is a little to no change for these processes with the magnetic field. Further, we observe that, on the average, the dominant contribution to the total magnetic field-dependent dynamical dielectric function comes from the armchair edge originating from the smaller (larger) carrier effective mass (velocity) than the zigzag edge. Tuning the optical responses of phosphorene with the transverse Zeeman magnetic field is useful for practical spintronic applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nanodimensional silica-based spin glasses of compositions xCoO-(100-x)SiO2 with x having values 20 and 30 were synthesized by sol-gel method within mesoporous silica SBA-15 (Santa Barbara Amorphous-15) having a pore diameter ~5.5 nm. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) analysis showed the presence of both Co2+ and Co3+ species within the glasses. This caused electronic conduction in this amorphous system. The nanoglasses exhibited resistivity values at room temperature which were about three orders of magnitude lower than those of the corresponding bulk glasses. The resistivity data for the nanodimensional glasses on analysis confirmed the conduction to arise due to small polaron hopping between the localized states represented by these ions with an activation energy in the range 0.08–0.07 eV. The inter-site separation values extracted from the analysis of the resistivity data were found to lie in the range 6.7–6.6 Å. The values of magnetodielectric (MD) parameter for the different nanocomposites were rather large with the highest value found to be in the range 523–49% for the frequencies 1 kHz and 1 MHz in case of nanocomposite with a glass composition 30CoO-70SiO2. The dissipation factor for the samples was, however, in the range 0.3–1.6. By using suitable measuring frequency the dissipation factor could be brought down to a value less than 1.0 with the M.D. parameter exhibiting values in the range 10–49%. The results were fitted to Catalan's model based on two dielectrics with different resistivity values connected in series. The satisfactory fit of the experimental data to the theoretical model based on a negative magnetoresistance of the nanoglasses leads to the conclusion that an enhancement of spin polarized electron hopping is the reason behind this effect. The results obtained should be further explored to find applications of these materials as magnetic sensors as well as magnetically controlled supercapacitors.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, an innovative air-bridge recessed source field plate is implemented into the fabrication of high voltage mm-wave GaN high-electron-mobility transistors (HEMTs). The device integrates a metal field plate (FP) and an air-bridge FP that locate over the gate region and land between the gate and drain. The reduced peak electric field contributes to a three-terminal breakdown voltage of 144 V for GaN HEMTs with LSD = 2.4 μm, which is 96 V for the normal mm-wave device. One order of magnitude lower in off-state leakage currents and well suppressed current collapse are also achieved. Particularly, slight increase in Cgs and Cgd was obtained after applying the air-bridge field plate, keeping the high frequency characteristic of mm-wave devices. The technology might attract significant attention in mm-wave GaN HEMTs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A partial substitution of Zn2+ for the Fe2+ site of BaY-type hexaferrite was found to be effective for the improvement of microwave absorption properties in 0.5–18 GHz. For this study, the composites of polycrystalline Ba2Fe2- xZnxFe12O22 (Ba2Fe2- xZnxY, 0.5 ≤ x ≤ 2.0) and epoxy resin were fabricated with various hexaferrite volume fractions (Vf) of 30–90%. As a result, Ba2ZnxFe2- xY (x = 0.5–1.5) composites having the partial substitution of Zn2+ exhibited larger complex permittivity values than fully Zn2+ substituted composite of Ba2Zn2Y (x = 2.0) due to an electron hopping between Fe2+ and Fe3+ ions. Because of the enhanced permittivity, Ba2Fe2- xZnxY (x = 0.5–1.5) composites with 30% of Vf possessed better impedance matching characteristics compared with other composites having larger Vf values. Consequently, Ba2Fe2- xZnxY (x = 0.5–1.5) composites exhibited excellent RL values lower than −50 dB with the thickness values ranging from 1.52 to 1.80 mm.© 2019Fast 180° magnetization switching is one of the main challenges for straintronics to be used in magnetic storage and logic. By deflecting the electrodes pair axis by a small angle from the long axis of a uniaxial multiferroic nanomagnet, the voltage pulse can directly induce the nanomagnet to complete repeatable 180° switchings without requiring a start-up time. The dynamic magnetization of the repeatable 180° switching in the nanomagnet and the optimal voltage pulse waveform is simulated through micromagnetic method. Is obtained by simulation calculation, when the electrodes pair axis tilting angle is about 5°, the required stress is small, the switching frequency is high, and the initial switching time is short, which is about 1/5 of the existing research scheme. The switching at room temperature is also calculated by a mathematical model. The switching time is longer under the influence of thermal fluctuations. These findings may provide guidance for the application of straintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Hot-deformed NdFeB magnets have attracted considerable attention due to their high thermal stability and exceptional corrosion resistance. In this study, the dependence of magnetic properties and recoil loops on the presence of a grain boundary phase (GBP) and Nd-rich secondary phases in hot-deformed NdFeB magnets was explored using micromagnetic simulations. By adjusting the parameters of the simulation model, the influence of several factors (thickness and spontaneous magnetization (Ms) of the GBP, Ms, total volume fraction and spatial distribution of the secondary phase), on the main and recoil loops was investigated. A change in thickness and in Ms of the GBP affects the coercivity (Hc) and remanence of the main loop. In particular, an increase of Ms leads to a decrease in the magnet's Hc. The influence of the secondary phase depends on its spatial distribution. Large volume grains result in lower Hc, but the role in decreasing Hc is weaker in contrast to a random distribution of smaller grains of the same overall volume content. Open recoil loops were interpreted by analyzing the distribution of calculated magnetic moments and energy terms. Loop opening is not directly related to Hc of the main loop. Rather it is mainly due to small irreversibilities in the dipolar energy of different magnetic configurations that appear along the recoil loop.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report on the fabrication, and magnetic properties of high saturation magnetic flux density (Bs) Fe76Si9B10P5 glassy alloy powder cores in which powder particles were electrically insulated by a thin layer of silicon oxide. Glassy Fe76Si9B10P5 alloy powders produced by the gas atomization technique were treated with silane coupling agent, which forms a thin silicone oxide layer on the powder surface. Toroidal shaped cores were prepared by spark plasma sintering (SPS) technique. Magnetization measurements revealed a slight decrease in the saturation magnetization from 164 emu/g (as prepared powders) to 161 emu/g after surface coating. We show that the powder surface coating is effective for decreasing the core loss at higher frequencies by suppressing the interparticle eddy currents. It is possible to have a high constant initial permeability (μi) of ~28 up to ~1.5 GHz by mixing with a small amount of resin. The constant permeability range can be extended to more than 3 GHz by completely insulating the powders electrically. Our results suggest that the metallic powder cores, which have the advantage of operating at higher Bs compared to ferrites can be used in the GHz frequency range by decreasing the powder particle size and electrically insulating the powders by coating their surface properly.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The mixed metal oxides have a significant increase in material science engineering applications. Mixed metal oxides of NiO/xFe2O3 nanoparticles (NPs) (x = 0.0, 0.3, 0.5, 0.7 and 1) were obtained by the mechanical mixing method, and their films were achieved by the drop coating method. Raman spectroscopy was used for identifying these NPs. Dielectric relaxation and ac conductivity behavior of NiO/xFe2O3 NPs (x = 0.0, 0.3, 0.5, 0.7 and 1) were studied. The dielectric constant, ε1, and the dielectric loss, ε2, for pure Fe2O3 NPs were found higher than that for pure NiO NPs. Moreover, with increasing the concentration of Fe2O3 NPs, the value of ε1 and ε2 increased in the mixed NiO/xFe2O3 NPs. The complex dielectric modulus the real, M1, and imaginary, M2, parts were investigated as well as the dielectric relaxation time. The total conductivity was investigated as a function of frequency for NiO/xFe2O3 NPs (x = 0.0, 0.3, 0.5, 0.7 and 1) then the improvement of its values was verified due to the addition of Fe2O3 NPs. The AC activation energy, ΔEac, was calculated, which increases (0.0081–0.0090) at a constant frequency of 1 MHz as Fe2O3 NPs content increased. These values of ΔEac reflected that the hopping conduction is the common current transport mechanism. On the other hand, the activation energy of the relaxation process, ΔEr, decreased (0.875–0.322) as a function of Fe2O3 NPs content increased.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The 0.5 mm-thick Fe-0.9 wt%Si-0.3 wt%Al non-oriented electrical steel sheets were successfully produced with one-stage and two-stage cold rolling methods. The comparative investigations were conducted on the relationships between the processing routes, microstructures, textures and magnetic properties. This study mainly focused on how to increase the grain sizes prior to cold rolling and its influences on subsequent microstructure and texture evolution. The results showed that the fine microstructure prior to final cold rolling led to the pronounced γ-fiber texture, fine recrystallized grains and deteriorated magnetic properties after final annealing. Nevertheless, by introducing a low-reduction cold rolling and intermediate annealing, coarse grains could be generated prior to the final cold rolling. When the cold rolling reduction was 11%, a relatively homogeneous microstructure composed of fully coarse grains was produced. The increased grain sizes promoted the generation of dense shear bands during final cold rolling, which served as the nucleation sites for λ-grains and Goss grains. This resulted in the improved magnetic properties due to the weakened γ-fiber texture, strengthened λ-fiber texture and Goss texture and increased grain sizes in the final annealed sheets. This work provided a new way to improve the magnetic properties of non-oriented electrical steels by controlling the grain sizes prior to final cold rolling.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Two carbonyl iron (CI)/polyimide (PI) composites (65:35 wt) with different CI particle geometry (flake like carbonyl iron FCI against spherical carbonyl iron SCI) were prepared. Due to the difference of demagnetization factor from the geometry anisotropy for SCI and FCI, the saturation magnetization Ms suppresses from 126 emu/g to 116 emu/g and the coercivity Hc from 25 Oe to 4.6 Oe. The geometry anisotropy of CI particles from spherical one to flake like one enhances the real part of permittivity and permeability loss of the CI/PI composites. The microwave absorption peak is shifted to lower frequency by 5.2 GHz for FCI/PI composite comparing to SCI/PI. A whole X and Ku bands (from 8.2 to 18 GHz) reflection loss (RL) < −5 dB absorption bandwidth is achieved in FCI/PI composite with thickness ≥1.2 mm and the minimum RL value of −19.28 dB appears at 11.62 GHz at thickness of 1.5 mm. The composites show excellent thermal stability with change of complex permittivity and permeability less than 7% after heated at 230 °C for 10 h.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Zn-substituted Z-type Sr hexaferrites (Sr3Co2− xZnxFe24O41, x = 0, 0.5, 1.0, 1.5) were prepared by solid-state reaction routes. The magnetic and high-frequency properties of the sintered bodies and powder–epoxy composites were studied. Almost-single-phase Z-type hexaferrite could be obtained in the sample calcined at 1160 °C and then sintered at 1210 °C. Double hysteresis behaviors were observed for the Z-type hexaferrites with x = 1.0 and 0.5. Gradual shifts of the μ' and μ″ spectra to lower frequencies accompanied with gradual increases in their intensities were observed with the increase in the Zn substitution content x, owing to the decrease in the magnetocrystalline anisotropy. Complex permeability and permittivity measurements of the Z-type hexaferrite–epoxy composites were performed using a network analyzer. The composites exhibited magnetodielectric properties with low loss factors (μ″ and ε″ ≈ 0) under 1 GHz and good electromagnetic wave absorption performances up to several gigahertz.© 2019The raw nano α-Fe2O3 powders consisting of nanorods with 50–100 nm in length and 8–14 nm in width exhibit superparamagnetism. The vacuum annealing of the raw nano α-Fe2O3 at 400 °C for 3 h leads to ferromagnetic-like behaviors at room temperature (RT), due to the appearance of ferrimagnetic Fe3O4. The α-Fe2O3/Fe3O4 composite structure has an antiferromagnetic α-Fe2O3 layer and a ferrimagnetic Fe3O4 layer contains a certain amount of Fe2+ and oxygen vacancies. In addition, nano α-Fe2O3 annealed in H2 at 300 °C for 3 h completely become Fe3O4. Some magnetic properties of the α-Fe2O3/Fe3O4, such as magnetization, magnetic remanence (Mr), coercivity (Hc) and exchange bias (EB), can be modulated almost reversibly and non-volatilely by applied external RT electric field without loop current. However, for both the raw nano α-Fe2O3 and the Fe3O4, these magnetic properties cannot be modulated by applied external RT electric field. The electric field control of magnetic properties for the α-Fe2O3/Fe3O4 should be due to the mechanism of phase transition induced by migration and redistribution of oxygen vacancies within the interface of α-Fe2O3/Fe3O4.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Bi(1−x)TbxFeO3 (x = 0, 0.03, 0.04, 0.06, 0.09, 0.12) nanoparticles are prepared by sol-gel method. X-ray diffraction analysis shows the formation of perovskite structure in the synthesized samples and crystallite sizes in the range of 15 nm. The perovskite structure together with the presence of a strong absorption peak observed at 545 cm−1 in the Fourier Transform Infrared Spectroscopy measurements, characteristic of FeO6 octahedral, confirms the formation of single phase BiFeO3 structure. The cycloidal spin nature of BiFeO3 is said to be suppressed in particles that are less than 62 nm across enhancing the ferromagnetic signature. The magnetic behaviour of the Bi(1−x)TbxFeO3 nanoparticles is found to change anomalously with change in Tb doping. Vibrating-sample magnetometer studies reveal a maximum in the magnetic moment for a Tb doping concentration of x = 0.03 with clear ferromagnetic order at room temperature. With increase in x beyond 0.03, magnetization decreases, while a further increase beyond x = 0.04 once again increases the magnetization. Room temperature Mossbauer spectroscopy reveals the presence of a paramagnetic doublet and a sextet, the variation of whose relative ratios is in corroboration with the magnetization studies.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The electric field-induced optical activity of monolayer phosphorene within the framework of effective anisotropic tight-binding model and the linear response theory is studied. The optical conductivity tensor is derived using the Kubo formula and an incident circular electromagnetic wave is applied perpendicularly to the phosphorene's plane. By dividing the optical frequency into three regimes, beneath, near and above the band gap, the electric-field-dependent measurement of the stretching and rotation angle of the polarization ellipse is investigated in details. Beneath the band gap, both reflected and transmitted lights are almost polarized linearly independent of the gate voltage, however, the polarization can be tuned via the electric field for the frequencies near and above the band gap. Our results show that, at certain electric fields, rotation angle 180° of the polarization ellipse belongs only to the frequencies above the band gap. Additionally, the absorption in phosphorene is possible up to a few percents, confirming the transparency of monolayer phosphorene. The findings here pave the way for setting up the real applications in optoelectronics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Fe-Si SMCs with different insulating layer (Fe2SiO4/SiO2) have been prepared successfully via sintering the oxidized Fe-Si powders at different temperature. We have investigated the effect of sintering temperature on microstructure and magnetic properties for the Fe-Si SMCs in detail. The insulating layer is mainly Fe2SiO4 when the sintering temperature is 800 °C and 900 °C. Noting that a three-shell insulating layer composed of Fe2SiO4 and SiO2 is formed when the sintering temperature reaches 1000 °C. However, excessive sintering temperature including 1100 °C and 1200 °C, will result in the generation of SiO2 and many Fe atoms. Thus, the core loss and quality factor increase with increasing the sintering temperature from 800 °C to 1200 °C except for 1000 °C due to the unique three-shell insulating layer, while the saturation magnetization increases gradually. And optimized magnetic properties including very low core loss of 169.7 mW/cm3, Ms of 183.6 emu/g, μe of 59 and Q of 6.9 have been obtained for the Fe-Si SMCs sintered at 1000 °C.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.An anomalous magnetic behaviour has been observed for transition metal (Fe, Co and Ni) based antidot nanostructures by modifying only the lattice geometry of the nanoholes array. A series of ferromagnetic, FM, antidot arrays have been fabricated by depositing them onto nanoporous alumina membranes with different pore diameters, d, varying in the range between 32 ± 2 and 93 ± 1 nm and maintaining fixed the inter-holes distance, Dint = 103 ± 2 nm, and layer thickness, t = 20 nm, but reducing the edge-to-edge separation between adjacent antidots, (W = Dint – d). A noticeable change of the in-plane coercivity dependence with W has been observed with an in-plane critical edge to edge distance, WC//, at which the in-plane coercivity behaviour with W is changed. In addition, for antidot samples with large W the in-plane hysteresis loops show single-step magnetic behaviour. Meanwhile, the INP hysteresis loops with W < WC// show multistep magnetic behaviour. The decreasing of the in-plane coercivity for FM-antidot samples with W < WC// is correlated with the increase of the out-of-plane contribution to the magnetic anisotropy i.e. increase the out-of-plane coercivity with increasing the nanohole size of antidots. These findings point towards a new nanotechnological strategy of fabrication arrays of magnetic bits, i.e., basic elements for magneto-optic perpendicular recording patterned media, embedded into a continuous 2D structural system and spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The Mn and Ni-doped type-I clathrates with nominal compositions of Eu8Ga15M1Ge30 (M = Mn, Ni) were prepared by the ARC technique. The incorporation of 3d metals into the cage frame leads to the decrease in lattice parameters. The compounds undergo a paramagnetic to ferromagnetic transition at 32.3 K for Eu8Ga15Mn1Ge30 and 32.5 K for Eu8Ga15Ni1Ge30, which are both about 2.5 K lower than that of the Mn/Ni-free Eu8Ga16Ge30. These transitions were identified to be second-order through the slope of the Arrott plot curves according to the Banerjee's criteria. In addition, the improvement of magnetic entropy change is observed due to doping. The maximum value of the magnetic entropy change -ΔSM max of Eu8Ga15Mn1Ge30 is 6.64 J/kg K around TC for a field change of 3 T. This magnetic entropy change is 14.5% higher than that of Mn/Ni-free Eu8Ga16Ge30. Mn-doping can result in a higher magnetic entropy change than Ni-doping. The -ΔSM max of Eu8Ga15Ni1Ge30 is only 6.13 J/kg K around TC for a field change of 3 T, in spite of the similar TC as Eu8Ga15Mn1Ge30. The estimated saturation magnetic moments per Eu2+ ion are 6.79 and 6.47 μΒ for Eu8Ga15Mn1Ge30 and Eu8Ga15Ni1Ge30, respectively. The lager saturation magnetic moment is the major reason for the higher -ΔSM max value of Eu8Ga15Mn1Ge30.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) can be used to transform electromagnetic energy into heat in hyperthermic treatment of cancer and other thermally activated therapies. The MNPs heating efficiency depends strongly on the combination of the MNPs’ structural properties and environmental conditions. MNPs hyperthermic yield is usually studied in diluted suspensions, although, in the actual therapy, the particles end mostly aggregated and fixed into cellular structures. In this work, the heating efficiency of low size dispersion Fe3O4 MNPs, defined as the Specific Absorption Rate (SAR), was studied in two conditions: liquid suspension (ferrofluid FF, typical characterization state) and gel matrix (ferrogel FG, mimicking biological application environment). The samples were characterized by TEM, ZFC-FC and SAXS. Their magnetic response to radio-frequency fields was measured by induction in order to obtain SAR values from the magnetization cycles area. 3D maps of SAR versus field amplitude and frequency were elaborated in order to compare the response of fixed and suspended MNPs. Structural characterization shows FG's MNPs agglomerated in a crystal-like mesostructure with a well defined interparticle distance. SAR results show a clear difference of behaviour between liquid and gel matrices, with larger SAR values for the FG sample indicating a lower resonance frequency, inside the studied region, for fixed MNP. Additionally, the local maximum suggested in FG's SAR map indicates a behaviour outside linear response regimen as expected for the applied field amplitudes.© 2019A 3.2 wt% Si non-oriented electrical steel (NOES) was processed using conventional rolling and annealing routes, i.e. hot rolling, hot band annealing, cold rolling, and final annealing. The evolution of texture during all the thermomechanical processing stages was investigated using electron backscatter diffraction (EBSD) techniques. It was found that the final annealing temperature and holding time had a profound effect on the texture. At higher temperatures and shorter holding times, the desired 〈1 0 0〉//ND (normal direction) texture was promoted, while the magnetically unfavorable 〈1 1 1〉//ND texture was weakened. The magnetic properties of the steel sheets were measured by Epstein frame method and magnetic Barkhausen noise (MBN) analysis, and it was found that the AC (alternating current) core losses of the NOES annealed at 850 °C for 60 min were comparable to grain-oriented electrical steel (GOES) with the same silicon content and the same sheet thickness, even in the rolling direction (RD). The DC (direct current) core losses and the MBN decreased with increasing grain size, due to the decrease of the pinning sites (grain boundaries). The good magnetic properties of the processed NOES were attributed to a combination of an optimized texture and an appropriate grain size, which was, in turn, the result of proper hot band annealing, fast heating during annealing and a good selection of the annealing temperature and holding time.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we proposed a compact miniaturized diplexer using 650 μm polished gallium arsenide (GaAs) substrate via thin film integrated passive device (TF-IPD) fabrication technology. The introduction of the three-order elliptic function diplexer can achieve low insertion loss and high isolation between the two outputs with a dimension of 1.9 mm × 0.8 mm × 0.2 mm (0.0053 λ0 × 0.0023 λ0 × 0.0005 λ0). The optimized IPD techniques for spiral inductor and metal-insulator-metal capacitor (MIMCAP) are discussed to achieve high Q-factor and excellent stability of the fabricated devices. Notably, the compact GaAs-based diplexer exhibits high performance with insertion loss of 0.5 dB and return loss larger than 16 dB. Besides, the isolation level between the two output ports is higher than 30 dB, which ensures the two ports can work independently without interference from each other. This study provides a facile fabrication approach for global system for mobile communications (GSM) and wideband code division multiple access (WCDMA) wireless communication systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this research, substitution of divalent (Zn2+) and tetravalent (Ge4+) ions into NiFe2O4 ceramic was explored to enhance the structural and magnetic properties. Two series of mixed nickel ferrites, Ni1-xZnxFe2O4 and Ni1+xGexFe2-2xO4, have been analogously inspected. XRD analysis evidenced that all compositions of the two systems were manufactured in a single-phase of nickel ferrite with cubic spinel structure. The lattice parameter increased significantly for Zn substitution from 0.833 to 0.837 nm, meanwhile decreased by adding Ge from 0.833 to 0.830 nm. The porosity rises from 5.24 to 6.81% with zinc substitution and from 5.24 to 10.27% with the inclusion of germanium due to the development of intra- and inter-granular pores. The grain diameter was increased considerably with Zn concentration from 1.29 to 6.47 µm, while changes slightly with germanium content from 1.29 to 2.24 µm. The magnetic measurements indicate that Ms increased significantly with increasing Zn2+ ions concentration, but decreased slightly with the addition of Ge4+ ions to nickel ferrite. In addition, the variation of the relative permeability (μr) with the applied magnetic field was discussed. Ni-Zn ferrite showed highest saturation magnetization, lowest coercivity and largest permeability, making it a suitable candidate for high frequency applications such as high density recording media compared to Ni–Ge ferrite. The initial permeability vs. temperature was measured from 300 K up to 900 K for all compositions. The Curie point was found to decrease with the addition of either Zn2+ or Ge4+ ions to nickel ferrite.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystallization of an Fe85.2Si0.5B9.5P4Cu0.8 alloy was induced by two different types of heat treatments employing Joule heating technique. In one case, continuous pulses of increasing amplitude of annealing current are supplied on a single sample, while in the other case, constant increases of the annealing current are used on different samples. The results show that with the first type of experiment it is possible to study the structural evolution of the alloy, providing that the amplitude of the pulse remains less than a maximum value. With the second type of experiments we have obtained the maximum value of heating rate for our system to achieve the nanocrystallization of the magnetically soft phase and avoiding the precipitation of phases that deteriorate the magnetic properties. The soft magnetic properties obtained with the second type of heat treatment are similar to those obtained in the literature with other types of thermal treatments. The work also presents measurements of electrical resistance and dilatometry during the structural evolution of the studied alloy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We derive the Electron Spin Resonance (ESR) lineshape in conducting crystals, relying on the density matrix description. In our approach, lineshape is determined as linear combination of absorptive and dispersive signals with non-negatively real coefficients, corresponding to the NMR limit. The significant points and segments of the total signal at resonance have been systematically quantified, and along that line, we have formulated an alternative fitting strategy consisting of few straightforward steps to obtain the relevant ESR parameters in metallic systems. Finally, by examining different crystal geometries, the universal value, A/B→(5+33)/4, of the lineshape asymmetry ratio has been derived in the case of metallic particles with extreme conductivity.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.As a new two-dimensional Dirac material, 8-Pmmn borophene hosts novel anisotropic and tilted massless Dirac fermions (MDFs) and has attracted increasing interest. However, the potential application of 8-Pmmn borophene in spin fields has not been explored. Here, we study the long-range RKKY interaction mediated by anisotropic and tilted MDFs in magnetically-doped 8-Pmmn borophene. To this aim, we carefully analyze the unique real-space propagation of anisotropic and tilted MDFs with noncolinear momenta and group velocities. As a result, we analytically demonstrate the anisotropic behaviors of long-range RKKY interaction, which have no dependence on the Fermi level but are velocity-determined, i.e., the anisotropy degrees of oscillation period and envelop amplitude are determined by the anisotropic and tilted velocities. The velocity-determined RKKY interaction favors to fully determine the characteristic velocities of anisotropic and tilted MDFs through its measurement, and has high tunability by engineering velocities shedding light on the application of 8-Pmmn borophene in spin fields.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper demonstrates a method of measuring the permeability of a pipe based on the magnetic shielding effect via simulations and experiments. Short pipe specimens are directly cut from a long industrial pipe instead of machining the pipe into strip, rod, or ring specimens. During measurement, the pipe specimen immersed in the geomagnetic fields rotates around a vertical axis and the magnetic fields inside are simultaneously recorded. It is found that original magnetizations can induce magnetic bias inside the pipe, which can be calculated and removed by using the recorded fields as a function of rotation angle. The magnetic fields without bias are used to calculate the shielding factor and then uniquely determine the pipe permeability based on the pipe shielding model. Since employing a pipe itself as the specimen can avoid additional magnetization generated during re-manufacturing, the measured permeabilities by the proposed method can be used as permeability samples and references for an on-site pipeline during magnetic abnormity inspections.© 2019Ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) of individual permalloy microstripe is investigated by magnetic resonance force microscopy (MRFM) in the geometry when a probe magnetic moment is parallel to a sample. Three resonant dips in the MRFM spectrum are observed, the lateral shift of the probe relatively to the microstripe leads to consequent transformation of the dips into peaks. This change of the contribution of the same FMR mode in the MRFM spectrum is explained by the change of the phase between magnetic and nonmagnetic probe-sample interaction due to inhomogeneity of the probe magnetic field. Developed micromagnetic simulations of MRFM signal are in a good agreement with experimental data and allow one to analyze the spatial distributions of magnetization oscillations corresponding to the experimental resonant modes.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The present article reports the governing influence of substituting the M2+ site in nanoscale MFe2O4 spinel ferrites by different magnetic metals (Fe/Mn/Co/Ni) on magnetorheological and magneto-elastoviscous behaviors of the corresponding magnetorheological fluids (MRFs). Different doped MFe2O4 nanoparticles have been synthesized using the polyol-assisted hydrothermal method. Detailed steady and oscillatory shear rheology have been performed on the MRFs to determine the magneto-viscoelastic responses. The MRFs exhibit shear thinning behaviors and augmented yield characteristics under influences of magnetic fields. The steady state magnetoviscous behaviors are scaled against the governing Mason number and self-similar responses from all the MRFs have been noted. The MRFs conform to an extended Bingham plastic model under field effect. Transient magnetoviscous responses show distinct hysteresis behaviors when the MRFs are exposed to time varying magnetic fields. Oscillatory shear studies using frequency and strain amplitude sweeps exhibit predominant solid like behaviors under field environment. However, the relaxation behaviors and strain amplitude sweep tests of the MRFs reveal that while the fluids show solid-like behaviors under field effect, they cannot be termed as typical elastic fluids. Comparisons show that the MnFe2O4 MRFs have superior yield performances among all. However, in case of dynamic and oscillatory systems, CoFe2O4 MRFs have the highest caliber. The viscoelastic responses of the MRFs are noted to correspond to a three element viscoelastic model. The study may find importance in design and development strategies of nano-MRFs for different applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.HP steels are commonly used in steam reforming tubes, which are exposed to harsh operational conditions causing microstructural changes. These microstructural changes cause variations in the magnetic properties, which can be measured by different techniques. This work aims at the measurement of the magnetic and electric variations in HP-Nb modified alloys with different chemical composition using scanning probe microscopy (SPM) techniques. The results show that, despite the microstructural change due to variation of chemical composition, samples with aging state I exhibit a magnetic response at the carbides boundary, while for advanced aging states, the magnetic response is not evidenced.© 2019We investigate anomalous Hall resistivity in ionic-liquid-gating of a [Co(0.8 nm)/Pt(0.6 nm)]3 perpendicular magnetic anisotropy heterostructure mediated by a low voltage at various temperatures. An anomalous Hall resistivity changes by 13.02% is achieved under a low gating voltage of −4 V applied to the ionic liquid at room temperature. By fitting the curves of anomalous Hall resistivity vs. longitudinal resistivity at corresponding temperatures under different low voltages, we attribute the origin of the anomalous Hall effect in this system to skew scattering. This result paves the way for application to sensitive low-voltage-induced reversible magnetoelectric coupling in spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Cyclic voltammetric performance of magnetic graphene composites expanded at 90, 900 and 2000 °C and their composites with polyaniline and carbon dots was monitored under external magnetic fields at maximum 1191 Gauss generated from 7 A current supply. These composites showed the enhanced performances accompanied by the increase of magnetic field strength. The enhancement of the capacitance was further achieved, when iron oxide nanoparticles were further added on magnetic graphene composites, when polyaniline was in-situ combined with magnetic graphene composites or when carbon dot was hydrothermally loaded on magnetic graphene composites. These results clarify the remarkable effect of the external magnetic field on the electrochemical performance of magnetic graphene composites. This research should offer a breakthrough on the adoption of the magnetic field in energy science and technology.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The oscillation frequency of the circular skyrmion motion in a nanodisk increases with the driving current density. However, the skyrmion may be destroyed at the nanodisk edge when the driving current density is larger than a threshold, which leads to a maximum oscillation frequency that may not be enough for ultrahigh frequency applications based on skyrmions. In this work, a modified nanodisk structure, in which a skyrmion can be driven by a large current density, is proposed. Numerical simulations demonstrate that when the edge of a ferromagnetic nanodisk has enhanced perpendicular magnetic anisotropy, the upper threshold of the skyrmion oscillation frequency can be increased by 75% compared to the original structure without enhanced edge. Our results may be useful for overcoming the frequency limit of the skyrmion-based spin-torque oscillator, which utilizes the current-induced oscillation of a skyrmion as the source of microwave power.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper describes a method of producing circumferentially oriented magnetic hard composites (bonded magnets). This means that the directions of easy magnetization of the magnetically hard particles contained in the magnet are perpendicular to the radius and to the axis of the cylindrical sample (parallel to the direction tangential to the surface of the cylinder). Tests were carried out on two magnetically hard materials (Nd-Fe-B and barium ferrite) with two different volumes of the solid phase in the slurry. The bonded magnets were produced by the centrifugal casting of the slurry in a constant magnetic field. The obtained shapes, in the form of cylinders, possessed a well compacted hard magnetic layer, with a thickness depending on the powder content in the slurry. In all cases, the remanence of the obtained samples was the highest in the circumferential direction, i.e. perpendicular to the longitudinal section of the cylinder. X-ray investigations revealed that the samples obtained have a crystallographic texture. A model of phenomena occurring during centrifugal casting of slurry in a magnetic field was proposed, which explains the structure of the obtained materials is shaped.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.SmCo5/Co exchange-coupled films with high saturation magnetization, and hence high energy product were fabricated on MgO substrates by sequential deposition of elemental Sm and Co layers at 450 °C followed by subsequent annealing at the same temperature for 1 h. Formation of defects induced multi-layered structures and the composition of individual layers were confirmed through high resolution Scanning Transmission Electron Microscopy (HRSTEM) imaging acquired on high angle annular dark field (HAADF) detector and Energy Dispersive X-ray (EDX) spectroscopy. Micromagnetic simulations and magnetic measurements further confirmed that the observed structure is coupled in rigid phase between soft and hard magnetic layers and the enhancement in coercivity results due to the domain wall pinning at the defects sites. This leads to the magnetic energy density in the film of the order of 22.2 MGOe which is close to the bulk value and have potential applications towards Micro-Electro-Mechanical Systems.© 2019Using micromagnetic simulation, we investigate the self-sustained oscillation of magnetic skyrmion in a ferromagnetic circular nanodot, driven by spin-torque which is generated from a reference layer of a circular nanopillar device. We demonstrate, by lowering the value of uniaxial anisotropy constant (Ku), the velocity of the skyrmion can be increased and using this property, gyration frequency of the skyrmion oscillator can be enhanced. Annihilation of the skyrmion at higher current densities, limit the gyration frequency of the oscillator, whereas by modifying the Ku value at the edge of nanodot, we are able to protect the skyrmion from being annihilated at higher current densities which in turn, increases the gyration frequency of the skyrmion based oscillator. By linear fitting the velocity value, obtained from the motion of the skyrmion in a nanostrip, we also predict the gyration frequency of the skyrmion in the nanodot which proves the validity of our idea in an intuitive way. We have also varied the radius of the nanodisk to see its effect on skyrmion.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The half-metallic calculations of MnZrX (X = In, Tl, C, Si, Ge, Sn, Pb, N, P, As, Sb, O, S, Se Te) half-Heusler compounds were investigated using WIEN2k code. In all compounds, the ferromagnetic (FM) phases were the most stable states energetically. The spin-up electrons of all half-Heusler compounds have semiconducting nature with energy gaps while spin-down electrons have metallic behavior. According to calculated Cij elastic constants, MnZrIn, MnZrTl, MnZrSi, MnZrGe, MnZrSn, MnZrPb, MnZrP, MnZrAs, MnZrSb, MnZrS, MnZrTe half-Heusler compounds are elastically stable except MnZrC, MnZrN and MnZrO compounds. Additionally, MnZr(In, Tl, C, Si, Ge, N, P, As, Sb, S and Se) compounds are ductile and MnZr(Sn, Pb, O and Te) compounds are brittle materials. Finally, MnZr(In, Tl), MnZr(C, Si, Ge, Sn, Pb, O), MnZr(N, P, As, Sb), MnZr(S, Se, Te) half-Heusler compounds were obtained true half-metallic ferromagnets (HMF) within 4.00, 3.00, 2.00 and 1.00 µB/f.u. respectively.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We studied the effect of viscosity on the harmonic signals of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) for thermometry application. Although thermometry is based on the temperature dependence of MNPs harmonic signals, they are also affected by the viscosity of the surrounding media. Therefore, we first perform numerical calculation to qualitatively show the effect of viscosity on the first (M1), third (M3) and fifth (M5) harmonic signals when an excitation field with medium amplitude (3 mT) and high frequency (10 kHz) is applied. We then present the experimental results for Resovist MNPs samples when viscosity is changed from 0.89 to 5.2 mPa·s. We obtained qualitative agreement between numerical calculation and experimental results on the viscosity dependences. Next, we study the correlation between the changes in harmonic signals caused by viscosity variation. The M1 and M3 had negative correlation in their change, while M3 and M5 had positive correlation. Due to the positive correlation, the ratio M5/M3 became almost independent of viscosity when appropriate amplitude and frequency were chosen for the excitation field. We also proposed a method to accurately estimate both viscosity and temperature of the MNPs sample from the measured harmonic signals even when the viscosity is not known in advance, which will be useful for precise thermometry.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Using first-principle calculations, we investigated the effects of vacancy-defect and adsorption of 3d transition metal (TM) atoms on arsenene. The results indicated that the adsorption of TM-adatoms on vacancy-defected arsenene exhibited higher stability than that in perfect arsenene. The analysis of the electronic structures suggested that the strong hybridization existed between the 3d-oribital of TM-adatoms and the 4p-oribital of As atoms around the defect. Furthermore, the nonmagnetic arsenene present magnetism by the introducing of vacancy and TM-atoms, where the magnetism mainly originated from TM-adatom and the As atoms around the vacancy. Moreover, the adsorption of Co, Ni, and Zn on the defected arsenene induced a half-metallic behavior. The diverse electronic and magnetic properties indicate a promising potential application of arsenene in electronic and spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Single crystals of a new silver and-cobalt based vanadate AgCo2V3O10 were grown from a melted mixture. The crystal structure determination reveals that this new vanadate crystallizes in triclinic system with space group P1-. The structure of the titled compound is constructed from CoO6 octahedra and VO4 tetrahedra sharing edges and vertices leading to an open three-dimensional framework delimiting tunnels along [0 0 1], where the Ag cations are located. The bands observed in Raman spectrum were assigned to corresponding vibrations of the VO4 groups. DC and AC magnetization (susceptibility) measurements revealed the spin-glass (SG) – type transition below a frequency-dependent temperature Tf(H) that is nearly independent on the applied magnetic field. Magnetic field H > 10 kOe induces the spin glass-antiferromagnet. These observations brings AgCo2V3O10 into the class of geometrically frustrated magnetic systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Compact and high speed electromechanical systems lead to higher and higher levels of multiaxial mechanical stress, that may strongly change the magnetic behavior of materials, making the development of highly accurate magnetic models a very important task. Among all available magnetoelastic models, multiscale approaches seem to be the most promising.The coupling effect is introduced at the single crystal scale, mainly attributed to the evolution of magnetic domain structures under magneto-mechanical loading. All these models use however a formulation of free energy where the energetic term describing magneto-elastic coupling is linearly stress dependent, that hardly allow (using artificial mechanisms) providing non-monotonic stress effect on the magnetic behavior. The proposition detailed in this paper is to consider a second order stress term in the free energy expression, allowing a linear dependance of magnetostriction tensor with stress to be defined and providing the non-monotonous stress effect. This introduction leads to a more complex description of magnetoelastic effect that needs the identification of a large number of complementary material constants. In this paper, developments are made in the frame of cubic symmetry for first order magneto-elastic term (joining the classical description) and considering an isotropic second order stress effect for the sick of simplicity. This simplification leads to only two additive physical constants to be identified. An identification procedure is proposed and applied to model the magnetoelastic behavior a non-oriented (NO) 3 wt%silicon-iron electrical steel.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Hard/soft Co0.5LaxFe2.5– xO4/CoFe composites have been synthesized by reduction process at 550 °C in 5% H2-Ar atmosphere. As the precursor, Co0.5LaxFe2.5– xO4 is prepared by the ball-milling-assisted ceramic process. High-crystallized spinel Co0.5LaxFe2.5– xO4 ferrites are formed after calcined at 900 °C in air for 2 h. The Co0.5Fe2.5O4 shows the highest specific saturation magnetization (78.48 emu/g), remanence (30.82 emu/g), and effective anisotropy constant (62323.48 erg/g) compared with La3+-doped Co0.5LaxFe2.5– xO4. By contrast, the specific saturation magnetization for Co0.5La0.04Fe2.46O4/CoFe composite, reduced at 550 °C for 20 min, exhibits an enhanced specific saturation magnetization (81.00 emu/g). The hysteresis loop for Co0.5LaxFe2.5– xO4/CoFe composites exhibits a good single-phase magnetic behavior. The improvement in magnetic properties for Co0.5LaxFe2.5– xO4/CoFe composites is attributed to the exchange–coupling interaction between the hard and soft phases.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effects of Mn substitution on the structural and magnetic properties of the NASICON-type Na3Fe2-xMnx(PO4)3 solid solution with x = 0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, have been investigated by means of X-ray diffraction, magnetization, ac-magnetic susceptibility and Mössbauer spectroscopy measurements in the temperature range of 1.7 K ⩽T⩽300 K. Rietveld analysis of room-temperature X-ray diffraction patterns indicates that the alloys are single-phase solid solution compositions, crystallizing in a monoclinic with C/2c space group. The Mn-substitution not only expands the unit-cell volume but also gives rise to increasing (Fe1-xMnx)O6 octahedral distortion. The magnetic data reveal the Mn-substituted compounds undergoing multiple phase transitions at TN1∼46 K and TN2∼43 K. We argue that the first transition from the paramagnetic to a canted antiferromagnetic state is due to magnetic Fe ions, while the second transition is associated with the antiferromagnetic sub-lattice the magnetic Mn moments. An analysis of the critical behaviour based on the temperature dependence of the hyperfine fields implies that the increasing Mn content modifies the nature of magnetic interactions, from 3D-Ising to tri-critical mean field criticality.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The spinel ferrite based nanocomposite (Zn0.2Co0.8Fe2O4-PbZr0.58Ti0.42O3) has been prepared through a chemical process to observe the magnetoelectric and memory effect at room temperature. The structural and surface characterization of the nanoparticles reveal the presence of both the phases having crystallites size in nanometric regime, which are uniformly distributed. The observed nonlinear behaviour of the current of magnetic field dependent current-voltage characteristic may be due to the oxygen vacancy and defect states at the grain boundaries of the granular system. The sharp increased in nature of current is attributed to the space charge polarization and the space charge limited current determining through Child's law. The maximum value of current is found to ~60 μA in presence of 15 V at ~2 kOe. Moreover, the change of open circuit current is found to ~71% in magnetic field. The DC electrical property of the nanocomposite shows two separate resistance states. Furthermore, the magnetic field dependent resistance is varying with an applied electric field and vice-versa. These features are a demonstration of good magnetoelectric coupling between the piezoelectric and piezomagnetic order parameters. The magnetoelectric coupling coefficient of the nanocomposite may be attributed to the magnetostriction properties of the piezomagnetic phase. The magnetoelectric coupling coefficient is largely depending on the direction of an applied magnetic field for the directional dependent magnetostriction properties of the piezomagnetic phase. The maximum value of the coupling coefficient has been found to ~4.5 mV/cm-Oe at room temperature. Furthermore, an applied AC magnetic field dependent magnetoelectric voltage coefficients of the nanocomposite have been estimated, which is completely matched with an observed value. This nanocomposite demonstrates the presence of memory effect, resistive switching behaviour, magnetoelectric coupling, etc.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This research presents semi-analytical and closed-form models to calculate the magnetic field distribution of elliptical cylinder permanent magnets with uniform diametrical magnetization at any point in three dimensional (3D) space. Using the magnetic charge approach, an accurate and fast-computed model is derived. The semi-analytical model yields results in excellent agreement with those of Finite Element Analysis. Moreover, it took less than 0.65 ms to compute each component of the magnetic field of the cylinder on a modern personal computer, which demonstrates its efficiency over the well-known Finite Element Analysis method, in terms of computation time. The accuracy and efficiency of the closed-form expressions are analysed and compared with the semi-analytical model. Two and three dimensional analyses of the magnetic field distribution of diametrically magnetised cylinders with different elliptical profiles are also conducted in this study, using the derived model. The analytical model can be used to calculate the magnetic field of an annular elliptical cylinder using the principle of superposition. In cases where the major and minor semi-axes of the elliptical cylinder are equal, it becomes a circular cylinder; therefore, the derived model can be used to compute the magnetic field of a circular cylinder with diametrical magnetization, which can be shown to outperform the existing analytical model in terms of computational cost.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanostructures are investigated nowadays for diverse applications as well as in basic research. They often show unexpected magnetization reversal processes which are not only of high interest for understanding magnetization reversal processes on the nano-scale, but also due to their possible use in magneto-electronic devices, spintronics, neuromorphic computing and other areas. Square nano-frames prepared from iron, e.g., belong to the magnetic nano-particles exhibiting additional stable states at remanence which can be used for quaternary storage devices. The reason for this study is that nano-particles prepared from permalloy or nickel with their very low magneto-crystalline anisotropy do usually not show steps in the hysteresis loop and corresponding stable intermediate state, while the magneto-crystalline anisotropy of cobalt often dominates over the shape-anisotropy, resulting in a large number of steps which are not always stable. Here we report on experimental investigations by magneto-optic Kerr effect (MOKE) and micromagnetic simulations of square Co nano-frames, exhibiting steps along the slopes of the hysteresis loops. The positions and numbers of these steps varied during measurements without intentionally changing the experimental setup. Micromagnetic simulations were carried out to explain the experimental findings which could be attributed to different Co crystallite orientations, resulting in a modified magneto-crystalline anisotropy and thus different hysteresis loops for smallest variations of the laser beam position on the samples during MOKE measurements.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The Sigma-phase Fe47Re53 compound was investigated by means of in-field DC and AC magnetization measurements. Field cooled, MFC, and zero-field cooled, MZFC, DC magnetization curves were recorded in the magnetic field, H, up to 1000 Oe. AC magnetization measurements were performed at the constant frequency of 1465 Hz in the field up to H = 500 Oe. Both types of measurements gave evidence in favor of a re-entrant character of magnetism in the studied sample. Based on characteristic temperatures determined from the measurements of the magnetic phase diagrams have been outlined in the H-T plane. The diagrams are similar but not identical. The main difference is that in the diagram constructed based on the DC data there is an intermediate antiferromagnetic-like phase which is absent in the AC diagram. Furthermore, the border lines (irreversibility, cross-over and Curie temperature) follow a power law but with correspondingly different exponents. The studied sample was also characterized by determining the effect of H on the degree of irreversibility and that of frustration.© 2019This paper presents the production process and the results of investigations into the microstructure and magnetic properties of (Fe83Ga17)100−xYx (x = 0, 3) composite materials. The manufactured composite materials consist of powdered (Fe83Ga17)100−xYx (x = 0, 3) alloy particles of two different size distributions (50 and 75 μm), bonded in an epoxy-binder with a weight ratio of 3:1, then oriented under a constant applied magnetic field with 1.0 T. The microstructure and magnetic properties of as-cast alloys, unoriented and oriented composite materials were examined by X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy and energy dispersive spectroscopy (SEM/EDS), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and strain gauge method. The powder particle shape of composite material was observed by optical microscopy (OM). The highest value of magnetostriction (~120 ppm) has been found in the oriented (Fe83Ga17)97Y3 composite materials with 75 μm particle size, more than 4 times that of unoriented Fe83Ga17 composite materials. The enhancement of magnetostriction is source from the preferred orientation of <0 0 1> direction induced by grain slip and rotation during orientation under applied magnetic field, the rotation and arrangement of domains by magnetization and the decrease of Young's modulus caused by grain refinement.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We welcome the spin Nernst effect to the royal family of Hall/Nernst effects with the recent experimental observations. Spin Nernst effect is the thermal analog of spin Hall effect which produces pure spin current in non-magnet through the interplay between the relativistically originated spin-orbit coupling and the thermodynamic forces. When a thermal gradient is created across a non-magnet, which has high spin-orbit coupling, a pure spin current is generated in a transverse direction by virtue of the spin Nernst effect. This effect can be useful for manipulating the magnetization of neighboring ferromagnet and hence it can provide an opportunity to write memory bits. In this article we briefly review the recent experimental evidences of spin Nernst effect and its possible application.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigated a voltage-control spintronics memory (VoCSM) with a shunt-free design process and W spin-Hall electrode. We successfully reduced the write current to 62 μA at a 5-ns write pulse (48 μA at a 20-ns write pulse), utilizing a high spin-Hall efficiency by developing the shunt-free design process and optimized W spin-Hall electrode. Moreover, the device was very reliable, exhibiting properties such as a low write error rate (<1 × 10−8) and high endurance (>1 × 1012 cycles). The spin-Hall MRAM and VoCSM with the shunt-free design process and W spin-Hall electrode could lead to high-speed nonvolatile memory with low power consumption and high durability.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Evenly mixed Fe-Y2O3 magnetic nanocomposites have been successfully prepared through a facile and rapid wet-chemical based route with two steps. First, a sheet-like mixed oxide precursor was synthesized by solution combustion synthesis using ferric nitrate, yttrium nitrate and glycine as the iron source, yttrium source and fuel, respectively. Subsequently, Fe-Y2O3 nanocomposites with evenly dispersed Y2O3 nanoparticles were prepared through hydrogen reduction of the as-synthesized sheet-like mixed oxide precursor. The phase constituents, morphology, specific surface area and magnetic properties of the Fe-Y2O3 nanocomposites synthesized at different temperatures were studied in details. The Fe-Y2O3 nanocomposite reduced at 400 °C presents a rod-like morphology with a short axis size of ~20 nm and a length of ~60 nm. With the reduction temperature increasing, the average grain size and saturation magnetization of the Fe-Y2O3 nanocomposites gradually increase, while the coercivity and specific surface area decrease. The saturation magnetization value of the Fe-Y2O3 nanocomposite reduced at 600 °C reaches 190.3 emu/g, with an average crystalline size of ~64 nm.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A controllable spin filter is proposed by theoretically investigating spin polarization in a magnetic microstructure constructed on surface of GaAs/AlxGa1-xAs heterostructure by patterning a horizontally-magnetized ferromagnetic stripe. Due to a broken intrinsic symmetry by spin-orbit coupling, a spin polarization effect appears in the magnetic microstructure. Degree of spin polarization can be modified by changing strength of spin-orbit coupling, which may be helpful for design of controllable spin-polarized source.© 2019In this paper, a partially ferrite-loaded rectangular waveguide is proposed as a periodic transmission line. Based on the modal analysis and the calculated dispersion diagram, this structure has a magnetically tunable composite right/left-handed (CRLH) response. As an application of this CRLH structure, a novel magnetically scannable antenna is presented with fixed and multi frequency beam scanning capability. Compared to the conventional ferrite-based antenna, the efficiency of the proposed antenna is high. In addition, there is not any mechanical switch or electrical tuning chip in the proposed scannable antenna. The simulation results show that the proposed antenna can be scanned from −23 to 40 degrees where the minimum antenna radiation realized gain is 14 dB. This work can be used as a first step in the design of a high performance reconfigurable scannable antenna in future investigations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Na2C is a novel two-dimensional material with Dirac Half-metal (DHM) characteristic, exhibiting a combination of single-spin massless Dirac fermions and half-semimetal. In this paper based on the first-principles calculations, we studied the mechanical, electronic, magnetic and optical properties of Na2C nanosheet. The elastic modulus of Na2C was measured to 18.5 N/m and isotropic, whereas it shows anisotropic tensile strengths of 2.85 and 2.04 N/m, for the loading along the zigzag and armchair directions, respectively. We found that Na2C, is a DHM with band gap of 0.7 eV in the up-spin channel and has 2 μB magnetic moment per unit cell. In addition, we investigated the effects of number of atomic layers (thickness), electric field and strain on the possibility of further tuning of the electronic and magnetic properties of Na2C. Our calculations show that by increasing the number of layers from monolayer to bulk, a transition from DHM to ferromagnetic metal occurs with a high magnetic moments in the range of 16–30 μB. With applying an electric field on the Na2C bilayer (within the ferromagnetic and anti-ferromagnetic orders), energy band gap is slightly increased. In addition our results indicate that the electronic structure can be significantly modified by applying the mechanical straining. In this regard, under the biaxial strain (from 0% to −8%) or large uniaxial strains (>-6%), we observed the DHM to ferromagnetic-metal transition. Moreover, vacancy defects and atom substitutions can also effect the electronic and magnetic properties of Na2C nanosheet. Defective Na2C with single and double vacancies, was found to show the metallic response. With various atom substitutions this nanosheet exhibits; ferromagnetic-metal (Si and Be) with 5.2 and 3 μB; dilute-magnetic semiconductor (B and N) with 3 and 7 μB magnetic moments, respectively. In the case of B or N atoms replacing the native C atom, the down-spin channel yields about 1 eV band gap. Interestingly, replacing the Na atoms in the native Na2C lattice with the Li can result in the formation of magnetic topological insulator phase with nontrivial band gap in the down-spin channel (25 meV and 0.15 eV) and up-spin channel (0.75 eV), in addition exhibit 8 μB magnetic moment in the ground state.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We study the dynamics of microscopic quantum correlations, viz., bipartite entanglement and quantum discord between nearest neighbor sites, in Ising spin chain with a periodically varying external magnetic field along the transverse direction. Quantum correlations exhibit periodic revivals with the driving cycles in the finite-size chain. The time of first revival is proportional to the system size and is inversely proportional to the maximum group velocity of Floquet quasi-particles. On the other hand, the local quantum correlations in the infinite chain may get saturated to non-zero values after a sufficiently large number of driving cycles. Moreover, we investigate the convergence of local density matrices, from which the quantum correlations under study originate, towards the final steady-state density matrices as a function of driving cycles. We find that the geometric distance, d, between the reduced density matrices of non-equilibrium state and steady-state obeys a power-law scaling of the form d∼n-B, where n is the number of driving cycles and B is the scaling exponent. The steady-state quantum correlations are studied as a function of time period of the driving field and are marked by the presence of prominent peaks in frequency domain. The steady-state features can be further understood by probing band structures of Floquet Hamiltonian and purity of the bipartite state between nearest neighbor sites. Finally, we compare the steady-state values of the local quantum correlations with that of the canonical Gibbs ensemble and infer about their canonical ergodic properties. Moreover, we identify generic features in the ergodic properties depending upon the quantum phases of the initial state and the pathway of repeated driving that may be within the same quantum phase or across two different equilibrium phases.© 2019The application of dynamic magnonic crystals, created by a surface acoustic wave, to measure the parameters of surface magnetostatic waves in YIG – GGG structures is considered. The methods and results of measuring the dispersion characteristics of surface magnetostatic spin waves (SMSW) at different angles between the magnetic field direction and the wave vector in the YIG film plane are described. The method is based on measurements of reflected SMSWs at frequencies of forbidden magnonic gaps, using the same antenna for exciting incident waves and registrations of reflected ones. Measurements of the frequency width of these reflected SMSW permit to determine its attenuation parameter. The results of measurements of the dispersion curves at several angles between the magnetic field direction and the wave vector in the YIG film plane are presented as well as the measurement results on attenuation parameters.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Herein, we report on the crystal structure, magnetic and local ferroelectric properties of the Bi1−xCaxFe1−xTixO3 and Bi1−xCaxFe1−x/2Nbx/2O3 perovskites prepared by a solid state reaction method. It has been found that the Ca2+/Nb5+-containing series is characterized by a narrower concentration range (x ≤ 0.2) over which the acentric R3c structure specific to the pure BiFeO3 can be stabilized. The compositional variation in the critical concentration defining the polar/nonpolar (R3c/Pnma) phase boundary can be understood as related to the chemical modification-induced changes in the lattice spacing diminishing the stability of the a−a−a− tilting in favor of the a−b+a− one. Both the Ca2+/Ti4+ and Ca2+/Nb5+ substitutions ensure the suppression of a cycloidal antiferromagnetic order, thus leading to the formation of a weak ferromagnetic polar state. While this effect is proven to be associated with a composition-driven reduction in polar displacements, lattice defects are supposed to contribute to the instability of the cycloidal spin arrangement.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.As the electro-optic (EO) and magneto-optic modulation (MO) effects of graphene in terahertz region, we first study the EO and MO modulations of Goos-Hänchen (GH) shift from a double graphene coating waveguide. The theoretical model of waveguide is analyzed and the corresponding calculation method is presented. The EO and MO modulations of GH shift are discussed in detail with different graphene parameters. Due to being sensitive to the electric field and magnetic field variations, the double graphene coating waveguide can be applied in field intensity detection based on GH effect. Calculation results show that maximum sensitivities of 2.99 × 104 μm/V and 1.61 × 108 μm/T can be realized in electric field and magnetic field sensing, respectively. Meanwhile we can adjust the applied magnetic (electric) field to achieve a higher sensitivity for a special range of electric (magnetic) field intensity to be detected. The EO and MO modulations of GH shift in the double graphene coating waveguide provide us a method to realize large GH shift at different frequency, magnetic field and electric field. Meanwhile the EO and MO modulations of beams shift can also be combined to realize more flexible and sensitive detections of electric field and magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.By employing spin-polarized density functional theory calculations, systematic investigations are carried out on the electronic, magnetic and optical features of melanin doped with 3d-transition metals (TMs). Our study aims to seek for a novel appealing nanomaterial that could be applied to spintronic devices. The structural models of isolated monomers of melanin and the electronic spin-polarized properties of these organic molecules doped with 3d-TMs are analyzed. According to our theoretical finding, the Ni-doped melanin has a nonmagnetic state, although a tiny magnetic moment is induced in both Cu- and Zn-doped into melanin. This can be essentially ascribed by the bonding interactions between these 3d-TMs and oxygen atom. Interestingly, the remaining frameworks of isolated monomer structures of melanin doped with 3d-TMs carry a quite significant magnetic moment. Only V- and Fe-doped into melanin are found to exhibit a half-metallic character, albeit the other TMs-melanin have a semiconducting property. For the overall systems, such as the pure melanin and its doping with 3d-TMs, we computed the optical absorption, reflectivity, and X-ray absorption near-K-edge structure spectra to identify the edge alteration of the optical spectra. This scrutiny could pave a new route to acquire the ferromagnetism in the isolated monomers of melanin doped with some selected 3d-TM species. We anticipate that these organic molecules doped with 3d-TMs could be potential candidates for energy storage, catalysts, and molecular electronic and spintronics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Hard magnetic MnBi films were fabricated using pulsed laser deposition (PLD). The films consisted of Mn/Bi bilayers and the thickness of each sample constant was 185 nm. The number of bilayers (5 to 80 bilayers) and consequently, the thickness of the Mn and Bi layers changed among the different samples, although the proportion of Mn and Bi remained constant in each bilayer. The structural and morphological changes in the Mn/Bi multilayered films were produced by thermal treatments and were monitored by measuring the change in their resistance as a function of the temperature. These measurements, along with the magnetic measurements, allowed us to determine the optimum heat treatments that induced the formation of the low temperature (LT) α-MnBi phase. A maximum value of both the magnetisation (460 emu/cm3) and the maximum BH product (46 kJ/m3) was observed in the sample with 40 bilayers, showing, in addition, a magnetic anisotropy, wherein the easy magnetisation direction was predominantly perpendicular to the plane of the sample. A detailed explanation of these changes and of the atomic diffusion processes present for such optimisation has been achieved.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the structural stability and magnetic interaction in Cr doped 3C-SiC synthesized by Thermal Plasma Technique. The EPR spectrum of undoped 3C-SiC shows a sharp resonance line corresponding to g=2.00 associated with the defects present in the system. Anomalous temperature evolution tendency of the relative intensity of EPR spectra can be attributed to magnetically correlated defects in the host matrix. We also report detailed studies of magnetic susceptibility, X and Q-band EPR studies and their temperature variations which helps to understand the possible electronic state of the Cr which is supposed to occupy the substitutional site of the tetravalent Si in the lattice. The nonmonotonous variation of Longitudinal Mode (LO) of the Raman spectra has been explained based on the interaction between carriers and surface plasmon using Longitudinal optical plasmon coupling mode (LOPC). The carrier density calculated by using LOPC fit with experimental data varies from 1.8×1015 to 4.2×1017 cm−3. Room temperature magnetic measurements exhibit ferromagnetic behavior with non-zero coercivity for all the samples up to 7 T field. The Curie temperature of the samples have been found to be above 760 K. Quantitative analysis of magnetic interaction validates the applicability of Bound Magnetic Polaron Model (BMP) which probably arises from the exchange interaction of Cr3+ ions with related (Si, C) defects. The polaron density estimated from the BMP fit agrees well with the carrier density obtained from the line shape fitting of Raman spectra.© 2019Artificially patterned magnonic crystals serve as a promising candidate for the emerging research fields of magnonics and spintronics. Here, we investigate the spin-wave dispersion in a diatomic nanodot lattice made of Ni80Fe20 nanodots of two different diameters placed in close proximity to form a binary magnonic crystal with a complex double-dot unit cell. The frequency dispersion of SW eigenmodes experimentally measured by the Brillouin light-scattering technique is in good agreement with the numerically calculated band structure derived from the linearized Landau-Lifshitz equation. Due to the change of the nature of interaction among the dots in two mutually perpendicular orientation of the applied bias magnetic field, magnonic band structure, including the slope of the dispersion curves, varies significantly. The anisotropic SW propagation is also studied numerically by local excitation of spin-wave dynamics in this system. This phenomenon is further explained by the calculated iso-frequency contours. Efficient manipulation of spin waves in this new type of two-dimensional magnonic crystal is promising for the development of nanoscale magnonic and spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper proposed an equivalent circuit model of a MEMS (microelectromechanical systems) microwave integrated detector applied to 8–12 GHz receiver. The detector can realize integrated detection of the power, frequency and phase of the received microwave signal. The input signal is coupled from the main path to the two branches through a designed 4-port coupler. On this basis the signal of the main path is used for power detection, and the signals of the branch are used for frequency and phase detection, respectively. Actually, the power detection is realized by MEMS thermoelectric power sensor, the simulation and test results show that the DC thermal voltage has a good linear relationship with the power. The frequency detection is based on the relationship between the coupling coefficient of the branch and the input signal frequency. Through simulation verification, when the coupling capacitance is designed to be about 110 fF, the normalized output of the frequency detection can be approximated linearly with the frequency in the X-band (8–12 GHz). For phase detection, the power combiner is used to synthesize the other branch and the reference signal generated by VCO (voltage controlled oscillator), which is controlled by the output voltage of frequency detector, and the normalized output shows a cosine relationship with the phase. Finally, the systemic simulation implemented by ADS (Advanced Design System) verifies the validity of design, and the simulation results of power and phase are related to the frequency, which demonstrates the necessity of integrated detection.© 2019The effect of bismuth and calcium substitution on the structure, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties in La0.7Sr0.3Mn0.9Cu0.1O3 manganite compounds were investigated. All the samples were synthesized using the conventional sol-gel route. The structural analysis revealed that our compounds crystalize in the rhombohedral structure (R3-c space group), at room temperature. The magnetic measurements showed that all the studied compounds exhibited a second order paramagnetic (PM)-ferromagnetic (FM) transition at Curie temperature TC ranging between 290 and 320 K. The magnetic entropy change (-ΔSM) values estimated by the Landau theory are very close to those obtained using the classical Maxwell relation. Under an applied field μ0H = 5 T, the maximum of the magnetic entropy change (-ΔSM max) and the relative cooling power (RCP) are found to be 3.06 J/kg.K and 198 J/kg for La0.7Sr0.3Mn0.9Cu0.1O3, 3.39 J/kg.K and 161 J/kg for La0.6Bi0.1Sr0.3Mn0.9Cu0.1O3, and 3.65 J/kg.K and 184 J/kg for La0.6Bi0.1Sr0.25Ca0.05Mn0.9Cu0.1O3. These obtained values were compared with those of some other reported manganite and showed that our compounds could be as promising candidates for magnetic refrigeration.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Permanent magnet motors have been used recently for many application thanks to high efficiency, high reliability, high power and torque density. However, these motors are vulnerable to demagnetization. This phenomenon reduces motor power and torque density. In this paper, an improved algorithm that considers only the flux density in the direction of magnetization is presented. Then an irreversible demagnetization in the Ring Winding Axial Flux Permanent Magnet (RWAFPM) motor is conducted during normal operating condition. Also, the effect of different factors such as temperature, armature reaction and self-demagnetization is investigated using Finite Element Method. In addition demagnetization tolerant of the motor at the various temperature conditions is carried out. Finally, using the Time Stepping Finite Element Method (TSFEM), the electromagnetic torque of the motor is calculated.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Quantum dot system is considered as the prime candidate for nanospintronics devices, within which to generate spins one by one is the long term goal for quantum information and quantum computation. In this paper, with the aid of the Wilson's numerical renormalization group method, we find a side-coupled double quantum dot molecule could be used to implement a multifunctional spin polarizer in the strongly correlated regime without switching the direction of the magnetic field. The spin polarizer reveals almost 100% efficiencies, and the polarizing scenarios could be controlled easily by the initial charge state through external gate voltage, leading to various kinds of spin polarizers, e.g., unidirectional, bidirectional, and dual spin polarizers. We demonstrate the Zeeman effect and the inter-dot transport processes are responsible for the spin-polarized transport. Our scheme is robust for any inter-dot coupling and may also be useful for quantum dots connected with magnetic leads.© 2019The structural, electronic, mechanical, magnetic and thermodynamic properties of XFeBi (X = Hf and Ti) alloys using the density functional theory as implemented in quantum espresso code are investigated. Both alloys are observed to have ferromagnetic character and are also half-metallic with a small band gap in their spin up channel. The magnetic moment of both alloys are also found to obey the Slater-Pauling rule with a magnetic moment of 1μB each. Their mechanical properties show that they are ductile in nature and are also mechanically stable. From the results obtained, it is obvious that these materials have the potential of been used as spintronics devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Deep neural networks are used to model the magnetization dynamics in magnetic thin film elements. The magnetic states of a thin film element can be represented in a low dimensional space. With convolutional autoencoders a compression ratio of 1024:1 was achieved. Time integration can be performed in the latent space with a second network which was trained by solutions of the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation. Thus the magnetic response to an external field can be computed quickly.© 2019It is a great challenge to make a balance between magnetorheological (MR) effect and sedimentation stability for magnetorheological (MR) fluids. Iron nanoparticle would be a good candidate to achieve this balance, but it lacks efficient preparation method. In this study, a DC arc discharge method was used to prepare iron nanoparticles. Their morphology, magnetic properties, crystal structures and surfaces chemical composition were examined, which confirmed their nano size (~40 nm), high saturation magnetization (~146 emu/g), and high purity. The iron nanoparticles and commercial carbonyl iron micro-sized particles were used as the dispersing phase to prepare MR fluids, respectively. Their magnetorheological effect and sedimentation stability were measured for comparison. The results indicate that the iron nanoparticles-based MR fluids present a slight lower MR effect, but much better sedimentation stability with respect to the MR fluids with carbonyl iron micro-sized particles.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Radial vortex is regarded as one of the information candidates in next generation spintronic devices. Owing to the advantage of topological protected stability, low driven current and small size. In this work, we obtained four types radial vortex in permalloy nanodisk by varying the value of interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction, and then investigated the current-induced reversal of these magnetic structures using micromagnetic simulation. Four different reversal modes are observed, that is precession mode, breathing mode, mixed mode and disarray mode. Among these modes, the precession mode and breathing mode emerge under the spin-polarized current with different densities moreover the switching time of breathing mode is almost ten times faster than that of precession mode. Our results provide a possible application of designing of radial-vortex-based spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Theoretical studies dealing with current-driven domain wall dynamics in ferrimagnetic alloys and, by extension, other antiferromagnetically coupled systems as some multilayers, are here presented. The analysis has been made by means of micromagnetic simulations that consider these systems as constituted by two subsystems coupled in terms of an additional exchange interlacing them. Both subsystems differ in their respective gyromagnetic ratios and temperature dependence. Other interactions, as for example anisotropic exchange or spin-orbit torques, can be accounted for differently within each subsystem according to the physical structure. Micromagnetic simulations are also endorsed by means of a collective coordinates model which, in contrast with some previous approaches to these antiferromagnetically coupled systems, based on effective parameters, also considers them as formed by two coupled subsystems with experimentally definite parameters. Both simulations and the collective model reinforce the angular moment compensation argument as accountable for the linear increase with current of domain wall velocities in these alloys at a certain temperature or composition. Importantly, the proposed approach by means of two coupled subsystems permits to infer relevant results in the development of future experimental setups that are unattainable by means of effective models.© 2019Core losses in manganese-zinc (MnZn) ferrites is an important factor governing the performances of power conversion devices such as power converters and switching mode power supplies. With the development trend of miniaturization, lightweight, and high frequency for power supply, it is worth emphasizing that the temperature characteristics of ferrite cores are closely related to energy transfer efficiency and reliability of power conversion devices and components. Herein, the effect of high valence ion additive HfO2 on the microstructure and electromagnetic performances of MnZn ferrites was systematically discussed, as well as physical mechanism of temperature dependence of core losses. The variation of hysteresis loss has been correlated with the hysteresis loop area (B-H), and the effect of the ratio of square of average grain size to resistivity D2/ρ on eddy current loss has been taken into consideration. Remarkably, eddy current loss does not monotonically decrease with the increase of HfO2 content via enhancing resistivity ρ, as well with the variation of average grain size D. The state-of-the-art MnZn ferrites with excellent temperature characteristics of core losses exhibits great potential in power conversion devices operating in a wide temperature range.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Pb2FeOsO6, with an Fe-Os antisite occupancy of about 16%, was synthesized recently and measured to be a cubic ferrimagnetic semiconductor with a high magnetic ordering temperature (Tc) of 280 K. We performed an investigation on Pb2FeOsO6 by using the density functional theory. Our calculated results indicate that Pb2FeOsO6 crystallizes into tetragonal symmetry and is a C-type antiferromagnet. After doping with Na, the system experiences a transition from C-type antiferromagnetic state to ferrimagnetic state, and the half-filled Os5+ t2g orbitals cross the Fermi level owning to the injection of holes. Therefore, the Na-doped Pb2FeOsO6 exhibits a half metallic nature. Moreover, the Tc raises significantly by Na doping. Therefore, we expect that the Na-doped Pb2FeOsO6 would be promising candidates as spintronic material.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The mixed ferrite-cobaltites LnFe0.5Co0.5O3, with Ln = Eu & Dy have been prepared by a sol-gel method and the samples have been characterized using X-ray diffraction and electron microscopy. The magnetic investigations reveal that both samples ordered in canted antiferromagnetic structures near room temperature. The Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya or antisymmetric exchange interaction induces weak ferromagnetism due to canting of the antiferromagnetically ordered spins. In the case of Ln-Fe-Co orthoferrites, two magnetic sublattices (Ln3+-4f and Fe3+/Co3+-3d) generally align in opposite directions and interesting temperature dependent phenomena: e.g. uncompensated antiferromagnetic sublattices and spin-reorientations, are observed in the system. The existence of hysteresis at low temperature region has been explained in terms of the strength of magnetic interactions between Fe3+ and Co3+ ions with different A-site rare earth cations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we study the magnetic properties of a bi-layer graphyne structure with RKKY (Ruderman-Kittel-Kasuya-Yoshida) interaction. The system is composed by two magnetic layers with mixed spins σ = 3/2 and S = 1, separated by (L) non-magnetic ones. Firstly, the ground state phase diagrams are reported and discussed. Then we use the Monte Carlo simulations in order to determine the effect of the RKKY interaction on the system magnetic properties. We find that the transition temperature increases when decreasing the number of non-magnetic layers. This result is confirmed by the displacement of the peak of susceptibility towards the high temperatures. Furthermore, the variation of the total magnetization versus the crystal field remains independent of the parameter L when this one is greater than or equal to three. Besides, the hysteresis loop stays invariable for L ≥ 2.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Motivated by the challenge of understanding the complex influence of the antiferromagnetic (AF) thickness and the temperature on exchange bias (EB) properties, and by the necessity of miniaturization of devices, we investigate EB properties of Co/IrMn nanodots and of continuous films by using kinetic Monte Carlo simulations. To that purpose, we use a granular model, which takes into account disordered interfacial phases in the AF layer and, in the case of nanodots, disordered phases at the edges in the AF layer. Our results show that the AF thickness dependence of the exchange field HE (measured at room temperature) in both nanodots and continuous films exhibits a maximum in agreement with experimental results. We explain these results in terms of superparamagnetic and blocked grains in the AF layer at room temperature and also not polarized AF grains during the initial field-cooling. The simulated values of HE in nanodots are smaller than that in continuous films for small AF thicknesses and larger for larger ones due to the contribution of the disordered phases at the edges in the AF layer. Also, we investigate the temperature and AF thickness effects on HE and on the coercive field HC. We found that HE slightly decreases at low temperatures due to the disordered interfacial phases. Importantly, at the maximum blocking temperature of the AF grains, HE vanishes and HC exhibits a maximum. Our numerical results are successfully compared to experimental data on Co/IrMn bilayers for various IrMn thicknesses and all temperatures. In addition, our results indicate that HE is smaller in nanodots at low measurement temperature due to the presence of disordered phases at the edges. Concerning HC, our data show that it can be either larger or smaller in nanodots depending on the measurement temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the effect of thermomagnetic treatment (TMT) on the magnetic and mechanical properties of the cold-rolled Fe-Cr-Co alloy was investigated. For this purpose, an alloy with Fe-23Cr-9Co chemical composition was prepared by vacuum induction melting. Then, the cast ingots were subjected to hot forging. The homogenization treatments were performed on the forged samples at 1200 °C for 10, 60, 120, 240 min. Then, the homogenized samples were cold-rolled to 40% and 80% reduction in area. The cold-rolled samples were annealed under the magnetic field at different temperatures and holding times; subsequently, they were aged. The results showed that the best mechanical and magnetic properties could be achieved under these conditions: thermomagnetic treatment at 640 °C for 45 min and step-aging from 620 °C to 500 °C. Under these conditions, the samples had the coercivity and saturation magnetization of 77 Oe and 158 emu/gr, respectively; also, the ultimate tensile strength and elongation of them were 1050 MPa and 12%, respectively.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Polyaniline encapsulated Cd2+ substituted nickel ferrite nanocomposites with different weight ratio (polyaniline/NiCd ferrite = 15, 25 and 30%) have been synthesized via in situ polymerization. The XRD (X-ray diffraction), FT-IR (Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy), UV–Vis spectra and TEM (Transmission electron microscopy) analysis confirmed the successful formation of conducting–ferromagnetic polymer nanocomposites. Electrical properties (DC) of the samples were measured by the FPR (Four probe resistivity) technique. TGA (Thermo-gravimetric analysis) analysis indicated improved thermal stability of composites with rising ferrite content in the polymer matrix. These nanocomposites exhibit ferromagnetism at room temperature with the increased saturation magnetization from 13.92 to 23.49 emu/g as revealed by VSM (Vibrating sample magnetometer) results. From VNA (Vector network analyzer) study, it was found that the composite containing 30 wt% NiCdFe2O4 showed the maximum SET (42.7 dB) in X-band range due to the synergistic tuning of magnetic and conductive nanoparticles, presenting them as an effective EMI shield for various electrical, electronic and radiation equipments.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We show that the ground state tunnel splitting of the magnetization can be topologically quenched in a nanomagnetic Josephson φ0 junction. Due to the relative strength of the spin-orbit interaction the tunnel splitting is found to oscillate with the bias current applied to the junction as well as the magnetic field along the hard axis. Spin-coherent-state path integrals are used to obtain an analytic expression for the tunnel splitting controlled by topological interference of two tunnel paths of opposite windings and the condition in which the tunnel splitting is frozen. This feature is expected to be observable in existing experimental technique.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have synthesized powders of Zn substituted Ni(1−x)ZnxFe2O4 ceramics with x = 0.2, 0.3, 0.4 by solid-oxide route and their phase formation was confirmed by XRD analysis. M-H hysteresis behavior of these samples was investigated as a function of Zn content. Curie temperature of these ferrites decreases as Zn content increases. Among the three compositions, ferrite with x = 0.4 (NZFO) exhibited higher magnetization and hence the same was compacted, sintered at 1200 °C and investigated for magnetostriction behavior. The same composition was further utilized for the fabrication of NZFO free standing thick films. Sintering of these free standing thick films was carried out at 1060 °C with various dwell time between 1 and 10 h. The effect of sintering dwell time on microstructural, magnetization and magnetostriction properties of free standing thick film has been studied. The NZFO free standing thick films sintered for 10 h show better magnetization whereas those sintered for 6 h attains almost constant magnetization at relatively low magnetic field. The piezomagnetic properties of the thick films sintered at 1060 °C for the duration of 6 h were found to be better. Further the layered composite structure of NZFO and Pb0.895Sr0.06La0.03(Zr0.56,Ti0.44)O3 (PSLZT) stacked with each other was fabricated, sintered for 6 h and characterized for their magnetization and magnetostriction properties.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Susceptibility inversion of near-field magnetic sources is of great application significance in the field of magnetic target detections, such as mine clearances and buried pipeline detections. This paper proposes a method of three-dimensional inversion imaging of magnetic sources in near-field with unknown shape, position and magnetization state. The method transforms the total field norm anomaly ΔT on the observation surface into the total field vector anomaly ||Ta|| and then constructs an objective function aiming at minimizing the deviations between the measured and predicted magnetic anomalies. The magnetic dipole equivalence principle is utilized to calculate the kernel matrix. The Gauss-Newton and conjugate gradient algorithms are utilized together to solve the inversion optimization process. The range of the magnetic susceptibility is constrained by using nonlinear transformations. Simulations and measurement experiments demonstrate the proposed method is capable to realize 3D inversions of curved pipes, intersecting pipes, separated magnetic sources, and “L” shaped steel pipes under near-field conditions. Through the actual magnetic field measurement experiments and the implementation of the proposed optimization inversion algorithm, accurate inversion of the magnetic susceptibility distribution and magnetic imaging of the “L” shaped steel tube was realized, testifying that the proposed method is feasible to be applied to the detection of buried pipelines.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI), favoring a chiral spin structure like the skyrmion, gives rise to the nonreciprocal propagation of spin waves. We investigate the propagation of spin waves in a nanostripe with the presence of a skyrmion chain by using micromagnetic simulations. Through applying a microwave locally, it is found that when the interval between skyrmions is large enough, the spin waves can be separated to the counter direction according to different frequencies. While for the tightly arranged skyrmions, the skyrmion chain with strong interactions between skyrmions becomes a channel for spin waves, which is around the frequency of skyrmion breathing and exhibit a characteristic of directional propagation. This work opens a vista for skyrmion-based spin wave devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We present an analytical study on the spinmotive force (SMF) generated by translational motion of magnetic skyrmion. A SMF refers to an electrical voltage induced by dynamical magnetic textures, which reflects the spatiotemporal variation of the magnetization. The dynamics of a skyrmion thus can be detected by a SMF measurement, which may play an important role in future skyrmion-based technologies. We find the dependence of the SMF on skyrmion structure (e.g., skyrmion or anti-skyrmion, Néel or Bloch type, and the polarity of the skyrmion core) and Rashba and Dresselhaus spin-orbit couplings (SOCs). To this end, we derive explicit formulae for the spin-dependent electric fields originating from the two SOCs. Our findings offer a comprehensive understanding of the phenomenon and an estimation of the electrical voltage signal associated with a moving skyrmion for a given experiment.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The hetero-structures of different correlated electronic and magnetic oxides have created fresh hope for the emerging class of oxide electronics. Here, we present a detailed investigation on structural, electrical, and magnetic properties of two such hetero-structures of perovskite nickelates and manganites; i.e., NdNiO3/La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 (NL) which exhibits metal-insulator (M-I) transition and LaNiO3/La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 (LL) sans MIT. The interfacial properties of these two heterostructures are scaled and compared as a function of the number of stacking layer periodicity (x) and the layer thickness (n). For NL series, we found a pronounced dependence of M-I transition on ‘x’ but for LL series, in contrast, we observed a different electronic transition: from a non-Fermi liquid to a Fermi liquid behavior upon reduction of layer thickness. A significant difference in magnetic properties of these two SL series reveals that the rare-earth cation size and/or magnetic order exceptionally control the charge redistribution at the interface of these two different SL series. Overall, this study brings out a broad range of electronic phases that can be realized in nickelate based heterostructures in which the rare-earth cation size can act as an effective controlling parameter.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Although magnetic refrigeration was a topic of special interest from fundamental point of view and applications for many years, recently special attention was paid for the development of low dimensional materials. In the present work, pure Gd ribbons were obtained by the melt-spun method in a conditions insuring very low stresses (velocity of the weal of 20–40 m/s). The structure, residual stresses and magnetocaloric effect obtained for 70 µm thick samples were comparatively analyzed. The residual stresses were carefully tested using X-ray diffraction techniques. The obtained results clearly reveal zero stress behavior for the investigated nanocrystalline ribbons. The magnetization was measured for temperature range 200–350 K (isotherms were measured with 5° steps) and in the magnetic field range of 0–7 T. The peak maximum was defined for the change of the magnetic entropy: the nanocrystalline rapidly quenched Gd ribbons had close value of the peak to that one known for bulk Gd.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this study, Co64P36/Ni27Co59P14/Cu composite wires with double magnetic layers are prepared by electroless deposition, and examined by hysteresis loop and giant magnetoimpedance (GMI). Hysteresis loops of the sample with double magnetic layers show a relatively obvious abrupt magnetization jump when compared a single-layer composite wire. The profile of GMI curves consists of a four-peak feature which indicates that both the magnetic layers have circumferential domain structure. The shift of the knee point on magnetization loops and the peak position on GMI curves show that dipolar interactions play a significant role between the two layers. The value of dipole field Hdi decreases with the increase of frequency and thickness of the outer layer in this multi-layer sample by fitting the experimental data. All the results indicate an effective way to study the dipolar interactions among sophisticated composite magnetic wires.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The influence of partial substitution of boron on the structural, microstructure, magnetic and calorimetric properties of Co2FeSi1−xBx (x = 0–0.5) alloys was systematically investigated. The x-ray powder diffraction and microstructural analysis confirmed the presence of second phase in the alloys. From calorimetric studies, it was observed that L21–B2 ordering temperature remain constant whereas the melting point decreases with increasing boron content and merges with ordering temperature at x = 0.5. The Curie temperature (TC) for the alloys x ≥ 0.25 has shown a linear increase with boron concentration. The saturation magnetic moment exhibits a linear decrease and confirms the substitutional effect of boron for Si. With increase in boron content, a compositional shift has been observed which may be attributed to the formation of second phase at the grain boundaries.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe dual directional silicon-controlled rectifier (DDSCR) device is widely used in on-chip electrostatic discharge (ESD) protection owing to its bi-directional ESD protection and strong current-tolerating capability per area. In this paper, an asymmetrical dual directional ESD protection device for automotive application was developed in a 0.18-µm Bipolar CMOS DMOS (BCD) technology. In order to verify and predict the proposed ESD protection device's characteristics, a transmission line pulse (TLP) testing system and a 2-dimension device simulation platform have been used in this work. According to the measurement results, the asymmetrical dual directional silicon-controlled rectifier with a floating P+ region (ADDSCR_FP+) increases the forward holding voltage (Vh) from 3.89 V to 19.7 V and increases the reverse holding voltage from 3.62 V to 19.5 V which only slightly decrease the failure current compared with the traditional asymmetrical dual directional silicon-controlled rectifier (ADDSCR). The ADDSCR_FP+ has the features of symmetrical forward and reverse I-V curves, high holding voltage and high failure current.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and Raman effect of (Tb1−xEux)2Ti2O7 have been investigated. Raman study indicates the existence of hardening due to phonon-phonon anharmonic interaction. The DC magnetic study indicates the significant contribution of dipolar and exchange interactions in Eu rich samples. From AC magnetic measurement, a partial single ion spin freezing around Tf = 33 K at zero magnetic field is observed in (Tb1−xEux)2Ti2O7. On applying a field of 10 kOe, all compounds show a field induced transition which shifts towards higher temperature with increase Eu content. This field induced transition might be attributed to the single moment saturation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Searching for new Heusler alloys with novel electronic and magnetic properties is a recent topic of interest to researchers. Using density functional theory based calculations, we study the effect of the replacement of Ga by Al at the A-site of A2BC-type alloy, Ga2MnNi. By analyzing the magnetic properties of the Ga2-xAlxMnNi system (with values of x between 0 and 2), we find that in Al2MnNi alloy, the Mn atom possesses a substantially lower value of moment compared to Ga2MnNi. To understand this unusual result, atom-derived spin-polarized densities of states (DOS) for the Ga2-xAlxMnNi system have been calculated. Analysis of Bader charge and difference charge density distribution has been found to corroborate with the DOS results. Further, we find that Al2MnNi alloy has a relatively large DOS, rather close to and below the Fermi level. Hence, electronic properties of a system with partial substitution of Ni by Co at the C-site of Al2MnNi have been probed. Combined results of calculations of Bloch spectral functions and density of states of this material suggest a large DOS almost at the Fermi level.© 2019Hydrogenation-disproportionation-desorption-recombination (HDDR) treatment of Fe-rich SmFex alloys with x > 8.5 was conducted in order to investigate the possibility that the HDDR treatment can synthesize metastable TbCu7 Sm-Fe phases with a Fe-rich composition, which are expected to provide large saturation magnetization. Fe-rich alloys prepared by melt spinning were HDDR-treated at 600 °C. As a result, the constituent phases of all the alloys transformed into non-Fe-rich TbCu7 type SmFe8.5 and iron phases in spite of the Fe-rich compositions of the original Sm-Fe phases. Thus, the TbCu7 type Sm-Fe phase synthesized by HDDR treatment behaved as the stoichiometric compound of SmFe8.5. Electron microscope analysis revealed that the exclusion of excess iron from the original Sm-Fe phase occurred in the stage of disproportionation. In addition, the Sm-Fe phase prepared via a combination process of melt spinning and HDDR treatment had a very refined microstructure with grain sizes smaller than 100 nm, resulting in a large coercivity of 14.1 kOe after nitrogenization.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Zn1−aFe2+aO4+δ (ZFO) and Mn1+bFe2−bO4−δ (MFO) nanoparticles (NPs) were prepared through a hydrothermal method. The samples crystallized in the cubic spinel structure belonging to the Fd3¯m space group. Their magnetic properties differ substantially from those obtained by other works, such as saturation magnetization (Ms) values of 80.5 emu/g for ZFO NPs and 30.7 emu/g for MFO NPs (at 300 K). Using energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDS), the sample formulas were deduced to be Zn0.30Fe2.70O4.14 for ZFO NPs and Mn1.12Fe1.88O3.74 for MFO NPs. Raman scattering (RS) spectroscopy showed that our samples are mixed spinel ferrites while X-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS) proved that Mn and Fe in the samples have mixed valances. RS and XAS together with Fourier transformed (FT) analyses of XAS data revealed detailed compositions of Zn0.13 2+Fe0.87 3+Zn0.17 2+Fe0.92 3+Fe0.91 2+O4.14 for ZFO NPs and Mn0.07 2+Fe0.93 3+Mn1.05 3+Fe0.29 3+Fe0.66 2+O3.74 for MFO NPs. We also found that MFO NPs have more spin canting than ZFO NPs. The thermal stability of ZFO NPs is better than that of MFO NPs, leading to a thinner magnetically dead layer in ZFO NPs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Fe-50 vol%Pt multilayers that were prepared by accumulative roll-bonding were annealed in vacuum for 2 h at various temperatures between 723 K and 823 K. Some samples were annealed without any high magnetic field (HMF). Others were subjected HMF up to 31.2 T, applied in either in-plane or out-of-plane directions. The annealing partially transformed the original multilayered structure into a polycrystalline hard-magnetic FePt magnetic phase with ordered L10 structure. Textured FePt/Fe nanocomposite foils were formed under HMF. Magnetic anisotropic behavior was observed in the annealed FePt/Fe composite because of the textured nanostructure. HMF annealing decreased grain size and increased the (0 0 1) texture along the HMF direction. In the sample annealed with out-of-plane HMF, both coercivity and maximum energy product were enhanced because of higher (0 0 1) out-of-plane texture and finer nanoscaled grain sizes compared to other samples. An in-plane HMF appeared to strongly inhibit phase transformation. This inhibition likely resulted from a change in Gibbs free energy and the diffusion inhibition caused by HMF.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.An important criterion in the evaluation of drug delivery systems based on nanoparticles is the drug release kinetics. From numerous published works, it is obvious that the fraction of the released drug as a function of time shows qualitatively the same behaviour, even when the release is assisted by an external force. In this study a series of experiments has been performed on a system that can be considered as the simplest drug delivery system. It consists only of uncoated/unprotected superparamagnetic magnetite nanoparticles in the form of mesoporous aggregates and adsorbed flavonols (quercetin, myricetin, or myricitrin). The simultaneous utilization of external permanent and oscillating magnetic fields remarkably accelerated the flavonol release. There is no a specific pulling force that eventually causes the rupture of the bonds between the molecules and the particle surface, i.e. the detachment of an individual molecule is thermally activated. The adsorption of molecules onto nanoparticles follows almost without delay quick changes in the field-induced motion of the nanoparticles, and they are subject to more frequent collisions with the surrounding solvent molecules. The barrier fluctuations occur due to the magnetic field dependence of the nanoparticle phonon spectra, to which the adsorbed flavonol molecule vibrations are strongly coupled. The phonon frequencies and phonon damping of a ferromagnetic nanoparticle are actually affected by the magnetic field through the spin-phonon coupling. The rate of release (spontaneous or forced) is invariably a first-order process, which can be considered a basic property of a broad class of drug nanodelivery systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The surface modification effects on the corrosion resistance and electromagnetic properties of iron-based soft magnetic composites (SMCs) were investigated in this study. Sodium stearate surface modification improved the mixing compatibility between phosphatized iron powder and epoxy resin. Sodium stearate reduces the friction between particles and between the particles and die wall during compaction. Reduced friction thereby increases the compaction density and abrasion resistance. The initial permeability was decreased with increasing sodium stearate concentration. The phosphatized iron powders with sodium stearate surface modification possessed lower imaginary permeability and core power loss than samples without surface modification.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We present the results of ab initio simulations of the series of intermetallic Sm–Co compounds. We show that the “open core” approach allows calculating intrinsic properties of Sm–Co compounds with sufficient accuracy for all structures of the series. The calculated magnetic moments, both total and on the cobalt atom, as well as the elastic constants agree with the available experimental data. Using the data, we recover embedded atom potential for Sm–Co alloys, which is suitable for studying the interface of coherent SmCo5 and Sm2Co17 phases.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Temperature dependences of heat capacity CP(T) and lattice parameters a(T), b(T), c(T) of thulium carboboride TmB2C at 2–300 K were experimentally studied. Magnetic phase transition in the carboboride – ‘paramagnetic – antiferromagnetic’ at TN = 11.0 K was revealed. By comparison with the diamagnetic LuB2C the Schottky contribution to TmB2C heat capacity due to the crystal electric field (CEF) was calculated. The splitting scheme of Tm3+ ion f – level by the crystal field was suggested. It was obtained that in the temperature range under study (5–300 K) TmB2C carboboride thermal expansion in the basal plane is almost missing (anisotropic invar effect, linear thermal expansion coefficient αa(T) ≃ αb(T) ≃ 0). It is, seems, a common property of the lattice dynamics of layered carboborides. The anomalies in the thulium carboboride thermal expansion are due to the magnetic phase transition and the CEF influence.© 2019The effects of thickness on surface roughness and magnetic properties of Ag-Co thin films prepared by electrodeposition technique were studied. Crystalline structural of the films were discussed. The scaling analysis showed that the surface growth of the Ag-Co thin films has an intrinsic anomalous scaling behavior. Meanwhile, the increase in the film thickness decreased coercivity and squareness while it increased local slope. In-plan demagnetizing factor was also enhanced with the film thickness (growth time) as a power-law and its results confirmed our dynamic scaling results. It was found that thin film growth mechanisms and surface roughness can have sturdy effect on magnetic features of thin films.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report temperature (T) dependence (2–300 K) of DC and AC magnetization (M), isothermal remnant magnetization (MIRM), heat-capacity (C), electrical resistivity (ρ), and magnetoresistance (MR) of a ternary intermetallic compound, Gd4PtAl, crystallizing in a cubic (space group F4-3m) structure. In this structure, there are three sites for the rare-earth. The magnetization data reveal that, in addition to a magnetic transition at 64 K, there is another magnetic feature below 20 K. The C(T) data reveal an upturn below 64 K, shifting to a lower temperature with increasing field, which establishes that the onset of magnetic order is of an antiferromagnetic type. However, there is no worthwhile feature near 20 K in the C(T) curve. Ac susceptibility peak undergoes an observable change with frequency and, in particular the peak around 20 K gets suppressed with the application of a dc magnetic field; in addition, MIRM undergoes a slow decay with time and isothermal M exhibits low-field hysteresis below 20 K only, which are typical of spin-glasses. The results overall suggest that this compound is a reentrant spin-glass in zero field. There are experimental signatures pointing to the existence of both antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic components, competing with the variation of temperature and magnetic field, as a result of which electrical and magnetoresistance behaviors are peculiar. The results overall suggest that this compound exhibits interesting magnetic and transport properties.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In material models for the finite-element simulation of electrical machines and the preceding magnetic measurements, the magnetic anisotropy of non-grain oriented electrical steel is usually considered in an oversimplified way, if at all. The magnetization behavior between rolling and transverse direction is not linear and varies with magnetic polarization, a relation that comes in addition to the complexity of the effect. In this paper, the magnetization anisotropy of five industrial non-grain oriented electrical steels is measured with a 1-D single-sheet-tester. The results are evaluated and correlated to the crystallographic texture of the studied materials. An approach to model magnetization curves at 50 Hz in arbitrary directions of the sheet plane is presented. The model is parametrized by measured magnetization curves along three different spatial directions and by macro-texture data in form of an orientation distribution function. This approach leads to a model that replicates the crossing of magnetization curves of different orientations with adequate quantitative accuracy for the application in FE magnetic field simulations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Investigation of the phase structure of [Nd1−x(LayCe1−y)x]2Fe14B (x = 0–0.7, y = 0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.5, 0.6, 0.8, 1.0) melt spun ribbons and their magnetic properties is presented. The La-Ce co-doped Nd-Fe-B alloys are compared with the La doping and Ce doping respectively by controlling the doping ratio of La/Ce. It can be found that the Nd-Fe-B alloys remain single 2:14:1 phase with Ce doping. In contrast, the 2:14:1 phase begins to decompose when the doping content of La reaches 30at.%. The 2:14:1 phase decomposes seriously with the La doping content over 50at.%, accompanied by the rising of secondary phases. The magnetic properties of Nd-Fe-B alloy decrease with the increasing of La, Ce doping content. The performance of La-doped Nd-Fe-B is superior to that of Ce-doped when the addition of La is less than 50at.%. However, severe phase decomposition of 2:14:1 phase with x more than 0.5 leads to the sharp decline of magnetic properties of La-doped Nd-Fe-B. In general, the magnetic properties, especially for the Br and (BH)max of La-Ce co-doped Nd-Fe-B are better than single-doped cases. And the co-doped Nd-Fe-B alloys show greater enhancement of (BH)max with the increasing amount of total doping content. For example, when the total doping concentration reaches 50at.%, the (BH)max of [Nd0.5(La0.6Ce0.4)0.5]2Fe14B still reaches 12.4MGOe, which is much higher than (Nd0.5Ce0.5)2Fe14B ((BH)max = 8.2MGOe).© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe article represents the physical processes and mechanisms that accompany the work of the real p-n-junction. The nature of the reverse and forward currents of p-n-junctions is studied as the basis for the operation of these devices. The new model of recombination in space charge region of p-n-junction has been developed. This model made it possible to develop a new method for processing current-voltage characteristics and determining the parameters of recombination centers in semiconductor devices including electron-phonon interaction parameters. The probability of electronic transitions is calculated. It takes into account the electron-phonon interaction and explains the rapid build-up of reverse currents as the applied voltage increases. The mechanisms of formation of the reverse current of the p-n-junction were discussed and it was concluded that the current is determined by the generation with the participation of deep centers and electron-phonon interaction.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effect of chemical pressure on the ferromagnetic insulator ground state and its effect on magnetotransport and magnetocaloric properties has been explored in this study. Magnetic and magnetotransport measurements reveal that the increased chemical pressure in Pr0.6La0.2Sr0.2MnO3 due to the partial substitution by La in Pr0.8Sr0.2MnO3 compound change the low-temperature insulator phase to the metallic phase. A room temperature enhancement of magnetoresistance (MR), as well as large relative cooling power (RCP), have been achieved with increasing chemical pressure in x = 0.2 compound. This enhancement of MR and magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in Pr0.6La0.2Sr0.2MnO3 compound have been attributed to the short- range ferromagnetic cluster formation at higher temperature (T>TC).© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization reversal process of interconnected pentagonal spin ice systems was investigated using micromagnetic simulations and experimental measurements. Five different systems were investigated, beginning with the interconnected Shakti lattice and introducing deformations with the idea of obtaining pentagonal tiling (belonging to the P4 group) until reaching an interconnected square lattice. In all pentagonal lattices, ferromagnetic domains are pinned, acting as isolated domains in an antiferromagnetic lattice, with Cairo tiling being the lattice that allows pinning more domains. Experimental measurements on a Cairo lattice of larger dimensions show that the shape of the hysteresis curve is invariant to the size of the bars that make up the interconnected pentagonal spin ice systems.© 2019A consistent theory of parametric resonance of spin-wave pairs in a ferromagnetically ordered system is developed for the case of parallel pumping. Exact equations for critical amplitudes at different frequencies of the pump field are obtained in the resonance approximation. The critical amplitudes for multiple frequencies of the pump field are calculated.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic hyperthermia ablates malignant cells by heating a tumor region when magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) are subjected to a high-frequency magnetic field. The treatment effect for magnetic hyperthermia can be evaluated by the mortality of malignant cells, which is mainly determined by the temperature profile of therapeutic target, treatment duration, Arrhenius kinetic coefficients, and also the material of MNPs. Both of these interests should be designed properly for a clinical consideration. This paper evaluates the survival rate of malignant cells by using an improved Arrhenius model, in which both treatment temperature profile and therapeutic duration are all taken into consideration. The treatment temperature profile for a proposed geometric model is predicted by solving Pennes bio-heat transfer equation using finite element method, in which a heat source in form of a Gaussian distribution is used as the power dissipation of MNPs. In addition, a kind of MNPs with low Curie temperature is considered to further improve the therapeutic effect for magnetic hyperthermia in this paper. Simulation results demonstrate that the temperature profile considering the MNPs with low Curie temperature can be more homogeneous than the case using Fe3O4 particles if their power dissipation are increased properly with respect to a critical value for the Fe3O4 particles. This better distribution in treatment temperature will then result in an obviously positive effects in malignant ablation for magnetic hyperthermia. Meanwhile, results also show that the survival rate of tumor cells is not only relevant to the therapeutic temperature and duration, but also depends more on the kinetic parameters due to the individual characteristic of malignant cells.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe quantum mechanical effects have become an important phenomenon in extremely scaled multi-gate MOS devices and therefore the self-consistent solution of Poisson's and Schrodinger's equation (P-S solver) is needed to get accurate charge and potential profiles. The commercial device simulators take impractically high computation time for the P-S solver. So, there is a need for a computationally efficient methodology which is fast as well as accurate. In this paper, a quantum corrected Poisson solver is developed which serves this purpose. The effects of quantum confinement due to geometry of the device and the electric field are captured accurately by modifying the density of states and incorporating correction in carrier charge profiles. The developed model is physics-based, accurate, and computationally efficient in comparison to the existing quantum correction models.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Manganese ion (Mn2+) in a ferrite nanostructure was partially substituted by different transition metal ions: Zn2+, Fe2+, Ni2+, and Co2+, in that respective order. The introduction of each different metal ion affected the size, the crystallographic parameters, and the magnetic properties of the ferrite nanoparticles. The magnetic properties changed accordingly with the individual characteristics of the selected transition metal ion, meaning that the introduction of a metal ion with lower coercivity like nickel or iron into the structure decreased the overall coercivity of the material; this also had an effect on increasing/decreasing the blocking temperature of the overall material. There were some unexpected variations at the crystalline structure and in its thermal stability, as demonstrated by X-ray diffraction, rietveld analysis, and TGA-DSC measurements. These changes can be attributed to lattice distortions caused by the substitution of different transition metal ions in the spinel structure, which affects its stability.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We calculated the spectrum of synthetic antiferromagnets (SAF) based spin Hall nano-oscillators (SHNO) with micromagnetic simulations. It was found that, even without an applied field, the frequency of generated spin waves can reach up to THz range once both Ruderman–Kittel–Kasuya–Yosida (RKKY) interactions and DC current density being reasonably high enough. We have further investigated the origin of THz spectrum. Although the magnetization dynamics of SAF is driven by spin transfer torque (STT) via spin Hall effect (SHE) in heavy metal (HM). The RKKY interactions can obviously boost it by accelerating the wiggle of magnetization in SAF. We also found that the bottom ferromagnetic layer thickness in SAF should be thin and the total thickness of SAF should not exceed the spin diffusion length in order to maximize STT effect and achieve THz spectrum. Finally, we clearly demonstrated the nonreciprocity of generated THz spin wave by introducing interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) at normal metal/ferromagnet (NM/FM) interface. Our results will technically extend the application of spintronic devices into THz field.© 2019A mononuclear complex [DyL3(H2O)4]·5H2O (1) was synthesized by the assembly of an organic ligand of 2-(4-pyridyl)pyrimidine-4-carboxylic acid (HL) with dysprosium nitrate. Magnetic studies indicate typical slow magnetic relaxation of a single-ion origin under an applied static magnetic field. Furthermore, the angular-resolved magnetometry measurements on a single crystal sample illustrates the obvious easy axial anisotropy with the g// value of 16.85 in this complex. The magnetic easy axis is determined along the direction of the second strongest coordination bond around dysprosium ion.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Static magnetic properties (field dependences of the magnetization and the complex permeability) in the wide temperature range were investigated. The electrodynamic properties of powdered carbonyl iron in the Extremely High Frequency range – 30–50 GHz were studied. The permittivity and the permeability of the material and dielectric and magnetic loss tangents were measured. The losses in the material layer were calculated. Negative values of the permittivity and the permeability are explained in terms of features of local interactions between EMR and grains. The possibility for practical applications is shown.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the large reversible magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in the cubic pyrochlores R2Mn2O7 (R = Dy, Ho, Yb) near their second-order ferromagnetic (FM) transition at TC ≈ 39 K due to a simultaneous FM ordering of rear-earth R3+ and transition-metal Mn4+ localized moments. Under the magnetic field change of 1 T (7 T), the maximum magnetic entropy change −ΔSM max is 5.7 (20.1), 4.3 (18.4), 3.9 (13.9) J·kg−1·K−1, and the estimated magnetic refrigerant capacity RC reaches 20.0 (564), 18.4 (503.7), 13.1 (371.4) J·kg−1 for Dy2Mn2O7, Ho2Mn2O7, and Yb2Mn2O7, respectively. We have discussed their magnetic properties and its correlation with MCE in terms of the intrinsic single-ion anisotropy of R3+ ions. Our results demonstrate that R2Mn2O7 cubic pyrochlores constitute a promising material platform for magnetic refrigeration applications in the intermediate temperature range.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Quantitative understanding of the magnetization processes (MPs) is one of the important aspects for the design and development of ferromagnetic smart materials (FSMs). The present work explores the method of decoupling the anisotropic MPs directly for bulk soft FSMs. The small-angle neutron scattering (SANS) measurements were performed on the [1 0 0]-oriented alloys Fe1- xGax (Galfenol) under a series of magnetic fields. Those two-dimensional (2D) SANS patterns were decomposed and reconstructed by the spherical harmonic approaches. The scattering intensities, which are respectively decomposed into isotropic and anisotropic components, show clearly the pathway of three types of magnetic domains. The 90° domain process is thus quantified directly in the bulk Galfenol. The evolution trend for the domain process is consistent with that for the lattice strain and magnetization responses, which has been respectively evidenced by the in-situ neutron diffraction and initial magnetization measurement. Meanwhile, the quantitatively addressed domain process agrees well with the simulated results by the energy-based domain rotation modelling. These observations indicate that the anisotropic magnetization processes correlate tightly with the lattice strain response, which are of significant importance for the understanding and design of large magnetic-field-induced strain (MFIS). The present approach provides a quantitative method for decoupling the magnetization processes, which would be also applicable to other ferromagnetic systems besides Galfenol. This may help the understanding of MFIS mechanism and development of new FSMs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A facile mechanochemical method for fabricating Pr2Fe14C-based magnetic nanoparticles was reported. H and C were introduced by the decomposition of heptane during the high-energy ball milling process and reacted simultaneously with Pr3Fe14Bx (X = 0–0.2) alloy to form Fe7C3, PrH2+δ and α-Fe phases. Subsequently, the H2 released from the PrH2+δ and Pr2Fe14C-based magnetic materials were obtained during a fast vacuum annealing process. Compared with the traditional heat-treatment which involved time-consuming annealing and multi-steps cooling process, the zero holding time annealing with a fast heating rate will effectively reduce the energy consumption. Addition of small amounts of boron is demonstrated to promote the formation of Pr2Fe14C and reduce the quantity of magnetically soft Pr2Fe17 and α-Fe phases. The optimal magnetic properties of Mr = 5.9 kG, iHc = 19.8 kOe and (BH)max = 8.0 MGOe were obtained in Pr3Fe14B0.1 sample after ball-milling for 7 h and subsequently annealing. Microstructure morphology analysis of the as-annealed Pr3Fe14B0.1 powder reveals that the particles are almost rectangular shapes with an average size of about 117 nm. This bottom-up approach for fabrication of Pr2Fe14C nanoparticles may provide new thoughts for the preparation of high-performance magnetic materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetorheological (MR) gels are a class of smart materials whose mechanical characteristics can be modified by the application of an external magnetic field. This paper aims at the investigation of the effect of the size of spherically shaped particles on the magnetorheological gels and the significance of its influence on the properties of the MR gels. MR gels are prepared using magnetite (Fe3O4) nanoparticles and/or carbonyl iron (CI) microparticles dispersed in a polymer gel. A free decay test apparatus built in-house is used to obtain the magnetic field dependent shear response of the gels under dynamic conditions at room temperature and the results are compared for varying sizes of particles. The results indicate a clear trend of increase in storage modulus of the magnetic gel with the decrease in the size of the particles under same conditions of magnetic field and mass fraction. For example, the increase in the shear storage moduli of the magnetic gel, prepared with a mass fraction of 20% of carbonyl iron particles of sizes 3.4 μm and 1.4 μm increase by 16.3% and 18% respectively of the zero field moduli, while the gel with the same mass fraction of magnetite nanoparticles increases to 28%.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe hardware realization of spiking neural network (SNN) requires a compact and energy efficient electronic analog to the biological neuron. A knob to tune the response of the as-fabricated neuron allows the network to perform various functioning without altering the hardware. Earlier, our group has experimentally demonstrated an LIF (leaky integrate & fire) neuron on a highly matured 32 nm SOI CMOS technology. In this work, we have experimentally demonstrated electrical tunability of the same through its intrinsic charge dynamics based on impact ionization (II) enabled floating body effect. First, a tunable input threshold (Vth) is achieved by changing the drain bias. Second, above threshold, a firing frequency (f) to input (V) sensitivity (df/dV) tuning is successfully demonstrated by controlling the SOI-MOSFET's current threshold. We show that both the independent control of sensitivity and threshold is fundamentally enabled by the non-linearity of the impact ionization based carrier dynamics. The SOI neuron provides equivalent electrical tunability to Resistor-Capacitor (RC) based LIF neurons without degrading its original area and power advantages for clock-less, asynchronous SNNs. Further, we show that the neuronal behavior (threshold and sensitivity) is a key determinant of network performance, specifically the learning accuracy. Such flexibility based on post-fabrication electrical tuning will be an attractive enabler for the SNN hardware.© 2019The structure and magnetic properties of PrNi2− xCox alloys are investigated over the entire concentration range 0 ≤ x ≤ 2. It is shown that there is a continuous series of disordered solid solutions with a structure of the MgCu2 type. In all alloys, cobalt atoms have a magnetic moment μCo = 0.5 μB. The ground magnetic state of the alloys depends on the composition. In the range 0 ≤ x ≤ 0.2, alloys are paramagnetic at a temperature T = 2 K, in the alloys with 0.4 ≤ x ≤ 0.8, ferromagnetic order occurs in clusters of cobalt atoms due to the exchange interaction of Co – Co. Their magnetization in small magnetic fields is realized via turnabout, by 180°, of the magnetic moments of individual clusters. In the alloys with 1.0 ≤ x ≤ 2.0, the long-range ferromagnetic order is established. The processes of technical magnetization reversal in them are effected via the motion of domain walls and rotation of the vectors of spontaneous magnetization. In all alloys, magnetic saturation is not achieved at T = 5 K even in a magnetic field of 200 kOe, which is associated with a large splitting of the ground J multiple of Pr3+ ions by the crystal field. Numerical calculations of the magnetization curves are performed. In the approximation of the independence of the parameters of the crystal field on the concentration, a satisfactory agreement between the calculated and experimental curves was obtained.© 2019Magnetic dilution is an effective strategy to enhance demagnetization times of Single-Molecule Magnets (SMMs). In this approach, a magnetic complex is co-crystallized with a diamagnetic analog to increase the distance between neighbor magnetic centers, diminishing the contribution of spin-spin dipolar interactions to demagnetization. In this article, we present an ab initio procedure to predict tunneling relaxation times (τQT) for magnetically diluted Single-Molecule Magnets. From a benchmark set of 18 mononuclear LnIII ions, it is concluded that the effect of magnetic dilution shows the same profile and a similar magnitude for all studied systems. For strongly diluted samples (i.e. 1% concentration), the model predicts and enhancement of around 4 orders of magnitude in τQT. Typical dilution proportions of 1:10 or 1:20 are associated by a ca. 100-fold increase in relaxation time. Variations in relaxation time were analyzed for three cases where experimental information for one dilution ratio is available. Furthermore, τQT at several magnetic ion concentrations were predicted for [Er(W5O18)2]9− and compared with literature data. In both cases, the agreement between experiment and theory was satisfactory, finding a general quadratic dependence on relaxation time enhancement upon magnetic dilution.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have systematically investigated the electronic structures, magnetic properties and strain effects of quaternary Heusler compounds FeMnCrZ (Z = P, As, Sb, Bi, Se, Te) by using the self-consistent full-potential linearized-augmented plane-wave (FPLAPW) method with the generalized gradient approximation (GGA) and the local density approximation (LDA) + U methods based on the density functional theory (DFT). By analyzing the electronic structures of these six compounds within GGA, we have found that the FeMnCrAs, FeMnCrSb, and FeMnCrTe alloys show excellent half-metallic ferrimagnetism, and the FeMnCrP and FeMnCrBi compounds present near half-metallicity. By using the LDA + U method, we found that FeMnCrP, FeMnCrAs and FeMnCrTe are half-metals. The total spin magnetic moments for all the half-metals satisfy the Slater-Pauling 24 electron-rule, confirming the existence of the half-metallic gap. The estimated Curie temperatures of all compounds exceed the room temperature, making the half-metal compounds promising for spintronic applications. Finally, the effects of uniform and tetragonal strain have been investigated. The half-metallicity can be either enhanced, reduced or destroyed by a uniform strain. A ferrimagnetism to ferromagnetism phase transition can be induced by a uniform lattice expansion within the LDA + U method. The effects of the tetragonal distortion turn out to be negligible for these compounds.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and electric properties (such as low field relative permeability and resistivity) are sensitive to changes in both steel microstructure and temperature. Recently an electromagnetic (EM) sensor system (EMspec™) has been installed to non-destructively on-line monitor the phase (microstructure) transformation in strip steels during the cooling process after hot rolling. To use an EM system to provide dynamic control via varying the cooling strategies or heat treatment using sensor feedback, which can give higher quality steel products with excellent mechanical properties at reduced cost, requires accurate interpretation of the EM sensor signals and predictive capability of the signals from desired microstructures at the relevant temperatures. A 3D FE model is reported here that allows the EMspec™ sensor output (Zero Crossing Frequency, ZCF) to be related to the steel microstructure (phase fraction) using the relationships between permeability and resistivity with microstructure and temperature. The model has been verified by room temperature measurements on various steel grades samples (varying microstructure and strip thickness). High temperature experimental tests have been carried out using a lab-based furnace and run-out table (ROT) with cooling system, mimicking the real-time monitoring of phase transformation of steel strip products. The experimental results have been compared to predicted sensor signals for the known transformation behaviour, determined independently using dilatometry. In this paper the process by which the model can be used to predict the ZCF values for different transformation behaviour, for example different ferrite fractions prior to bainite/martensite formation in a two phase steel, which in turn can be used to control the cooling strategy to achieve a desired microstructure and mechanical properties is discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Different from many previous reports, La-Al-Cu alloys with different Al/Cu ratios containing only high abundant rare earth element La were employed for grain boundary diffusion treatment for sintered NdFeB permanent magnets. It is found that Al and Cu contents should be optimized to achieve coercivity enhancement. The coercivity of the magnet was enhanced from 1000 to 1006, 1077 and 1156 kA/m after La70Al10Cu20, La70Al15Cu15 and La70Al20Cu10 alloys diffusion, at 800 °C for 1 h followed by 500 °C for 3 h. The coercivity stability was also improved, indicated by the enhanced temperature coefficient of β from −0.63 to −0.61, −0.61 and −0.60%/K. Microstructure investigation indicates that the formation of continuous grain boundary phase after diffusion reduces the magnetic exchange interaction and contributes to the enhanced coercivity. After diffusion, the La2O3 phase was observed in both the triple junction and strip grain boundary. La, Al and Cu elements showed different distributions in the magnets. The diffusion coefficients obtained from Fick's second law indicate that La diffuses faster than Al and Cu at 800 °C, which explains the various effects of the diffusion sources and different coercivity enhancements by the alloys with different Al/Cu ratios. Although the process should be further optimized, the current results demonstrate that the grain boundary diffusion using low cost La-Al-Cu alloys can improve the microstructure and enhance the coercivity of NdFeB magnets.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This article explores, research and developments of various physical properties such as structural, thermal, magnetic, elastic, thermodynamic and thermoelectric of cubic rare-earth-gold equiatomic R-Au intermetallics (R = Ce, Pr, Nd, Sm, Gd, Tb, Dy, Ho, Er, Tm, Yb and Lu) of CsCl structure. These materials have the highest melting points and are also very hard among the known lanthanide intermetallics. The purpose of this review is to shed light on the physical properties of these least studied materials and also encourage researchers to evaluate them for their possible high-tech applications. Furthermore, this study will provide reference data for the future experimental/theoretical work on these intermetallics and will help in identifying the gaps in the current status of knowledge about these compounds.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The antiferromagnet Mn5Si3 has recently attracted attention because a noncollinear spin arrangement has been shown to produce a topological anomalous Hall effect and an inverse magnetocaloric effect. Here we synthesize single crystals of Mn5Si3 using flux growth. We determine the phase diagram through magnetization and measure the magnetoresistance and the Hall effect. We find the collinear and noncollinear antiferromagnetic phases at low temperatures and, in addition, a third magnetic phase, in between the two antiferromagnetic phases. The latter magnetic phase might be caused by strain produced by Cu inclusions. This suggests that fluctuations of the mixed character magnetic ordering in this compound can be easily quenched by stress.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Bi-component magnonic crystals with a strong dipole-exchange interaction across the interface of the constituent magnetic elements have shown promising potentials in magnonics and magnon-spintronics. Here, we have reported an all-optical investigation of spin wave dynamics in an array of periodically arranged bi-component magnonic crystal in the form of triangular shaped Ni80Fe20 nanoelements embedded in Co50Fe50 matrix using time-resolved magneto-optical Kerr effect magnetometry. The spin wave spectra obtained from the sample reveal a broad band of spin wave modes where they possess a strong and systematic bias magnetic field tunability which is crucial for active control over such system in device applications. Further, the spin wave modes show a six-fold and a four-fold rotational anisotropy with the bias field orientation due to combined effects of element shape and lattice symmetry. Micromagnetic simulations reproduce the experimental results qualitatively where the simulated mode profiles unravel the spatial distribution of spin wave frequencies inside both constituent elements while the internal magnetic fields play a crucial role for the observed tunability of spin wave dynamics. Development of such magnetically coupled embedded magnetic nanostructures can pave a new pathway in designing the future magnonic devices and faster microwave communication systems.© 2019The microwave absorption properties of (FeCo)100−xNix (0 ≤ x ≤ 15) samples were investigated in this study, which were made by a simple single roller melt spinning technique. It was found that the introduction of Ni into FeCo can significantly enhance the crystallinity and flake-like particles in the samples. The complex permeability and permittivity increase gradually with increment of Ni content. Notably, a broad peak emerges in the imagine part of permeability at 4–16 GHz for the Ni-substituted samples which covers almost all the tested frequency region. The contributions of microstructure and morphology to the increased electromagnetic parameters are explored detailedly in this work. Moreover, attenuation ability enhances while impedance matching performance deteriorate gradually with Ni content improving. It is interestingly to find that the sample with x = 5 exhibits the maximum qualified bandwidth (≤−10 dB) of 7.64 GHz with a thin thickness of only 1.4 mm eventually, which is superior to many reported microwave absorbing materials.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we used thermal evaporation method to deposit metal oxide films as inorganic buffer layer in Organic light-emitting diodes (OLEDs), and investigated how the K2CO3-doped NiO (KNO)buffer layers affect OLEDs’ performances. The mechanisms of enhanced hole injection into the hole transport layer NPB (α-naphthylphenylbiphenyl diamine)via NiO:K2CO3 anode buffer layers in Alq3-based and TADF-based OLEDs were studied by means of J-V-L characteristics, secondary ion mass spectroscopy (SIMS), and admittance spectroscopy measurements. For Alq3-based OLEDs, devices’ opto-electrical performances showed increased of luminance from 8780 cd/m2 to 22940 cd/m2, the decreased of turn-on voltage from 3.4 V to 3.1 V at 1 mA/cm2, and increased of current efficiency from 4.3 cd/A to 3.48 cd/A when 1-nm-thick K2CO3-doped NiO film with doping concentration of 1 mol% was inserted into OLEDs. TADF-based OLEDs’ current efficiency increased from 21.7 cd/A to 29.7 cd/A with similar anode buffer layer parameters. SIMS depth profiles on OLEDs suggested higher indium (In)diffusion from ITO anode onto TADF-based OLEDs upon device operation leading to higher roll-off phenomenon. Deposition of NiO:K2CO3 as anode buffer layer onto OLEDs device reduced the diffusion of In in organic layers during device operation. Investigation of the capacitance as function of voltage and frequency yield information about carrier injection characteristics for both Alq3 and TADF-based OLEDs. Due to better carrier recombination capability, TADF-based OLEDs’ slope in V > Vbi area has fewer shifts and more stable response, leading to higher amplitude in current efficiency enhancement in comparison with fluorescents (Alq3)material.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Single crystals of UCoGa have been grown in different conditions and subsequently annealed in order to provide a collection of samples representing various quality as to concentration of lattice defects. The different sample quality “grades” have been characterized by values of residual electrical resistivity. Correlations of magnetic parameters (coercive field, Curie temperature) with residual resistivity have been determined and domain-wall pinning by crystal defects has been confirmed as the underlying mechanism of coercive field in strongly anisotropic ferromagnets.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents a comprehensive study of antennas based on co-planar waveguides (CPW) for ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) detection and spin wave spectroscopy in ferromagnetic insulators. We studied the FMR detection waveguide for both flip-chip method and on-chip waveguide. An antenna can work with low-wave vectors on commercial substrates such as RO4003/Al2O3 and ferromagnetic insulators such as yttrium iron garnet. A higher value of wave vector k is required by antennas to excite spin wave with a shorter wavelength, which strongly depends on the width of the antenna. A co-plane waveguide antenna can excite k1 between 0 and 6 rad/μm with the spin wave group velocity and excitation-spectrum width Δk = 3.58 rad/μm and inner signal line 0.5 μm. The value of k1 for antenna excited spin wave using a 0.5 μm short-circuit line of CPW varied between 0 and 7 rad/μm with Δk = 1.98 rad/μm. Antennas with different width (0.5–10 μm) were also studied. Meander-shaped short-circuit lines were designed to modify the k vector. The maximum amplitude of the k vector of the designed antenna appeared at k3 ≈ 3 rad/μm for the line width of 0.5 μm.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.For the first time, Nd-Fe-B permanent magnets are manufactured by rotary swaging. Nd-Fe-B alloys were heated and deformed by a rotary swaging process with different stress states, degrees of deformation and feed speeds. As a result, the rotary swaged Nd-Fe-B samples were successfully magnetically hardened, which is confirmed by the measurements of magnetic properties with a vibrating sample magnetometer and a pulsed field magnetometer. Microstructures observation by SEM-BSE-EBSD before and after swaging confirmed the drastic grain refinement during the process. The reduction of grain size is attributed to the fracture of grains. The cohesion of the samples is maintained, because the cracks between the fractured grains were immediately filled with the liquid Nd-rich phase. The best swaged sample with a maximum energy product of 8.75 MGOe has a remanence of µ0Mr = 0.75 T and a coercivity of µ0H = 1.05 T. The rotary swaging process enables a continuous manufacturing of Nd-Fe-B permanent magnets directly from castings, which has the potential to be more productive and thus cost-effective in comparison with the conventional powder metallurgical production or hot deformation techniques.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This research investigation demonstrates that Ni40Fe30Co30 medium-entropy alloy is a suitable starting ternary composition of ferromagnetic Ni, Fe, and Co, along with the widely explored equiatomic NiFeCo, for designing high-entropy magnetic alloys. Mechanical alloying of the 40 at.% Ni, 30 at.% Fe, and 30 at.% Co powder mixture for 9 h produced Ni40Fe30Co30 alloy, comprised of γ phase. The lattice-parameter, average particle size, and grain size were estimated to be ~0.3580 nm, ~4 μm, and ~8 nm, respectively. At 300 K, the HCI (intrinsic coercivity) and MS (saturation magnetization) of the as-prepared alloy was 2.40 ± 0.09 kA/m and 130.8 ± 2.6 Am2/kg, respectively. At cryogenic temperatures, with the decrement in temperature (T) from 300 K to 60 K, both HCI and MS increased, by ~1.5 times and ~7%, respectively. The estimated HCI(0) (i.e., HCI at 0 K), MS(0) (i.e., MS at 0 K), and μH (maximum magnetic moment per atom) were ~4.09 kA/m, ~140.7 Am2/kg, and ~1.46 μB, respectively. At T < ~660 K, the as-prepared alloy powder maintained the γ phase, and at higher T, α phase precipitated out. MS decreased from 130.8 Am2/kg to 114.9 (±2%) Am2/kg while HCI decreased from 2.40 kA/m to 1.16 ± 0.13 kA/m with the increase in T from 300 K to 840 K. Thermal-treatment improved the soft-magnetic properties of the alloy—MS increased by 10% and HCI decreased by 35%. At cryogenic temperatures, the thermally-treated alloy exhibited magnetic behavior similar to the as-prepared alloy—both HCI and MS increased with the decrease in T.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Due to the shielding effect of ferro-metallic materials, electric field control has been limited to magnetic thin films. Here, we show that by applying an electric field to Pt/Co based heterostructures, the modulation of magnetic anisotropy in a multilayer stack is comparable to the modulation observed for a single Pt/Co stack. Additionally, the multilayer provides a ~4 to 5 times increase in thermal stability due to the larger magnetic volume and the increase in perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. The magnetic anisotropy modulation and the increased thermal stability of the multilayer can be attributed to the proximity induced magnetism in the Pt spacer layer between the magnetic Co layers.© 2019The diffusion treatment of suspension liquid of Dy, Tb and TbF3 coated onto Ce-rich dual-main-phase Nd-Fe-B/(Nd, Ce)-Fe-B sintered magnets was carried out. The magnetic properties, microstructure and temperature characteristics of three kinds of diffusion magnets were studied. The optimum diffusion temperature of Dy, Tb and TbF3 was obtained by adjusting the heat treatment process. The most significant aspect of improving magnetic properties is that the coercivity achieves the optimal effect with the remanence lossless slightly. Amount of increase of Hcj after diffusion is: Tb > Dy > TbF3; Proposing the diffusion process mainly consists of three aspects firstly, and respective diffusion coefficients.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report the resistance switching behavior and its modulating magnetic properties and magnetoresistance of an Au/ZnO-Co/SiO2-Co/Pt structure. The ZnO-Co/SiO2-Co bilayers prepared by magnetron sputtering at room temperature contain Co nanoparticles embedded in the oxide matrices. Repeatable bipolar resistance switching is observed in the Au/ZnO-Co/SiO2-Co/Pt structure, accompanied with a change of magnetization and magnetoresistance. At high/low resistance state, the sample exhibits weak/strong saturation magnetization and large/small magnetoresistance ratio. The accumulation of oxygen vacancies and the appearance of oxygen-deficient ZnO1-x, more Co atoms and Zn atoms in the switching areas due to the motion of oxygen ions under electric stimuli may be counted for the occurrence of the resistive switching effect. During the processes, the variations of the number of oxygen vacancies and Co atoms offer the opportunity to modulate magnetoresistance and ferromagnetism of the sample. This work shows that the resistance, magnetoresistance and magnetic properties of the Au/ZnO-Co/SiO2-Co/Pt structure can be electrically tuned, which may supply clues for designing multifunctional devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.It is difficult to prepare Sm2Fe17N3 sintered magnets because Sm2Fe17N3 phase decomposes above 600 °C, and the decomposition results in significant reduction of magnetic properties. To consolidate Sm2Fe17N3 powder below the decomposition temperature, an increase of the filling fraction is expected to be one of the effective methods. In this study, an addition of graphite as well as Zn to Sm2Fe17N3 powder was conducted by mechanical milling. The dispersion of graphite powder, which acted as a lubricant when compacting the powder, resulted in an increase in the filling fraction. The high relative density, 93.0%, of a sintered body was easily obtained by the addition of the most balanced amounts of graphite and Zn. The magnetization was increased with increase in the additive amount of graphite due to the reduction of the strain accumulated to crystal grains during the mechanical milling. The coercivity was not decreased even when the amount of Zn was reduced, because the Zn powder was dispersed more homogeneously due to the suppression of agglomeration among particles and adhesion of powder to the inside wall of pod during the mechanical milling by the addition of graphite powder.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The laws governing the formation of residual stresses in copper oxide nanoparticles in the process of their direct plasma-chemical synthesis in a low-pressure arc discharge plasma are studied. Correlation dependences of the residual stress and the magnetization of nanoparticles on the pressure of the gas mixture of 10% O2 + 90% Ar are presented. The problems associated with the bifurcation of the magnetization curves during cooling in zero (ZFC) and non-zero (FC) magnetic field, non-equilibrium behavior, relaxation of magnetization and magnetic viscosity of the obtained CuO nanoparticles are discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Single-molecule spin transport represents the lower limit of miniaturization of spintronic devices. These experiments, although extremely challenging, are key to understand the magneto-electronic properties of a molecule in a junction. In this context, theoretical screening of new magnetic molecules provides invaluable knowledge before carrying out sophisticated experiments. Herein, we investigate the transport properties of three equatorially low-coordinated erbium single ion magnets with C3v symmetry: Er[N(SiMe3)2]3 (1), Er(btmsm)3 (2) and Er(dbpc)3 (3), where btmsm = bis(trimethylsilyl)methyl and dbpc = 2,6-di-tert-butyl-p-cresolate. Our ligand field analysis, based on previous spectroscopic data, confirms a ground state mainly characterized by MJ = ±15/2 in all three of them. The relaxation of their molecular structures when placed between two Au (1 1 1) electrodes leads to an even more symmetric ∼D3h environment, which ensures that these molecules would retain their single-molecule magnet behavior in the device setup. Hence, we simulate spin dependent transport using the DFT optimized structures on the basis of the non-equilibrium Green's function formalism, which, in 1 and 2, suggests a remarkable molecular spin filtering under the effect of an external magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Present work aims at investigating the structural, magnetic and dielectric properties of zinc doped Fe2O3 nanoparticles (pure, 10%, 20% & 30%) and correlated with their local electronic structures using X-ray absorption near-edge structure (XANES) spectroscopy. X-ray diffraction and Raman measurements infer that doping of Zn cations lead to the formation of secondary phases corresponding to ZnFe2O4 along with the hematite phase of Fe2O3. Magnetic measurements show that magnetization vs magnetic field curve for 10% Zn doping exhibit maximum saturation magnetization (~2.93 × 10−3 emu/g) as well as the coercivity (~956 Oe). The values of these parameters decrease for higher content of Zn. The temperature dependence of dielectric behaviour follows the same trend as that of the lattice parameter and magnetic measurements. The XANES spectra at Fe L- and Fe K-edges indicate partial reduction of Fe3+ ions into Fe2+ upon Zn doping in the Fe2O3 lattice. However, divalent state is favourable for Zn (i.e. Zn2+) within the doping range reported in this study.© 2019Fe90Ta10 (Fe-Ta) thin films, deposited using a pulsed laser deposition (PLD) method, have been found to exhibit characteristics of a soft ferromagnetic material with very low coercivities (1–10 mT) and saturation magnetization ~1.6 × 106 A/m. Our temperature dependent magnetization data at several fields (0.1–3 T) have conclusively detected the anharmonic term in the magnon dispersion relation. Moreover, the rigid-band model for metallic alloys can predict correctly the magnetic moment of ~2 µB as found by us from the above magnetization data of Fe90Ta10. We have also observed an Extraordinary Hall Effect (EHE) in these films. The extrinsic quantum mechanical side-jump mechanism as well as the intrinsic mechanism (due to the Berry phase curvatures) are responsible for the EHE varying here as the square of the electrical resistivity. Thus, our interpretation of the data at every stage is backed by theoretical considerations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nanowires of Ni1−xFex compounds were obtained by electrochemical deposition in pores of flexible polymer track membranes with pore diameters of 30 and 70 nm. The elemental composition and growth conditions, allowing to control the length and aspect ratio of the nanowire, were established. Magnetic and Mössbauer spectroscopy measurements show that the nanowires have pronounced ferromagnetic properties, and the magnetic moments of Ni-Fe nanoparticles are oriented mainly along the wire axis. In particular, the nanowires with a length of about 10 μm and a diameter of 30 nm consist of magnetic domains about 20 nm in size with magnetic moments oriented predominantly along the axis of the nanowire. Such materials can be considered as quasi-one-dimensional nanostructured ferromagnetic systems. A new theoretical model was used to describe the magnetic properties and calculate the basic physical parameters of nanowires.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, conical-shaped M-type ferrite (BaFe12O19, BaM) magnetic nanodot arrays have been prepared on alumina substrate by pulsed laser deposition (PLD) through an ultrathin alumina mask (UTAM). The UTAM has periodically ordered cylindrical holes with a diameter of 350 nm and an interpore distance of 450 nm. Nanodots with a shape distribution in which the diameter is centred at 327 nm with a standard deviation of 23 nm have been fabricated. The microstructures, morphologies and magnetic properties of the nanodot arrays were investigated. Scanning electron microscopy and X-ray diffraction revealed that the prepared nanodots are c-axis-oriented conical crystals. The hysteresis loops indicated that the BaM nanodot arrays have a 63% squareness ratio, which is significantly higher than that of the film (45%). The first-order reversal curve (FORC) diagram showed the nanodots have small distributions of coercivity (Hc) and interactive field (Hu) between particles, with the centre at Hc = 1800 Oe and Hu = −280 Oe. Furthermore, the micromagnetic simulation revealed that this unique structure greatly impacts the distribution of demagnetizing field and effectively reduces the intensity of demagnetizing field.© 2019Deeply understanding the role of intermediate metal A on structure and related properties of ThCr2Si2-type transition metal compounds ATM2X2 is of great importance for designing novel layered functional materials. However, inducing A vacancies usually trends to destroy the original structure in reported systems so far, which hampers the further research. Here we report the controllable K vacancies in K1− xCo2Se2 system (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.3), where both the ThCr2Si2-type structure and intact tetrahedral [CoSe] layers can be maintained with the varying occupancies of K. By inducing K vacancies in structure, tetragonality of the lattice for K1− xCo2Se2 increases with the shortened a and elongated c. The (CoSe4) tetrahedron is also compressed perpendicular to the c direction resulted from the K deficiency. X-ray absorption near-edge structure reveals that the valence state of Co is basically unaffected by K deficient with the absorption edge of Co K-edge unchanged. Concerning the physical properties, K vacancies increase the resistivity of metallic K1− xCo2Se2 due to the decreased charge transfer from K+ to [CoSe] layers. More importantly, the ferromagnetic interaction of K1− xCo2Se2 is unexpectedly weakened by raising K vacancies with the Curie temperature shifted from 80 to 52 K, despite the shortened Co-Co distance. First-principles calculation reveals that the spin polarization is weakened resulted from the K vacancies, mainly attributed to the reduced charge transfer from K+ to [CoSe] host. Our results clearly indicate the domination of transferred electrons from intermediate metal A on the magnetic interaction of ATM2X2, and also show the feasibility to regulate the structure and related properties of ATM2X2 by controlling the A content.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigated on the strain-induced magnetic anisotropy via the Jahn-Teller (JT) distortion of Cu2+ ions and the magnetoelastic coupling of Co2+ ions in Cu1− xCoxFe2O4 particles. The ideal composition for the tetragonalization of (Cu,Co)Fe2O4 is confirmed for x in the range of 0 < x < 0.15. The tetragonally distorted spinel structured (Cu,Co)Fe2O4 particles indicate tetragonal distortion of up to 5.6% as a consequence of the JT effect, and increasing the Co content suppressed the cooperative JT distortion. In-field Mössbauer study revealed a 10% Fe-rich B site due to the anti-site defects. The saturation magnetization increases with x and varies from 26.9 to 36.8 Am2/kg. The coercivity ranges from 68 to 175 kA/m and showed a maximum at x = 0.1. The maximum anisotropy field, Hk estimated from torque measurement is 1590 kA/m (20 kOe), with the magnetic anisotropy constant K = 0.14 M J/m3. The maximum values of Hc and Hk are explained by the mechanism of magnetic anisotropy from both the lattice distortion of Cu2+ and the anisotropy sites of Co2+. We showed that the magnetoelastic theory is applicable qualitatively to explain the large anisotropy obtained in the tetragonally distorted particles.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A series of ultra-small planar broad-band phase shifters with wide range of phase shift are designed and tested in this investigation. To achieve this performance a series of microstrip transmission lines with Iron (Fe) films of various thicknesses (from 100 to 800 nm) were designed, fabricated and tested. The basic principle of operation of these phase shifters are based on ferromagnetic resonance (FMR). The influence of the thickness of the magnetic layer was studied for two frequency regions: below and above the ferromagnetic resonance. This is because for a real-device the insertion loss should be less than −3 dB (or as low as possible). In the high frequency region, the optimal frequency (corresponding to the highest change in phase shift) increased significantly with the increase of the Fe film thickness (from 27 GHz for the structure with 100 nm of Fe to 43 GHz for the structure with 800 nm of Fe film). In the low frequency region, however, the optimal frequency varied little with the Fe layer thickness. The highest change in phase shift (~90 deg/cm) corresponded to the structure with the thinnest Fe layer for the low frequency region and with the thickest Fe layer for the high frequency region. In the high frequency region the Figure-of-Merit was about 20 deg/dB at low magnetic fields (<1 kOe) and decreased with increasing field. The theory of operation for the proposed design is explained by using the full-wave High frequency structure simulator (HFSS) software.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ferrimagnetic Heusler alloys with the low moment and high Curie temperature are desired material for spintronic devices utilizing spin transfer torque phenomena. Our earlier report showed compensated ferrimagnetism with high Curie temperature in arc melted bulk Mn2V0.5Co0.5Z (Z = Ga, Al) alloys. The low-temperature M-T behaviour of the bulk alloys was not explored and in this report we discuss the structural and magnetic properties of Mn2V0.5Co0.5Z (Z = Ga, Al) Heusler alloys in the ribbon and bulk forms, particularly concentrating on the distinct low-temperature M-T behaviour. The observed magnetic moment of the parent alloys is around 2 μB/f.u. which was reduced to nearly zero as the Co is substituted at the V site of the Mn2VZ (Z = Ga, Al) alloys. The compensated moment value at room temperature for Mn2V0.5Co0.5Ga alloy in the bulk and ribbon forms are 0.13 and 0.09 μB/f.u. respectively. For Mn2V0.5Co0.5Al, a further reduced moment was observed which are 0.08 and 0.04 μB/f.u for the bulk and ribbon samples respectively. The observed Curie temperatures are more than 640 K for both ribbons and bulk samples. A very different temperature dependent magnetic response was observed for the ribbon and bulk samples. The arc melted bulk samples exhibited Néel P-type ferrimagnetic behaviour where there is no full compensation temperature. In contrast to this, the ribbon samples exhibited Néel N-type ferrimagnetic behaviour with a full compensation temperature of 420 K for Mn2V0.5Co0.5Ga and 275 K for Mn2V0.5Co0.5Al.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Spintronic devices are considered as promising candidates in implementing neuromorphic systems or hardware neural networks, which are expected to perform better than other existing computing systems for certain data classification and regression tasks. In this paper, we simulate with micromagnetic framework a spin orbit torque driven domain wall based synaptic device, based on existing theoretical and experimental studies of current driven domain wall motion in heavy metal/ferromagnet heterostructures. Next we design a feedforward Fully Connected Neural Network (FCNN) with no hidden layer using several such domain wall devices as synapses and transistor based analog circuits, which we also simulate using analog circuit simulator, as neurons. An analog peripheral feedback circuit is also designed using transistors, which at every iteration computes the change in weights of the synapses needed to train the network using Stochastic Gradient Descent (SGD) method. Subsequently it sends write current pulses to the domain wall based synaptic devices which move the domain walls and update the weights of the synapses. Next we demonstrate through simulating “on-chip” learning of the designed FCNN on the MNIST database of handwritten digits that our FCNN trains itself in hardware through continuous update of the weights in the synapses. Previous simulation reports of spintronic FCNN do not show such peripheral circuits needed for “on-chip” learning and hence only show “off-chip” learning, where the final weights of the network are first calculated in a separate computer and then directly stored in the synapses. We obtain fairly high training and test accuracy for “on-chip” learning of our network. We also report energy dissipated in the synaptic devices for the training in this paper.© 2019Understanding the magnetic interactions and magnetization reversal behaviors in composite magnets is helpful for exerting the optimum magnetic properties. In this work, we found that the squareness of the hysteresis loop is weakened by increasing the thickness of Ta space-layer in La-Nd-Fe-B/Ta/Co multilayers, but improved by designing the Co layer as periodic arrays of disks. Magnetization reversal behaviors were studied using first order reversal curves (FORC) and magnetic force microscopy (MFM). It has been found that the nucleation and propagation of new domains mainly lead to the irreversible magnetization process. By patterning the Co layer as periodic arrays of disks, the dipolar interaction is enhanced due to the shape-dependent anisotropy of Co disks, leading to better squareness. Our results benefit to understand the magnetic interactions and magnetization reversal behaviors in La-Nd-Fe-B/Co composite systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Spin correlation, competing interactions and subtle interplay between various degrees of freedom can lead to novel quantum states in correlated electron systems. Insights into the intrinsic magnetic susceptibility and the origin of complex magnetic ordering on a microscopic scale set an attractive setting in correlated quantum matter. In this context, Nuclear Magnetic Resonance (NMR) probe offers an unprecedented approach to explore the underlying physical mechanism of correlated quantum phenomena in condensed matter physics. NMR is a site selective microscopic technique extremely sensitive to low energy spin dynamics defining the ground state properties and is useful in mapping the tomography of correlated electron materials. NMR is a powerful microscopic probe to extract the intrinsic magnetic susceptibility and to probe topological order and elucidate the nature of enigmatic elementary excitations in correlated quantum matter. NMR shares an interface with muon spin relaxation (µSR) and neutron scattering and the combination of these techniques on a complementary scale provides an outstanding track to shed insights into the dynamics of dressed quasi-particles in the ground state of correlated electron materials. In this short review, we focus on some of the emergent physical phenomena in a few correlated electron materials sharing common experimental signatures in magnetization, specific heat, and NMR spin susceptibility and spin lattice relaxation rates.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the synthesis and magnetocaloric properties of ternary intermetallic compound ZnMnSb, which crystallizes in tetragonal crystal structure with the space group of P4/nmm. It undergoes a second order phase transition from ferromagnetic to paramagnetic at Curie temperature (Tc) of 302 and 293 K for arc melted and rapid thermal quenched ZnMnSb samples respectively under an applied field of 500 Oe. The maximum change in isothermal magnetic entropy (−ΔSM) with typical values of 1.3 and 0.8 J/kg K are found at Tc for arc melted and rapid thermal quenched samples respectively under an applied field of 20 kOe. The relative cooling power (RCP) calculated from the (−ΔSM) vs. T distribution plots are in the range of 43–48 J/kg. The critical behavior of ZnMnSb has been explained using the Arrott plots, field dependence of magnetization at Tc and temperature dependence of magnetization. The obtained values of the critical exponents δ and β are 3.385 and 0.154 for arc melted; and 2.850 and 0.102 for rapid thermal quenched samples respectively indicating that there exists a long range magnetic interaction below Tc. The moderate −ΔSM at low applied field along with broad operating temperature range, the Tc close to room temperature and the low cost of ZnMnSb make it a promising candidate for room temperature magnetic cooling applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic behaviors of Co(II) complexes of N,N’-bis(3,5-di-tert-butylsalicylidene)-1,2-cyclohexanediaminato, N,N’-bis(3-chlorosalicylidene)-1,2-cyclohexanediaminato, N,N’-bis(3,5-dichlorosalicylidene)-1,2-cyclohexanediaminato, (3-nitrosalicylidene)-1,2-cyclohexanediaminato, N,N’-bis(3,5-dinitrosalicylidene)-1,2-cyclohexanediaminato, and N,N’-diaminomaleonitrilebis(salicylideniminato) were studied to identify the presence molecular tristability that is observed for the parent CoIIsalen (salen = ethylenebis(salicylideniminato)). N,N’-bis(3,5-dinitrosalicylidene)-1,2-cyclohexane-diaminato(2-)cobalt(II) exhibited tristable behavior similar to CoIIsalen, and it is anticipated to have a dimeric structure.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents a detailed microscopic observation of magnetic domains in Gd-Fe thin films using magnetic force microscopy and Kerr microscopy with longitudinal sensitivity. Two different sets of Gd-Fe films of various thicknesses were prepared where set-B is richer in Fe compared to set-A. A thickness-dependent transition from in-plane magnetization state to weak out-of-plane state with nano-scale stripe domains has been observed for the films of set-A where the critical thickness of transition was estimated to be around 50 nm. The film with thickness below the critical limit exhibits band domains along the in-plane easy axis and successively transform to the ripple-like states when the external field is applied along the hard axis. The films of set-B exhibit predominant in-plane magnetization irrespective of thicknesses. The ripple domain state to wider band domains has been observed with the increase in film thickness. The domain pattern and their angular variation confirm that the magnetization reversal is dominated by nucleation and propagation of domain walls. Micromagnetic simulation successfully complements the phenomenon of stripe domain formation at higher thicknesses.© 2019A Hall magnetometer with variable sensitivity is constructed to measure the magnetic properties of magnetic nanoparticles manufactured by different methods. This novel magnetometer can also be used to measure bulk materials and samples in liquids. The magnetometer is constructed of two commercial Hall-effect sensors in an acrylic structure, which serves as the support for a micrometer and the circuit board with the sensors. For operation, the magnetometer acquires a complete magnetization curve in a few minutes. It has a magnetic moment sensitivity of 1.3 × 10−9 A m2 at a sensitivity of 493 mV/mT, the sensitivity can be adjusted in the range of 10–493 mV/mT. Its performance is tested with magnetic nanoparticles. As an application example, we estimate the mean diameter of the nanoparticles using the magnetic curves. The results are compared with those obtained by other techniques, such as transmission electron microscopy (TEM), X-ray diffraction (XRD) and dynamic light scattering (DLS). The magnetization results are also compared with those obtained by independent commercial magnetometers, which reveal errors of approximately ±0.31 A m2/kg (i.e., 0.6%) in the saturation region.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A theoretical model is developed that can accurately analyze the effects of thermal fluctuations in antiferromagnetic (AFM) nano-particles. The approach is based on Fourier series representation of the random effective field with cut-off frequencies of physical origin at low and high limits while satisfying the fluctuation-dissipation theorem at the same time. When coupled with the formalism of a Langevin dynamical equation, it can describe the stochastic Néel vector dynamics with the AFM parameters, circumventing the arbitrariness of the commonly used treatments in the micro-magnetic simulations. Subsequent application of the model to spontaneous Néel vector switching provides a thermal stability analysis of the AFM states. The numerical simulation shows that the AFM states are much less prone to the thermally induced accidental flips than the ferromagnetic counterparts, suggesting a longer retention time for the former.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Aiming to develop the rare earth-iron-boron permanent magnets with high performance/cost ratio, a systematic investigation on the phase structure, microstructure, magnetic properties, and corrosion resistance of melt-spun nanocrystalline (La1−xYx)2Fe14B alloys has been carried out. In La based alloys, at least 20 at% Y substitution for La is needed to form hard magnetic 2:14:1 phase. With the increase of Y content, the lattice parameters a, c of 2:14:1 phase decrease and its Curie temperature Tc increases linearly. Y substitution also can effectively enhance the inter-grain exchange coupling and the corrosion resistance of La2Fe14B alloy. The corrosion current density icorr decreases from 36.2 μA/cm2 to 10.6 μA/cm2 in 3.5 wt% NaCl solution with increasing x from 0.2 to 1.0, and all these values are lower than those for nanocrystalline Nd2Fe14B alloy. The hard magnetic properties with maximum energy product (BH)max of 2.6 MGOe, remanent polarization Jr of 0.65 T, and intrinsic coercivity Hcj of 84 kA/m have been obtained in (La0.7Y0.3)2Fe14B alloys. Y2Fe14B alloy shows the highest (BH)max of 6.8 MGOe, Jr of 0.88 T, and Hcj of 148 kA/m. This work suggests that La-Y-Fe-B alloys also have the potential for fabricating new and low-cost magnetic materials with performance better than hard ferrites.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Recently it has been proposed that the magnetic coupling among magnetic dopants in diluted magnetic semiconductors (DMSs) and doped transition metal oxides (TMOs) has a considerable local contribution attributed to the magnetic moment, Δμtot, induced by the dopants on their first nearest neighboring (1nn) anions. In the present work, we identify the correlations which link Δμtot to the free atomic properties of the host and dopant atoms, in particular their atomic susceptibilities and in turn to those atomic properties which are associated with atomic susceptibility, namely the electronegativity, EN, and the ionization potentials, In, of the constituent atoms. Interestingly, the ab initio numerical results for Δμtot obtained for ZnO, GaN, GaP and CdS doped with transition metals of the 3d-series reveal a universal variation with respect to the inverse of the difference of the electronegativities of the dopants and their anion ligands.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effect of grain boundary area on the magnetization behaviors in Sm25Co48Fe20Cu5Zr2 magnet was investigated. Grain boundary area with deficiency of Cu and incomplete cellular microstructure was clearly observed. In-situ Kerr observation revealed that the magnetization reversals firstly occurred in the grain boundary areas and then propagated into the interiors of grain. The grain boundary areas with weakened pinning force of magnetic domain walls could undermine the coercivity and induce inferior squareness of the magnet. The investigation using Fresnel LTEM demonstrated that the grain boundary area was magnetized more easily than the grain interior, which agreed with the multi-stage phenomenon of the initial magnetization curve of the magnet.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nanomagnetic materials are excellent experimental tools for the study of electromagnetic phenomena and are suitable for the manufacture of artificial new materials with unusual physical properties. These properties depend on the magnetic structure of the dipole system in a great degree. In the present study, the emphasis is on the exact magnetic structure of a system with an infinite number of nanomagnetic dipoles arranged on a simple square lattice at zero temperature. Using numerical methods, such as the Static Relaxation and Monte Carlo simulation, we have obtained various magnetic configurations and by analyzing them, we found some exact, degenerated ground states for a system with an infinite number of dipoles, with long-range dipole-dipole interactions between themselves that form a simple two-dimensional square lattice. The degenerated ground states turned out to constitute systems of anti-parallel lines which form a ‘magnetic crystalline’ structure with a zero-magnetization vector. Any equilibrium state of dipole system is degenerated by nature of the dipole-dipole interaction: simultaneous inversion of the direction of each dipole of the system to exact opposite one leaves the system in equilibrium and does not change its energy. The degeneracy of the ground state, in combination with fluctuations, boundary and finite-size effects results in several metastable disordered configurations for a system of finite but large number of dipoles, thus macroscopically a nanomagnetic dipole system has zero-magnetization and behaves in a fashion similar to paramagnetic material.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The work deals with experimental and theoretical study of magnetic hyperthermia produced by a system of immobilized magnetically interacting multidomain ferromagnetic particles, placed in an oscillating magnetic field. The intensity of heat production was measured by direct calorimetry of heat evolution from model epoxy composites with the particles. Magnetite particles with weight averaged diameters 65 and 190 nm, and metal iron particles with weight averaged diameter 85 nm were used as fillers, which volume fraction in composites was up to 36%. Sine-wave magnetic field with the strength 1.75 kA/m at the frequencies 100, 150, 213 kHz was elaborated in hyperthermia heating. Theoretical consideration was focused on the influence of dipole-dipole interaction on the relaxation time of the particle magnetization in the oscillating field. The results show that the interparticle interaction significantly enhances the intensity of the heat production This effect must be considered at the practical organization of this method for therapy of cancer diseases.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The interlayer exchange coupling and magnetotransport properties have been investigated in trilayer structures where two coupled symmetric Co layers were separated by a spacer. The trilayers have the following general structure: Co(dCo)/X(dspacer)/Co(dCo), where X stands for used spacer (pure Mo or codeposition Mo and Fe with chemical composition Mo0.8Fe0.2), dCo and dspacer are the thicknesses of the cobalt and spacer layers. Two samples sets were fabricated by molecular beam epitaxy: (i) wedge-like: the both Co wedges are similar (0–3 nm) and directed along one the side of the substrate while the spacer wedge (also 0–3 nm) was grown along perpendicular direction; (ii) uniform in thickness Co(3 nm)/X(0.7 nm)/Co(3 nm), exhibiting in-plane magnetization configuration and the strongest antiferromagnetic coupling. Magnetization processes were investigated using polar and longitudinal magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) for studies of out-of-plane and in-plane magnetization configurations, respectively. With increase of dMo, the interlayer exchange coupling alternates between ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic exhibiting as high as 0.3 T coupling field HIEC of antiparallel alignment for dMo = 0.7 nm. Iron doping results in about 3.5 times decrease of the HIEC, measured at first antiferromagnetic coupling range for both perpendicular and in-plane magnetization configurations. The oscillating dependence of HIEC on dspacer is analyzed in the frame of a Ruderman–Kittel–Kasuya–Yosida model. The giant magnetoresistance (GMR) effect has been investigated in the current in plane geometry. Relation between MOKE and GMR results is discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, The aim is to evaluate the magnetic properties and structure of Ni-Zn doped ferrites with trivalent Ti4+ cations substitute in Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2− xTixO4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.50) synthesized by conventional solid state method. The magnetic properties, surface morphology, and cations distribution of the ferrites have been investigated by X-ray powder diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The experimental results shown that under the optimum doping content, the real permeability µ′ can reaches 345H/m. The nanocrystal of composition Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe1.9Ti0.1O4 has the maximum value of Ms = 117.6 emu/g as evinced in VSM measurements. Meanwhile, the real permeability µ′ was improved significantly with the increase of Ti substitution when x ≤ 0.1, and decreased when x > 0.1.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A facile and easily reproducible laser ablation method has been developed to synthesize high quality Mn3O4 nanoparticles from Mn pieces in ambient air. By changing the laser ablation air pressure to ~20 Pa, a mixture of α-Mn and Mn3O4 composite nanoparticles were obtained. Most of the Mn3O4 nanoparticles are spherical in shape size ranging from 20 to 90 nm. Besides spherical shape, a considerable amount of α-Mn/Mn3O4 nanoparticles show irregular shape and aggregation. The oxide nanoparticles exhibit large coercivity up to 1.05 T, which is almost four times to that of the Mn3O4 single crystals, owing to size effect. The coercivity was further enhanced to 1.17 T in α-Mn/Mn3O4 nanoparticles, owing to the additional interfacial effect between α-Mn and Mn3O4 besides size effect. The presence of the antiferromagnetic/ferrimagnetic α-Mn/Mn3O4 interface results in an exchange bias field up to ~65 mT in the nanoparticles.© 2019Patterned magnetic nanoparticles are key elements for magnetic devices. This article reports a laser based approach to generate patterns of magnetic nanoparticles over a large area at high yield. The local hot spot of a tightly focused laser can induce rapid in situ oxidation of iron salts adsorbed on a porous silica substrate into magnetic iron oxide nanoparticles, as confirmed by reflectance test, Raman spectroscopy, electron microscopy, X-ray diffraction, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, and magnetic measurement. The effects of laser power, moving speed and laser frequency on the formation (mass and line width) of patterned magnetic nanoparticles have been examined. Given high yield of laser oxidation and high speed of laser direct patterning, the method is appropriate to produce magnetic material pattern over a large area.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nickel oxide (NiO) with bulk crystalline size is an antiferromagnetic insulator correlated strongly with crystal structure. A reduction in crystalline size causes a change in the magnetic sublattice, resulting in the appearance of ferromagnetic moments. Furthermore, in the nano crystals fabricated in mesoporous silica, there is a lattice distortion at the unit cell level that brings about the change in the magnetic property, suggesting a prominent magneto-structural correlation. We investigate anisotropic compression effects on nanocrystalline NiO with a crystalline size (D) of 11.4 nm to observe this remarkable magneto-structural correlation. Magneto-crystalline anisotropy is at its maximum when negative contraction occurs. The negative contraction appears even in a bulk crystal under non-ideal hydrostatic compression, and its anomalous structural change is suppressed with decreasing D.© 2019Breast cancer is one of the leading causes of death among women worldwide, therefore early diagnosis and monitoring the status of cancer are essential. In the present study we developed antibody-conjugated iron oxide magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) with highly efficient potential to detect HER2-expressing cancer cells in blood, a compartment where tumor cells are very rare. The MNPs were first coated with (3-aminopropyl) trimethoxysilane. Effective coating was checked by VSM, XRD, FT-IR, TGA, EDX, and SEM. Anti-HER2 antibody (Herceptin) was conjugated on the surface of silane-coated MNPs (MNP-Si). The affinity of antibody-conjugated MNPs (Ab/MNP-Si) for HER2-expressing cells was evaluated in the SK-BR-3 cell line as a breast cancer cell model. Different concentrations of SK-BR-3 cells were mixed with peripheral blood mononuclear cells and subjected to isolation with Ab/MNP-Si in a magnetic field. Separation efficiency, as determined by flow cytometry, was 77–98%. Further evaluation with fluorescence microscopy also confirmed the ability of Ab/MNP-Si to detect low numbers of SK-BR-3 cells in whole blood. Our results suggest that Ab/MNP-Si is a potentially useful tool to isolate circulating tumor cells by targeting tumor-specific surface receptors under a magnetic field, and may improve breast cancer diagnosis and monitoring.© 2019Uniaxial compressive deformation at elevated temperatures was applied to various Nd-lean Nd-Fe-B nanocomposite magnets. Particularly, influences of addition of eutectic Nd-Cu alloys having low melting points on texturing were investigated. X-ray diffraction and magnetic property measurements were carried out for the deformed samples to check whether texture is induced. A series of the experiments clearly demonstrated that no texturing occurs in the case of the alloys without any Nd-Cu alloy while textured magnets are successfully obtained when Nd-Cu is added. However, the texture obtained by the current attempt was not very strong. Detailed multi-scale electron microscopy revealed that the textured region was limited to where Nd was enriched and α-Fe phases disappeared. The strategy to obtain an ideal microstructure of nanocomposite magnet is discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Three-dimensional magnetic textures present their richness not only in variety of ground state structures, but also in their dazzling collective modes. As an example, the target skyrmion, a topological spin texture with a central skyrmion and an extra concentric helical ring, has been enabled by confining a chiral magnet in a nanodisk geometry. In this work we investigate the collective spin wave modes of the target skyrmion in the external field region of −400 mT to 400 mT. Through micromagnetic simulations we reproduced three major phases of the target skyrmion, and derived resonance modes at varying external magnetic field by the power spectral density study. All typical modes were resolved in terms of their dynamical snapshots in temporal domain and the corresponding spatial Fourier transformations. Some modes are shown to behave similarly in-plane but differently out-of-plane, and vice versa. This suggests, on a broader scope, that both responses will be necessary to fully characterize collective modes of three-dimensional spin textures.© 2019This work studies the relationship between the electrochemical synthesis temperature and the potential of Ni nanotubes obtained in polyethylene terephthalate template pores with their structure and morphological peculiarities. Based on established regularities in the evolution of morphology and structural parameters, the dynamics of the Ni nanotubes main magnetic characteristics are analyzed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The complex permeability of an iron-oxide nanoparticle suspension has been measured as a function of magnetic field strength at radio and microwave frequencies using a loop-gap resonator. The system studied was a water-based ferrofluid containing Dextran-coated Fe3O4 particles with an average diameter of 8 nm. The real part of the permeability increased sharply beyond a frequency-dependent threshold value of the static magnetic field before saturating. Just beyond this threshold field, there was a peak in the imaginary part of the permeability. The permeability measurements, which exhibited features associated with ferromagnetic resonance, were used to determine the dependence of the microwave absorption on static magnetic field strength. Using the absorption data, the g-factor of the ferrofluid was found to be 1.86 ± 0.07.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The spin-crossover (SCO) phenomena is a switching between a high spin (HS) and low spin (LS) state when the system is submitted to an external parameter variation such as pressure and temperature. Recently, SCO materials have been pointed as good candidates for caloric refrigeration due to their giant barocaloric potentials. However, other caloric effects are yet to be investigated in those compounds. The magnetocaloric effect (MCE) is defined as a temperature change due to an applied magnetic field and is analyzed by two thermodynamic potentials: isothermal entropy change (ΔST) and adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad). In this work we studied the magnetic and magnetocaloric effects on the [Fe(pzt)6](PF6)2 (pzt = 1-propyltetrazole) spin-crossover compound. Our theoretical microscopic model results in a total entropy with includes the magnetic, lattice, electronic and configurational contributions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The Er-based compound Er4CoCd was synthesized successfully and its structural, magnetic together with magnetocaloric properties were investigated in detail. The Er4CoCd crystallized in a Gd4RhIn-type structure with the space group of F4¯3m, which was confirmed by Rietveld refinement. A ferromagnetic transition was observed around its Curie temperature (TC) of 12.5 K accompanied by a large magnetocaloric effect (MCE). The performance of MCE for Er4CoCd was evaluated by the isothermal maximal magnetic entropy (-ΔSM max), the temperature averaged entropy change (TEC) at 10 K temperature lift [TEC (10 K)], and the relative cooling power (RCP). The values of -ΔSM max, TEC (10 K), and RCP of Er4CoCd are 20.4 J/kg K, 19.2 J/kg K, and 503 J/kg under the magnetic field change (ΔH) of 0–5 T, respectively.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The interest in spintronics devices based on domain wall (DW) motion has gained attention for many years. However, the stochastic behaviour of DW motion is still a fundamental issue for the practical implementation of DW devices. In this study, we demonstrate that effective domain wall pinning can be achieved by using exchange interaction between Co/Ni multilayer with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) and Co layer with in-plane magnetic anisotropy (IMA) to create locally tilted magnetisation. The strength of exchange interaction is tuned by varying the thickness of spacer layer Pt between the PMA and IMA layers, thus forming different tilt angles. Micromagnetic simulations were performed to verify the relation between pinning field and magnetisation tilt angle. Polar Kerr microscopy shows the current-driven DW pinning and depinning in the Co/Ni multilayer device with Co crossbars, where the thickness of spacer layer Pt is 1 nm. The proposed approach can potentially be used in future DW memory device applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper focuses on the phase transition, microstructure and magnetic properties of amorphous-nanocrystalline Sm15Co70−xFe10B5Alx (x = 0, 5, 10, 15, 20) ribbons melt-spun at a speed of 40 m/s. The results show that the five ribbons are all composed of a high content of amorphous and several nanocrystalline phases, and these crystalline ones are Sm(Co,M)7 main phase and minor phases including Sm2(Co,M)7, Sm2Co7B3, Co72Fe28, etc. Al addition alters the crystallization processes of different ribbons, particularly, a uniform cellular microstructure is formed in x = 15 ribbons which win the maximum coercivity of 15,409.0 ± 2075.2 Oe. The coercivity of five ribbons is first dominated by the nucleation mechanism, and then the pinning mechanism. The strong pinning effect, stemmed from a combination of uniform cellular microstructure, high volume ratio of cell-walls, high solubility of Al in the Sm(Co,M)7 and the multiphase interfaces in the wide cell walls, is the main reason for the high coercivity. Finally, the relational models among composition, microstructure and magnetic mechanism were established.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetotransport properties and magnetocaloric effect of (La0.7Ba0.3MnO3)1-x/(Al2O3)x composites have been investigated through their theoretical and experimental studies. The Al2O3 addition increases the resistivity, showing up a crossover from 3D Mott to the soft gap variable range hopping (VRH). The relative cooling power of LBMO matrix (~98.77 Jkg−1, H = 2 T) is approximately 65 percentage of that of pure Gd (RCP = 153 Jkg−1, H = 2 T). It means to achieve an active magnetic refrigerator employing LBMO will need more than one and half times the volumes of a refrigerant unit consisting of pure Gd. A good concordance is observed as simulated both resistivity and magnetization curves.© 2019We study the valley-dependent electron transport properties in a graphene under the joint modulation of the magnetic field and the strained barrier. In studying, the effect of the magnetic field on the valley-dependent electron conductance and the valley polarization is considered. From the numerical results, we deduce that a large valley polarization nearly 100% can be obtained in such a magnetic-strained graphene, and the polarization is mainly governed by the strength and the position of the right magnetic field. Moreover, the distance between the right magnetic field and the strained barrier plays an important effect on the valley polarization. These interesting-theoretical finds can promote the realization of the new types of the magnetic field-tunable valleytronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report intrinsic memory effect in magnetization for zircon-type DyCrO4, pointing the cooperative glassy response below ∼7 K. Intriguingly, the memory effect is observed well below the ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic ordering temperatures, indicate re-entrant spin-glass state in DyCrO4. Above the magnetic order ferroelectricity emerges with a ferroelectric TC at 97 K, which is associated with a signature of magnetoelectric coupling. Thus DyCrO4 attracts the community for multiple interesting properties with a high temperature ferroelectricity and low temperature re-entrant spin-glass-like behavior.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigated the current-induced magnetization switching in a perpendicular magnetized Pt/CoNiCo/Pt sandwich structure by spin-orbit torques under in-plane gradient current density. The gradient spin current density resulted from the spin Hall effect along the current direction was achieved by designing a bottom wedged Pt electrode. An in-plane effective field along the current direction is induced by the wedged Pt layer, which determines the direction of the current induced magnetization switching. The effective field increased with the slope of the wedged Pt, and is sufficient to induce deterministic switching of nearly 90% domains with the slope value of 0.21.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic susceptibility measurements on RT5Al2 (R = Gd, Y; T = Pd, Pt) show that while GdPd5Al2 orders antiferromagnetically at TN = 7 K, GdPt5Al2 does not order down to 2 K. This result is in confirmation of earlier published reports suggesting that although RPd5Al2 exhibit antiferromagnetic transitions, no magnetic ordering has been found down to 2 K for isoelectronic RPt5Al2 compounds. To understand the evolution of magnetic ordering from RPd5Al2 to RPt5Al2, band structure analysis has been carried out in Gd and Y based analogues of these two series. Band structure calculations show enhanced two dimensionality of the conduction electrons, triggered by the enhanced anisotropic behavior of the Pt-5d electrons in GdPt5Al2. More extended nature of Pt-5d electrons, compared to the Pd-4d electrons, might be the reason behind a change in the magnetic interaction from Pd to Pt-based compounds. We also note that tetragonal anisotropy and spin-orbit coupling do not have primary roles in such a change in magnetic interaction.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We present a study of the magnetic properties of [Co(0.3 nm)/Ni(0.6 nm)]×N multilayers as a function of bilayer repetitions N. From magnetometery measurements, magnetic force microscopy (MFM) and X-ray diffraction (XRD), a correlation between the magnetic and structural properties could be made. It is shown that the multilayers exhibit square hysteresis loops for N ≤ 8 with a maximum coercivity of about 220 Oe for N = 8. The XRD scan and rocking curve measurements reveal that fcc phase of (Co/Ni) is improved for a larger value of N. Micromagnetic simulation is conducted on each multilayer at demagnetized state to reproduce the MFM images. From the best correspondence of the experimental and simulated domain structures, intrinsic parameters such as saturation magnetization Ms anisotropy energy Ku and average domain size were obtained. It is found that Ms value of all the multilayers is about 800 emu/cm3 with less than 3% difference. On the other hand, Ku shows a continuous decrease with N down to 12% from its largest value for 4 bilayers.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.ZnO and Co-doped ZnO films were synthesized by the radio frequency magnetron sputtering in mixed atmosphere of Ar + 20% O2 and Ar + 20–50% H2. The morphology, chemical composition, crystal structure, optical transmission, electrical resistance, and magnetic circular dichroism of the films were investigated. It was established that the films thickness decreased several times when Ar was partly replaced by hydrogen in the sputtering chamber. At the same time, for the Co-doped ZnO films, the increase in the relative Co content with the increasing hydrogen concentration was observed. These phenomena are explained by the formation of gaseous ZnH2 because of the hydrogen reaction with the growing films under the conditions of the high substrate temperature (450 °C) and, respectively, the decrease in the Zn component in the films. The hydrogenated Co-doped ZnO films exhibit an increase in electric conductivity and ferromagnetic behavior at room temperature. The magnetic nature of the films is explained by a combination of the intrinsic ferromagnetism (due to the formation of the Co-H-Co complex) with the inclusion of metallic Co clusters.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The hybrid interface states and their dominated spin-dependent transport in a biphenyl magnetic molecular junction are investigated theoretically in the presence of molecular geometrical torsion. The results reveal a different response of the hybrid interface states relative to the molecular orbitals as the change of torsion angle between the two phenyl rings, where the projected density of states of the hybrid interface states is hardly disturbed while an obvious shift occurs for the molecular orbitals. The further transport calculation demonstrates that the spin-dependent current contributed by the hybrid interface states is suppressed by the torsion angle with a relation of cosine square of the torsion angle, which is consistent with that in nonmagnetic molecular junctions without obvious hybrid interface states. However, the tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) of the junction can be enhanced by the torsion angle at high bias voltage. The dependence of the TMR on the torsion angle relies on the bias voltage and detailed situation of the hybrid interface state, which may be achieved by changing the anchoring group. This work indicates that one can modulate the current and TMR of magnetic molecular junctions by manipulating the conductance of hybrid interface states via the molecular conformation, which deserves further verification in experiments.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, Fe25Co25Ni25Mo5P10B10 high-entropy bulk metallic glass (HE-BMG) with a maximum diameter of 1.2 mm is prepared by combining fluxing treatment and J-quenching technique. The magnetocaloric effect and the “high-entropy effect” on the magnetocaloric properties of the present Fe25Co25Ni25Mo5P10B10 HE-BMG have been investigated. The Curie temperature of the present Fe25Co25Ni25Mo5P10B10 HE-BMG is 560 K, the peak value of the magnetic entropy change and the refrigerant capacity are 0.80 J kg−1 K−1 and 135.4 J kg−1 under the applied field of 1.5 T, 1.88 J kg−1 K−1 and 310.2 J kg−1 under the applied field of 5 T, respectively. Compared with other transition metal-based BMGs, the present Fe25Co25Ni25Mo5P10B10 HE-BMG does not exhibit a relatively larger magnetic entropy change but a much wider full width at half maximum temperature of the magnetic entropy change curve, thus a larger refrigerant capacity.© 2019The next-generation of refrigerant materials should be based on solid materials with big entropy-driven conversion when submitted to an external stimulus change. We report the refrigerant capacity (RC = 2950 J kg−1, upon pressure change of ΔP = 1 kbar) in one of the most known and investigated spin-crossover material [Fe(phen)2(NCS)2]. Our indirect obtained experimental data for the isothermal entropy change (ΔST = 78 Jkg−1K−1) and the adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad = 11 K) for ΔP = 1 kbar, agree with our theoretical calculations. From comparison between the thermodynamic and microscopic entropy descriptions, the origin of the barocaloric effect was ascribed to the pressure phonons activation in spin-crossover materials. Besides, a proper refrigeration thermodynamic cycle (Ericsson cycle) was quantitatively used for showing the refrigeration capacity of [Fe(phen)2(NCS)2].© 2019The effect of torsion-induced acceleration of domain-wall motion has been discovered in magnetic glass-covered microwires. Torsion-stress application causes a step-change increase in domain-wall velocity. The threshold character of the observed effect is related to the successive stress-induced appearance of spiral and elliptical types of domain structures. The theoretical analysis allows us to associate the stress-induced domain-structure transformation with a change of the relationship between the inner core and the outer shell of the magnetic structure in microwires.© 2019Magnetic textures of nanostructures possess topological features due to the continuity of the magnetization vector field and the restrictions implied by the boundary of magnetic material. In thin planar nanoelements, where the dependence of the magnetization across the thickness is inessential, the textures can be represented as a soup of 2-d topological solitons, corresponding to magnetic vortices and antivortices, which are the solutions of Skyrme's model. Topology of the element (of the boundary conditions) then imposes the restrictions on properties and locations of these objects. Periodic arrays of magnetic antidots have topology with infinite connectivity. In this work we classify the metastable magnetization textures in such arrays and build their approximate analytical representation, which allows to prove the conservation of the topological charge (skyrmion number) under the considered model assumptions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.For the first time, we report the synthesis of nickel ferrite-graphitic layers nanocomposite (C-NiFe2O4) via a straightforward approach using iron-nickel cyanide powder (Fe[Ni(CN)4]·3H2O). Firstly, iron-nickel cyanide powder was prepared by mixing equal molar amount of iron salt and potassium tetracyanonickelate (II) hydrate. Secondly, the as-synthesized iron-nickel cyanide powder was thermally treated in air at a temperature as low as 400 °C. The ignition starts at one point of high energy like the edges and then propagates like a wave through all the material. The ignition process was accompanied by huge expansion finally forming C-NiFe2O4 nanocomposite. All samples were characterized by the standard characterization techniques such as field emission scanning electron microscope (FE-SEM), high-resolution transmission electron microscope (HRTEM), Raman spectroscopy, X-ray diffraction (XRD) and thermogravimetric analysis (TGA) as well as vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) to probe the magnetic properties at room temperature. HRTEM investigation reveals the presence of the graphitic layer on the nickel ferrite nanoparticles. Iron-nickel cyanide powder which has sheet-like morphology was directly converted into C-NiFe2O4 nanocomposite during the thermal treatment in air. The VSM magnetic investigations revealed unusual inverted hysteresis behavior of the as-prepared C-NiFe2O4 nanoparticles. While traditional hysteresis loop was obtained in the case of iron-nickel cyanide with specific magnetization saturated at 0.142 emu/g, anomalous hysteresis loop was observed in the case of C-NiFe2O4 nanocomposite with specific magnetization saturated at 28.668 emu/g. The mechanism of the C-NiFe2O4 nanocomposite formation has been proposed based on the obtained experimental data. The present approach for the C-NiFe2O4 nanocomposite synthesis is straightforward, surfactant free, simple and scalable as well as it can be applied to the other ferrites.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A quantum statistic Green's-function method is used to study the localization of in-plane propagating spin waves in a magnetic film consisting of two different atomic planes. It is known that, in a three dimensions magnetic system with randomness, there is a mobility edge at which the states of spin wave change their character from extended to localized. However, we find a mobility edge in the magnetic film at finite temperature. In low-frequency range, the spin waves ω1 and ω2 are extended, they can propagate in layers 1 as well as 2. Whereas, in high-frequency range, the spin waves ω1 and ω2 are localized, i.e., they propagate in layers 2 and 1, respectively. We use the ratio of frequency width of localized spin wave to that of extended spin wave to characterize the degree of localization of spin wave in the magnetic film. The effects of the temperature, the interlayer coupling and the external magnetic field on the mobility edge energy ω* and the degree of localization of spin wave have been investigated. In the present work, a quantum approach is developed to study the localization of spin wave and the results show the method to adjust the transition from localized to extended states of spin wave in a magnetic film consisting of two different atomic planes.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Novel spin-electronic devices require electrodes that inject electrons with both high spin-polarization and perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA). Several full-Heusler compounds are expected to be half-metallic ferromagnets, e.g. chemically-ordered L21 or B2 Co2MnSi. However, most cubic full-Heusler alloys have small magneto-crystalline anisotropy meaning that PMA is difficult to achieve in thin film geometries of devices. Addressing this limitation, Butler et al. (2014) calculate PMA and full spin-polarization in ultra-thin (2–3 nm) chemically-ordered Co2MnSi with an epitaxial coherent interface to rock-salt MgO (0 0 1). Experimentally, PMA in sputter-deposited ultra-thin films with full-Heusler compositions was reported though with adjacent layers of Pd or Pt. We investigate structural origins of such PMA using a test case of ultra-thin Co2MnSi films prepared by magnetron sputter-deposition, adjacent to a MgO layer to represent a tunneling barrier, and to a Pd buffer layer. We measure PMA, with an energy density of 7.8 ± 1.8 Merg/cc at 5 K, when a Pd layer is adjacent to Co2MnSi, following annealing in a narrow temperature range, around 350 °C. This ferromagnetism originates from nanometer scale regions, below 5 nm in size, having a relatively low saturation magnetization, 550 ± 50 emu/cc at low temperatures. Following thermal annealing, significant compositional intermixing between Co2MnSi films and adjacent layers, Co with Pd and Mn with MgO, was measured by electron energy-loss and angle resolved X-ray photoelectron spectroscopies. Aberration-corrected transmission electron microscopy shows that Co2MnSi does not crystallize while at the interface with Pd, nanometer-scale crystallites of FCC solid solution CoPd with {1 1 1} texture are identified. We conclude that these Pd rich CoPd crystallites, characterized by large magnetostriction, are a source for PMA.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The performance of exchanged biased tunnel junctions strongly relies on the annealing process finalizing the fabrication process, which is applied to set a pinned reference magnetization, as well as to enhance the magnetoresistance ratio through the crystallization of the CoFeB layers. With the increasing demand in terms of integration and scalability of tunnel magnetoresistive elements, a laser-induced annealing process presents several advantages against traditional oven annealing technique. It provides the possibility to locally set an individual reference magnetization at the micrometer scale to enable e.g. a Wheatstone bridge or multidimensional sensor fabrication on a wafer level. This study presents the influence of laser-induced localized annealing on the magnetic properties of an exchanged biased CoFeB/IrMn system. The diffusion processes occurring at the interface of CoFeB/IrMn are analyzed in detail utilizing X-ray photoemission spectroscopy depth profiling technique and the results are compared to those obtained by standard vacuum oven annealing and correlated to the magnetic properties investigated by magneto-optical Kerr effect magnetometry.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, using micromagnetic simulation, we show that the dipolar magnetic interaction effect plays a very important role in the process of creation of skyrmions in a coupled system of nanodisks. First, we have determined the magnetic ground state in an isolated nanodisk for different values of perpendicular uniaxial anisotropy (PUA) and Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI). Next, we have applied perpendicular pulse polarized current densities (J) and found that it is possible to create a metastable Néel skyrmion from a nanodisk whose ground state is a single magnetic domain. From these results, we obtained a phase diagram of polarized current intensity vs. time of application of the current pulses, for different values of parameters such as PUA, DMI, and distance between the nanodisks. Our results show that, depending on the separation distance between the nanodisks, the current density required to create a skyrmion changes, due to the dipolar magnetic interaction.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.High field magnetic behavior up to 50 T is reported for the triangular-lattice antiferromagnet AgCrS2. High-field magnetization measurement at 4.2 K suggests two successive magnetic phase transitions were observed at Hc1 ~ 5.5 T and Hc2 ~ 40 T. The magnetic excitation is found to change significantly at Hc1 by means of the high-frequency electron spin resonance (ESR) spectroscopy. The possible origin of the magnetic phase transitions is discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We study the magnetic skyrmion formation in thin-film stacks, consist of two magnetic layers separated by a non-magnetic spacer. The Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation, comprising the spin precession term and the damping term with all relevant contributions, is numerically solved within the micromagnetic framework. Through extensive systematic calculations, we find that skyrmion size can be controlled by the interlayer exchange coupling, as well as the external magnetic field. z-component of the magnetization of the layers, which can be tailored by the coupling, strongly affects the skyrmion diameter. The skyrmion phase coexists with the helical phase for both types of coupling, being antiferromagnetic or ferromagnetic, in the absence of the magnetic field. The size of the skyrmions at zero field can also be controlled by the interaction. We anticipate that our predictions not only expand our fundamental understanding of the physical mechanisms responsible for skyrmion formation but also provide rational basis for the next-generation logic/memory device applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We study the collision dynamics of soliton in discrete classical ferromagnetic spin chain with Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya (DM) interaction in the classical limit. The discrete spin dynamics are found to be governed by discrete nonlinear Schrödinger (DNLS) equation. One soliton and two soliton solutions of DNLS equation are obtained by employing the discrete Hirota bilinearization method. Through the graphical illustrations for the one soliton and two soliton solution, we discuss the effect of DM interaction in ferromagnetic spin chain. Inelastic collision phenomenon occurring in this system and both amplitudes of each soliton get suppressed or enhanced after collision. We also find the discreteness effect on the soliton excitation in ferromagnetic spin chain. The modulation in the soliton excitation induced by DM interaction and discreteness is also discussed briefly.© 2019Iron carbides nanomaterials have attracted intensive interests due to their potential applications in catalysis, biomedicine and batteries. In this review, first, we will introduce the structures and fundamental feature of iron carbides firstly and then summarize the synthesis methods, such as sol-gel method or high temperature organic phase methods etc. Finally, the applications of various iron carbides in biomedicine, highly efficient catalysis as well as energy storage field will be discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Efficacious control of spin wave dynamics is demonstrated in two-dimensional magnonic crystals in the form of defective honeycomb antidot lattices. The spin wave dynamics of this system is investigated using broadband ferromagnetic resonance spectrometer. A stark modification in magnonic spectra is achieved with the modulation in the lattice spacing and with the bias magnetic field strength and its orientation. A rich band of spin wave modes are obtained for the lattice with smallest periodicity, which finally converges to two modes in case of the largest one. The spin wave modes in all lattices possess a strong anisotropic behaviour with a six- and two-fold rotational symmetries as a function of the bias field orientation originating from the strong modulation of internal field distribution at different regions of such unorthodox system. The experimentally observed spin wave modes have been qualitatively well reproduced by micromagnetic simulations and the simulated mode profiles unravel the presence of diverse genres of extended and localized standing modes in these unusual magnonic crystals. These observations are significant for tunability and anisotropic propagation of spin waves leading towards the development of efficient magnonic devices competent with the future microwave communication systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, electroless-plating of magnetic film directly on planar spiral copper coil to fabricate embedded inductor was designed and realized by introducing NiCoP alloys as its cladding magnetic core. This method with novel structure was achieved with significant increasing of inductance L and Q factor. The optimized alloy of Ni41Co58P1 results in enhanced inductance L around 32%@10 MHz and Q factor of 18. Cp experimental demonstrates its typical ignorable parasitic capacitance. Finally, HFSS simulation revealed the magnetic film constrained the magnetic line transmitted flowing the magnetic film, leading to effective inductance L increasing, which is in good agree with the experimental results.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The phenomenon of “induced magnetic ordering” for the local magnetic moments with singlet ground state in a periodical lattice is considered for the prototype intermetallic rare-earth compound PrNi ordered ferromagnetically at temperature TC = 21 K. Within the framework of a realistic model the energy dispersion relations are obtained for the magnetic excitations above Tc along the high symmetry directions. The “soft mode” behaviour observed for the acoustic magnetic excitation along (q 0 0) direction is reproduced. The influence of the substitution of isovalent nonmagnetic La for Pr1−xLaxNi on the temperature of ferromagnetic ordering is investigated. The linear decrease of the ordering temperature TC down to zero value in increasing of the La concentration up to x = 0.5 is observed and described by the model.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effect of Nd and Sr-deficiencies on the magnetic and electrical transport properties of Nd0.67-xSr0.33MnO3-δ (x = 0.09, 0.17, 0.25, 0.33) and Nd0.67Sr0.33-yMnO3-δ (y = 0.09, 0.17) compounds were investigated. The conventional solid-state method was adopted for the preparation of the compounds. Rietveld refinement was used to analyze the X-ray diffraction patterns of the synthesized compounds. The scanning electron microscopy along with energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy analysis was used to examine the surface morphology and homogeneity. The effective ionic oxidation states of Mn-ions was calculated from the X-ray absorption spectroscopic technique via the interpolation method. Temperature variation of magnetization under a constant static field of 50 Oe confirmed that all the deficient compounds undergo a ferromagnetic to paramagnetic transition similar to the pristine compound, but TC increases with the increase in Nd-deficiency and decreases with the increase in Sr-deficiency. Among the studied compounds, Nd0.67-xSr0.33MnO3-δ (x = 0.17) composition shows the highest magnetic transition temperature with the least value of electrical resistivity and significant magnetization than that of the pristine compound. Hence, the present study confirms that the structural, magnetic and electrical transport properties of Nd0.67-xSr0.33MnO3-δ (x = 0.09, 0.17, 0.25, 0.33) and Nd0.67Sr0.33-yMnO3-δ (y = 0.09, 0.17) manganites are significantly influenced by the creation of deficiency at the Nd and Sr-sites.© 2019 Elsevier LtdTrap-assisted tunneling (TAT) mechanism dominates the subthreshold leakage current and ambipolar transport behavior of tunnel field-effect transistor (TFET) with polycrystalline-silicon (poly-Si) channel. The unwanted ambipolar transport behavior of poly-Si TFET can be suppressed by the employment of gate-to-drain underlap structure to increase the tunneling distance near the drain side when the TFET is operated at the negative gate voltage. The gate-to-drain underlap length of TFET would also exhibit series resistance effect and strong temperature effect on the on-state current (ION). The strong temperature dependent series resistance effect and bandgap narrowing effect cause the poly-Si TFET to exhibit temperature instability of the on-state current. In order to improve the temperature instability of the on-state current, the ammonia plasma treatment has been performed to passivate the defects and reduce the trap state density of poly-Si film. The trap state density reduction of poly-Si can improve the field-effect mobility of transport carrier and reduce the series resistance effect, resulting in the reduction of the temperature dependence of ION. Consequently, the improved temperature dependent ION of poly-Si TFET can be obtained, and it is useful for the development of poly-Si thin-film transistor and its applications in the high resolution display industry and three-dimensional integrated-circuit.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Mn-Ga alloys have attracted considerable interests due to the high uniaxial magnetocrystalline anisotropy (MCA) arising from their tetragonal structure, but the evolution and influence mechanism of the uniaxial MCA associated with composition variations is still unclear. In this paper, experiments and first-principles calculations are combined to study the uniaxial MCA over a wide composition range of MnxGa100− x (50 ≤ x ≤ 75) alloys, ranging from MnGa to Mn3Ga. By adopting suitable annealing processes, the single tetragonal phase is obtained in all studied alloys. From the law of approach to saturation, it is deduced that the magnetocrystalline anisotropy constant (K1) firstly increases from 1.59 MJ m−3 for x = 53.5 to a maximum value of 2.24 MJ m−3 for x = 65, and then decreases to 1.3 MJ m−3 for x = 75. By comprehensive first-principles calculations, we find that under the effect of the crystal field, the Mn atom occupying 4d site of the tetragonal lattice (Mn-4d) has easy axis anisotropy, which is positive to the uniaxial MCA; while Mn-2b has a soft in plane tendency, which is negative to the uniaxial MCA. As x increases from 53.5 to 65, the itineracy of the d electrons is increased through d-d hybridization between Mn-2b and Mn-4d, simultaneously the spin-orbit coupling is enhanced due to c axis shortening of the tetragonal lattice, both improve the overall easy axis behavior, resulting in the increase of K1. As x further increasing from 65 to 75, the soft in plane tendency of Mn-2b leads to the decrease of K1. The analysis can be applied to other 3d alloys, and offers a guidance for improving their uniaxial anisotropy, especially for Mn based permanent magnet.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Composite films of Pb0.93La0.07Zr0.6Ti0.4O3 (PLZT) with spinel ferrites viz. Ni0.6Zn0.4Fe2O4 (NZFO), Co1.1Mn0.1Fe1.8O4 (CMFO), and Co0.9Zn0.1Fe2O4 (CZFO) respectively, were synthesized by the sol-gel spin coating technique. The layered structure of PLZT and spinel ferrite has been deposited onto silicon (1 1 1) substrate. X-ray diffraction analysis was used to confirm the formation of required phases in the light of JCPDS data. Microstructural investigation carried out using Magnetic Force Microscopy (MFM) operated topography mode depicts presence of grains having size of about 20–25 nm. The dielectric properties of the samples under investigation were recorded in the wide range of temperature measurements, in order to confirm existence of well grown ferroelectric phase and understand phase transition behavior. The magnetoelectric interactions have been investigated using phase signal of Magnetic Force Microscopy (MFM). Variation of MFM phase contrast and phase angle have been investigated as a function of electric field applied between magnetic tip and substrate, which gives an idea about nature of magnetoelectric interactions. The change in the magnetic domain as a function of applied electric field has been used to understand the magnetoelectric interactions present in the layered thin films of PLZT and spinel ferrite composite structure. Maximum phase angle change of 80°, 100° and 18° has been observed in the composite films of PLZT-NZFO, PLZT-CMFO and PLZT-CZFO respectively in presence of the applied voltage of 5 V/−5 V with respect to 0 V. Maximum value of magnetoelectric coefficient estimated for composite films of PLZT and NZFO composite was found to be 98 mV/cm Oe amongst the sample under investigation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the room temperature magnetoimpedance in bulk samples of La0.7Sr0.3− xCaxMnO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) subjected to ac current excitation of frequency f = 1 MHz to 3 GHz and dc magnetic fields (−5 kOe < H < 5 kOe). The ground state changes from ferromagnetic (FM) for x ≤ 0.20 to paramagnetic (PM) for x ≥ 0.24 at 300 K. Ac magnetoresistance is not only higher in magnitude than dc magnetoresistance but shows interesting features: It is negative and shows a single peak at Hdc = 0 below certain frequencies in FM samples but transforms into positive double peaks at Hdc = ±Hk and the double peak feature shift towards higher magnetic fields with increasing frequency of the ac current. Surprisingly, the ac magnetoresistance in PM samples is also negative and displays a single peak at 500 MHz, which transmutes into an abrupt increase at a critical field value for f > 700 MHz. A plot of Hdc corresponding to the double peak/critical field versus frequency suggest that the curves are linear for PM samples and non-linear for FM samples. We suggest that the observed anomalies in the ac magnetoresistance are due to electron paramagnetic resonance for x ≥ 0.24 and ferromagnetic resonance for x ≤ 0.20. Thus, we are able to electrically detect paramagnetic and ferromagnetic resonances in these conducing magnetic oxides through a simple magnetoimpedance measurement.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.When a current flows in the axial direction of a horizontal cylinder coated with a ferrofluid film, it generates a magnetic field exterior to the cylinder which causes a radially inward force on the dipoles of the ferrofluid. In a recent work an evolution equation was derived, valid for a magnetic fluid coating a horizontal cylinder. To be time-accurate, we could only study the coating evolution with sufficiently small initial volumes such that the small slope approximation was valid throughout the evolution of the coating. In this work, we are going to change the evolution equation to an iterative equation, and use it to find the maximum sustainable volume of coatings for a given cylinder radius and magnetic field strength. In an effort to model actual physical situations, we assume that the magnetic fluid is an ester ferrofluid, and that the conducting cylinder is made of either copper or a niobium-tin superconductor. We find that, for sufficiently small cylinder radii, or sufficiently strong magnetic fields, the tendency for the ferrofluid to flow towards the bottom of the cylinder is suppressed. We also show that, over a large range of cylinder radii, the magnetic field can almost completely suppress variations in the coating thickness along the axis of the cylinder caused by surface tension effects.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A nondestructive testing (NDT) data fusion method for evaluation of bearing rings quality was proposed to reliably and efficiently recognize the qualified bearing rings in terms of hardness. A softmax classifier programed by python was used to classify bearing rings. Bearing rings are nondestructively inspected using Magnetic Barkhausen Noise (MBN) and Eddy Current (EC). Following these nondestructive examinations, the information gathered from these two NDT methods has been fused. The results obtained with these processes were presented in this paper and the classification results were discussed. It was observed that more robust and better prediction performance on bearing ring classification was achieved by using the fused information. Moreover, the fused Root Mean Square (RMS) and reactance features outperform the others in terms of accuracy and loss value indicating least misclassification probability.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work the propagation of nonlinear electromagnetic short waves in a ferromagnetic medium with inhomogeneous exchange is discussed. It is shown that such waves propagate perpendicular to the magnetization density. The evolution of waves under the influence of perturbations in one transverse dimension is considered. As result, we derive a new (2+1)-dimensional evolution system in which painlevé analysis reveals its integrability properties. In the wake of such analysis, using the arbitrary functions to enter into the Laurent series of solutions to the above system, we present some typical class of excitations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This article reports the composition dependent microstructural, optical and magnetic behavior of rare earth Sm3+ ions substituted nanocrystalline nickel ferrite. The formation of pure cubic spinel structure was confirmed by X-ray diffraction patterns. The average crystallite size was found to decrease with increasing Sm content because of hindered crystal growth. The field cooled (7 T) hysteresis loops at 5 K displayed large exchange bias of 2 kOe along with considerable coercive field for the smallest particles. A strong correlation between particle size, canted surface spins, vertical shift and exchange bias was observed at low temperature. The reduction in coercivity and saturation magnetization observed in room temperature hysteresis loops was attributed to nonmagnetic behavior of substituted Sm3+ ions. The existence of interparticle interaction below blocking temperature and high surface anisotropy due to disordered surface spins was confirmed by M-T protocols. The indirect allowed optical band gap was found to increase with high Sm content due to finite size effect.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The influence of noncollinearity between unidirectional and uniaxial anisotropies on asymmetric magnetization reversal of NiFe/IrMn bilayers has been investigated. The experimental findings show that a noncollinear effective anisotropies originates from the competition among the applied magnetic field, magnetic anisotropy and exchange coupling, and the presence of magnetic frustration at NiFe/IrMn interfaces. Azimuthal measurements of the exchange bias suggest that the degree of effective interfacial anisotropies, which can be quantified by the angle (γ) between the uniaxial and unidirectional anisotropies, plays a crucial role in determining magnetization reversal. For a variable thickness of antiferromagnet layers, the experimental findings suggest a non-monotonic correlation between the magnitude of γ and the degree of interfacial roughness. Numerical analysis has been performed by considering the magnetic frustration present at the ferromagnet/antiferromagnet interfaces, suggesting a good agreement with experimental findings.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Carbon coated copper nanoparticles, Cum/C nanocomposites, were synthesized using solid-phase pyrolysis in solid solutions of copper phthalocyanine and metal free copper phthalocyanine, (CuPc)x(H2Pc)1−x where 0⩽x⩽1. The weight concentration of copper in percentages consistently varies from 0 to 12 wt% and the sizes of copper nanoparticles in samples changes from 2 nm to 500 nm. Samples containing 8 and 12 wt% Cu have a bimodal size distribution. The X-ray diffraction data and HRTEM images show a face-centered cubic structure of Cu nanocrystallites that uniformly distributed in the carbon matrix. The temperature and field dependences of the magnetization in all copper-containing samples exhibit both ferromagnetic and giant-paramagnetic properties in the measured temperature range of 10–300 K. The saturation magnetization of ferromagnetic nanoparticles falls in the range 0.2–1.5 emu/g and weakly depends on the temperature from helium up to the room temperatures. The paramagnetic magnetizations in Cu/C nanocomposites at H = 50 kOe and T = 10 K are practically an order of magnitude higher in all the samples than the ferromagnetic saturation magnetizations. The paramagnetic susceptibilities of the Cum/C nanocomposites at 10 K are of the order of (0.3–1)10−4 emu/gCuOe, which are one and a half to two orders of magnitude higher than the specific paramagnetic susceptibility of the carbon matrix.© 2019Magnetocaloric effect (MCE) has drawn much attention because its magnetic cooling property enables refrigeration without producing noxious gas or using rapidly depleting resources. However, applications for everyday life are yet distant. In addition, we need to understand more about the practical aspect of the MCE. Here, we introduce a phenomenological model to explain the quasi-adiabatic MCE. Correction factors to the equilibrium thermodynamic feature implied by the entropy landscape are devised in analytic forms. To demonstrate the validity of the model, the MCE from two different materials is investigated. The recently discovered metallic paramagnet, YbPt2Sn, shows a linear and reversible MCE which is typical of a paramagnetic system and suitable for cryogenics without 3He. On the other hand, a complex-phase material, Ce0.5La0.5B6, exhibits a pronounced irreversible MCE especially across a magnetic phase boundary. A term that describes the field induced heating near a phase transition turns out to be essential in resolving the irreversible, non-equilibrium MCE.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Both low Curie temperature (Tc) and high specific absorption rate (SAR) are desired for magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) used in magnetic induction hyperthermia (MIH). Here, we report novel MNPs (Zn0.54Co0.46Cr0.6Fe1.4O4) with a Tc of 48.8 °C, which meets the requirement for the self-regulating of MIH therapeutic temperature. This low Tc can be attributed to the weak A-B super-exchange interactions caused by the substitution of Zn2+ and Cr3+. The SAR of the MNPs under clinical applied AC magnetic field (16 kA·m−1, 100 kHz) is up to 6.53 W·g−1, which is mainly contributed by the relaxation loss. The short relaxation time, caused by the low magnetocrystalline anisotropy, may take responsibility for the occurrence of the relaxation loss. While the low magnetocrystalline anisotropy is related to the low occupation ratio of Co2+ in B sites. The in vitro experiments indicate the self-regulating temperature nature and biocompatibility of the MNPs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Two dimensional magnetic materials, with tunable electronic properties could lead to new spintronic, magnetic and magneto-optic applications. Here, we explore intrinsic magnetic ordering in two dimensional monolayers of transition metal tri-halides (MX3, M = V, Cr, Mn, Fe and Ni, and X = F, Cl, Br and I), using density functional theory. We find that other than FeX3 family which has an anti-ferromagnetic ground state, rest of the trihalides are ferromagnetic. Amongst these the VX3 and NiX3 family are found to have the highest magnetic transition temperature, beyond the room temperature. In terms of electronic properties, the tri-halides of Mn and Ni are either half metals or Dirac half metals, while the tri-halides of V, Fe and Cr are insulators. Among all the trihalides studied in this paper, we find the existence of very clean spin polarized Dirac half metallic state in MnF3, MnCl3, MnBr3, NiF3 and NiCl3. These spin polarized Dirac half metals will be immensely useful for spin-current generation and other spintronic applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Combined natural and thermomagnetic convection heat transfer in ferrofluid surrounding a vertically orientated electrically-heated microwire is experimentally and numerically investigated and compared with the natural convection in de-ionized water. Numerical simulation is validated with the experimental results for de-ionized water. The convective forces are induced by density and magnetic susceptibility changes both due to temperature gradients in the fluid. The results are presented in the form of a transient temperature rise of the wire and streamlines of the induced flow for different electric currents (1–2.5 A) supplied to the wire. We found that as a result of the magnetic field vortices form along the cell and enhance the heat transfer from the wire. The size and number of the vortices depend on the current supplied. The studied phenomenon can have great impact on the research on cooling electronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Based on the first-principles density functional theory and non-equilibrium Green's function technique, we investigate the spin caloritronic transport properties of Mn-porphyrin trimer with carbon nanotube electrodes. The system exhibits distinct spin caloritronic transport properties under different magnetic configurations. The underlying mechanism is analyzed by spin-resolved transmission spectra, current spectra, spatial distributions of corresponding molecular projected self-consistent Hamiltonian orbitals. Based on these intriguing spin caloritronic transport characteristics, the thermal spin logic gates, such as NOT, AND and OR are designed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This study aims to investigate the 24d and 8b site occupancies, valence state, and spin state of Co ions in Co-doped In2O3 prepared by a chemical solution method. The Rietveld analysis of X-ray powder diffraction patterns of the products revealed that Co2+ and Co3+ ions tend to occupy the 24d and 8b sites, respectively. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy analysis indicated that the Co2+ ions are dominant at low-doping region (x≤0.044) and that Co3+ ions appear at high-doping region (x≥0.052). Magnetic susceptibility measurements revealed that the effective Bohr magneton number peff is ~3.8 at the low-doping region, consistent with the value for Co2+ in the high-spin (S=3/2)state. The peff decreases at the high-doping region, where Co3+ ions appear. These results indicate that the Co3+ ions are in the low-spin (S=0) state or intermediate-spin (S=1) state.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.General Spin-S Ising model under the effect of the random field has been investigated within the effective field approximation. Effect of the bimodal distribution as a discrete, and Gaussian distribution as a continuous random field distribution, on the phase diagrams and order parameter of the system, have been determined. Detailed investigations display many interesting phenomena such as reentrant behavior and small ordered phase which can survive any degree of randomness. Underlying physical mechanisms have been given for the effect of the random field distributions. Especially role of the crystal field has been clarified.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Quantum breathers properties and modulational instability in quantum zigzag spin chains with alternative combination ferro-antiferromagnetic interactions are carried out. For a few number of bosons, by using the number states method and numerical diagonalization, the energy spectrum, multi-quantum breathers states and theirs new properties are found. For a large number of bosons, based on the time dependent Hartree approximation and semi-discrete multiple-scale method, we provide a detailed analytical analysis, discuss conditions to obtain solitons bright localized solutions and predict the formation of instability regions in the system. In both configurations, we have constructed quantum breathers states and deduced their quantum energies. Furthermore the modulational instability analysis are done and the formation conditions of appearance instabilities regions predicted by our analytical investigations are found and are in full agreement. Convincing quantitative agreement has been found between the analytical approaches and the numerical simulations for the modulational instability. Experimental data on Rb2Cu2Mo3O12 are parameters used in this work.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetisation processes in assemblies of identical magnetostatically interacting Stoner-Wohlfarth (SW) particles are analysed. First we demonstrate analytically that in case of perfectly aligned anisotropy axes of the particles, parallel to the applied magnetic field, the demagnetising factor of an assembly is reduced by the value of self-demagnetising factor of a single constituent particle. This is a direct consequence of discrete character of particles’ magnetisation switching in this configuration, and it is not due to self-interaction. To confirm the analytical results, Monte-Carlo modelling was performed for two different 2D configurations of dipolar interacting SW particles: one with their anisotropy axes lying in plane, and another one – with out of plane anisotropy axes, while the applied magnetic field always being out of plane. We show that while for the in-plane configuration usual demagnetising field correction applies, for the out of plane case the usual correction leads to an overskewed M(H) curve, while the correction reduced by the particle's self-demagnetising factor of 1/3, yields correct results, confirming the analytical model. This expands the validity of hard demagnetising field corrections, introduced recently for nucleation type hard magnetic materials, to materials where discrete magnetisation switching occurs by coherent rotation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic skyrmions are topologically-protected spin textures existing in chiral ferromagnetic materials, which can be utilized as information carriers for non-volatile memories and logic circuits in spintronics. Searching simple and controllable way to create isolated magnetic skyrmions is desirable for further technology developments and industrial designs. Based on micromagnetic simulations, we show that the temporal dissipative structure can be developed in the T-shaped chiral ferromagnetic nanojunction when it is driven to the far-from-equilibrium regime by a constant spin-polarized current. Then the magnetic skyrmions can be continuously nucleated during the periodic magnetization dynamics of the nanojunction. We have systematically investigated the effects of current density, Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction, external magnetic field, and thermal fluctuation on the nucleation dynamics of the magnetic skyrmions. Our results here suggest a novel and promising mechanism to continuously create magnetic skyrmions for the development of skyrmion-based spintronics devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We reviewed magnetic tetra metal nitrides – Fe4N and Co4N for their structure, magnetization and the thermodynamics of phase formation. Opposed to Fe4N, the formation of a stoichiometric Co4N turns out to be extremely difficult. A review of the literature of Co4N compound suggest that the experimental lattice parameter (LP) was always found to be smaller than the theoretical predicted value. It can also be seen that as the substrate temperature (Ts) increases, the LP of Co4N film decreases. In this work, we deposited Co4N films using molecular beam epitaxy (MBE), direct current magnetron sputtering (dcMS) and high power impulse MS (HiPIMS). Films were characterized using X-ray diffraction, X-ray reflectivity and atomic force microscopy. It was found that at high Ts, N out-diffusion significantly affects the growth of Co4N phase. We found that the MBE deposited films did not show any signature of Co4N phase when Ts<703K but at Ts=703K, the phase formed can be assigned to fcc Co rather than Co4N. On the other hand, the dcMS and HiPIMS grown films clearly show the presence of Co4N phase even at Ts=300K. Detailed analysis of Co4N films grown using dcMS and HiPIMS reveals that HiPIMS grown films are single phase and have a denser microstructure. The density of HiPIMS deposited film was also found to be close to the theoretical value. Magneto optical Kerr effect and polarized neutron reflectivity measurements were carried out to study magnetic properties. Differences in the magnetic moment and magnetic anisotropy were correlated with structural parameters. Obtained results are presented and discussed in terms of involved thin film growth mechanism.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Inductively heatable magnetic particles are powerful additives towards smart processes, such as bonding and debonding on demand or self-healing. For the best efficiency, particles are needed which possess the highest possible heating rates/specific absorption rate when being exposed to a magnetic induction field. Herein, a cheap, simple and upscalable precipitation-oxidation assisted aging synthesis route for magnetic nanoparticles is optimized towards yielding a product with high heating rates. In-depth synthesis parameter studies were carried out to understand how the nanoparticle structure can be influenced in a way to yield the best heating rates. This included variation of the precursors chemistries, precipitant concentration, the oxidation and aging conditions as well as the co-doping of the particles with Zn and Co. A correlation between magnetic hysteresis, measured via vibrating sample magnetometry and specific absorption rate of the samples was established and it was demonstrated how crucial it is to select the right range of external magnetic fields in hysteresis measurements in order to achieve reliable and predictable correlations with the specific absorption power and heating rates, respectively. Via the established understanding and the systematic variation, it was ultimately possible to develop a synthesis procedure, yielding ferrimagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles that come with specific absorption rates of up to 1474 W·g−1 (at a magnetic field of 430 Oe at 1013 kHz).© 2019Multiferroic, CoCr2O4 bulk material undergoes successive magnetic transitions such as paramagnetic to collinear ferrimagnetic state at Curie temperature (TC) and non-collinear spin-spiral ordering temperature TS followed by a lock-in-transition TL. In this paper, the rich sequence of magnetic transitions in CoCr2O4 nanoparticles after doping with iron ions are investigated by varying the concentration from x = 10 to 40%. With increasing iron concentration from 10 to 40%, while TC increases from 102 to 160 K higher than the TC of pure CoCr2O4, TS increases from 26 to 40 K. Later transition is clearly shown by sharp transition in specific heat measurement. While enhancement in TC is attributed to increase in lattice expansion and the exchange interaction between tetrahedral (A) and octahedral (B) sites, spin-spiral ordering is dictated by B-B interaction. Further, we have examined the magnetic transitions through neutron scattering using polarized neutron beam along three orthogonal directions. We observe that the para to ferrimagnetic transition is found to be continuous and the spiral ordering is diffused in nature irrespective of composition.© 2019This work reports a theoretical analysis of the absorption properties of a one-dimensional ternary periodic structure of dielectric, silicon dioxide and hyperbolic materials using well-known simple transfer matrix method (TMM). The hyperbolic material is a composite material of dielectric and plasma materials in which the optical constants of hyperbolic material have been studied by considering the effective medium theory. The relative permittivity of hyperbolic material has been studied with the variation of filling fraction and the electron collision frequency. The absorption of ternary periodic structure was studied with varying incident angle, in which the maximum absorption is found at incident angle 80°. Therefore, we have studied the absorption spectra of the considered periodic structure with variation of filling fraction, electron collision frequency, and thickness of dielectric material where the incident angle is constant at 80° for the maximum absorption. In this particular case, we have obtained the enhanced absorption spectra for ternary periodic structure in comparison to other angle of incidence at low normalized frequency. However, zero absorption for the same structure is obtained at the high normalized frequency range that exhibits a band gap. Now, the enhanced absorption of the considered structure has been studied with variation of filling fraction, electron collision frequency and thickness of dielectric material. We have obtained that the enhanced high absorption at the low microwave frequency may be used as a sensor, detector, logic gate; and the absorption band gap at the high microwave frequency range may as tunable absorber based microwave devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The structure, microstructure, magnetic properties and magnetocaloric effect in the BiFeO3-based multiferroics with a partial isovalent substitution of bismuth for europium ions have been experimentally and theoretically investigated by X-ray diffraction, SEM and magnetic methods. The ceramic EuxBi1− xFeO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.2) samples have been prepared by a solid-state reaction method under cold pressing at high pressure P = 4 GPa. With increase in the concentration of the doping Eu element a structural phase transition from a rhombohedral R3c to an orthorhombic Pn21a perovskite structure is observed. Microstructure and chemical composition of the EuxBi1− xFeO3 samples have been studied by SEM data. Temperature dependences of magnetization for the Eu-doped multiferroics demonstrate two magnetic “weak ferromagnetic-antiferromagnetic” and “antiferromagnetic-paramagnetic” phase transitions in a high temperature range T = 640–822 K. The presence of a weak ferromagnetism in all compositions is confirmed by open loops of magnetic field dependencies. On the basis of the analysis of magnetic data, magnetic entropy change, heat capacity change, relative cooling power and full-width at half-maximum of the peak have been calculated. It has been found out that the thermodynamic characteristics strongly depend on the degree of substitution, temperature, and magnitude of magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The large volume variation of ferromagnetic shape memory alloy is strongly restricted in the film format on rigid substrates. Due to the high growth temperature (>673 K), it is difficult to grow Heusler alloys with high crystalline quality on flexible polymers. We successfully synthesize high-quality 100 nm thick Ni51.6Mn33.5In14.9 films on transparent flexible mica substrates by pulsed laser deposition, and compare the crystalline structure, morphology and magnetic properties with the films grown on Si (1 0 0) substrates. Due to the weak Van der Waals inter-layer interaction in mica substrates, the clamping effect of substrate can be significantly weakened by thinning the thickness of substrates using the simple mechanical exfoliation. This makes the final sample with Ni-Mn-In film on ultrathin mica substrate highly flexible with smallest curvature radius down to 0.745 cm. In addition, the mechanical properties of flexible Ni-Mn-In films were tested by bending in various curvature radiuses repeatedly. The resistance only changes slightly after more than 10,000 cycles, indicating the highly stable flexibility. These results demonstrate that flexible ferromagnetic shape memory alloy film can be obtained by using mica substrates and has great potential applications in flexible electronics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The intermetallic rare earth-transition metal (R-T) compound Nd2Fe14B has a large energy density and is an industrially important permanent magnet material. Its low Curie Temperature (TC) though limits its use for electric motor applications. To improve its high temperature permanent magnetic properties, the coercive field (HC) should be enhanced, which can be achieved by influencing intrinsic atomistic properties such as saturation magnetization (MS) and magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy (MAE). Strain effects and substitution are two important methods for influencing MS and MAE. Using numerical methods based on density functional theory, firstly MS and MAE of three R2Fe14B compounds with R=Pr,Dy and Y are calculated at 0 K. Further, the influence of changing the lattice parameter ratio c/a on MAE is studied. For increasing c/a, MAE of Y2Fe14B and Pr2Fe14B remains nearly constant, while MAE of Dy2Fe14B decreases monotonously, up to 40% per 1% change in c/a. In the next step, 50% of the R-atoms are substituted. For Pr2Fe14B, MAE decreases with substitution of Dy and Y; for Dy2Fe14B it increases with Pr but decreases with Y; for Y2Fe14B it increases with Pr and Dy. The nucleation field (HN) of the substituted phases are estimated for different microstructures and visually compared to the non-substituted compounds, showing a large HN for PrDyFe14B. Further, based on DOS plots of the Y-DyFe14B system, the contribution of different atoms and atomic sites to MAE is discussed, and by visualizing the electronic density contours, the influence of substitution on Fe-atoms in Dy2Fe14B and DyYFe14B is studied.© 2019In this paper, a comparison of different floating junction structure underneath the termination region FJt for 4H-SiC FJ_JBS is performed by simulations and experiments. The simulated results indicate that the optimized dose of FJt is different when the different FJt structures are chosen, which is resulting from different work mechanism. The experimental results show that the breakdown voltage of FJ_JBS with discontinuous floating junction structure underneath the termination region is 2.9 kV. For comparison, the FJ_JBS with continuous floating junction structure without fixed outer boundary underneath the termination only achieves a breakdown voltage of 2.05 kV, which validates the simulation results.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe electromechanical stability of low temperature polycrystalline silicon thin-film transistors embedded on plastic film was investigated as a function of type of stress and cyclic bending. The results show these devices to have reliable electromechanical integrity against mechanical strain at a bending radius of a few millimeters under compressive stress on the inner bending surface. By contrast, after being subjected to tensile stress on the outward bending surface, the devices show significant electrical failure under the induced strain. The onset of strain fracture also closely corresponds to the electrical failure of the device when exposed to tensile stress. The deformation kinetics caused by stress accumulation were investigated in multiple films with regard to a flexible backplane; these results reveal that mechanical integrity in reliable device design could be effectively provided by controlling the types of stress and could be put into practical use in flexible electronics applications.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this work we are first to report an explicit solution to the SPE for a dynamically-depleted DD-SOI MOSFET that captures the effects of both oxide-trapped charge and interface traps on the device characteristics. Derivations for both the implicit (iterative) and explicit (non-iterative) solutions to the surface potential equation are presented for the DD-SOI MOSFET device. The explicit or closed form approximation was solved using non-iterative techniques that have been developed for the PSP MOSFET compact modeling framework (Wu, 2007; Chen and Gildenblat, 2001, 2005). The non-iterative model can be implemented as a Verilog-A sub-circuit module using a VCVS in series with the gate of the SOI MOSFET that is compatible with standard circuit level simulation tools. We demonstrate the accuracy of the implicit and explicit surface potential-based derivations using two dimensional TCAD simulations as a comparison. Finally, we present the symmetric linearization method for computing the drain current of the DD-SOI MOSFET.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effect of partial substitution of Si by Ga on the microstructure and soft magnetic properties of FINEMET-like Fe73.5Si13.5− xNb3B9Cu1Gax (x = 0, 3, 6, 9, 12 at.%) alloys has been investigated. It was found that the primary crystallization of ribbons was gradually changed from α-Fe (Si) into α-Fe (Ga, Si) phase with the increase of Ga content. Besides, the Fe-Ga clusters were detected in the amorphous ribbon with x = 6, which could provide nucleation sites for the α-Fe (Ga, Si) phase. In such case, the crystallization temperature of the ribbons with Ga addition was lower than that of ribbon without Ga addition. For the ribbon with x = 6, the precipitation of Ga element was priority to that of Si, which leads to the ‘increase-decrease’ tendency for the changes of lattice parameter with the increase of annealing temperature. Meanwhile, compared to the α-Fe (Si) phase with enrichment of Si for x = 0 ribbon, the α-Fe (Ga, Si) phase with high Ga and low Si concentration for the x = 6 ribbon was obtained, together with fine grain size (11 nm) of α-Fe (Ga, Si) phase, resulting to the same low coercivity (0.24 A/m), higher saturation magnetization (1.37 T) and maximum permeability after annealed at 455 °C for 1 min.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.PANI-γFe2O3 nanocomposites were synthesized under intense UV radiation, λ = 365 nm, at different temperatures. In this synthesis, the oxide acts as an oxidant of PANI during polymerization. Thermogravimetry measurements confirmed that polymerization was more pronounced for PANI-γFe2O3 than PANI-Fe3O4. This was probably due to the larger number of Fe+3 ions in the former, which are responsible for the aniline oxidation. A large decrease in magnetization over the reaction time was observed in the samples synthesized at 60 °C. This diminution is attributed to the transformation of γ-Fe2O3 into α-Fe2O3, evidenced by both X-Ray diffraction analysis and the corresponding presence of the Morin transition. In samples synthesized at 80 °C, a more accelerated transformation from the γ-Fe2O3 phase to α-Fe2O3 was initially observed, followed by full dissolution of the iron oxide in ferrous sulfate, FeSO4. The magnetic properties of the samples synthesized at 40 °C oscillate as a function of the reaction time. This is because the chemical reaction synthesis presents sustained oscillations, as confirmed by magnetization measurements taken during the process. The maghemite Fe+3 ions were reduced by the polymerization of the aniline, favoring the formation of magnetite. On the other hand, the magnetite Fe+2 ions were oxidized by UV radiation, leading to the opposite transformation. The magnetization of these phases is different, which causes sustained oscillation in their values. The later results were analyzed using the Lotka-Volterra model and the parameters agreed well with the experimental data.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Multi-main-phase (MMP) magnets prepared by co-sintering Nd2Fe14B and (Nd,Ce)2Fe14B powders have shown better magnetic properties than the single-main-phase (SMP) magnets with the same average composition, enabling the preparation of high cost-performance permanent magnets with high Ce content. The present work focuses on the squareness factor (Q) of demagnetization curve for MMP Nd-Ce-Fe-B magnets, which represents the magnetic stability in practical applications. It is found that the MMP magnets prepared with larger fraction of (Nd,Ce)2Fe14B components possess higher Q value than those with lower fraction, which highlights the importance of relative fraction between the magnetically softer Ce-rich and the magnetically harder Nd-rich 2:14:1 grains on the squareness for the MMP magnets. Besides, the reduced Ce/Nd gradients within 2:14:1 grains and the formation of continuous RE-rich (RE, rare earth) grain boundaries also make contributions to the recovered squareness factor as well as the sustained coercivity.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 powders were prepared by plasma arc discharge method followed by the subsequent heat treatments within the temperature range of 1000–1250 °C. Structural, microstructural, magnetic and dielectric properties of the as-synthesized and heat treated powders are examined in detail. The results indicate that as-synthesized powders contain a mixture of ZnO, Fe0.72OZn0.13 and Ni-Zn ferrite phases. However, the quantitative amount of Ni-Zn ferrite phase gradually increases by post annealing process. This finding is accompanied by an improvement in the magnetic properties such that a single phase Ni-Zn ferrite with the average crystallite size of 212 nm, lattice parameter of 8.332 Å, saturation magnetization of 35.1 emu/g and coercivity of 24.9 Oe is formed after annealing at 1250 °C. Nevertheless, dielectric properties measured in the frequency range 20 Hz–10 MHz exhibits a complex behaviour due to the different mechanisms that cause polarization.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the observation of high temperature ferromagnetism in nanoparticles of NbCo2, prepared by high speed ball milling. The magnetic properties of the bulk and noncrystalline samples have been studied through measurements of bulk magnetization and hyperfine field of 100Rh, implanted into the sample. Compared to the low, temperature independent magnetic susceptibility (χ∼10-5 emu/gm) observed for bulk NbCo2, the nanoparticle samples exhibit very high value of magnetic susceptibility (χ∼10-3 emu/gm), whose temperature dependence indicates possible ferromagnetic ordering near or above 300 K. The saturation magnetic moment obtained from isothermal magnetization (M vs H) data, however, turns out to be quite small (0.10μB). On the other hand, hyperfine field measurements performed for 100Rh probe using time differential perturbed angular correlation technique indicate strong paramagnetic behavior of nano-NbCo2. We believe that ferromagnetism observed in nano-NbCo2 most probably arise from a small fraction of surface atoms, while the bulk of the material remains paramagnetic.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magneto-structural coupling of non-stoichiometric Ni50Mn35.4In14.6 alloy is investigated by the first-principles calculations in view of phase stability and magnetic properties of the austenite, the six-layered modulated (6M) martensite, and the non-modulated (NM) martensite. The calculated martensitic phase transformation sequence of the Ni50Mn35.4In14.6 alloy is Paramagnetic Austenite (PA) → Ferromagnetic Austenite (FA) → Ferrimagnetic 6M (FIM 6M) → Ferrimagnetic NM (FIM NM) as a function of temperature. The Mn-Mn interatomic distance reduces significantly when the FA parent phase transforms to a 6M or NM martensitic phase. At the same time, magnetism of the alloy changes from ferromagnetic to ferrimagnetic; this is a typical magneto-structural coupling phenomenon. The Ni 3d state electrons play an important role in driving martensitic transformation for the Ni50Mn35.4In14.6 alloy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Tm doped AlN (AlN:Tm) nanostructures such as nanowalls and hexagonal nanopillars were synthesized by plasma-assisted direct nitridation method without any catalyst or template. The AlN:Tm nanowalls exhibit strong photoluminescence in blue (460–480 nm), while nanopillars show strong emission lines in the near infrared spectral region (790–820 nm). Through hysteresis measurements, both AlN:Tm nanostructures exhibit room-temperature ferromagnetism. The saturation magnetization of AlN:Tm nanopillars is obviously larger than that of the nanowalls due to the geometry morphology. Both optical and magnetic properties of AlN:Tm nanostructures can be regulated through tuning the architectures. This work provides a new opportunity to design promising materials for optoelectronic and magnetic functionalities on a single chip.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Multilayer structures on the basis of n-type (In,Fe)Sb and p-type (Ga,Fe)Sb diluted magnetic semiconductors (DMS) along with separate (In,Fe)Sb and (Ga,Fe)Sb layers were fabricated on GaAs substrates by pulsed laser sputtering of InSb, GaAs, GaSb, Sb and Fe targets in a vacuum. Transmission electron microscopy and energy-dispersive x-ray spectroscopy reveal a strong dependence of the phase composition of the (In,Fe)Sb compound on the growth temperature. An increase of the latter from 220 °C to 300 °C leads to a coalescence of Fe atoms and formation of a secondary crystalline phase in the (In,Fe)Sb layer with a total Fe content of ≈ 10 at. %. At the same time, the Ga0.8Fe0.2Sb layers obtained at 220 °C and 300 °C are single-phase. The separate In0.8Fe0.2Sb and Ga0.8Fe0.2Sb layers grown on i-GaAs at 220 °C are DMS with Curie temperatures of ≈ 190 K and 170 K, respectively. The three-layer p-i-n diode (In,Fe)Sb/GaAs/(Ga,Fe)Sb structure grown on a GaAs substrate at 220 °C with a Fe content of 10 ± 1 at. % in the single-phase (In,Fe)Sb and (Ga,Fe)Sb layers has a rather high crystalline quality and can be considered as a prototype of a bipolar spintronic device based on Fe-doped III-V semiconductors.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The two-dimension magnetic metal-organic frameworks is a new direction for studying materials with high Curie temperature and stable ferromagnetic ground state. We predict that a tight kagome lattice with spin-splitting and spontaneous magnetization can be achieved in a transition metal-Mg2-S6C6 alloy formed by substituting Mg with 3d transition metal atoms in nonmagnetic Mg3-S6C6. It is found that most systems have ferromagnetic and semiconductor properties after replacing the metal atom, except the Ni- and Cu-Mg2-S6C6 systems. The exchange interactions between transition metals and organic ligands effectively regulate spin polarization. The π-d coupling, one of the exchange interactions, play a crucial role in determining the spin state of the system and it will make and it will weaken the magnetism and even make it disappear. Additionally, it is also confirmed that the V-Mg2-S6C6 can exhibit strong ferromagnetism with higher Curie temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Here we report the synergistic effects of Zr and Dy71.5Fe28.5 (at%) co-addition on the magnetic performance of Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets and the underlying mechanism. The high-melting-point Zr suppresses the abnormal grain growth during high-temperature sintering process and also causes insufficient densification as limited by its poor wettability with the main phase grains. The co-addition of low-melting-point Dy71.5Fe28.5, however, increases the volume fraction of liquid intergranular phases upon sintering, and facilitates the formation of smooth and continuous grain boundaries, which can counteract the adverse effect of single Zr addition. As a result, the 2:14:1 main phase grains are well isolated, exhibiting an effectively weakened short-range exchange coupling between adjacent grains. Moreover, Dy diffusion towards the surface region of grains also generates a (Pr, Nd, Dy)2Fe14B magnetically hardening outer layer. Owing to the joint contributions from grain refinement, optimized grain boundary layer, and Dy-enriched hardening shell, the coercivity can be significantly enhanced from 14.0 to 21.9 kOe upon co-doping 0.3 wt% Zr and 3 wt% Dy71.5Fe28.5, accompanied with a slight remanence reduction. It demonstrates that co-doping low-melting-point and high-melting-point additives provides an efficient approach to fabricate high-performance Nd-Fe-B magnets.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper describes the effect of Ga composition (x) on the static and dynamic magnetic properties of 50-nm-thick Fe100- xGax films (18.5 ≤ x ≤ 33.4). The in-plane damping constant (α//), the perpendicular (out-of-plane) damping constant (α⊥), the saturation magnetostriction (λs) and the maximum piezomagnetic coefficient ((dλ/dH)max) of these films are dependent on x, whereas the tendencies of α// and α⊥ for x are quite opposite to those of λs and (dλ/dH)max for x. For every x, the value of α// is much larger than that of α⊥, suggesting that both the intrinsic damping and the extrinsic damping coexists in the in-plane dynamics of each Fe100- xGax film because of magnetic inhomogeneities such as two magnon scattering, anisotropy dispersion and so on. These results also demonstrate that only the intrinsic damping contributes to the out-of-plane dynamics of each Fe100- xGax film.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Two-dimensional metal carbides and nitrides, known as MXenes, have good metallic conductivity and hydrophilic surfaces. An elegant exfoliations approach was used to prepare a two dimensional (2D) metal carbide Ti3C2 MXene from layered Ti3AlC2 MAX phase by removing ‘Al’ layer by chemical etching. Here, we demonstrate the potential of MXene Ti3C2 and its composite with Polyaniline (PANI) for EMI shielding. The morphology, phase composition, magnetic properties and microwave absorbing properties of the samples were characterized by scanning electron microscopy, X-ray diffraction, vibrating sample magnetometer and vector network analyzer respectively. Microstructure investigation using the scanning electron microscope showed an average grain size of 6 um for Ti3C2 MXene. The saturation magnetization of MAX and MXene phases is 49.16 emu/gm and 49.28 emu/gm respectively. The coercivity is much higher in MXene as compared to MAX phase. The Electromagnetic Shielding properties like complex permittivity, complex permeability, S-parameters and various shielding effectiveness for the MXene-PANI composite (50% wt) were studied in the microwave frequency range (8.2–12.2 GHz). A good enhanced EMI-shielding effectiveness of ≈23 dB with the sample thickness of 1.5 mm is achieved for the lightweight MXene-PANI composite.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties and thermal stability of the Fex(Si2B11P3C1)(99.25- x )/17Cu0.75 (x = 80–86 at.%) nanocrystalline alloys were systematically investigated in this study. It was found that an exceptional combination of high Bs and low Hc can be obtained for the Fe84.5 alloy with a critical formability after annealing in a large temperature-time window. The decrease of Fe content leads to a high formability for the low Fe content alloys (≤83 at.%), but at the sacrifice of Bs, soft magnetic properties and thermal stability. For the Fe86 alloy with excessive Fe content, the precipitation of preformed α-Fe grains in the as-quenched precursors will significantly deteriorate the magnetic softness due to the formation of non-uniform nanostructure with coarse α-Fe grains after annealing. The excellent magnetic properties and thermal stability of the high Fe content alloys with critical formability are attributed to the formation of high number density of fine α-Fe grains in the amorphous matrix, which results in an enhanced soft-impingement and competitive effects. These results will provide a new understanding and strategy for balancing the Bs-formability trade-off as well as enhancing the thermal stability, which are the most important obstacles for the industrial production of high performance nanocrystalline soft magnetic alloys.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The realisation of quantum computers based on molecular electronic spins requires the design of qubits with very long coherence times, T2. Dephasing can proceed over several different microscopic pathways, active at the same time and in different regimes. This makes the rationalisation of the dephasing process not straightforward. Here we present a computational methodology able to address spin decoherence processes for a general ensemble of spins. The method consists in the propagation of the unitary quantum spin dynamics on a reduced Hilbert space. Then we study the dependence of spin dephasing over the magnetic dilution for a crystal of Vanadyl-based molecular qubits. Our results show the importance of long-range electronic spin-spin interactions and their effect on the shape of the spin-echo signal.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Imbert-Fedorov (IF) effect means a transverse shift of circularly polarized light perpendicular to the incident plane when refracted from an interface. The physical mechanism of this phenomenon is the coupling between spin angular momentum and orbit angular momentum based on the angular momentum conservation law. We study electro optic (EO) modulation and refractive index detection of graphene waveguide based on IF effect. As the applied voltage affects the permittivity of graphene, EO modulated IF effect can be observed. We mainly focus on the EO modulation of IF effect in the graphene waveguide and give the physical explanations for this phenomenon. Due to the dependence of IF effect on the prism refractive index, we explore the possible application of the graphene waveguide in refractive index detection in which a maximum sensitivity of 1.4 × 104 μm/RIU can be obtained. Meanwhile the detectable refractive index range and its sensitivity can also be controlled by the applied voltage. The EO modulation of IF effect provides us a new physical mechanism to realize EO modulators and refractive index sensors.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the first detailed investigation into how exchange-coupled magnetic properties evolve during the formation of the Co-Pt L10 + L12 nanochessboards, which self-assemble by a pseudo-spinodal mechanism below the eutectoid isotherm. The maximum observed coercivities exceed 3 kOe, but these values are more than 5 times lower than the largest values predicted by micromagnetics simulations of ideal, single-colony chessboards. For magnetization reversal controlled by nucleation, a simple analysis readily reconciles this discrepancy by accounting for misorientation associated with the polycrystalline structure that exists at the 50 µm lengthscale, demagnetizing fields associated with eutectoid colonies at the 0.5 µm lengthscale, and non-idealities in the chessboard structure at the tiling lengthscale of about 20 nm.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Room temperature magnetoimpedance and magnetodielectric effects for (100 − x)% LaFeO3 − x% organic paraffin wax (x = 0, 0.5, 1, 1.5%) hybrid nanocomposites have been investigated. The enhancement of magnetoimpedance (∼226%) and magnetodielectric (∼75%) effects at low frequency region are obtained for x = 0.5% nanocomposites for strain mediation of piezomagnetic materials. The observed current – voltage characteristics both in absence and presence of magnetic field at room temperature have corroborated with the enhanced effect. It is also showing electrical memory effect with electrical switching. The Nyquist plots have been fitted considering the parallel combination of resistance-constant phase element circuit. AC electrical studies reveal the conduction mechanism in the system controlling through the grain and grain boundaries of nanocomposites. The minimum grain and grain boundaries resistance are found for x = 0.5% nanocomposites. The electric modulus of these nanocomposites has been studied to separate the grain and grain boundaries contributions of the system. A phenomenological model has been demonstrated to explain the observed result considering the barrier width of paraffin wax layer across the grain boundaries of LaFeO3 nanoparticles. The observed transport behavior attributes the phenomenological model. The organic hybrid nanocomposites (x = 0.5%) may be worked as a resistance-capacitance-inductance circuit with voltage magnification.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Hall transport properties of single ferrimagnetic CoTb thin films were systematically studied. We report on the extraordinary Hall signals near the magnetization compensation point. The Hall “anomaly”, which is reminiscent of the Topological Hall effect (THE), is distinguished from the anomalous Hall effect (AHE) by fitting the overall Hall resistance signal. At the Hall anomaly regime, magnetic bubbles are observed by optical magnetometry. We propose the observed Hall anomalies originate from the noncollinear spin texture stabilized by Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya interaction (DMI), which is closely related to the anisotropic antiferromagnetic coupling between Co and Tb moments. The novel phenomena found in CoTb thin films broaden the physic understanding of THE and may stimulate on further studies of THE in amorphous materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic interactions in stoichiometric (Mn3SnC), carbon deficient (Mn3SnC0.8) and tin deficient (Mn3Sn0.85C) antiperovskite compounds are studied using X-ray absorption fine structure spectroscopy and neutron diffraction. The study confirms the presence of local structural distortions only around Mn atoms in the antiperovskite compounds irrespective of their stoichiometry. The distortions in the Mn6C octahedra are such that only Mn atoms are displaced from their crystallographic positions resulting in long and short Mn–Mn bonds. These long and short Mn–Mn bonds are responsible for the presence of ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic moments on Mn atoms. The C deficiency at the center of the octahedra increases the strain on the Mn6C octahedra and results in a wide variation of Mn–Mn bond distances as a function of temperature and large hysteresis in magnetic properties. On the other hand, Sn deficiency tends to relax strain by giving more space for the octahedra to distort leading to temperature independent Mn–Mn bond distances.© 2019It is noted that one of the fundamental questions in the magnetophoresis problem, namely, the determination of the magnetic susceptibility of ferroparticles χ remains poorly understood. This question is of the most importance for “different-kind” ferroparticles contained in processing media in the form of impurities. It is pointed that the approaches to the determination of χ have not been adequately studied and that there is an opportunity of implementing the approach based on the data on the magnetic susceptibility of a disperse specimen χ with a disperse phase of particles to be studied provided that the following rules are observed. First, in addition to obtaining data on the specimen χ (experimental data; for a necessarily small-volume specimen the ponderomotive method is advisable), the volume fraction of the ferroparticles in the specimen γ shall be known. Second, “rigid” specimens, in particular, in the form of powder shall be used. The use of colloidal or suspension specimens shall be avoided because of the unobstructed movement of ferroparticles leading to the formation of their chains and aggregates, which disturbs the condition of the specimen. Third, in order to provide sufficiently long distances between the ferroparticles and to eliminate their mutual magnetic effect, their concentration in the specimen shall be low (γ ≤ 0.15–0.2). At these values of γ the concentration dependences of χ are fairly linear; therefore, values of χ can be determined as χ = χ/γ. Fourth, it shall be taken into account that in the post-extreme (for the susceptibility) range of the magnetic-field strength H = 120–700 kA/m the dependence of the susceptibility χ on the magnetic-field strength has the exponential form: χ∼H-0.75. This makes obtaining an extended experimental-calculation strength dependence of χ easier provided that a single control value of χ is known. Fifth, the same is also true for the “affined” dependence of the susceptibility of the particles themselves χ on the magnetic-field strength, namely, χ ∼ H− 0.75. The approach described in this work has been sufficiently substantiated using concentration and field dependencies of χ for various powder specimens (with magnetite particles, ferroimpurities of sugar and wheat farina, condensate, ammonia, ammonia aqua, circulating water, steam, etc.).© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The crystal structure of the tetragonal layered cobalt oxide LaSrCoO4 has been studied by means of neutron diffraction at high pressures up to 5.8 GPa in temperature range 7–300 K. The pressure and temperature behaviour of the lattice parameters, including lattice parameters, unit cell volume, and interatomic bond lengths, have been obtained. The anisotropic compression of lattice parameters as well as Co-O bond lengths of the oxygen octahedra have been revealed. The anomalous thermal volume expansion at high pressure are observed, indicative for the pressure induced spin state crossover of Co3+ ions from the mixed low spin – high spin (LS + HS) state at room temperature towards the low spin (LS) ground state. The structural mechanisms of the spin state crossover are discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Electrodynamic theory applied to the analysis of TEn0p mode resonances in ferrimagnetic spheres placed either in metallic cavities or in the free space is compared with Walker-Fletcher's theory of so-called magnetostatic modes. The influence of the diameter of the sample, its permittivity and the permittivity of the surrounding media on the resonance frequencies of a few modes is analyzed. It is shown that the dominant resonances are essentially related either to negative values of the diagonal component of the permeability tensor or, for clockwise circularly polarized magnetic fields, to negative effective permeability. The electrodynamic theory is used to determine the saturation magnetization (Ms) from measured TEn01 frequency differences. Measurements on different samples confirmed that Ms can be determined using an electrodynamic approach with uncertainties of the order of 2% regardless of sample sizes or metal enclosures if the anisotropy field is negligible compared to the static internal magnetic bias.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a magnetic nickel oxide/chitosan nanocomposite was fabricated by a facile precipitation approach. The structure and morphological properties of the prepared nano-material were characterized via X-ray diffraction, Fourier transform infrared spectrometry, scanning electron microscopy and energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy. The prepared nanocomposite was used as a nano-sorbent for the magnetic solid-phase extraction (MSPE) of the trace amounts of zinc (Zn(II)) ions from aqueous solutions followed by flame atomic absorption spectrometric (FAAS) detection. Several factors influencing the extraction efficiency of Zn(II) ions such as pH, extraction time, amount of the nano-sorbent, elution conditions and sample volume were investigated and optimized. Under optimized conditions, the calibration curve with a liner dynamic range of 0.35–15 ng mL−1 was attained. The preconcentration factor and limit of detection were 100 and 0.12 ng mL−1, respectively. The method precision was evaluated with seven replicates at the concentration level of 5 ng mL−1 and the relative standard deviations of 2.8% and 3.1% were obtained for intra-day and inter-day repeatability, respectively. The applicability of the developed MSPE-FAAS method for the measurement of Zn(II) ions was validated by analyzing the certified reference material NIST SRM 1549. Zinc(II) ion concentration was measured in various real samples including tap water, river water, well water, milk and powder milk using the method, and satisfactory relative recovery values were acquired for the spiked samples.© 2019In search for novel magnetic materials, we discuss the computer estimation of structural, electronic, mechanical, thermodynamic and magnetic properties of yet-to-be synthesized but stable Fe2TaGe alloy. We make use of density functional theory and mechanical aspects for this resolution. The scrutiny of structural and mechanical stability outlines the L21 structure as the stable phase. Interestingly, while the Fe2TaX (X = Al,Ga,In) compounds are reported to be non-magnetic semiconductors, the Fe-Ge compound comes out to be a ferromagnetic half-metal. The computed electronic structure reveals a half-metallic gap EHM = 0.05 eV for the PBE functional; while as for the mBJ potential, EHM = 0.21 eV in spin-down channel. From the elastic studies, the present system falls out to be a ductile material along with a Debye temperature of 590.14 K. The magnetic evolution predicted from Slater-Pauling rule (Mt-24) manifests the total integral magnetic moment to be one Bohr magneton, and the same is reflected from ab-intio simulations. The predictions of thermodynamic and ground-state properties from extensive first-principles calculations could be useful for its future experimental realization with intriguing applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, the effects of Bi/Co co-doping upon the phase constituents, microstructure, magnetic and dielectric properties in Ba3−xBixCo2+xFe24−xO41 (x = 0.05, 0.1, 0.15, 0.2, 0.4) Z-type hexaferrite samples have been investigated. The Ba3−xBixCo2+xFe24−xO41 samples were synthesized by the conventional ceramic methods. The XRD data indicate that the sintered sample with x = 0.05 crystallizes a Z-type hexaferrite main phase with small amount of M-type and Y-type secondary phases. The sample with x = 0.1 have a Z-type hexaferrite structure, while small amount of secondary phases of W-type and Y-type hexaferrites are detected for high Bi/Co co-substitution content (x ≥ 0.15). Bi/Co co-substitution effectively improves the density of the samples, and enhances their magnetic and dielectric properties, especially the high frequency characteristics. The best combination of magnetic and dielectric characteristics is achieved at x = 0.2, with the magnetic permeability of (9.72 ± 0.32) and the cutoff frequency of (2.04 ± 0.13) GHz.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The locally non-similar solutions of Sisko fluid for boundary layer flow in the presence of thermal radiation and magnetic field have been presented. Further, heat transfer analysis is carried out in the presence of Joule heating. Three equations model for Sisko fluid flow and heat transfer over a moving surface is modeled while using Sparrow-Quack-Boerner local non-similarity method (LNSM). The numerical computation is performed to explore the impacts of different physical parameters which are responsible for controlling the flow and heat transfer. Specifically, the impact of magnetic field introducing a decreasing velocity profile and force balance boundary layer thickness and increasing the temperature profile as well as thermal boundary layer thickness, respectively for shear-thinning as well as shear-thickening fluids. However, the growing parallel values of material parameter (A) and streamwise coordinate (ξ) increases the velocity profile significantly for both pseudo plastic (0<n<1) fluid as well as dilatant (n>1) fluid. For the same parameters, an opposite trend is noticed for the temperature distribution. Additionally, with a fixed value of streamwise coordinate along with the increasing variation in Eckert number (Ec) and radiation parameter (Rd), the temperature profile is founded with enhancement conduct. Comparisons in the form of local skin friction (resistive forces) and the local Nusselt number (rate of heat transfer) are determined in excellent correlation with the previous published results in the limiting cases.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The energy structure of heterometallic molecules with wheel topology is considered within the quantum Heisenberg spin model, using mostly the algebraic methods. In our approach, the central spin is coupled to the peripheral ones by the interaction parameter J′, whereas the latter located at the perimeter are subjects to the nearest-neighbour interaction J. The systems are frustrated in the regime J>0 irrespective of the sign of J′ and the ground state total spin quantum numbers form a universal sequence consisting of a definite number of steps as a function of the ratio α=J′/J. The Kahn degenerate frustration points occur at the discontinuous jumps or special symmetry junctures. In addition, the Lieb-Mattis level order is revealed despite the lack of bipartiteness, and existence of broad plateaus in the magnetisation profiles is also indicated.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The change in structural behaviour, magnetic measurement & dielectric characteristics of polycrystalline Bi0.80−xLa0.20HoxFeO3 (x = 0.00, 0.05, 0.10 & 0.15 and designated as LH0, LH05, LH10 and LH15 respectively) multiferroics prepared using method of the solid-state reaction, have been investigated. The powder X-ray diffraction and Rietveld refinement of the XRD spectrum indicates that Bi0.80La0.20FeO3 multiferroics have single phase in R3c. Rietveld refined spectrum of the XRD conclude that holmium substitution at A-site for the samples LH05 and LH10 is crystallized as combo of rhombohedral R3c and orthorhombic Pbam space group. Holmium substitution for LH15 has changed the rhombohedral R3c symmetry of Bi0.80La0.20FeO3 to the orthorhombic Pbam symmetry. The magnetic behaviour was studied by recording magnetization with magnetic up to ±10 kOe. Weak ferromagnetic behaviour of all samples attributes that co-doping effectively concealed spiral spin configuration by altering the canting angle. Dielectric behaviour of prepared ceramic compounds was carried by impedance analyser within frequency ranged 100 Hz–7 MHz for different temperatures.© 2019In this study, a Nd(FeMo)12 alloy was prepared using a magnetic levitation melting furnace and subsequent heat treatment. The nitrides of this alloy, which exhibit uniaxial anisotropy, were then synthesized by gas-solid reaction. The melting process of the Nd(FeMo)12 alloy, as well as the microstructure and magnetic properties of the nitrides, was investigated by X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy, transmission electron microscopy, and magnetometer measurements. A homogeneous Nd(FeMo)12 phase was obtained by magnetic levitation melting using a MoFe alloy as a raw material, followed by heat treatment for 72 h. The nitrogenation of the Nd(FeMo)12 alloy was investigated. The magnetic properties of Nd(FeMo)1 2N1.52 powders obtained at a nitriding temperature of 550 °C were enhanced after grinding. No phase decomposition occurred during grinding. The nitriding powders exhibited a fine polycrystalline structure after grinding, as determined by transmission electron microscopy. The coercivity of the powders increased with a decrease in particle size, and Nd(FeMo)12N1.52 nano-powders with a coercivity of 3800 Oe was prepared by 70 h of surfactant-assisted high energy ball milling. Nd(FeMo)12N1.52 powders obtained exhibit an HA of 11 T and TC of 598 K.© 2019The magnetic properties, alignment and phase composition of nanocrystalline Nd-Fe-B magnets hot deformed (HD) at 830 °C employing different hot-pressed precursors fabricated at various hot pressing (HP) temperatures were investigated. Both the remanence and coercivity simultaneously increased first and then decreased with the HP temperature from 450 °C to 650 °C. The optimum magnetic properties of HD magnets were obtained at HP temperature of 550 °C with remanence and coercivity of 1.40 T and 924 kA/m, respectively. The usage of the HP temperatures lower than 500 °C was resulted in high porosity and low crystallization degree for hot pressed magnets, causing aggregation of the RE-rich phase and small amount of residual amorphous after hot deformation. This procedure increased the volume fraction of nonmagnetic phase and reduced magnetic properties. Furthermore, the platelet-shaped grains were separated by thick triple junctions, which deteriorated the alignment of grains. When HP temperature was 550 °C, the hot-deformed magnet gained the optimum alignment, and the stacked platelet-shaped grains were separated by smooth thin grain boundary. However, at HP temperature of 650 °C equiaxed coarse grains were dominant instead of platelet-shaped grains in the hot-deformed magnet. The high HP temperature led to apparent grain growth, and then the nucleated grains further grew and were hard to be deformed, developing a poor alignment. A schematic model of the microstructure evolution for hot-deformed magnet is proposed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The angular dependence of magnetic hysteresis in rapidly quenched amorphous nanowires with two compositions – the low magnetostrictive (Co0.94Fe0.06)72.5Si12.5B15 and the highly magnetostrictive Fe77.5Si7.5B15, respectively – is analyzed by means of micromagnetic simulations. The investigated samples were 30 and 100 nm in diameter. The magnetization process depends on the angle at which the external magnetic field is applied. Fe77.5Si7.5B15 amorphous nanowires with smaller diameters exhibit larger coercivity than (Co0.94Fe0.06)72.5Si12.5B15 ones, irrespective of the angle at which the external field is applied. Moreover, both types of nanowires have similar remanence values at 30 nm diameters. However, nanowires with larger diameters (100 nm), exhibit a more complex behavior, since the (Co0.94Fe0.06)72.5Si12.5B15 samples exhibit a slightly larger coercivity as compared to the Fe77.5Si7.5B15 ones. The magnetization reversal process is influenced by the interplay between the preponderant factors that affect the overall magnetic properties of amorphous nanowires with different compositions and dimensions. The results allow one to accurately tailor the magnetic behavior of rapidly solidified amorphous nanowires for various applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The temperature and magnetic field dependences of magnetization of the Cantor CrMnFeCoNi alloy were studied at ambient and high (up to 1 GPa) external pressure. The low-temperature spin-glass-like behavior and the paramagnetic behavior at temperatures above 100 K with effective paramagnetic moment of the alloy, meff = 2.71 μB/f.u., were observed. A negative value of the paramagnetic Curie temperature, θC = −210 K, was found that confirms a presence of strong antiferromagnetic interactions of moments in the alloy. A model of the magnetic clusters with the effective moment of mcl = 0.275 μB/f.u. provides a possibility to describe qualitatively the pronounced difference between the pressure-induced decrease of magnetization of the ZFC and the FC alloys, dlnM/dP(5 K) = −15.5*10−3 GPa−1 and −39.2*10−3 GPa−1, respectively. The former value is in an excellent agreement with the value of −16*10−3 GPa−1 obtained from our quantum–mechanical calculations. The negative pressure shift of the ordering temperature of the alloy, dTord/dP = −9 K/GPa, and the pressure-induced decrease of magnetization of the alloy in paramagnetic state, dlnM/dP(90 K) = −70*10−3 GPa−1, indicate a possible itinerant character of magnetism of the alloy. The results of theoretical calculations of the total moment of the CrMnFeCoNi fcc-alloy are discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This work presents the study and development of soft magnetic composites of iron coated with alumina nanoparticles dispersed in sodium silicate, also known as liquid glass. It is proposed that the nanoparticles dispersion increases the thermal resistance of the glassy coating, allowing a heat treatment with higher temperatures, reducing the internal stresses generated during the pressing and reducing core losses. Thermogravimetric analysis under an oxidative atmosphere of the powder samples and Scanning electron microscopy and energy-dispersive X-ray diffraction of fractured compacted samples are shown to discuss the coating thermal behavior. Also, electrical resistivity, relative permeability and magnetic losses of samples with and without nanoparticles dispersed in sodium silicate are shown discussing their loss separation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.By specific design of the sample, in which SrTiO3 substrate is fully covered by a thin layer of the colossal magnetoresistive material La0.67Ca0.33MnO3 (LCMO) and the latter is partially covered by high-temperature superconductor YBa2Cu3O7-δ (YBCO), and by using multiple current and voltage contacts, direct evidence of the strong effect of LCMO on YBCO is obtained. It is found that LCMO strongly influences not only superconducting, but also normal state of YBCO, and it is argued that this is a consequence of the spin injection from the former to the latter. The effect of the deposition conditions and crystal orientation of YBCO layer on this effect is clarified. A surprising peak in the temperature dependence of resistance seen in ex-situ ab-plane oriented sample is explained as a combination of two effects: influence of spin-polarized electrons on superconductor below its critical temperature and the interface-controlled shift of Curie temperature of LCMO to low temperatures. Considering expected use of LCMO and YBCO in composite quantum computation circuits, their combination with another advanced quantum material, graphene, is explored.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The thermal density matrix renormalization group (DMRG) is investigated with emphasis on employability in molecular magnetism studies. To this end magnetic observables at finite temperature are evaluated for two one-dimensional quantum spin systems: a Heisenberg chain with nearest-neighbor antiferromagnetic interaction and a frustrated sawtooth (delta) chain. It is found that thermal DMRG indeed accurately approximates magnetic observables for the chain as well as for the sawtooth chain, but in the latter case only for sufficiently high temperatures. We speculate that the reason is due to the peculiar structure of the low-energy spectrum of the sawtooth chain induced by frustration.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effect of the tensile stress applied during ion beam synthesis of thin silicide films on magnetic properties is studied. The magneto-optical Kerr effect revealed the existence of both magnetically anisotropic and isotropic regions in the synthesized thin film. In the isotropic regions, the increase in the coercive force is observed as the external tensile stresses decrease. It is assumed that in this area stress relaxation and the subsequent growth of the finely dispersed silicide phase occur. In accordance with the Herzer model, large values of the coercive force are associated with relatively large crystallite sizes. In the magnetically anisotropic region, the anisotropy field is proportional to the stress applied during implantation that indicates the magnetoelastic nature of the induced anisotropy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The features of focusing and caustic of spin waves in antiferromagnetic crystals with body-centered tetragonal (BCT) lattice in the framework of Heisenberg model are investigated. The model takes into account the interaction of an atom's spin with its first and second neighbors. It is shown that magnon focusing picture depends on the ratio between the exchange coupling constants of atom's spin with first (J1) and second (J2) neighbors. If the value of J2 is positive then the spin waves focusing occurs in the [1 0 1], [1 1 0], and [1 0 0] directions and if J2 is negative then the caustic of magnons forms in some directions. The region of frequencies of spin waves where the caustic can be observed is obtained. The dependence of caustic direction on magnon frequency is investigated.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetotransport properties of ultra-soft magnets were studied on both macroscopic and microscopic scales by performing bulk and point-contact measurements, respectively, in CoSiBFeNb ribbons prepared by melt spinning technique. While the bulk measurements did not show any variations in dc resistance as a function of applied magnetic field (zero magnetoresistance), the point-contact measurements revealed giant-magnetoresistance-like changes in the resistance of small volumes (106–109 nm3) associated with the contacts. A high-density current applied to the contacts was found to affect the point-contact magnetoresistance – the magnetic field where resistive switching occurs was found to shift with the applied dc bias. The magnetotransport effects observed on the microscopic scale could be attributed to specific local configurations of magnetic domains in CoSiBFeNb and effects of spin-transfer torque on the domain configurations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic nanoparticles functionalized with diethylenetriaminepentaacetic acid (MagNP@DTPA) have been employed for extracting and processing strategic metal ions in nanohydrometallurgy. In order to probe the metal ion capture from aqueous solution in real time, an external weighing device has been adapted for a conventional analytical balance, allowing to measure the nanoparticles attraction by a miniature neodymium (Nd2Fe14B) supermagnet. The magnetic migration kinetics, also referred as magnetophoresis, has been probed in this way, as well as the evaluation of the magnetic interaction of the Fe3O4 core with the attached paramagnetic metal ions. The results indicated some correlation between the overall nanoparticle magnetic moments and their magnetophoretic rates. An additive magnetic response was observed for the metallated nanoparticles in dry form, using VSM. However, in solution, the global magnetization decreased with the magnetic moment of the attached metal ions. Presumably, there is an influence of dipolar and superexchange interactions mediated by the metal-ligand structures, including the formation of carboxylate bridges between the outer paramagnetic centers in the dry form.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The simultaneous realization of full valley and spin polarized current is one of the major challenges in the spintronics and valleytronics graphene devices. In this paper, we propose a superlattice of ferromagnetic gapped graphene with spin-orbit coupling (SOC) for the generation of simultaneous remarkable full valley and spin polarized current without need for strain and magnetic vector potential. It is found that a gate-controllable spin and valley polarized current can be achieved by the proposed superlattice device. More importantly, the spin and valley polarizations are oscillatory functions of the gate voltage and the directions of polarized currents can be electrically controlled by changes in the gate voltage, which is crucial for development of multiple-valued logic graphene-based spintronics and valleytronics devices. Furthermore, in case of one barrier structure, we show that at the Fermi energy approaching the spin-orbit energy gap, there is a gate-tunable strong spin-valley filtering effect which is attractive for spin-valley sensing applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of rapidly solidified Ni0.895Cr0.105MnGe1.05 melt-spun ribbons studied by both direct (adiabatic temperature change) and indirect (isothermal magnetic entropy change) methods in intermediate and high magnetic fields up to 10 T. The maximum values of the adiabatic temperature changes (ΔTad) and magnetic entropy changes (ΔSM) were found to be ∼2.6 K (µoH = 10 T) and 4.4 J kg−1 K−1 (µoΔH = 5 T), respectively, near the Curie temperature (TC). The ΔTad curves and magnetization isotherms were found to be completely reversible, which indicates the high degree of reversibility of the MCEs in this system. A large temperature span (of about 61 K) and a non-saturating behavior of ΔTad were observed at magnetic fields up to 10 T. The adiabatic temperature change was found to be a linear function of (µoH)2/3 near TC, in accordance with the Landau theory of phase transitions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic, dielectric and structural properties of a double perovskite oxide Nd2CoTiO6 (NCTO), synthesized by solid state reaction method, have been studied. The Rietveld refinement of the room temperature neutron diffraction (ND) pattern specifies that the crystal structure of NCTO is monoclinic with space group P21/n, which contains an ordered array of alternate CoO6 and TiO6 octahedra. Magnetization measurements, carried out from room temperature to 2 K indicate a transition at ∼17 K. The rise of magnetization sharply below ∼17 K is attributed to the magnetic ordering of Nd3+ ions. Ac susceptibility data recorded in the range 70 K–5 K ruled out the presence of spin glass behavior in NCTO. To confirm the nature of magnetic ordering, temperature-dependent ND measurements were carried out and the analysis of ND data recorded at 15 K and 3 K shows the presence of canted antiferromagnetic spin structure of NCTO at low temperatures. Thermal variation of dielectric permittivity shows an anomaly at ∼720 K. First principles density functional theory (DFT) has been invoked to determine the band structure of the sample. The electronic structure has also been extensively investigated to correlate different observed properties of the sample.© 2019This study reports the creation of a highly sensitive, low-frequency magnetic field sensor based on a composite multiferroic consisting of a bidomain lithium niobate/metglas laminate shaped in form of a tuning fork. An efficient suppression of acoustic and thermal noises in the measurements of AC magnetic fields has been achieved. As a piezoelectric component we used a y + 128°-cut lithium niobate single crystal. A metglas foil (serving as a magnetostrictive component) was antisymmetrically bonded to each tine of the tuning fork. The sensor demonstrated a 6.7 times increase of the sensitivity to magnetic fields as compared to a single-plate magnetoelectric (ME) sensor: the magnetic field detection limit was enhanced from 20 pT to 3 pT at a frequency of ca. 318 Hz, without any additional shielding from external noises. The advantages of the ME sensors based on bidomain lithium niobate over those based on PZT or PMN-PT are a much higher thermal stability, anhysteretic piezoelectric effect, large resistance to creep, lead-free nature and simple and cheap fabrication process. Ultimately, the tuning-fork ME sensors based on bidomain lithium niobate single crystals might be used in low frequency, ultra-sensitive, cheap and high-temperature magnetic field sensors for biomedical or space applications.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe new concept of thermally power generation system, a sensitized thermal cell (STC)based on a dye-sensitized solar cell, had been suggested. In this STC, thermally excited charge carriers in a semiconductor were used instead of photon excited charge carriers in a dye. In the previous repot, the β-FeSi2 used as the semiconductor included impurities and the battery characteristics was low. Here, to obtain high purity β-FeSi2, the combination method of arc melting and drop cast was used. As a result, the battery characteristics was improved. The present results show that the properties of the semiconductor contribute to the performance of the STC.© 2019 Elsevier LtdA simple wet-chemical synthesis of layered MoS2 thin films on sapphire is reported. The gap in understanding solution processed MoS2 deposition needs to be closed to exploit all its excellent properties for low-cost applications. In this work, as deposited Mo-precursor thin films were prepared based on the solubility and coating properties of Molybdenum(V)chloride in 1-Methoxy-2-propanol. Subsequent annealing of the deposited amorphous Mo-precursor films in the presence of sulfur resulted in the formation of highly crystalline layered MoS2 films on sapphire. Improved crystallinity of the deposited films was achieved by increasing the process temperature and performing the post-annealing treatment. Post-annealing at temperatures above 900 °C increased the uniformity of multilayer films, together with the increase of MoS2 grain size. For charge transport analysis, top-gate top-contact thin film transistors (TFTs)based on these solution processed MoS2 films were fabricated. Ionic liquid gating of the TFT devices exhibited n-type semiconducting behaviour with field-effect mobility as high as 12.07 cm2/Vs and Ion/off ratio ∼ 106. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy measurements revealed that the films annealed between 900 °C and 980 °C had an average chemical composition of S/Mo ∼ 1.84. This facile liquid phase synthesis method with centimeter-scale uniformity and controllable film thickness up to 1.2 ± 0.65 nm is suitable for low-cost preparation of other transition metal dichalcogenides thin films in next-generation electronics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report the effect of hydrostatic pressure (P)on the martensitic transition in Mn50Ni40Sn10 Heusler alloy using the magnetization and electrical resistivity measurements. Martensitic transition temperature (TM)is found to shift significantly to higher temperatures with the application of pressure, which reflects the stabilization of the martensite phase. On the other hand, TM shifts to lower temperatures with magnetic field, which implies the stabilization of the austenite phase. The estimated rate of change of martensitic transition temperature with pressure (dTM/dP)for the present alloy is ∼4.6 K/kbar. The alloy shows a maximum negative magnetoresistance (MR)of 9.6% for P = 4 kbar at the martensitic transition. A large isothermal magnetic entropy change (ΔSM)of 16.6 J/kg.K and a refrigerant capacity (RC)of ∼146 J/kg are observed at TM under ambient pressure. Both quantities are found to decrease with the increase of pressure. The values of ΔSM and adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad), calculated from heat capacity measurements are ∼11.3 J/kg.K and −3.4 K respectively for 50 kOe field change. The observed pressure and field dependence results have been explained using the Clausius-Clapeyron equation. The combined effect of pressure and field on the martensitic transition is also discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The anchoring of the molecule to an electrode is known to be a key factor in single-molecule spintronics experiments. Likewise, a relaxation down to the most stable geometry is a critical step in theoretical simulations of transport through single-molecule junctions. Herein we present a set of calculations designed to analyze and compare the effect of different anchoring points and the effect of perturbations in the molecular geometry and interelectrode distance. As model system we chose the [V(α-C3S5)3]2− complex connecting two Au(1 1 1) electrodes in a slightly compressed geometry. In our calculations, the attachment happens through an S-Au bond, a common anchoring strategy in molecular spintronics experiments. Our results confirm that small alterations in the molecular geometry have important effects in the conductance. We were able to compare these effects with the ones arising from changing the anchoring position with a constant molecular geometry. Unexpectedly, we demonstrate that the anchoring position has only a lesser relevance in the spintronic behavior of the device, as long as all other parameters are kept frozen. As a consequence, we predict that for experimentalists aiming for reproducibility, the molecular design of rigid linkers is more relevant than the design of univocal anchoring positions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report on broadband and in-plane angle dependent ferromagnetic resonance measurements of MnN (30 nm)/CoFeB (tCoFeB) exchange bias bilayer systems with CoFeB thicknesses ranging from 5 to 20 nm. We find that the strong unidirectional anisotropy in this system is accompanied by a strong uniaxial in-plane anisotropy and a small interfacial perpendicular anisotropy (K⊥,i=0.043±0.001erg/cm2). The strength of the interfacial exchange bias coupling in this system Δσeb=0.193±0.005erg/cm2 is only 2.5 times larger than the interfacial uniaxial coupling strength Δσu=0.076±0.003erg/cm2. The relaxation in this system also shows a strong unidirectional and uniaxial in-plane anisotropy. While the observed thickness dependence of the uniaxial anisotropy of the relaxation is consistent with an interfacial two-magnon scattering contribution, we find that this is not the case for the unidirectional relaxation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A single crystal of tetragonal Mn1.95Cr0.05Sb has been successfully grown by a modified-Bridgeman method with tiny amounts of hexagonal MnSb secondary phase distributed in the self-assembled mosaic boundaries. Under low magnetic fields, the consecutive occurrences of a spin-reorientation transition (SRT)and a magnetoelastic transition from ferrimagnetic (FRI)state to antiferromagnetic (AFM)state appear in c-axis, while these two transitions occur separately in a-axis. Such behavior can be ascribed to the asynchronous spin reorientation, which is resulted from the competition between the Zeeman energy and the magnetocrystalline anisotropy. More interestingly, the anisotropic magnetostrictions associated with the field-induced metamagnetic magnetoelastic transition have been observed. In the process of cooling, the maximum reversible values of ∼0.230% and ∼−0.125% are obtained at 165 K along c- and a-axes, respectively, for the application of cyclic magnetic fields up to 30 kOe. These values are consistent with those estimated by the difference in thermal expansion curves near the transition region. Moreover, it can be also found that the metamagnetic magnetoelastic transition shows either a narrow hysteresis (∼6 K)and a strong sensitivity to the magnetic field (∼−0.5 K/kOe). Therefore, the high reversible magnetostriction is spread over a wide temperature range for the studied sample. Our experimental findings indicate that the Mn2Sb-based intermetallics can be considered as a promising candidate with low-cost for magnetostriction.© 2019A series of multilayers [Co(6)/Pt(15)]4/(Pt(s))/[Co(10)/Pt(15)]4 (thicknesses in Å) consisting from a perpendicular magnetic anisotropy [Cο(6)/Pt(15)]4-stack (PA) coupled to an in-plane anisotropy [Cο(10)/Pt(15)]4-stack (IPA) through the variable Pt interlayer (with s = 0–45 Å), is studied as a model mixed-anisotropy system. Vector vibrating sample magnetometry and polarized neutron reflectometry show that, at remanence, the magnetization of each stack relaxes to its own easy axis, with the exception of the s = 0. For the s = 0 sample, the strong coupling between the two different anisotropy stacks results in a collective reversal of both stacks. This process corresponds to an averaged effective uniaxial anisotropy, which suppresses the PA characteristics. For the rest of the samples the stacks are weakly coupled and separate reversal of the two stacks occurs. The PA stack reverses by rapid domain wall motion under the influence of the IPA which has relaxed to its own easy plane. The remaining coupling, despite being weak, influences the values and angular dependence of the reversal fields as well as the positions of positive/negative and doublets on the First Order Reversal Curve (FORC) distributions.© 2019Using first principles calculation in the framework of density functional theory we have investigated the electronic structure, magnetism and ferroelectric polarization in the triangular lattice antiferromagnet AgFeO2, and compared it to the isostructural system CuFeO2. Our calculations reveal that spin-orbit interaction plays an important role in determining the magnetic property of AgFeO2 and is possibly responsible for its different magnetic ground state in comparison to CuFeO2. Calculations of ferroelectric polarization of AgFeO2 suggest that the spontaneous polarization arises from noncollinear spin arrangement via the spin-orbit coupling. Our calculations also indicate that in addition to electronic contribution, the lattice mediated contribution to the polarization is also important for AgFeO2.© 2019Resistive random-access memory (RRAM) with a Ni/SiNx/a-Si/p+-Si structure is presented. In contrast to RRAM devices based on high-k materials, the proposed Si-based device is more attractive and promising because the SiNx and a-Si layers have full compatibility with conventional complementary metal-oxidesemiconductor technology. The proposed device is compared to a control device with a single layer of SiNx. A conduction path containing Si dangling bonds (traps) can be generated in both the SiNx and a-Si layers. The conduction path in each layer can be controlled by the compliance current during the forming process. For high compliance current mode, the double-layer device has a higher ON/OFF ratio (∼104) and lower leakage current (∼10-9 A) than the single-layer device. For low compliance current mode, better non-linearity (∼103) can be obtained when a 1/2 read bias scheme is applied to the cross-point array.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Efficient tunability of magnetization dynamics in two-dimensional circular and triangular-shaped Ni80Fe20 antidots arranged in hexagonal lattice is demonstrated using a combination of all-electrical and all-optical detection techniques. A broad band of modes is observed for both the lattices. A strong variation in the spin-wave spectra is obtained with the strength and orientation of the bias magnetic field. A crossover between two higher frequency branches is observed with the variation of bias magnetic field strength in circular antidot lattice, whereas no such crossover is observed in the triangular antidot lattice. In addition, the spin-wave modes in both lattices show strong six-fold anisotropic behaviour presumably due to the variation of internal field distribution originating from a combination of the lattice arrangement and the shape of the antidots as a function of the bias magnetic field orientation. Micromagnetic simulations qualitatively reproduce the experimentally observed spin-wave modes and the simulated mode profiles reveal the presence of extended and quantized standing spin-wave modes in these lattices. Also, some lower frequency localized edge modes, obtained in the triangular antidot lattice due to the asymmetric demagnetized regions at sharp corners, are not observed in the circular antidot lattice. These observations are significant for large tunability and anisotropic propagation of spin waves in GHz frequency magnetic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Research on magnetic particles has expanded over the years. These particles have several properties, such as low cost, fast preparation and use time, high surface area, and easy separation, which allow them to be employed in the purification of molecules, for example, enzymes. In this work, magnetic particles of azocasein-iron composite were produced, characterized and used in the purification of a microbial protease. The particle characterization was performed using the established techniques: X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier-transform infrared (FTIR) spectroscopy and scanning electron microscopy (SEM). A purification rate of 11.64 was achieved by the use of magnetic particles in comparison to the crude extract. The recovery rate was very low but was higher when compared to the traditional, expensive, and slow DEAE-Sepharose column purification.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Radiofrequency alternating magnetic field (RFAMF) induced heating of superparamagnetic nanoparticle dispersions (magnetic nanofluids) have attracted wide attention due to its superior potential for various industrial and bio-medical applications. Here, we probe the role of initial susceptibility and relaxation dynamics on RFAMF induced heating efficiency of magnetic nanofluids containing oleic acid capped single domain Fe3O4 magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) with nearly similar saturation magnetization values. Our results suggest that the initial susceptibility of MNP plays a major role in RFAMF induced heating efficiency and the variation of MNP size dependant relaxation dynamics alone is not sufficient to account for the field induced heating efficiency. Calculations on quasi-static hysteresis loops revealed a decrease in initial susceptibility with increasing MNP loading due to enhanced dipolar interaction, which resulted in the observed decrease in heating efficiency with increasing MNP concentration. The effect of relaxation dynamics on SAR, probed by varying the base fluid viscosity, showed that the heating efficiency is largely unaffected with increasing medium viscosity for magnetic nanofluids with Neel dominated relaxation modes, whereas heating efficiency decreased by ∼70% for magnetic nanofluids with Brownian dominant relaxation modes. This study attempts to decouple the individual contributions of initial susceptibility and relaxation dynamics and the results obtained are beneficial for designing magnetic nanofluids with enhanced magneto-thermal conversion efficiency.© 2019In this study, regular hexagonal cobalt (Co) nanosheets with mesoporous structure have been successfully prepared on a large scale uniformly through precursor directed synthesis route. In contrast to the traditional ball milling technique, such Co nanosheets were controllable and repeatable in lateral dimension and thickness. The radial length of the Co nanosheets was observed in the range of 3–5 μm with the average thickness of 120 nm. Such flaky shape was proved to be beneficial to break the Snoek limit, resulting in appreciable permeability in high frequency range. In addition, the mesoporous structure is favorable of lowering the permittivity and suppressing eddy current effect. Consequently, excellent microwave absorption performances could be achieved through adequate synergy of the attenuation competence and impedance matching. The minimum reflection loss (RL) value of −45.1 dB was realized with a thickness of 2 mm, and the effective bandwidth (RL<−10 dB) could be reached 8.5 GHz. To the best of our knowledge, this is the largest effective bandwidth compared with those of Co-based materials derived from diverse elaborate superstructures. Such unique morphology and microstructure could provide new insights to design superior microwave absorbers depending on ferromagnetic metals and a series of composites.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetoelastic couplings in ferromagnetic materials can be modelled using multiscale approaches. Various degrees of sophistication are accessible depending on the foreseen material and application. Here, we present a set of models, built on this approach, which can be used for devices magnetic field analysis. The representation of combined crystal anisotropy and texture effects is analysed through the introduction of a simplified fiber texture. A method is also proposed for the computation of magnetostriction hysteresis together with magnetization by association with a Jiles-Atherton model. All the models are detailed with their main physical and numerical characteristics, and the whole set of features that are needed for their use in device simulation tools. A test structure is finally simulated using the finite element method in order to illustrate the possibilities offered by these multiscale approaches.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this study, a novel core-shell ternary composite systems containing Fe-Co alloy (Fe-Co) @silicon dioxide (SiO2) @polyaniline (PANI) was prepared by a rational route. The product exhibited high-performance electromagnetic absorption property within the range of 2–18 GHz. Meanwhile, the elements, structure, morphology and electromagnetic wave parameters of FeCo@SiO2@PANI were subsequently detected by XRD, XPS, TEM, SEM and VNA. The maximum absorption of FeCo@SiO2@PANI composite reached −48.6 dB with a layer of thickness only of 1.6 mm and the effective frequency width of absorption was lower than −10 dB reaches 8.4 GHz with the thickness range of 1.6–4.0 mm. In addition, the adding the FeCo@SiO2@PANI composite in the paraffin matrix is only 30 wt%. Consequently, it is believed that the ternary composite materials could be used as an excellent electromagnetic wave absorber with lightweight, thin thickness, broad bandwidth and strong absorption.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We studied the influence of Pt, Co and MnIr layer on the exchange bias field HE and coercive field HC in perpendicular exchange-biased [Pt/Co]3/MnIr multilayers by magneto-optical Kerr effect. As the thickness of the Pt layer increases, the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy constant Ku first increases and then reaches to saturation, which is resulted from the competition between perpendicular anisotropy and interfacial short-range interaction. The saturation damping constant α0 of the sample increases from about 0.062 to 0.122 when the Pt thickness increases from 0.5 nm to 1.5 nm. However, α0 increases with the decrease of Co thickness. We attributed both of these mainly to spin pumping effect.© 2019The stochasticity of magnetic domain wall positioning after applying rotating magnetic fields to polygonal ferromagnetic nanowire-type magnetic field sensor structures is investigated. High-resolution magneto-optical Kerr effect microscopy is utilized to determine the travelled domain wall distances. The impact of the applied magnetic field amplitude, of field orientation, and of the polygon angle on domain wall positioning is systematically investigated to identify conditions for a deterministic response. Under certain conditions of magnetic field angle and amplitude, a highly predictable behaviour of domain wall positions with standard deviations below 30 nm is achievable. The presented magneto-optical method enables high throughput detection of domain wall positions with nanometer resolution.© 2019As electromagnetic wave absorbers, carbon-matrix materials embedded with magnetic nanoparticles could meet both magnetic loss and dielectric loss requirement. In this work, magnetic Fe3C/C (denoted as FC-650) and Fe3C/Fe/C (denoted as FC-700) carbon-matrix composites were successfully fabricated via carbonization of Material Institute Lavoisier (MIL)-101(Fe). Particularly, both Fe3C/C and Fe3C/Fe/C owned flower-like structures formed by two-dimension flakes. Due to flower-like structures and components of the samples above, excellent electromagnetic wave absorption with dual-loss mechanism could be effectively realized. Fe3C/C possessed an optimal reflection loss of −39.43 dB at 14.00 GHz, measured with an absorption thickness of 2.00 mm. Moreover, it exhibited a broad effective bandwidth of 14.32 GHz (from 3.68 GHz to 18.00 GHz). The optimal reflection loss of Fe3C/Fe/C was up to −20.31 dB at 14.40 GHz corresponding to the absorption thickness of 2.00 mm. Multiple internal reflection, interfacial polarization, ferromagnetic resonance, interference cancelation and conduction loss might account for the absorption properties of the prepared magnetic carbon-matrix composites. This paper not only expands a new application aspect for MIL-101(Fe) as a precursor of magnetic materials, but also provides a simple approach to prepare flower-like electromagnetic wave absorbers.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.By performing the density functional theory type of first-principles calculations, we investigate four ordered double-M elements MXenes, TiMC (M = Zr, Hf, Cr and Mo) which contain one more element than Ti2C and may offer new physical properties. Our calculation results show that these monolayers are not only dynamically stable, but also have large in-plane stiffness. We demonstrate the intrinsic ferromagnetism of metallic TiZrC and TiHfC whose Curie temperatures are higher than that of Ti2C. And, differing from Cr2C in which the four 3d electrons of the divalent Cr atoms are fully polarized, the partially polarized Cr atoms in TiCrC are anti-ferromagnetic coupling with each other. Additionally, we predict that the 1%–3% compressive strain turns TiZrC and TiHfC into ferromagnetic half-metals with 100% spin-polarization at Fermi level. More importantly, our calculations show that TiZrC, TiHfC and TiMoC with surface terminated by O atoms all convert into semiconducting with direct band gap around 1.40 eV, while TiCrCF2 is ferromagnetic half-metal with large energy gap of 3.14 eV for the semiconducting spin channel.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic Incremental Permeability (MIP) being highly stress dependent proves to be very effective to evaluate materials non-destructively. In this article, modelling technique based on Jiles-Atherton model has been proposed to simulate the signature MIP butterfly loop for the 12 Cr-Mo-V-W creep test samples. Jiles-Atherton parameters imply physical interpretations. From these butterfly loops, a physical relation, based on the values of the J-A's parameters, with the microstructure such as precipitations, dislocations, Kernel Average Misorientation (KAM) has been investigated with experimental as well as simulation validations. It is especially observed that J-A's parameters are well correlated to the precipitation quantity and KAM.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic anisotropy of films of La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 grown on vicinal (1 1 1)-oriented SrTiO3 substrates are investigated. For temperatures above the tetragonal – cubic structural phase transition temperature of the substrate, a step edge induced uniaxial magnetic anisotropy is found at remanence, with a thickness-driven change in easy axis direction, from perpendicular to the step edges to parallel to the step edges with increasing thickness. The anisotropy constant for the investigated (1 1 1)-oriented samples is of the same magnitude as for previously reported (0 0 1)-oriented samples. The data is discussed in the framework of in-plane rotations of the oxygen octahedra resulting in a uniaxial anisotropy. Furthermore, the magnetic anisotropy is sensitive to the structural phase transition at 105 K of the substrate, and the anisotropy constant increases drastically as the temperature is lowered below 105 K.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The logarithmic relaxation of the magnetisation in recording media under different applied negative fields can collapse onto an universal decay curve, by applying a scaling law based on the fluctuation field Hf, which describes the time-dependent magnetic behaviour in terms of thermal effects. In this work the scaling approach is investigated, in which multiple measurements of thermal decay curves in varying holding fields are scaled via the fluctuation field in order to reproduce the long-time decay of magnetisation. The scaling technique is tested using a numerical model of a granular perpendicular media and then applied to experimental data. Scaling is shown to be successful for systems of multiple layers of soft (Ni) and hard (Co) magnetic materials, coupled by a Pt interlayer and for CoCrPt granular recording media systems. Based on a dataset of decay curves in negative fields, the data lifetime of magnetic recording media can be quantified, this representing an important factor for media design and production.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Iron-titanium sulfides FeTi2S4 and Fe2TiS4 have been structurally and magnetically characterized using powder X Ray Diffraction with Rietveld refinement method and 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy at variable temperature. Both sulfides have the same crystallographic phase, based on the monoclinic Cr3S4 type structure and vary in atomic coordinates; FeTi2S4 retains the ideal atomic positions proposed for the Cr3S4 phase, while in Fe2TiS4 the metal displacements from ideal sites are noticeable. Mössbauer spectra reveal different magnetic behaviors; in FeTi2S4 there is a transition from paramagnetic to magnetic ordering at temperature Tc = 145 K, giving rise to unusually low hyperfine magnetic field of 2.5 T (at 77 K) if compared with values of iron magnetic moments reported previously, this behavior is explained on the basis of blocking Fe localized magnetic moments by the Spin density wave (SDW) originated from 3d Ti atoms. In Fe2TiS4 a transition from paramagnetic to (SDW) arises at Tc = 290 K, the SDW is spread in both Fe and Ti metals through [1 0 1] crystallographic plane and undergoes a transition of first order from Incommensurate SDW (ISWD) to Commensurate SDW (CSDW) at TIC = 255 K. The atomic positions in the unit cell are correlated to the magnetic behavior in both sulfides.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Specular spin valves (SVs) containing ultrathin MgO, structured as substrate/seed/AF/PL1/MgO/PL2/Cu/FL/MgO/cap, have been fabricated. Both structural and magnetic characterizations of MgO based specular spin valve (SSV) have been performed and compared them with the measured data on naturally oxidized (NO) and conventional spin valves (CSV), grown under optimised condition. Reversible minor loop characteristics, highest exchange bias of 625 G and 10% magnetoresistive (MR) ratio were important observations in MgO based system. Zero hysteresis behavior was confirmed due to the reduction of grain growth of the stacks above the fine-textured MgO layer, through X-ray diffraction measurements. Interestingly, at 10 K, above 100% enhancement in MR ratio was observed in MgO based system with marginal increase in coercivity of the order 1 G. On the other hand, NO based structure has 10% MR, minor loop hysteresis of ∼2 G and exchange bias of ∼560 G at room temperature; however at 10 K, only 75% enhancement in MR ratio with large anomalies in magnetic measurements attributes due to the AFM nature of oxide materials. The above studies reflects the superior performance of MgO based SSV over a wide range of temperature in comparison to other SV structures and may lead to futuristic linear magnetic field sensor applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Based on the first-principles calculations, we have systematically studied the electronic, magnetic and optical properties of single-layer CrS2 with and without vacancy defects. The S vacancy is the most energetically favorable vacancy among the considered S vacancy, Cr vacancy, S2 double vacancy and CrS double vacancy. The vacancy induced defect states drop into the original band gap region, so the smaller band gaps have been obtained for single-layer CrS2 with vacancies compared with the perfect one. Although the perfect single-layer CrS2 is a nonmagnetic direct band gap semiconductor, the magnetic semiconductor is obtained via either Cr vacancy or CrS double vacancy. The S vacancy and S2 double vacancy are still nonmagnetic semiconductors with reduced band gaps. Furthermore, the static dielectric constants and static refractive index of single-layer CrS2 with vacancies are all bigger than those of perfect CrS2 because the reduction of the band gaps. The first main absorption peak is weakened while the other two main peaks are all significantly enhanced for single-layer CrS2 with vacancies.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.It is well known that azimuthal spin wave modes of magnetic vortex state in permalloy nanodisks have circular symmetry. Intuitively, magnetic materials having magnetocrystalline anisotropy is not compatible with the circular symmetry of the azimuthal modes. In this article, however, we report cubic azimuthal modes in heterogeneous nanodisks consisting of a permalloy core and a Fe shell. The fourfold symmetry of azimuthal modes is due to the exchange, and magneto-static, interactions between the permalloy core and the Fe shell. In comparison to the results of circular azimuthal mode, the vortex switching occurs considerably faster under the excitation of cubic azimuthal mode. The gyration path of vortex core turns into square under the influence of induced cubic anisotropy in the permalloy region. We find out periodic oscillation of the vortex core size and the gyration speed as well. Our findings may offer a new route for spintronic applications using heterogeneous magnetic nanostructures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have detected size-dependent modifications in magnetic ordering in charge ordered nanoparticles through the study of magnetocaloric effect. Due to prominent surface induced magnetism in nanoparticles, it is very difficult to probe the magnetic ordering in charge ordered antiferromagnetic nanoparticles from direct magnetization study, especially at lower magnetic fields, though at higher magnetic fields the antiferromagnetic/charge ordered transition can be visualized properly. We show that, at comparatively lower magnetic fields, the magnetocaloric effect provides a sensitive way for the detection of such ordering transitions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Formation of a polycrystalline thin film from a Prussian blue analogue (PBA) on insulating substrates through a chemical method is reported here. One of the typical PBAs, Ni-Co PBA, K0.4Ni2.8[Co(CN)6]2·nH2O, was selected to demonstrate the growth process. Silicon substrate surface is functionalized through a typical self-assembled monolayer process using aminopropyltrimethoxysilane (APTMS) to form relatively robust interface with PBAs through the coordination bonds with the terminal amino-groups of APTMS. Then, these amino-functionalized silicon wafers are used as anchors for the controlled assembly of homogeneous Ni-Co PBA thin films which shows several kinds of pyramidal structures on the surface. The obtained thin films exhibit paramagnetic properties at room temperature without a negative magnetization.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper utilizes a thermodynamic approach based on Helmholtz free energy density and a finite element (FE) model to analyze a galfenol-based magnetostrictive energy harvesting concept device. An analytical energy density function is first presented assuming an isotropic material for the identification of a magneto-mechanical constitutive law. The model utilizes the magnetic flux density and mechanical strain as state variables. Compared to some earlier approaches, this simplifies the implementation of FE models based on magnetic vector potential and mechanical displacement, since time-consuming inversion of the constitutive law is not required. The Maxwell and mechanical balance equations are then solved utilizing the constitutive law in an axisymmetric FE model. A prototype device is developed and tested under uniaxial cyclic compressive loading of 100 Hz at different preload and dynamic loading cases. Finally, the results from the simulations are compared with the experimental results for validation. The comparison shows that the analytical constitutive model fits well to the magnetization curves measured under static loading. Furthermore, the FE model closely predicts the measured power with some discrepancies under different preload values. The model is able to predict the behavior of the device with respect to preload, load resistance and magnetization of the sample, proving to be an effective tool in the design of such devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we have presented a detailed study on the effects of mechanical activation caused by high energy ball milling on the structural, magnetic and hyperfine properties of nanosized Co0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 having three different particle sizes 63 (M1), 25 (M2) and 17 nm (M3) synthesized by chemical coprecipitation method. Characterization techniques like powder x-ray diffraction, high resolution transmission electron microscopy, dc magnetic measurements and Mössbauer spectroscopic techniques have been employed to examine M1, M2 and M3 thoroughly. All the three samples are cubic spinel ferrites with Fd3-m symmetry. The lattice parameters of M1, M2 and M3 are 8.395, 8.391 and 8.375 Å, respectively. The particles constituting all the three samples possess both superparamagnetic and ferrimagnetic phases at room temperature. The values of blocking temperature of M1, M2 and M3 are 204, 210 and 220 K, respectively. The values of saturation magnetization of M1, M2 and M3 at 300 and 10 K are 56.8, 55.3, 51.5 emu g−1 and 115.68, 113.84, 109.65 emu g−1, respectively. The values of coercivity for M1, M2 and M3 at 10 K are 1395, 2190 and 1950 Oe, respectively. The theory of magnetic domains has been exploited to explicate the trend in coercivity. The cation distribution of M2 is (Zn2+ 0.48Fe3+ 0.52)A[Co2+ 0.5Zn2+ 0.02Fe3+ 1.48]BO4. The effects of mechanical activation on cation redistribution and magnetic property of M2 have been investigated by infield Mössbauer spectroscopic measurements and verified by theoretical analysis of experimental results of Rietveld refinement of powder x-ray diffraction data in conjugation with dc magnetic study. The sample M2 is basically ferrimagnetic in nature possessing a slightly canted core surrounded by a disordered shell. It exhibits excellent memory effect in its dc magnetization measurement. The sample is capable of encoding, preserving and recalling binary numbers through magnetic field change. This property of the sample may be used to design magnetic coding and sensing devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The Ni and X (X = C, N, O, F, P, S, Cl, Se, and Te) codoped monolayer WS2 (W15Ni1S26X6) alloys were studied systematically by using the first-principles methods. The volume V of Ni and X codoped WS2 unit cell deceases with the deceasing atomic radius of X belonging to the same period or group in the periodic table of the elements. The codoped W15Ni1S26X6 (X = C, N, O, F, P, S, Cl, Se, and Te) alloys are easier to form under the W-rich condition than under the S-rich condition. The W15Ni1S26O6 and W15Ni1S26C6 alloys are the easiest and the hardest to form, due to the lowest and the highest formation energies, respectively. Only the HM W15Ni1S26Se6 alloy with a large magnetic moment of about 4 μB can be used in the spintronic devices. The Ni and X (X = S, Se, F, and Cl) codoped HM W15Ni1S26X6 alloy has the superiority for the optical use compared with the pristine W16S32 alloy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The geometric, magnetic and electronic structures of oxygen-deficient CuFeO2 crystal have been studied with the GGA plus on-site repulsion U method. In CuFeO2, oxygen vacancy has the influences on two aspects. One is the decrease of lattice parameters, another is the valence change of Fe and Cu ion induced by the change of ionic charge number. In addition, when the oxygen vacancy appear in CuFeO2, the stability of collinear antiferromagnetic structure is enhanced. Furthermore, the electronic structure analysis suggest that there may be a powerful magnetoelectric coupling effect in oxygen-deficient CuFeO2 crystal, since the crystal is a zero gap conductor in ferromagnetic state while having a small gap in antiferromagnetic state. This unique property exhibits potential application prospect for magnetoelectric current sensor.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Matching permeability and permittivity, low magnetic and dielectric loss tangent and high refractive index play a critical role in designing a miniaturized antenna with high performance. Here, TiO2 was introduced into Ni0.368Cu0.2Zn0.432Fe1.96O3.94 ferrite ceramic to adjust equivalent permeability and permittivity via suppressing grain growth. The effects of concentration of TiO2 and sintering temperature on microstructure, complex permeability and permittivity, DC resistivity, and saturation magnetization of NiCuZn ferrite ceramics were investigated. SEM results indicated that TiO2 obviously retarded grain growth to achieve uniform and dense NiCuZn ferrite ceramics with small grains (∼0.60 μm). Also, it was found that the addition of TiO2 can enhance the DC resistivity and reduce loss factors via increasing in fraction of grain boundaries. Furthermore, different sintering temperatures were chosen to control the matching permeability and permittivity and to promote densification. At last, a NiCuZn ferrite with the equivalent permeability to permittivity (μ′ = 12.90, ε′ = 12.76, @ 40 MHz), very low loss factors (tanδμ = 0.050, tanδε = 0.00022, @ 40 MHz), and high DC resistivity was obtained sintered at 1000 °C when 16 wt% TiO2 was added. Thus, NiCuZn ferrite ceramics doping TiO2 show a lot of potential to be used as a substrate material in miniaturizing antenna for futuristic electronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The dynamics of a micro-organism swimming through a channel with undulating walls subject to constant transverse applied magnetic field is investigated. The micro-organism is modeled as self-propelling undulating sheet which is out of phase with the channel waves while the electrically-conducting biofluid (through which micro-swimmers propel) is characterized by the non-Newtonian shear-rate dependent Carreau fluid model. Creeping flow is mobilized in the channel due to the self-propulsion of the micro-organism and the undulatory motion of narrow gapped walls. Under these conditions the conservation equations are formulated under the long wavelength and low Reynolds number assumptions. The speed of the self-propelling sheet and the rate of work done at higher values of rheological parameters are obtained by using a hybrid numerical technique (MATLAB routine bvp-4c combined with a modified Newton-Raphson method). The results are validated through an alternative hybrid numerical scheme (implicit finite difference method (FDM) in conjunction with a modified Newton-Raphson method). The assisting role of magnetic field and rheological effects of the surrounding biofluid on the swimming mode are shown graphically and interpreted at length. The global behavior of biofluid is also expounded via visualization of the streamlines in both regions (above and below the swimming sheet) for realistic micro-organism speeds. The computations reveal that optimal swimming conditions for the micro-organism (i.e., greater speed with lower energy losses) are achievable in magnetohydrodynamic (MHD) environments including magnetic field-assisted cervical treatments.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Oscillatory effects in magnetic susceptibility of free electrons in a strong magnetic field is well known phenomenon and is well captured by Lifshitz-Kosevich formula. In this paper we point out similar oscillatory effects in Stoner susceptibility which makes the system to oscillate between paramagnetic phase and ferromagnetic phase alternatively as a function of external magnetic field strength. This effect can happen in a material which is tuned near to its magnetic instability. We suggest an experimental set-up to observe this effect. We also suggest that our result can be exploited to control a material around its quantum critical point to study its thermodynamical and transport properties.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The porous flower-like Ni/C composites were simply prepared through the pyrolysis of Zn-doped metal organic frameworks (MOFs) under a N2 atmosphere. The method is facile, controllable and without surface active agents. The microstructure, composition, and electromagnetic parameters can be easily controlled by varying thermal decomposition temperature to achieve the high electromagnetic loss. Interestingly, the Ni/C composites calcined at 800 °C have strong electromagnetic absorption with the maximum reflection loss (RL) value of −52.4 dB. In addition, the effective absorption band width (<−10 dB) of absorbing coating is as high as 5 GHz, and it is noteworthy that the composites have a very thin matching thickness of 1.6 mm. The excellent electromagnetic attenuation performance can be ascribed to the novel flower structures, synergistic effect between nickel and carbon, and remarkable impedance matching. This designed flower-like composites supply an impactful pathway to achieve potential candidate materials as highly effective microwave absorbers.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Polyimide (PI) with excellent insulating property and enhanced thermal stability was used as insulating coating material for the preparation of iron-based soft magnetic composites (SMCs), and the effect of insulating coating content and curing temperature on the magnetic properties of iron-polyimide SMCs was investigated. The results demonstrate that the insulating layer of PI shows satisfactory adhesion property on the surface of iron particles, and uniform insulating layer of PI was obtained by imidization of polyamic acid (PAA) at 200 °C. With the increase of PI content, the thickness of insulating layer increases gradually, accompanied by the increase of resistivity and the reduction of core loss. PI shows enhanced heat resistance, the SMCs can be cured at the temperature up to 400 °C, leading to the effectively release of residual internal stress generated during the compaction process. At the optimized PI content of 1.5 wt% and curing temperature of 400 °C, low core loss of 780 W/Kg (measured at 50 mT and 100 kHz) and higher maximum permeability of 305 were achieved.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic susceptibilities of nanocrystalline alloys are studied in the remanent state. • Local interactions induce difference in longitudinal and transverse susceptibilities. • The phenomenon is described within the mean field approach for weak exchange coupling. • Effects of polydispersity and magnetostatic are modelled by Monte Carlo technique. • A new method for estimation of intergrain exchange interaction constant is proposed. The macroscopic magnetic properties of nanocrystalline alloys are strongly dependent on microstructural and micromagnetic inhomogeneities along with intergranular interactions. In particular, magnetic susceptibility is sensitive to these factors and frequently used for alloy characterisation. In this work reversible magnetic susceptibility in the remanent state of the nanocrystalline alloy with randomly oriented easy magnetisation axes is considered. Due to intergranular interactions the susceptibilities measured parallel and perpendicular to the remanence can be distinctly different from each other. When the intergrain exchange is the dominant interaction this susceptibility feature has potential for its quantitative evaluation. Here this opportunity is studied by means of two approaches: analytical solutions based on the mean-field approximation and simulations using the kinetic Monte Carlo model. The dependence of the magnetic susceptibility on the exchange coupling strength are investigated taking into account the effects of grain size distribution and magnetostatic interactions. These results lead us to propose an experimental susceptibility-based method for the estimation of both intergrain exchange interaction strength and effective magnetic anisotropy constant. This method can be used for the characterisation of high-anisotropy nanocrystalline alloys with randomly oriented easy magnetisation axes that is a widespread case. The method is applied to rapidly quenched Nd2(Fe0.8Co0.2)14B nanocrystalline alloy giving strong exchange coupling and a reasonable value for the anisotropy constant.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Considering the nickel has an almost perfect in-plane lattice constant match with graphene, vertical Ni/graphene/Ni junctions are fabricated and characterized in this article. In order to improve the interface quality, we employ a modified fabrication process of depositing the ferromagnetic (FM) material on both sides of a suspended graphene membrane assisted with rotating the sample with a slant angle during the bottom FM film growth. The magnetoresistance (MR) ratio of about 0.1% with a low resistance-area product (RA) of 30 Ω·μm2 is obtained at room temperature and the device shows a typical metallic behavior with the linear I-V characteristic and T2-typical temperature dependence of the resistance. Interestingly, the temperature dependence of the MR displays an unusual behavior as the MR ratio reduces with the decreasing temperature, which we believe is due to the antiferromagnetic coupling between the two FM layers competing with the dipole field.© 2019 Elsevier LtdNitrogen-doped silicon indium zinc oxide (N-SIZO) thin film transistor (TFTs) were fabricated depending on nitrogen contents. It has been observed that nitrogen has substituted oxygen in N-SIZO system. Its electrical property and bias stability can be appropriately tuned by nitrogen-doping to reduce oxygen defect states. This change is mainly caused by the substitution of O atoms by N ones. As the N content increased, the peak related to the oxygen deficiency of XPS was systematically decreased. In addition, TLM analysis confirmed that the resistance increases steadily with increasing N content. Subthreshold swing (SS) was also improved by increasing nitrogen doping. This low SS means that the total trap state is decreased. As a result, it is confirmed that the negative bias stress (NBS) test shows stability as the N content increases.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents electron magnetic resonance (EMR) and vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM) study of Heusler alloy Ni50Mn35.5In14.5 ribbons prepared by melt spinning. The temperature dependency of the EMR spectra and magnetization was measured during the cooling and heating process in the 180–330 K and 100–450 K temperature ranges, respectively. Both methods reveal thermal hysteresis (structural phase transition) and metamagnetic character of this material. The morphology and composition were investigated by scanning electron microscopy (SEM) with an energy-dispersive spectrometer (EDS).© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this study, we have presented a source-connected field plate (SCFP) InAs high electron mobility transistor (HEMT) and evaluated its potential for using in high-speed and low-power logic applications. The fabricated device demonstrated good electrical characteristics including low subthreshold swing (SS) of 76 mV/decade, drain induced barrier lowering (DIBL) of 44 mV/V, ION/IOFF ratio of 2.4 × 104, an off-state gate leakage current of less than 5 × 10−6 A/mm and a Gm, max of 1100 mS/mm at VDS = 0.5 V. When increasing the drain-source bias (VDS) to 1.0 V, the Gm, max increased to 1750 mS/mm with a cut-off frequency of 113 GHz. These results revealed that the fabrication of source-connected field plate InAs HEMTs achieved excellent device performance for high-speed and low-power logic applications.© 2019 Elsevier LtdVery thin plasma enhanced chemical vapor deposition (PECVD) titanium (Ti) of 6 ± 1 nm was characterized on doped unstructured and structured Si substrate. Based on the current state of the art, we utilized the Design of Experiment (DoE) methodology, considering selected responses and factors of the Ti deposition and post annealing. This paper provides approaches on how to apply PECVD for unstructured silicon and structures with increasing aspect ratios. The derived process for unstructured wafers yields low resistivity at a Ti film thickness of approximately 7 nm. An uniform filling inside a test structure was achieved with a low process temperature of 590 °C, an increasing pressure and TiCl4-flow as well as a post rapid temperature anneal process (RTP) at medium temperature and time. The dispersion of the measured total resistance increases over the different trench distances at lower process pressure, higher power, and higher RTP. In contrast to the reference process configuration, the formed TiSi2 is smaller-grained and more uniform within the entire test structure. Consequently, leveraging DoE for the used test structure geometries allows the evaluation and optimization of silicide and its properties as a function of contact geometry and of Si doping.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Co2FeAl (CFA) thin films of 50 nm thickness have been grown on MgO (0 0 1) single crystal substrates at room temperature with and without post-annealing (PA) at 300 °C and 400 °C using dual ion-beam sputtering technique. The XRD pattern of the as-grown film revealed that CFA grows with preferred crystallographic orientation on the MgO (0 0 1) substrate. Temperature dependent anisotropy measurements on PA films revealed a dominating contribution from cubic anisotropy as confirmed by the analysis of azimuthal angle dependent longitudinal in-plane magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) measurements. The contributions from the cubic and uniaxial anisotropies have also been quantified employing ferromagnetic resonance spectroscopy. Magnetization reversal is accompanied with a plateau in the MOKE hysteresis recorded at various azimuthal angles in the in-plane applied magnetic field configuration. The occurrence of the observed plateau is explained by the presence of a combination of domain walls such as 90°, 135° and 180° domain walls and/or complex domains which is supported by results from micromagnetic simulations. These results demonstrate the feasibility of manipulating the magnetization switching in one of the two ferromagnetic electrodes of the magnetic tunnel junction devices based on Heusler alloy ferromagnetic films.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Transition metal atoms adsorbed on surfaces (adatoms) behave like magnets in nanoscale and have potential applications in quantum computing. Scanning tunneling microscopy and inelastic tunneling spectroscopy studies yield the spin Hamiltonian parameters. Semi-empirical approach based on crystal-field and microscopic spin Hamiltonian theory is employed for modeling of the zero field splitting parameters bk q, and Zeeman g-factors for Fe2+(S = 2) adatoms on Cu2N/Cu(1 0 0) surface. These parameters are determined for wide ranges of the microscopic parameters: the spin-orbit (λ), spin-spin (ρ) coupling constants, and crystal-field energy levels (Di) within the 5D multiplet. Matching theoretical and experimental 2nd-rank parameters (b2 0, b2 2) yields suitable values of {λ, ρ, Di}. For the first time, also the 4th-rank parameters (b4 q) as well as the g-factors and their ρ-contributions are estimated. Using EasySpin program we show that the transition energies and mixing coefficients obtained using only b2 q differ significantly from those using both (b2 q, b4 q). This indicates that b4 q significantly affect the spin energy levels. Hence interpretations of experimental data may be inaccurate if b4 q are neglected. Our approach enables bridging the gap between semi-empirical and DFT/ab-initio methods and may be utilized for Fe2+(S = 2) adatoms on other surfaces and Fe2+-based molecular nanomagnets.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The binding energy of a hydrogenic-like donor complex D0 placed in a two-dimensional Gaussian quantum dot GaAs semiconductor is determined incorporating the Rashba and Dresselhaus spin-orbit interactions in the presence of an externally applied magnetic field. A unitary transformation is employed to deal with the spin-orbit interactions and their effects are incorporated up to second order in the coupling coefficients. The resulting Hamiltonian is solved variationally using a simple wave function. The results indicate that the Rashba spin-orbit interaction and the confining potential reduce the energy of the donor complex whereas the magnetic field enhances it. Interestingly enough, the binding energy is enhanced by the Dresselhaus spin-orbital interaction in the presence of a magnetic field and while it is reduced in the absence of it. Finally we study the effect of magnetic field and spin-orbit interactions on the magnetic moment and susceptibility.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Barium monoferrite (BaFe2O4) was synthesized by citrate combustion method. The structural, magnetic properties as well as permittivity and permeability at microwave frequencies have been investigated and discussed in present paper. Formation of orthorhombic crystal structure was confirmed from the X-ray diffraction pattern. These polycrystalline samples sintered at different temperatures have higher Curie temperature (∼700 K) and coercivity (∼4000 Oe) as compared to the values reported in literature. Next to detailed structural and magnetic properties, also permittivity and permeability at X-band microwave frequencies were measured using cavity perturbation technique. The high and quite comparable values of dielectric constant and permeability make this material suitable for use as a microwave absorbing paint as well as a promising electromagnetic interference (EMI) shielding material.© 2019The single-layer Ta(20 nm)Nd13Fe77B10(100 nm)Ta(20 nm)film was prepared and diffusion-processed by Nd25Cu75(20 nm)and Nd70Cu30(20 nm). The evolutions of microstructure and magnetic properties were comparably studied. By using same amount of diffusion layer, different coercivities were achieved. The coercivity enhancement mechanism was explained phenomenologically by surface defects of Nd2Fe14B grains and estimation of activation volume. It was found that due to the increased Nd composition in grain boundaries, the activation volume was reduced and the local anisotropy was enhanced due to the remedied surface defect. Such dependence was consistent with the coercivity changes.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.To study the relationship between the mechanical properties of sintered NdFeB magnets and composition of the Nd-rich phase, sintered NdFeB magnets with different mechanical properties and composition of Nd-rich phases were prepared by spark plasma sintering technology (SPS). Several correlations including the bending strength of the magnet to sintering temperature (σbb-t), the rare earth content in the Nd-rich phase to the sintering temperature (nRE-t), and the iron content in the Nd-rich phase to the sintering temperature (nFe-t) were investigated. Several empirical formulas for these relationships ware obtained by fitting these experimental curves. It is found that there is almost no change in the sum of Re and Fe content, revealing that the diffusion direction of RE and Fe atoms in the boundary phase between the main phases during sintering is opposite, and the relationship of σbb to nRE are approximately linear. Based on these, the mechanism of improving the mechanical properties of sintered NdFeB materials via changing the composition of Nd-rich phase was discussed.© 2019Residual magnetic field (RMF) for metal material has a relationship with material stress status. Bridging the relationship between macro parameters and material microstructure is an essential step to deal with the characterization of residual stress. This paper applies magneto-optical Kerr microscopy (MOKE) with the help of magneto-optical indicator film (MOIF) to observe and analyze variations of magnetic domain pattern under different stress conditions of high permeability grain oriented electrical steel (HGO steel). Experiment about repeatability is carried under cyclic stress applications and the stability study is proceeded during the relaxation time after release of stress. By using two domain texture features, mean value (MV) of domain wall image intensity linked to domain rotation to characterize RMF amplitude and the angular second moment (ASM) related with domain wall displacement to express the RMF distribution are used for investigation of repeatability and stability. Results show that domain wall displacement is repeatable and stable both under cyclic stress round and during relaxation time after release of stress. It has been found that the situation of domain rotation is varied in different locations, and broad texture area of domain wall images has better repeatability and stability when compared with area with narrow texture of domain wall images. The results provide substantial potential to evaluate the residual stress from the view of characterization of micro-structure.© 2019The domain rotation process during magnetostriction in Fe-Ga rolled sheet has been clarified. The magnetic domain pattern variation with magnetic field of rolling surface was observed by magneto-optic Kerr Microscopy in-situ. According to the sample information and magnetostriction, different magnetic domain structures were constructed for different magnetization stage. In the demagnetized state, the magnetic domain structure of Fe-Ga rolled sheet was closure domain with lancet domain as supplementary domain, and when the magnetic field is larger than 8.3 kA/m the magnetic domains is lancet domains, which well explains the domain rotation process at the stage of slow magnetostriction growth. Using an equivalent stress, the magnetostriction of Fe-Ga polycrystal was simulated by an energy-based domain rotation model. The result fits well with the measured magnetostriction in rapid growth stage and saturation stage. These two models work as a complement to each other and clearly show the domain rotation process during magnetostriction.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.An amorphous GdFeCo film has a spin reorientation transition (SRT)with the temperature varying from 230 K to 300 K. Its magnetization reversal processes have been characterized by the hysteresis loops and first-order reversal curve (FORC)in the vicinity of the SRT temperature. Along with the SRT from out-of-plane to in-plane, the total irreversible components decrease with increasing temperature from 84% (250 K)to 13% (300 K)and the reversal process gradually changes from the pinning-type dominated reversal (250 K)to the nucleation type reversal (270 K), and then to the uniform rotation (300 K). The identification of the magnetization reversal process nearby SRT is important to understand the magnetic properties in the magneto-optical recording materials GdFeCo.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Manganese substituted indium-tin-oxide (Mn: ITO) nanoparticles (NP) and thin films (TF) were prepared using solid state reaction and electron beam evaporation techniques, respectively and studied the role of doping concentrations, temperature and applied magnetic fields on structural, optical and magnetic properties. The structural, optical and magnetic properties of the prepared NP and TF were studied using X-ray diffractometer, UV–Vis-NIR spectrophotometer and vibrating sample magnetometer, respectively. The Mn: ITO NP and TF exhibited a cubic structure without any secondary phases. The optical band gap of the Mn: ITO NP increased (3.07 eV–3.15 eV) whereas it decreased in Mn: ITO TF (3.9 eV–3.25 eV) with an increase of Mn concentration. The Mn: ITO NP exhibited a clear hysteresis loop at a temperature of 32 K and the strength of magnetization increased with the increase of Mn concentration and it decreased with the increase of temperature. The Mn: ITO NP has shown antiferromagnetic nature at higher applied magnetic fields. The Mn: ITO TF has shown weak ferromagnetic nature at room temperature and the magnetization decreased with the increase of Mn concentration. The magnetic saturation was not observed in these films even at higher applied magnetic fields.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We studied, using finite-element micromagnetic simulations, magnetization-reversal processes of exchange-decoupled granular NdFeB magnets for a cubic model system that consists of 27 polyhedral grains of different crystallographic orientations along with non-magnetic grain boundaries. In the simulations, we varied the degree of easy-axis alignment of individual grains with different uniaxial orientations. For perfect uniaxial alignment, i.e., α = 1, the normalized remanence magnetization and the normalized coercivity along with the maximum energy product (BH)max were estimated to be 1, 0.64, and 64.71 MGOe, respectively, and were decreased to 0.59, 0.42, and 20.56 MGOe, representing reductions of 41, 34, and 68%, respectively, for a randomly oriented alignment of the grains’ easy axis, α = 0.6. From a comparison of the magnetization-reversal processes for different easy-axis alignments, i.e., α = 1, 0.98, 0.94, 0.87, 0.82, 0.79, and 0.60, it was found that all of the magnetization reversals consisted of three different sub-processes: the nucleation of a reversed domain within a grain and the expansion of nucleated domains to complete the reversal in that grain via domain-wall motion; magnetization-reversal propagation to the next grain via successive nucleation in other neighboring grains; further rotation of the magnetizations of all of the grains for cases of larger misalignment of grains’ easy axis. According to these reversal sub-processes, as the degree of easy-axis alignment, α, decreased, the nucleation of reversed domains occurred at smaller field strengths and the apparent grain-by-grain reversal propagation became slower. The lower the value of α, the lower the energy required for the nucleation of reversed domains and the more predominant the pinning of the apparent grain-by-grain reversal propagation. These reversal processes led to hard-magnet parameters such as normalized remanence magnetization and coercivity and the maximum energy product (BH)max. The values of the parameters for the perfect uniaxial alignment of grains became smaller with increasing misalignment of the grain's easy axis. The results provide both a better understanding of micro-scale magnetization-reversal processes and guidelines for optimal design of hard-magnet microstructures for higher (BH)max values.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Intergranular adding Dy-containing powders is effective to enhance the coercivity of Nd2Fe14B-based sintered magnets with slight remanence loss due to the formation of (Nd, Dy)2Fe14B hardening shell surrounding the 2:14:1 grains. Here, the influences of post-sinter annealing (PSA)time on microstructure and coercivity of Dy69Ni31-added Nd-Fe-B magnets have been investigated. With prolonging the annealing time at 580 °C, the coercivity increases rapidly from 10.1 kOe to 16.2 kOe when the annealing time is less than 6 h and keeps nearly unchanged after longer time annealing. Longer time annealing promotes the formation of thicker Dy-enriched 2:14:1 hardening shells as well as optimized and continuous grain boundary (GB)layers, which plays positive contributions to enhance coercivity. However, the transmission electron microscope (TEM)investigations reveal that crystal structure of RE-oxides at the triple junctions changes with prolonging PSA time, transforming from double hexagonal close-packed (d-hcp)to a mixture of face-centered cubic (fcc)and ordered body-centered cubic (bcc)and to hexagonal close-packed (hcp). The latter transformation may play a negative role on coercivity enhancement, offsetting the positive contributions. These findings may provide a useful guide for engineering the microstructure of Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this present work, bismuth molybdate (Bi2Mo2O9)nanoparticles (NPs)were prepared by microwave combustion method using urea as the fuel. The phase formation and purity of the product was identified by powder X-ray diffraction (XRD). Fourier transform-infrared (FT-IR)analysis was adopted to record the functional group of Bi2Mo2O9 NPs. The morphology, purity, size and elemental composition of the sample were confirmed by Scanning electron microscope (SEM), elemental mapping, energy dispersive X-ray (EDX)analysis and High-Resolution transmission electron microscope (HR-TEM)technique respectively. The UV–visible and photoluminescence (PL)spectra were used to examine optical and electronic behavior of the prepared sample at room temperature (RT). The chemical bonding of Bi2Mo2O9 NPs was studied by Raman spectroscopy. The magnetic properties of Bi2Mo2O9 NPs were examined by vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM)at RT. The particle size distribution was examined by X-ray Photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS). The Electrochemical (EC)properties of Bi2Mo2O9 NPs were investigated by Cyclic voltammetry (CV), Galvanostatic charge/discharge (GCD)and Electrochemical impedance spectral (EIS)studies. The specific capacitance (Cs)of prepared Bi2Mo2O9 NPs is 197 F/g at 0.4 A/g with excellent cycle stability of 94% specific capacitance after 1000 cycles. Hence, the results of electrochemical characteristics exhibits excellent performance and have potential application of electrode for energy storage systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The thixotropic yield behaviors of ferrofluids with different particle volume concentrations were studied through a series tests under constant stresses for sufficiently long times. A lubrication oil based ferrofluid was prepared and a diluted sample was acquired by mixing the initial ferrofluid sample with carrier fluid according to a ratio of 1:3. The particle volume concentration of the samples was estimated through the magnetization curves as 7.8% and 1.9%. A critical bifurcation stress can be observed through the time evolution of the initial ferrofluid sample under moderate magnetic fields, over which the viscosity curves tend to infinity. For the diluted ferrofluid sample, no viscosity bifurcation can be observed even under the minimum stress values. Similar viscosity bifurcation phenomenon for initial samples can be seen from the curves under different magnetic field strengths or temperatures. The experimental results indicate that the yield process of ferrofluids is thixotropic and significantly influenced by the shear history. The microscopic mechanism behind the thixotropic yield behaviors of ferrofluids is discussed and analyzed. A non-linear structural model was presented to describe the time evolution of viscosity in ferrofluids under different magnetic field strength. The comparison between the fitting results and experimental data indicates that the thixotropic yielding behaviors of ferrofluids can be predicted in some extent. These findings provide a new perspective on the yielding behaviors of ferrofluids which takes the thixotropic effect into consideration.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetism of two-dimensional layered materials is of considerable interest in spintronics. In the present work, we report the ferromagnetism of the layered material SnSe2 induced by Bi doping. The pure SnSe2 and Bi-doped SnSe2 film samples are prepared by chemical vapor transport method. X-ray diffractions show that both the SnSe2 and Bi-doped SnSe2 have CdI2-type layered structure grown perfectly along the c-axis. Magnetic measurements indicate that the pure SnSe2 is a diamagnet. The doping of nonmagnetic Bi introduces ferromagnetism in SnSe2 with Curie temperature of 65 K. A coercivity as high as 4.4 kOe is observed at T = 10 K. Such high coercivity has never been reported in d0 two-dimensional layered materials. First-principles calculations indicate that the Bi-doping leads to the spin splitting of degenerate px and py orbital states and gives rise to a spin order aligned in ab plane. Calculations also show that the Bi-doped SnSe2 is a half metal. All these features make Bi-doped SnSe2 a potential candidate for spintronic material.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Earlier comprehensive study of SrFeO3−δ series of compounds showed interplay between the oxygen vacancy and the magnetic and transport properties of the system. We have synthesized a powder sample of SrFeO3−δ series with oxygen vacancy in the range 0.15⩽δ⩽0.19. X-ray powder diffraction confirms the tetragonal crystal structure of the compound while the magnetic data indicates the presence of response from both orthorhombic (Sr4Fe4O11) and tetragonal (Sr8Fe8O23) phases which is common for the series with intermediate compositions. The temperature dependent dielectric measurements have been carried out in the 10 kHz–1 MHz frequency range. The dielectric constant and loss are found to be nearly temperature independent for △T∼170K around room temperature. This temperature independent response could possibly be referred to as ‘flat loss’ corresponding to a low loss behavior, making the compound a potential candidate to capacitor industry. The anion stoichiometry has been further manipulated by introducing a more electronegative fluoride anion in the vacant oxygen sites where the structure changes to cubic one at room temperature.© 2019 The AuthorsVoltage-control of exchange biases through active selection of distinct domain states of the magnetoelectric and antiferromagnetic pinning layer is demonstrated for Cr2O3/CoPd heterostructures. Progress and obstacles towards an isothermal switching of exchange bias are discussed. An alternative approach avoiding exchange bias for voltage-controlled memory exploits boundary magnetization at the surface of Cr2O3 as voltage-controlled state variable. We demonstrate readout and switching of boundary magnetization in ultra-thin Cr2O3/Pt Hall bar devices where reversal of boundary magnetization is achieved via magnetoelectric annealing with simultaneously applied ±0.5 V and 400 mT electric and magnetic fields.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, a systematic investigation of electrical transport mechanism has been used as a tool to investigate the charge-order suppression and its crossover in Pr0.5Ca0.5MnO3 (PCMO) manganite system with varying particle size and applied magnetic field. The samples with different particle sizes were synthesized by adopting sol-gel method and sintering at different temperatures. The prepared samples were thoroughly characterized by various physicochemical techniques. The activation energy and density of states at Fermi level obtained from the temperature-dependent electrical resistivity data clearly show the charge order crossover signatures and its suppression in the samples below 70 nm particle size and applied magnetic fields above 4 T. The significant change in various electrical transport parameters with the particle size around 70 nm could be attributed to the melting of long-range charge ordering behavior due to surface spin disorder and induced lattice-strain effects in PCMO manganite system.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Many layered graphene and graphene-like two-dimensional carbon materials have been successively proposed in theory and experiment owing to their exceptional properties and potential applications. By employing the first-principles study, we find that a new graphene-like material, δ-graphyne, whose properties of the zigzag-edged nanoribbon are very similar to those ones of zigzag-edged graphene case. The band structure clearly exhibits a metallic property in non-magnetic state. And we can see a visible spin splitting within the ferromagnetic state, however, spin degeneracy within the antiferromagnetic state. To this end, here we propose a molecular junction based on the zigzag-δ-graphyne nanoribbon symmetrically with additional phenyl rings at both edges. The computational results imply that the device has many good electron transport performances, such as negative differential resistance, spin-filtering and rectification effects, and so on. In particular, the spin-filtering efficiency can be up to 99%, and the maximum of the rectification ratio reaches up to 106%. The mechanisms for these effects are revealed and discussed in terms of the band structure, spin-resolved electron transmission spectrum, the local density of state and the transmission pathway. Therefore, our research results can provide a basis for the experimental preparation of the δ-graphyne-based junction.© 2019 The AuthorsA major issue plaguing Heat Assisted Magnetic Recording (HAMR)is the high writing (Twrite)and peak heat spot temperatures (Tpeak). To counter this, a low temperature thermal exchange coupled composite (ECC)media with reduced write temperature relative to previous high temperature thermal ECC media is introduced. The FePt Tc is reduced from 700 K to 500 K, and the write layer Tc is reduced from 900 K to 600 K. Optimizations for Ms and Ku of the write layer generate values of Ms = 700 emu/cm3 and Ku = 1.0 × 107 erg/cm3 at 300 K. Switching Probability Distribution (SPD)calculations with lowered Tpeak = 650 K indicate Twrite = 487 K. This indicates a Twrite reduction by 34% as compared to the previous write temperature of 738 K for the high temperature thermal ECC media. Examining the FWHM of the SPD under 0% and 3% Tc variation indicates a noise reduction of ∼20% relative to single layer high Tc FePt media, and a much larger reduction relative to low Tc FePt media. The jitter values at lowered Tc approach the ideal value set by the grain size in the absence of any Tc and Ku variation. Simulations with uncorrelated and correlated Tc and Ku variations in the write and FePt layer generate similar results. Reduction of FePt Tc may reduce the anisotropy relative to its undoped value: reduction of anisotropy by 33% is found to adversely affect the SPD by only 3–4%, but has a larger impact on jitter. These results help establish the usefulness of a low temperature thermal exchange coupled composite media for HAMR.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe reliability of a bulk fin field-effect transistor (FinFET) with a high-k dielectric/metal-gate stack has been investigated by comparing the effects of DC and AC stresses. It is well known that the relaxation during the off-cycle of the AC stress decreases the Vth shift and enhances the device lifetime due to electron detrapping from the high-k dielectric. We found that the relaxation in the interface traps is significantly weaker than that of bulk traps during the unipolar and bipolar AC stresses. The weak recovery is attributed to the concurrent interface state generation during a positive-bias temperature instability (PBTI) stress. Eventually, the interface traps became a major source of the device drift (over 60%) at the high temperature of 400 K. This finding suggests that a new strategy is required to address the PBTI reliability focusing on the residual interface states as well as the bulk trapping, particularly at a high temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The influence of Fe-alloying on the structural transition temperatures, microstructure, and mechanical and magnetocaloric properties of polycrystalline Ni41Co9−xFexMn40Sn10 (at. %) (x = 0–3) alloys has been studied. The substitution of Fe for Co introduced the so-called γ phase when the Fe content exceeds 1 at. %. The transformation temperatures decreased almost linearly with increasing Fe content without alteration of the transformation sequence. The compressive strength and maximum compressive strain increased to 1270 MPa and 21.3 % for Fe content of 3 at. %. In addition, the fracture type changed gradually from typical intergranular cracking to transgranular cracking with increasing Fe content. Magnetic field-induced reverse martensitic transformation was modified by increasing the Fe alloying, leading to the reduction of magnetic hysteresis loss (∼ 82.5 % drop after addition of 3 at. % Fe) but at the expense of a significant reduction in the maximum magnetic entropy change value.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, pristine zinc oxide (ZnO), Co2+ doped zinc oxide (ZCO) and Co-Y co-doped zinc oxides (ZCYO) are synthesized by sol-gel method. To increase the oxygen vacancy, the as-prepared samples are annealed in vacuum furnace. Refinement of the recorded X-ray diffractograms (XRD) shows that all the samples have grown in single hexagonal phase with space group P63mc and the nanocrystallites are grown with average sizes lie in the nanometer regime (10–29 nm). Fourier-transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR) and photoluminescence (PL) spectroscopy could not detect any secondary phase except the desired one. Interestingly, room temperature ferromagnetism (RTFM) is observed in Co-Y co-doped sample where maximum magnetization is quite high (∼0.34 emu/g) compared with undoped ZnO. Absence of any metal cluster in ZCYO by XRD and optical analyses ruled out the ordering due to clustering. Thus origin of RTFM in ZCYO is intrinsic in nature. The defect mediated RTFM observed in ZCYO nanoparticles due to exchange interaction between dopants ions is explained by the oxygen vacancy together with the presence of the increase of surface defects due to co-doping of Co ion and non-magnetic Y ion.© 2019Steep slope negative capacitance MOSFETs with HfYOx ferroelectric on FDSOI were experimentally demonstrated. An average SS of 30 mV/dec was achieved over 3 decades of drain current. The negative capacitance is believed to be a transient phenomenon because a strong polarization switching is needed for the steep slope. We found that the sub-thermal SS degrades with the cycling measurements, which is assumed to be caused by the trap charging in the ferroelectric oxide layer. The tradeoff between polarization and charge trapping is responsible for the subthreshold behavior of the device.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe reported a low-temperature solution-processed method for the fabrication of AlOx thin films in the memory device. The detailed study is carried out to figure out the effect of varying annealing temperatures (150, 200, 250, 300, and 350 °C) on resistive switching characteristics of solution-processed aluminum oxide dielectric. The dielectric properties of AlOx films under different annealing temperatures were evaluated by atomic force microscopy (AFM), thermogravimetric analysis-differential scanning calorimetry (TGA-DSC), X-ray diffraction (XRD), attenuated total reflection Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (ATR-FTIR) and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) firstly. Then the AlOx films were used as the switching dielectric layer for a variety of low-temperature solution-processed oxide resistive random access memory (RRAM) devices. It was found that forming voltage increased with increasing annealing temperature and forming free behavior could be achieved by 200 °C sample. No repeatable resistance switching characteristics were observed in the devices with minimum (150 °C) and maximum (350 °C) annealing temperatures. Compared with the ALD-derived AlOx based RRAM devices in previous study, enhanced performance like small forming voltage, large resistance ratio (〈1 8 0) and narrow resistance and voltage distribution was achieved by the solution-processed AlOx based ones at the optimized low annealing temperatures of 200 to 250 °C, which would be applied in the bionic circuit simulated by synapses and neural networks. All three samples (200, 250, and 300 °C) obtained switching endurance up to 300 cycles and data retention over 104 s. Furthermore, the solution based fabrication method also has the potential in the flexible memory application due to the merit of the low-temperature process.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe aim of this work is to propose and qualify a systematic method for parameters extraction of Junctionless Nanowire Transistors (JNTs) based on drain current measurements and compact modeling. As junctionless devices present a different conduction mechanism than inversion-mode transistors, the methods developed for the latter devices either are not compatible or cannot be directly applied to JNTs before a deep analysis on their applicability. The current work analyzes the extraction of the series resistance, including a discussion about the influence of the first and second order mobility degradation factors, flatband voltage and low field mobility in junctionless transistors based only on static drain current curves. An analysis of the method accuracy considering the influence of the channel length, nanowire width and height, gate oxide thickness and doping concentration is also presented for devices with different characteristics through three-dimensional numerical simulations. The inclusion of the second order effects in a drain current model is also shown, considering the extracted values. The method applicability is also successfully demonstrated in experimental devices.© 2019We propose three innovative SOI Tunnel FET architectures to solve the recurrent issue of low ION and degraded subthreshold slope measured on TFETs. These are evaluated and compared with a standard TFET structure (with lateral tunneling) using the Sentaurus TCAD tool. Extending the source (anode) at the bottom of the body region generates vertical band-to-band tunneling. Moreover, reducing the vertical distance between the extension and the gate oxide (Lrt) yields a very steep slope and higher ION compared to a device with only lateral tunneling, but only for gate lengths longer than 100 nm. Using an ultrahigh boron dopant concentration (1021 cm−3) thin layer at the bottom for extremely small body thickness (TSi < 7 nm), increases ION even for small gate lengths (LG < 100 nm). The implementation of an embedded tip in the source enhances the maximum electric field at the source/channel junction, but the impact on the performance is limited because the tunneling area is not increased. Therefore, this architecture provides a performance similar to a standard TFET. TCAD simulations using SiGe with different germanium concentrations (30% and 50%) and pure germanium, instead of silicon, show an increase of the interband tunneling current when using an ultrahigh dopant concentration thin boron layer for small gate lengths (LG < 50 nm). The reduction of the tunneling current using a relatively thick channel (11–7 nm) can be compensated by using a higher germanium concentration to reduce the energy bandgap. However, this will increase the density of defects causing a TAT tunneling instead of interband tunneling, jeopardizing the possibility of achieving a subthreshold swing below 60 mV/dec.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, a novel temperature distribution measurement method for packaged integrated circuit (IC)chips is proposed, based on field-programmable gate array (FPGA)embedded ring oscillators. A temperature sensing network is established using the programmable logic resources of the FPGA. Smart thermal sensors detect the temperature based on the relationship between the delay time and the temperature in the ring oscillators. An infrared image of the chip is captured using an infrared camera to verify the correctness of the proposed method. The spatial resolution of the temperature sensor network is 0.13 mm × 0.28 mm and the measured temperature error varies by less than 2.1 °C.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Pt\Co\W multilayers are evaluated as a novel material composition for the use in perpendicular nanomagnetic logic (pNML)applications. Starting from single and bilayer stacks, the material system is explored for maximum Co thicknesses while preserving perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA)as well as single-domain behavior for micrometer-sized structures. Results for single trilayers show significantly reduced saturation magnetizations when compared to Pt\Co\Pt. Anisotropy measurements reveal a comparable volume component together with substantially reduced surface contributions. The subsequent analysis of [Co1.22\Pt1.45\WX]2 bilayer stacks indicates the emergence of weak interlayer coupling superposed by anisotropy differences, for Tungsten thicknesses tW⩾0.5nm, not exceeding the low mT range. The impact of local anisotropy engineering on micro-magnetic test structures by means of Ga+ ion beam irradiation for different stack compositions is investigated, targeting low nucleation fields and shaping hysteresis behaviors for single step switching. First operational dipole-coupled inverter structures based on a Pt\Co\Heavy-Metal system are demonstrated achieving clocking fields down to 50 mT.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents a benchmarking comparison between InAs FinFET and gate-all-around (GAA)MOSFET by a 3-D TCAD simulation. The complete FinFET fabrication process is demonstrated followed by a TCAD simulation platform based on the experimental data. Both DC and RF simulation results are shown here. Further optimizations are explored for InAs FinFET/GAA MOSFET through TCAD simulations. It is found that with optimizations in materials, device geometry and fabrication, significant enhancement in DC/RF performances is possible with these devices. In addition, GAA MOSFET shows a better potential for future RF application.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe demonstrate the electrical performances of an AlGaN/GaN metal–insulator–semiconductor high electron mobility transistor (MIS-HEMT)with low gate leakage current (Ig). A low gate leakage current as low as the order of 10−11 A/mm was achieved from normally-off MIS-HEMT device (Vth = 2.16 V)with a partially recessed gate, fluorine treatment, and ALD Al2O3 gate dielectric layer. The gate leakage current decrease is attributed to the pre-treatment of the gate region with hydrofluoric acid (HF)and deionized water (DI)solution, which acts to remove the native oxide layer and thus decrease interface traps. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS)and atomic force microscopy (AFM)analyses demonstrate that the AlGaN surfaces are modified such that the surface roughness and native oxide introduced by the treatments used to achieve normally-off operation are remedied with the use of the pre-treatment.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Composite rheological materials based on ferroelectric porous structure and either magnetic elastomer or fluid filler were investigated. Ferroelectric porous structure was prepared using silicone matrix and ferroelectric PZT microparticles. Different types of liquid magnetic mixtures were placed into the porous foam like in a sponge. The influence of external electric field on the magnetic properties of such composites was detected by vibrating sample magnetometer with added voltage source. Coefficient of inverse magnetoelectric transformations of the sample with elastic filler was found to depend on magnetic field. It maximum value for the sample with iron microparticles was found to be ∼36 µG cm/V. Comparing the properties of the ferroelectric foam with ferrofluid and magnetic elastomer, we propose a qualitative model of magnetoelectric effect associated with deformation effects in components and with magnetization mechanism.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In recent years, high-efficiency absorption properties, low filler loading and lightweight of microwave absorbing materials have received increased attention in the field of electromagnetic wave absorption. Herein, hollow ZnSnO3 nanocrystals grown on nitrogen-doped graphene nanosheets (ZnSnO3-NRGO)has been successfully synthesized through a simple hydrothermal route. As a synergistic microwave absorber, ZnSnO3-NRGO exhibits remarkable microwave absorbing performances compared with ZnSnO3. The maximum reflection loss (RLmax)of ZnSnO3-NRGO (with low filler loading ration of only 10 wt%)can reach up to −40.8 dB at 17.6 GHz with an absorber thickness of only 2 mm and the efficient absorption bandwidth (RL exceeding −10 dB)is 3.2 GHz. Under the thickness of 3 mm, the RLmax of ZnSnO3-NRGO can reach −33.2 dB at 13.7 GHz with high-efficiency bandwidth (RL < −10 dB)of 6.4 GHz (from 11.4 to 18 GHz). The improving performances can be attributed to more reasonable impedance matching, higher attenuation capability, proper synergistic effect and multiple interfacial polarizations. Therefore, this work demonstrates that ZnSnO3-NRGO with light-weight and strong microwave absorption performance shows the great potential as a microwave absorber.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The present work has demonstrated the experimental results of dc magnetization and neutron diffraction measurements for Co1.25Fe1.75O4 ferrite. The material has been prepared by chemical route, and annealed at different temperatures to study its effect on the stabilization of Co and Fe ions in tetrahedral and octahedral sites. Magnetic measurements have been carried out to study the temperature variation of magnetization, coercivity and effective anisotropy constant of the samples. Neutron diffraction pattern has been used to calculate the lattice parameter, site distribution of Co and Fe ions, and site magnetic moments as the function of measurement temperature and annealing temperature of the samples. In this work, specific attempt has been made to understand the lattice and magnetic correlation by employing the neutron diffraction and neutron depolarization techniques. The experimental results suggest the possibility of an inverse relation between anomalous lattice expansion and decrement of high field magnetization at lower temperatures, typically below 150 K.© 2019The ground state properties of a frustrated spin-1/2 system is studied on a trellis ladder which is composed of two zigzag ladders interacting through rung interactions. The presence of rung interaction between the zigzag ladders induces a non-magnetic ground state, although, each of zigzag ladders has ferromagnetic order in weak anti-ferromagnetic leg interaction limit. The rung interaction also generates rung dimers and opens spin gap which increases rapidly with rung interaction strength. The correlation between spins decreases exponentially with the distance between them.© 2019Pure o-LiMnO2 prepared by solid state reaction under Ar flow at 850 °C crystallizes in an orthorhombic symmetry (SG: Pmnm). Mn3+ with four unpaired electrons is subjected to a strong Jahn-Teller (J-T) distortion, where the MnO6 octahedron is significantly elongated (1.17%) along the c axis. In air, the oxide converts to spinel LiMn2O4 at ∼320 °C. The magnetic susceptibility of LiMnO2, measured between 4.2 and 900 K, indicates a long range order. The negative θP value (−790 K) reveals strong antiferromagnetic interactions between half-filled dz2 1 orbital. The predominant interaction is negative and occurs between Mn3+ and its next-nearest neighbors via O2− ions by super exchange with Mn3+-O: 2p-Mn3+ angle of 178°. Above 300 K, the susceptibility follows a Curie Weiss law with a magnetic moment of 5.26 μB consistent with the high spin state Mn3+ (t2g 3 eg 1) but slightly larger than the spin only contribution for the ground state 5Do. The susceptibility is field dependent down to 4.2 K and a spin canting has been detected at low temperature. As magnetic chains are separated by non-magnetic Li ones, the interactions are confined along the [1 1 0] direction and one can expect a good realization of one dimensional model. Therefore, the magnetic data have been fitted on the base of the isotropic model for finite linear chain in terms of intra-chain antiferromagnetic interactions using the Fisher model. The best fitting is obtained for a value of J/k = −60 K. The results are compared with those of the crednerite CuMnO2 with smaller J/k value (−33 K).© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this study, sodium doped molybdenum (Mo:Na) and Mo thin films are deposited at different working pressures under the excitation of the radio frequency (RF) or direct current (DC) power supplies for application in Cu(In,Ga)Se2 (CIGS) thin film solar cells. The various material properties including dynamic deposition rate, electrical and optical properties, crystal structure and morphology are systematically investigated and compared for these RF and DC sputtered Mo:Na and Mo thin films. Mo and Mo:Na related back contacts, i.e. bottom Mo:Na layer prepared at a high working pressure and top Mo or Mo:Na thin film sputtered at a low working pressure are employed in CIGS thin film solar cells. CIGS thin film solar cells with Mo:Na (bottom, DC)/Mo:Na (top, DC) have a relatively high VOC, which is related to a relatively easy migration of Na passing through the DC Mo layers and entering into the CIGS thin film solar cells. A CIGS thin film solar cell of 14.0% has been achieved in this work.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Alnico 8 elements are added into Ce-Fe-B ribbons and the effects of the multi elements on the magnetic properties, phase transition temperatures and microstructure are investigated. It is found that the addition of alnico elements is helpful for enhancing the magnetic properties of the Ce-Fe-B alloys. The Curie temperature of Ce2Fe14B (2:14:1)main phase increased from 422 K for the standard alloy to 490 K by 20 wt% addition of alnico, while the Curie temperature of CeFe2 (1:2)phase decreased from 223 K to 122 K. The transmission electron microscopy (TEM)analysis showed that the nano grains of the alloys are refined which is attributed to the refractory character of Ti. The intergranular exchange interactions measured by applying Henkel plots also enhanced by adding alnico elements into Ce-Fe-B ribbons. The magnetic properties Hcj, Br and (BH)max improved significantly for the optimized addition of alnico. Magnetic properties of Hcj = 5.16 kOe, Br = 4.59 kG and (BH)max = 4.14 MGOe are obtained in Ce35Fe56.5(alnico)7.5B ribbon. The improved magnetic properties in alnico-doped Ce-Fe-B alloys are attributed to the refined microstructure and enhanced intergranular exchange interactions.© 2019We report on current-induced ferromagnetic resonance techniques to characterise spin-Hall effect at high temperatures. A microwave current was injected into a patterned CoFeB/Pt bi-layer grown on a glass substrate, simultaneously exerting spin-transfer torques through the spin-Hall effect and also causing Joule heating enabling the control of the device temperature. We measured the device temperature by using the device itself as a local temperature sensor. A clear reduction of CoFeB magnetisation was observed as the device temperature was increased allowing us to estimate the Curie temperature of our CoFeB film to be 920 K. The spin-Hall angle of Pt was quantified as (1.72 ± 0.03) × 10−2 at 300 K and was slightly increased to (1.75 ± 0.02) × 10−2 at 410 K. This simple method can be widely used for quantifying the spin-Hall angle of a large variety of materials at high temperatures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This study aims to examine the magnetohydrodynamic (MHD) effect on the blood flow of a Casson fluid in a vertical cylinder. Blood is taken as a non-Newtonian viscous fluid due to the viscosity which depends on the volume fraction of red blood cells. The effect of magnetic field on blood and particles velocities with temperature distribution has been studied. Using the definition of Atangana-Baleanu fractional derivatives, the classical model which governs the flow has been generalized and the exact solution of the problem has been obtained by applying the joint transformation of Laplace and Hankel. Effects of interesting embedded parameters on both velocities (blood velocity and particles velocity) have been examined and discussed graphically. Results showed that an increase in blood velocity or particle velocity is caused due to increase in Gr and λ, however, a reverse behavior is noticed for higher values of M. Rate of heat transfer at the plate surface is measured using Nusselt number relation. The results are computed and presented in a tabular form.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Earlier studies show that the multiferroicity in the spin-chain compound Ca3CoMnO6 critically depends upon the Co/Mn ratio. In order to establish the role of Co and Mn in controlling the multiferroic properties, we intend to disturb this ratio to find out its implications on the physical properties. The present study is aimed at studying modification of the properties of Ca3CoMnO6 by partial substitution of Ni for Co. The combined results of structural, magnetic and dielectric studies show interesting changes as a function of Ni substitution. There is a drastic difference in M(H) behavior at T < TN for Ca3Co1−xNixMnO6 (x = 0.0, 0.2) compounds. The magnetodielectric properties are also largely different for x = 0.0 and 0.2 samples. The MDE for x = 0.0 is negative with ∼7% variation, whereas for x = 0.2 it is positive with about 1% variation over the temperature range of measurement. Therefore, Ni substitution clearly alters the magnetic structure resulting in the change of magnetic space group, thus influencing the overall magnetic properties.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The generation of ultrashort hot-electron pulses in metallic heterostructures offers attractive perspectives for the ultrafast spin manipulation on the picosecond time scale. In such approach, the hot-electron pulses are produced by exciting a non-magnetic capping layer with femtosecond infrared laser pulses. These hot-electron pulses propagate towards a buried magnetic layer to trigger ultrafast demagnetization. Lately, it was shown that the demagnetization onset and characteristic demagnetization times are both affected by the transport regime (ballistic or diffusive)of the photo-excited hot-electrons. In this work, we show that the hot-electron pulses produced by photo-exciting a Al(3)/Ta(3)/Cu(60)capping layer undergo a temporal stretching and delays when they go across a [Co(0.1)/Ni(0.6)]x5 multilayer. These information were extracted from a study of hot-electron induced demagnetization in CoDy alloys by means of Time-Resolved X-Ray Magnetic Circular Dichroism.© 2019The saturation magnetization in Ni doped ZnO thin films have been triggered by altering the electronic configuration of ZnO by surface functionalization with Trioctail Phosphine Oxide (TOPO). Initially, Ni doped (3, 5 and 7 mol %)ZnO thin films have been grown by RF magnetron sputtering and the same were functionalized with Trioctylphosphine oxide (TOPO)later by spin coating. The XRD analysis confirms the hexagonal wurtzite structure of grown films. It has been found that lower grain size for both unfunctionalized and functionalized 5 mol% Ni doped ZnO films. PL emission at around 530 nm reveals the presence of oxygen vacancies which is actually cause for origin of ferromagnetism. The saturation magnetization values of 5.70 emu/cm3, 10.14 emu/cm3 and 8.51 emu/cm3 obtained for Ni doped ZnO films from VSM have been enhanced to 7.81 emu/cm3, 11.51 emu/cm3 and 9.61 emu/cm3 upon TOPO functionalization. The high saturation magnetization in 5 mol% Ni doped ZnO film is attributed to lower crystallite size (high grain boundaries)and higher oxygen vacancies. The Zn-P bond observed in the XPS spectrum reveals the formation of the surface layer between Zn and P atom which is responsible for the enhancement of saturation magnetization. The presence of peak at 1146 cm−1 in Raman spectra also confirms the presence of functionalized element, P from TOPO. The simple mechanism based on the bound magnetic poloran and charge distribution has been proposed to explain the origin of room temperature ferromagnetism.© 2019 The AuthorsThis paper gives a procedure for automatically generating finite element meshes with an adaptive mesh size from Electron Backscatter Diffraction (EBSD) data. After describing the procedure in detail, including preliminary and image processing steps, an example application is given. The method was used to carry out finite element (FE) micromagnetic simulations based on real microstructures in the hard magnetic material, MnAl. A fast micromagnetic solver was used to compute hysteresis properties from the finite element mesh generated automatically from EBSD data. The visualization of the magnetization evolution showed that the reversal is governed by domain wall pinning at twin boundaries. The calculated coercive fields are very sensitive to changes of the Gilbert damping constant, even for low field rates.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Recent progress in all-electrical nucleation, detection and manipulation of magnetic skyrmions has unlocked the tremendous potential of skyrmion-based spintronic devices. Here, we show via micromagnetic simulations that the stable magnetic oscillations of STNO radiate spin waves (SWs) that can be scattered in the presence of skyrmions in the near vicinity. Interference between SWs emitted by the STNO and SWs scattered by the skyrmion gives rise to interesting dynamics that leads to amplification or attenuation of STNO's magnetic oscillations. In the presence of strong Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI), the amplified magnetic oscillations evolve into a new skyrmion. These interactions between skyrmions and STNOs are found to be identical for both Neel-type and Bloch-type skyrmions, and are not observed between domain walls and STNOs. These findings offer a novel perspective in processing information using single skyrmions and we propose a 3-bit majority gate for logic applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The low-temperature magnetic, thermal, electrical transport and magnetocaloric properties of the TmNiSn compound were investigated. A polycrystalline sample was prepared by arc-melting. Powder X-ray diffraction confirmed the formation of TmNiSn with orthorhombic TiNiSi-type crystal structure (space group Pnma, no. 62). It was found that TmNiSn undergoes paramagnetic to antiferromagnetic state transition at the Néel temperature TN = 2.4 K. A week inflection of isothermal magnetization curve taken at 1.8 K, can indicate a spin-flop transition. Magnetocaloric properties obtained from isothermal magnetization curves demonstrate positive and negative magnetocaloric effect. In the magnetic field change of 3 T the maximum magnetic entropy change of −10.5 J/(kg K) was obtained at 3.5 K along with the corresponding relative cooling power (RCP) value of 81 J/K. The electrical resistivity result shows metallic behavior from 2 K up to 400 K with clear anomaly at TN.© 2019 Elsevier LtdA facile electrospinning technique followed with calcinations in air has been accepted as a straight forward protocol for the research and development of SnO2/TiO2 heterostructures which are composed of SnO2 nanoparticles and TiO2 nanofibers. Characterizations of the nanocomposites by series of testing techniques indicate that the SnO2 nanoparticles were prepared and uniformly anchored on the surface of TiO2 nanofibers. Gas sensors were fabricated to investigate the gas-sensing behaviors of SnO2/TiO2 nanocomposites. Comparing with pure SnO2 nanoparticles and TiO2 nanofibers, SnO2/TiO2 nanocomposites exhibited better gas-sensing performance. The SnO2/TiO2 heterojunctional composites with the mass ratio of 1.5:1 presented an optimum operating temperature of 240 °C. The maximum gas response relative to 100 ppm ethanol is 9.58, which is about 1.89 and 1.88 times higher, respectively, than pure TiO2 nanofibers and SnO2 nanoparticles. Meanwhile, the gas sensors prepared with SnO2/TiO2 nanocomposites also had shorter response and recovery time and long term stability. The enhanced sensing properties could be ascribed to the formation of heterojunction and the synergetic effect of SnO2 and TiO2 together with its unique nanoparticle attached fibrous architectures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The phase diagrams and magnetization curves of a graphene ladder-type Ising system under an applied transverse field are investigated by using the effective-field theory with correlations. They have exhibited many characteristic phenomena, such as the reentrant phenomena exhibiting the three transition temperatures. In particular, the thermal variations of transverse magnetizations have exhibited some characteristic features not found in other transverse Ising models.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe exploitation of the two-dimensional electron gas (2DEG) channel of an AlN/GaN/AlN double barrier heterostructure, for High Electron Mobility Transistors (HEMTs) with metal–oxidesemiconductor (MOS) tri-gate around a fin-shaped channel (MOS-FinHEMTs), has been investigated by combining fabrication, dc I-V measurements and simulations of single-fin MOS-FinHEMT devices. The dependence of the threshold voltage (Vth) and the maximum drain-source current (Ids,max) on the fin width (Wfin), as well as the effects of ohmic contact resistance, gate-drain and source-gate distance and of the Al2O3 gate dielectric thickness (tox), have been addressed. Fabricated single-fin MOS-FinHEMT devices with tox = 20 nm, exhibited a positive shift of Vth, in comparison to a reference planar-gate device, ranging from +0.8 V for Wfin = 650 nm to +3.4 V for Wfin = 200 nm, due to lateral depletion of the channel by the gate contacts on the fin sidewalls. Simulations reproduced the experimental Vth values and also predicted the Vth of devices with narrower fins, down to Wfin = 10 nm. The boundary for normally-off operation (Vth = 0 V) was determined at Wfin = 17 nm that may increase up to 31 nm if the tensile strain of the top AlN barrier in the fin nanostructure is elastically relaxed. A reduction of maximum drain-source current per top gate width (Ids,max/Wg) with decreasing Wfin in the range of 200–650 nm may result from increased ohmic contact resistance. However, for narrower fins, Ids,max/Wg is predicted to decrease significantly with decreasing Wfin, due to the lateral field of the sidewall gates. The Ids,max/Wg will also decrease with increasing distance between the source, gate and drain contacts for any Wfin. Finally, the Vth and Ids,max/Wg values were calculated for Al2O3 thickness in the range of 5 to 40 nm.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe potential of resistive switching (RS)devices based on TiN/Ti/HfO2/W stacks to mimic synapses within a neuromorphic applications context is analyzed in depth. The fabrication and characterization process are explained and a physically-based modeling description is performed to understand the devices resistive switching operation and conductance modulation. The model employed considers truncated-cone shaped conductive filament (CF)geometries and parasitic ohmic resistances linked to the device conductive filaments in addition to device capacitances. The temporal evolution is analysed assuming a valence change memory operation, where the oxide surrounding the CF is considered as well as the CF thermal description. A complete series of RS cycles has been fitted with the model by means of the gradient descent algorithm to study the compliance current effects on the conductance modulation. To do so, experimental and modeled results are extensively compared.© 2019 Elsevier LtdTunable components and circuits, allowing for the fast switching between the states of operation, are among the basic building blocks for future communications and other emerging applications. Based on the previous thorough study of graphene based resonators, the design methodology for graphene tunable filters has been devised, outlined, as well as explained through an example of the fifth order filter. The desired filtering responses can be achieved with the material loss not higher than the loss corresponding to the previously studied single resonators, depending mostly on the quantity of graphene per resonator. The proposed design method relies on the detailed design space mapping; obtained data gives an immediate assessment of the feasibility of specifications with a particular filter order, maximal passband ripple level, desired bandwidth, and acceptable losses. The design process could be further automated by the knowledge based approach using the collected design space data.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic sensors adopting amorphous wires have advantages in high sensitivities and low noise characteristics, yet those performances would be irreproducible due to the inhomogeneity existing in amorphous wires. In this research, glass-coated Co-Fe-Si-B-Cr amorphous magnetic wire was adopted to a fundamental mode orthogonal fluxgate (FM-OFG)sensor to investigate its adaptability as a magnetic core. In as-cast wire form, non-repeatability and anomaly found in the magnetization process deteriorated the sensor noise performance. Current annealing was then performed to the wire core. It was confirmed that the current annealing greatly improved the repeatability in magnetization, reducing the sensor noise level to 30 % of the case obtained with the as-cast wire core. Further analyses on current annealing parameters implied that the internal stress relaxation of the wire was rapidly occurring at the beginning of the annealing, followed by the induction of circumferential anisotropy. The results revealed that those changes in magnetic property were repeatable and controllable, making the sensitivity and noise performance of the sensors highly reproducible. This feature will be a great advantage in further practical development of the sensors.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe effective mobility in 4H-SiC trench metal-oxidesemiconductor field-effect transistors (MOSFETs)with an n-channel region on the 11-00 face, corresponding to the trench sidewalls, is investigated. Using a previously proposed mobility model, which includes Coulomb scattering mobility (μC), surface roughness scattering mobility (μSR)and optical phonon scattering mobility (μOP), the dependence of the effective field (Eeff)on μOP is studied experimentally. It is found that for the trench MOSFETs with a drift layer, μOP is proportional to Eeff −1, whereas for trench MOSFET without a drift layer, it is proportional to Eeff −0.3, which is consistent with reports on phonon scattering mobility in SiC lateral MOSFETs fabricated on 0001 and 0001- faces. The results suggest that the proposed mobility model is effective, and that the dependence of Eeff on μOP is not affected by the plane orientation of SiC and needs to be evaluated with the drift layer resistance removed. A method for evaluating the carrier transport properties of trench MOSFETs with a drift layer is also proposed.© 2019In this study, novel CIP@EP composites with a core-shell structure were prepared by using the in-situ polymerization method. The phase structure, morphology and thermal stability were investigated by FTIR, XRD, SEM, TEM and TG. The results indicated that EP were densely covered on the surface of CIP particles, and with the increase of EP contents, the EP shell became thicker, which effectively strengthened the thermal stability of the materials. The magnetic and electromagnetic properties of the composites were systematically investigated. It was found that the content of EP played an important role in improving the magnetic and dielectric properties. High EP content can effectively improve the impedance matching between the dielectric and magnetic loss of the absorbers and enhance the EM wave absorption ability of the composites. This study proves that the CIP@30%EP exhibits an excellent EM wave absorption ability, which has higher value of RL and wider absorption width than other CIP@EP composites. The CIP@30%EP has a strong reflection loss peak of −16.1 dB and wide effective absorption bandwidths of 5.4 GHz at the thickness of 2.2 mm. Furthermore, the method utilized to synthesis the CIP@EP composites can be a suitable and efficient way to prepare other spherical microwave absorption materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Hysteresis loss is one of the important behaviors to be considered which reverse the magnetization. In this study, the influence of alloying element, grain size, particle size and spark plasma sintering on hysteresis loss (HL) has been analyzed. An increment in the % of nickel caused a decrement in HL value at 2–100 h milling time. Generally, the value of HL decreases with the decrement of average grain size, however, the value of HL is observed to marginally increase while the average grain size decreases from 225 to 75 nm. A maximum HL value was found with the average grain size 75 nm. Hence, it could be concluded that up to a critical average grain size of ∼75 nm the HL is not strongly dependent on the average grain size, whereas lower the grain size from 75 nm the HL value steeply decreases. It indicates the high HL value can be observed at intermediate grain size and low HL value at fine and coarse grain sizes. The HL value is higher at the intermediate average size of the particle and becomes lower while the average size of the particle with a larger or smaller dimension. It was found from all spark plasma sintering samples that when milling hour increases the value of HL increases, because of the increment in sintered grain size at higher hour milled samples and also decreases the lattice imperfection and internal strain while sintering.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.PbPdO2 and M-doped PbPdO2 (M = Cu, Co, Fe) films were prepared using pulsed laser deposition (PLD) method. The structures, electrical and magnetic properties were systematically investigated by XRD, Raman, SEM, XPS, AFM and VSM. Our results indicate that PbPdO2 and PbPd0.9M0.1O2 (M = Cu, Co, Fe) film with (0 0 2) preferred orientation can be well fabricated. The valence states of magnetic atoms in M-doped PbPdO2 (M = Cu, Co, Fe) thin films are identified to be Cu1+, Co2+,3+ and Fe3+, respectively. All Pb(Pd,M)O2 (M = Cu, Co, Fe) films exhibit ferromagnetism with high metal-insulator transition temperatures at around 330–370 K. Moreover, the resistivity of Fe doped PbPdO2 film is higher than that of the pristine PbPdO2 film, while the resistivities of Co and Cu doped PbPdO2 films are lower. At the same time, Fe, Co and Cu dopants do enhance the ferromagnetism of PbPdO2 film, while the enhancement of magnetic moment for Fe dopant is most evident. Lastly, based on Pb vacancy and O−1 observed experimentally, the band gaps and magnetic moments of Pb(Pd,M)O2 films were calculated by first-principles, and the results explain well the experimental facts.© 2019Core–shell structured CeO2@Fe composites composed of a dielectric CeO2 core and ferromagnetic Fe shell were synthesized via a metal organic chemical vapor deposition (MOCVD) method. The phase structure, morphology, magnetic, and electromagnetic (EM) properties of the composites were characterized with modern measurement techniques. According to the results, the rough α-Fe shell is homogeneously deposited on the CeO2 surface. The saturation magnetization (Ms) and coercivity (Hc) of the CeO2@Fe composites are 45.1 emu/g and 274.3 Oe, respectively. The EM properties of the composites containing 60, 70, and 80 wt% CeO2@Fe and paraffin wax (PW) were investigated in the frequency range 2–18 GHz. The CeO2@Fe–PW composite with 70 wt% CeO2@Fe exhibits a minimal reflection loss (RL) of − 17 dB at 9.6 GHz (thickness of 2.54 mm). The composite with 80 wt% CeO2@Fe shows a broad effective absorption bandwidth (RL ≤ −10 dB) at 4.24 GHz (thickness of 1.24 mm) and can be exploited for practical applications at 3.12–18.0 GHz by tuning its thickness from 0.97 to 4.0 mm. The excellent microwave absorption performance of the composites is attributed to the synergistic effects of a dielectric loss due to Debye relaxation and interface polarization and a magnetic loss due to natural resonances and exchange resonances. Moreover, the balance between the impedance matching and attenuation constants are benefits for the microwave absorption.© 2019A large single crystal of bismuth has been studied between 2 K and 150 K by means of polarized neutron diffraction in fields up 6.2 T applied along the trigonal axis. The recorder flipping ratios are very small in agreement with the diamagnetic response of bismuth. Maximum entropy reconstruction shows that the leading contribution to the magnetic field induced magnetization is indeed associated with electron states centered at bismuth. However, small contribution stems from states placed outside bismuth atoms.© 2019We study the anomalous Hall effect (AHE) and anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR) in a series of ultra-thin Pt/Co(x)/Pt trilayers (0.1nm⩽x⩽0.5nm). We find that the AHE exhibits a significant increase at low temperatures (T). This increase cannot be attributed to a trivial increase in magnetization or resistivity. A similar T dependence is observed in the AMR measurements. Interestingly, these effects show almost no dependence on cobalt thickness. Our measurements indicate that the deviation from common behavior can be attributed to an induced magnetic proximity effect in the Pt layers that increases at low temperatures, in agreement with previous reports. An alternative explanation related to the evolution of a non-continuous magnetic layer is considered as well.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A magnetic nanoring model with surface anisotropy by bending a single-walled nanotube was proposed and was placed in an inhomogeneous magnetic field produced by an electric current passing through the center of the nanoring and perpendicular to the ring plane. The ground state with vortex spin structure was determined and the magnetization was calculated by using the spin Green's function method. It is found that the strong surface anisotropy can ensure the spins vortex state of the system. With the increase of temperature, the total order parameter of the spins gradually decreases to zero from their classical values. As the radius of the nanoring increases, the transition temperature of the system decreases rapidly and then gradually tends to a finite value. Changing the direction of the current, the generated reverse toroidal magnetic field can switch the magnetic state of spins from a vortex state to a reversal vortex state. The value of the current required for magnetization switching shows monotonic relationship to the radius of nanoring, surface anisotropy and the temperature which is far below the transition temperature. When the temperature is greater than the transition temperature, system shows the paramagnetic behavior.© 2019The influence of He+ ion irradiation on magnetotransport properties of epitaxial layers of a diluted magnetic semiconductor (DMS) (In,Fe)Sb, a two-phase (In,Fe)Sb composite and a nominally undoped InSb semiconductor has been investigated. In all layers, a conductivity type conversion from the initial n-type to the p-type has been found. The ion fluence at which the conversion occurs depends on the Fe concentration in the InSb matrix. Magnetotransport properties of the two-phase (In,Fe)Sb layer are strongly affected by ferromagnetic Fe inclusions. An influence of the number of electrically active radiation defects on the magnetic properties of the single-phase In0.75Fe0.25Sb DMS has been found. At the same time, the results show that the magnetic properties of the In0.75Fe0.25Sb DMS are quite resistant to significant changes of the charge carrier concentration and the Fermi level position. The results confirm a weak interrelation between the ferromagnetism and the charge carrier concentration in (In,Fe)Sb that is fundamentally different from Mn doped III-V DMS.© 2019The direct and converse magnetoelectric (ME) effects in a flexible structure containing a mechanically coupled layers of amorphous ferromagnet FeBSiC and a piezo-copolymer poly(viniledene fluoride trifluoroethylen) (P(VDF-TrFE)) are investigated. The mutual transformation of magnetic and electric fields in the structure arises due to a combination of magnetostriction and piezoelectric effects in the ferromagnetic and piezoelectric layer, respectively. The ME effects were induced by exciting the structure with alternating magnetic fields of 0–100 kHz frequency and 1–5 Oe amplitude, or alternating electric fields of amplitudes up to 500 V/cm in the presence of a constant H field. For the direct ME effect the conversion coefficient reached 7.2 V/(cm·Oe) at a bending resonance frequency of 412 Hz and 44 V/(cm·Oe) at a planar resonance frequency of 25.15 kHz. Increasing the excitation magnetic field at the bending resonance frequency, the nonlinear second harmonic generation with an efficiency of 0.24 V/(cm·Oe2) was observed. For the converse ME effect, the conversion coefficient at the planar resonance frequency was 0.09 G·cm/V. The dependences of the efficiencies for the direct and converse ME transformations on the constant field and the amplitudes of the excitation fields are well explained by theory. These results could be used to develop magnetic and electric field sensors, as well as autonomous energy harvesting sources.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.With increasing demand for miniaturization in computational and communication technologies, the ability to control spin wave amplitude and phase attract considerable attention, due to prospect of magnonics for valuable decrease of consumed energy with increased functionality of devices. In our paper we theoretically investigate spin wave propagation in the system of two antiferromagnetically coupled magnetic media separated with an ultrathin nonmagnetic interface layer. We propose to use this specially designed interface to perform control over the phase and the intensity of the transmitted spin waves. Our results show, that the interface with varying exchange coupling parameter can be treated as a metasurface, which can offer a change of the spin wave phase between transmitted and incident waves in the range from -π/2 to π/2. In particular we show, that a positive shift correlates with the lower and the negative phase shift with higher transmittance. Moreover, we show that the phase shift can be controlled by the external magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe rectification of terahertz radiation in a periodically almost-depleted graphene structures with dual grating gate is studied. Plasmonic electron-hole ratchet based rectified current grows with decreasing the Fermi energy of charge carriers in the gated parts of graphene. It is shown that the charge carriers accumulated at boundaries of depleted parts of graphene enhance the magnitude and inhomogeneity of oscillating electric field of the plasmon, which leads to significant growth in the rectification efficiency. Interaction of plasmon modes in different gated parts of graphene can increase the rectification efficiency due to excitation of the hybrid plasmon modes.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The low-frequency room-temperature interface magnetoelectric (ME) effect (MEE) was observed in the layered ferromagnetic (FM)/ferroelectric (FE) structures. Ceramic substrates on the base of lead zirconate titanate PbZr0.45Ti0.55O3 (PZT) were used as FE substrates. The FM Co layers of 1–3 μm in thickness were deposited by ion-beam sputtering/deposition (IBSD) technique onto the 100–400 μm PZT substrates. The substrates before metal deposition were mechanochemically polished and ion-beam planarized. X-ray diffraction, magnetic and ME experiments have revealed that MEE in Co/PZT/Co structures obtained is the result of elastic mechanical stresses in the interface because of the metal and substrate crystal lattices mismatches. Due to the specific influence of ion beams on FE substrate there exists adhesion of the FM metal layer to the FE substrate resulting to the elastic coupling of the layers and hence to the ME interaction on the interface. The structures obtained are perspective for application as energy-independent elements in magnetic field sensors and magnetic memory.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This article deals with the magnetic blood flow in a cylindrical tube with uniformly distributed magnetite dusty particles (MDP). The two-phase Brinkman type fluid model is considered. The fractional governing equations are model in the cylindrical coordinate system taking into consideration the magnetization of the fluid due to the applied magnetic field. The fractional governing equations are subjected to physical initial and boundary conditions. The joint Laplace and Hankel transform are employed to develop exact analytical solutions. The obtained solutions are computed numerically and plotted in different graphs. It is noticed that for a long time τ=0.4 the blood and MDP velocities increase with increasing values of the fractional parameter. In contrast, this effect reverses for a shorter time τ=0.02. The magnetic field significantly influences the blood and MPD velocities due to Lorentz forces. Both velocities are decreased with increasing values of the magnetic parameter.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and magnetocaloric effect of polycrystalline Pr0.55(Ca0.75Sr0.25)0.45MnO3 compound have been studied extensively. Temperature dependent magnetization study reveals that the ferromagnetic transition takes place at T ∼ 220 K and an antiferromagnetic transition appears at T ∼ 150 K. Associated with the ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic transition, large normal and inverse magnetocaloric effect of the polycrystalline Pr0.55(Ca0.75Sr0.25)0.45MnO3 compound are observed. Magnetocaloric effect of that compound is addressed by considering the competing nature of ferromagnetic metallic and charge ordered antiferromagnetic insulating domains at the low temperature region.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Domain wall injection by electric means is an energy exhausting process. This process is conventionally carried out by sending a current pulse through a stripline which generates an Oersted field to locally switch the magnetization in a magnetic wire. In this work, the magnetic properties of the device were modulated by electric control to lower the required current density for DW injection. The proposed DW injection device employs a Hall cross structure which simplifies the device fabrication process and allows a larger Oersted field to be generated at the domain wall injection region. Electrical pulses of 50 ns were sent through the Hall bar to inject domain walls. The formation of the resulting domain walls was detected electrically using the Hall resistance and optically by Kerr microscopy. The results show that the required current density for injection of domain walls is reduced by ∼20% with an applied electric field of +250 MV/m on the Hall cross structure.© 2019The effect of Co on the magnetic properties of ultra-rapidly annealed (heating rate > 104 K/s, annealing time < 1 s)nanocrystalline (Fe1−xCox)87B13 with x = 0–0.5 has been investigated. A saturation magnetic polarization of 2.02 T is observed for x = 0.2 while maintaining a coercivity of 9.3 A/m. This represents a 0.1 T increase over existing Co-free HiB-Nanoperm alloys with a B content of 13 at.% and is directly comparable to conventional crystalline Fe-3 wt%Si. Ultra-rapid annealing is shown to be a requirement for producing magnetically soft materials in this alloy system. The effect of Cu on ultra-rapidly annealed nanocrystalline (Fe0.8Co0.2)87−yB13Cuy where y = 0–1.5 is also investigated. It is found that Cu is effective at improving the magnetic softness of Co-containing HiB-Nanoperm, with y = 1 displaying a Hc of 7 A/m and a saturation magnetic polarization of 2.0 T.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Density functional theory calculations have been carried out for the hard magnetic compound YCo5 and its related phases. The calculations provide a straightforward but accurate method, as reflected in good agreement obtained with experimental results in terms of saturation magnetization and magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy (MAE). For the calculations we used the projector augmented wave method with GGA-PBE approximation and included spin-orbit coupling and (U,J)potentials, which are calculated to convergence. It is shown that these properties are influenced by the crystal structure and atomic distances, hence the crystal structures have been optimized and relaxed. The influence of changes in symmetry, distances and lattice parameters are studied, as well as the effect of substituting one Co-atom by Fe or Cu as examples for a magnetic and a non-magnetic impurity. The comparison between YCo5 and hcp-Co shows the importance of atomic environments and lattice symmetry for a large MAE. The calculations predict that Fe and Cu both reduce MAE, but Fe increases magnetization. Despite lacking 4f-orbitals as compared to SmCo5, YCo5 exhibits a large anisotropy, originating from the contribution of the Co-atoms. We have also shortly studied the influence of 4f-electrons for rare earths R=Pr and Sm on MAE for comparison. YCo4Fe, YCo4Cu, SmCo4Fe and SmCo4Cu are calculated to have MAE values of 2.1MJ/m3, 2.7MJ/m3, 19.2MJ/m3 and 8.2MJ/m3 at 0 K respectively.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We present a comparative study of the effect of divalent doping on structural, magnetic and magneto-transport properties of (La0.4Pr0.6)1-xCaxMnO3 (x = 3/8, 1/3)mixed phase manganites. Structural analysis, using X-ray and neutron diffraction studies, reveals a similar orthorhombic crystal structure with Pnma space group for both the samples; however, x = 3/8 composition shows higher octahedral distortion. The temperature dependent resistivity shows signature of a first order metal-insulator transition with conduction through percolative paths for both the samples. A broad thermal hysteresis observed in temperature dependent magnetization as well as magneto-transport data indicates coexistence of different magnetic phases like metallic ferromagnet, and insulating charge ordered antiferromagnetic in both the manganites. The variation of magnetization profiles with temperature for these stoichiometrically similar compositions is found to be remarkably different, with the dominance of charge ordered-antiferromagnetic phase in the x = 3/8 composition and ferromagnetism in the x = 1/3 composition. The field dependent magnetization isotherms show significantly higher fraction (≈2 times)of ferromagnetic phase in x = 1/3 composition as compared to x = 3/8 composition. The metal-insulator transition temperature is also found to be higher for composition with x = 1/3 (155 K)than that for x = 3/8 (112 K). In an applied magnetic field of 8 T, the resistivity changes drastically as the charge order melts and gives way to stable ferromagnetic metallic behaviour with higher metal-to-insulator transition temperature. The temperature dependent magnetoresistance shows a significant variation for the samples, with maximum value of around 3 × 105% and 7 × 104% for x = 3/8 and x = 1/3 compositions, respectively. These observations suggest that inspite of a very small variation in divalent doping, the magnetic phase fractions in these two manganites are significantly different.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the magnetization dynamics in CoFeB/(Ag, Pt)multilayer films grown onto amorphous substrate engineered to have in-plane magnetic anisotropy and distinct effective damping parameter. We go beyond quasi-static magnetic properties and characterize the dynamic magnetic response by employing ferromagnetic resonance and magnetoimpedance measurements. The link between magnetic features and dynamic magnetic behavior allows us to identify the role of the effective damping parameter and of the magnetic anisotropy on the magnetoimpedance effect in multilayer films. In addition, we consider a theoretical approach to interpret the experimental data and also predict the magnetization dynamics in wider ranges of the explored parameters. From our results, we provide insights to tune the damping parameter and magnetic anisotropy in engineered multilayer films grown onto amorphous substrates.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Delafossite compound, CuCrO2, popularly known as transparent conducting oxide, has previously been reported to demonstrate antiferromagnetic ordering of the triangular magnetic lattice below 24 K. We find that mere 5% Ti-substitution at Cr-site, leads to short range magnetic correlations, manifested as non-analytical behaviour of H/M and other anomalies in the low magnetic field dc magnetization, ac magnetic susceptibility, time dependent magnetization, and isothermal remanent magnetization. The ac susceptibility measured at different applied frequencies do not show any frequency dependence, ruling out the glassy magnetic phase. The short-range magnetic correlations are observed over a wide temperature range starting from 180 K and below, until the system orders antiferromagnetically at 22 K. These correlations which are most pronounced at low values of applied magnetic field, get readily suppressed when the fields exceed 0.5 T. Signatures associated with these short-range correlations seem to fit a Griffiths-like phase description. The results of heat capacity measurement with and without magnetic field, provides additional information about the dimensionality of the magnetic interactions. Rietveld refinement of the X-ray diffraction data reveals that the highly anisotropic crystal structure remains unaffected with the substitution. A static disorder driven magnetic inhomogeneity arising in the triangular magnetic sublattice of Cr ions decreases the dimensionality of magnetic interactions, and seems to be the possible origin of this interesting magnetic behaviour.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates the effects of Ag on the magnetic and mechanical properties of sintered NdFeB permanent magnets. The microstructure of the NdFeB permanent magnets was characterised using scanning electron microscopy (SEM)with energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDS)analysis. 0.1 wt% of Ag was added to the overall NdFeB composition to study the effects of Ag on the microstructural changes. The NdFeB and NdFeB + Ag magnets exhibit a two-phase structure with the main Nd2Fe14B phase and the Nd-rich grain boundary phase. It is found that Ag is enriched in the Nd-rich grain boundary phase and tends to alloy with the minor element, Cu. An enhanced coercivity (Hcj)is obtained in the NdFeB + Ag whilst the remanence (Br)and maximum magnetic energy product ((BH)max)decrease due to the addition of 0.1 wt% Ag. Impact resistance tests were carried out to examine the impact toughness of NdFeB and NdFeB + Ag magnets. It is shown that the magnets still exhibit a brittle fracture behaviour and no significant increase in the impact resistance of the NdFeB + Ag magnet is presented.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.γ-Fe2O3 nanoparticles were dispersed in a mesoporous silica (SBA15)matrix using the co-precipitation method. While structural properties were investigated by X-ray diffraction, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, micro-Raman and transmission electron microscopy, magnetic studies were performed with DC and AC magnetometry. The γ-Fe2O3 nanoparticles have the regular cubic spinel structure. A strong reduction in the saturation magnetization (∼30 emu/gFe, 300 K)was measured and can be mainly attributed to the large fraction (60%)of surface spin disorder. This phenomenon was studied using the modified Kneller's law and a modified Bloch spin wave model with a surface disorder term. Values of spin wave stiffness constant D of 391 meVÅ2 and exchange integral Jex equal to 1.12 meV were obtained, suggesting the presence of a block spinel ferrimagnetic state. The Vogel-Fulcher relation was applied to study the nanoparticles magnetic interactions. The values of zv = 5.3 (5), Tf = 184 K and τ0=10-12s suggest a superspinglass behavior. Thermoremanent experiments have also shown that magnetic relaxation occurs even below Tf (180 K)with an exponential decay with scale parameters in the range from 0.56 to 0.6, in agreement with the slowing down law. These facts indicate that the superspinglass effect is mainly caused by the strong surface spin disorder and frustrated collective state related to an interacting system with a broad particle size distribution.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.MnBi is a potential candidate for permanent magnets that can be used in high-temperature applications due to the large magnetocrystalline anisotropy and unique positive temperature coefficient of coercivity. In this work, MnBi magnets with a high content of low temperature phase (LTP)were prepared by arc melting followed by heat treatment. The high coercivity of 7.11 kOe at 300 K and 21.97 kOe at 500 K can be obtained for MnBi ingots, respectively. Two-step thermal annealing can promote the transformation from the Mn and Bi phases to form LTP MnBi, allowing a maximum remanence of 38.3 emu/g to be acquired. Open recoil loops for MnBi ingots have never been reported and are worthy of investigation. It was found that the non-uniform distribution of the Mn phase, Bi phase, LTP MnBi, and even the amorphous phase, as well as their large variation in size, could produce a non-negligible local demagnetization field with non-uniform distribution and resulted in open recoil loops. Nearly closed recoil loops can be achieved by improving the non-uniform distribution of the microstructure. The dependence of the magnetic properties and the recoil loops on the microstructure was investigated in detail.© 2019The magnetic heterostructures, consisting of Fe nanowire arrays (FNWs)and Fe25Ni75 film, are prepared by combining electrochemical deposition and RF magnetron sputtering. The ferromagnetic resonance (FMR)property in the magnetic heterostructures is investigated by using frequency sweep mode and field sweep mode. The results of hysteresis loops and permeability spectra indicate that the FNWs could destroy the stripe domain structure in Fe25Ni75 film. The resonance absorption near the FMR field is excited in the heterostructures, which can be attributed to the spin non-uniform precession namely spin waves resonance excitation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A biocompatible nanodrug delivery formulation based on poly (D, L-lactide-co-glycolic)acid (PLGA), polyethylene glycol (PEG)and superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles has been developed and evaluated for the enhanced delivery of docetaxel (DTX)to breast cancer cells. The hydrothermally synthesized iron oxide nanoparticles (IONP)were encapsulated along with the DTX drug in a PLGA-PEG coating using a modified emulsion evaporation method. The structural, morphological and chemical characterization of the iron oxide nanoparticles was done by XRD, FE-SEM, TEM, DLS, and FTIR. The X-ray diffraction analysis showed good crystallinity of the nanoparticles. The magnetization versus field (M-H)curve revealed the superparamagnetic behavior of the synthesized IONPs at room temperature with a saturation magnetization of 71.9 emu·g−1. The DTX loaded iron oxide nanoparticles (DIONP)showed spherical shape and uniform size distribution in the range of 160–220 nm. DIONP showed higher internalization efficiency and moderate cytotoxicity in MCF-7 cells as found from the confocal microscopy and MTT assay. Further, in vivo plasma pharmacokinetic (PK)study showed improved values of important PK parameters such as area under curve, mean residence time, the volume of distribution, etc. for DIONP as compared to pure DTX. DIONP showed nearly 12% drug loading capacity with a sustained drug release over the experimental time-period. The higher saturation magnetization, controllable size, satisfactory drug loading, sustained release, predominant cancer cell uptake, effective cytotoxicity along with improved PK profile of DIONP could potentially make it an outstanding drug delivery strategy for breast cancer therapy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.An original feature of this work is the proposal of two equations to fit the volume fraction of ferromagnetic (α + α′)phases that can be applied in the measurement of magnetic saturation of comminuted duplex and superduplex stainless steels (for example, powders or filed chips). Duplex stainless steels contain similar volume fractions of austenite (γ)and ferrite (α)in their microstructure. Two steels exemplify this class, namely the most widely used duplex UNS S31803 and superduplex UNS S32520 stainless steels. The phenomena of work hardening, formation, and reversion of strain-induced martensite (α′)in austenite were compared in both stainless steels. Samples were work-hardened and annealed under identical conditions, and their behavior was evaluated mainly through X-ray diffraction and magnetic measurements. Notably, the volume fraction of strain-induced α′ in duplex stainless steel was as high as 32%, which indicated that this steel had a greater tendency to form α′ than superduplex stainless steel, for which the corresponding value equaled 15%. Annealing at 650 °C for 2 h promoted the reversion of strain-induced α′ into γ, decreasing the volume fraction of the former phase from 32 to 2% (duplex)and from 15 to 6% (superduplex).© 2019The effects of Nb buffer layers on the magnetic properties of Nb/CoFeB/MgO/Ta films have been studied. The films exhibited perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA)when the Nb buffer layer thickness approached or exceeded 3 nm. PMA was retained at annealing temperatures up to 350 °C for the films containing 5-nm Nb buffer layer. The Ta, CoFeB, MgO, and Nb layers were easily distinguished by energy-dispersive X-ray spectroscopy. High-resolution transmission electron microscopy showed that the Nb, MgO, CoFeB, and Ta layers were crystalline. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy indicated that the oxygen reduced from MgO combined with Fe and Co to form FeOx and CoOx after annealing, strengthening the PMA. The Nb(5)/CoFeB(1)/MgO(2)/Ta(3)film exhibited a smooth CoFeB/MgO interface after annealing, as confirmed by X-ray reflectivity. The crystallized MgO and CoFeB, formation of Fe and Co oxides, and smooth CoFeB/MgO interface all contributed to the strong PMA.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A partially filled, ferrite-loaded rectangular waveguide can support a unidirectional propagating mode. We theoretically study the tunneling of this mode through finite conducting and non-conducting barriers. For a half-filled waveguide and a conducting barrier, the problem is treated analytically. Other filling factors and/or barrier types are investigated by means of a numerical technique. It is found that despite the absence of back-scattering, the passage of the unidirectional wave through a barrier is accompanied by significant power loss, even for short barriers. This phenomenon is caused by the sharp rise in field amplitude close to the barrier, and cannot be eliminated by reducing the material loss as this will further enhance the nearly singular behavior of the field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Anomalous Hall effect is commonly used as a simple technique to study the magnetization reversal of perpendicularly magnetized thin films. Yet, in most applications, the easy-magnetization direction is in the film-plane. We here propose photo-induced anomalous Hall effect as a new magneto-metric technique to reconstruct the in-plane magnetization loop of metallic thin films. Nickel thin films were deposited on intrinsic silicon to form a Schottky contact. Photo-induced Hall voltage was found hysteretic with the in-plane, magnetic field. The measured voltage-loop was found to mimic the magnetization loop as measured by a magnetometer.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI)of a heavy metal (HM)/ferromagnetic (FM)metal heterostructure is vital to the current-induced fast domain wall motion. The tilting of the moving Dzyaloshinskii domian wall (DW)has been paid much attention. In this work, using the micromagnetic simulation, we find the DW tilting is originated from different initial DW velocity at two edges because of the initial antisymmetric magnetic structure at two edges. In the very early stage of DW motion, the DMI energy traps the DW motion at one edge. For a track whose width is smaller than a critical value, the edge effect plays a major role for DW tilting. This modifies the track width dependence of tilting angle and relaxation time derived from the collective coordinate method without considering edge effect. When the track is wide enough, a temporary vortex-like moment structure inside DW and variation of DW chirality at the edge appear in the process of generating DW tilting for reducing DMI and demagnetization energy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic noncollinear spin valve effect has been observed in a magnetic multilayer structure of IrMn/NiFe/Cu/Y3Fe5O12 (YIG). In this structure, the detected amplitude of spin current emitted by spin pumping depends on the NiFe magnetic states (saturation or unsaturation). This yields a spin valve-like behavior with reliable amplitude changes up to 110% and the behavior may originate from the difference of spin absorption when the NiFe layer is magnetically saturated or not. Our results provide a ferromagnetic noncollinear spin valve, paving the road towards ultralow-dissipation spintronic devices based on pure spin current.© 2019Comprehensive investigation of the phase state and the magnetoresistive properties of Ag-added Ni80Fe20 film systems with a total thickness of 55 nm in a wide range of component concentration under the heat treatment within the temperature range 300–900 K was presented. Thin films based on permalloy Ni80Fe20 with addition of Ag atoms were prepared by the electron-beam co-evaporation method at room temperature. Their composition and phase state were studied using X-ray spectrometry and electron diffraction methods. The film phased state remained unchanged when adding Ag within the entire range of investigated compositions. The process of the high-temperature treatment also did not affect their structure. Different types of magnetoresistive effect were observed. The anisotropic magnetoresistive effect appeared in systems with low concentration of Ag atoms. With increasing concentration of the non-magnetic atoms the shape of magnetoresistive field dependences transformed to the linear-like drop curves without hysteresis that led to the appearance of the isotropic magnetoresistive effect in the film plane. The maximum isotropic magnetoresistance was observed at the Ag concentration of about 60 at.%. The magnitude of this maximum value increased after annealing at 500 K and significantly reduced after high-temperature annealing at 900 K.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Polyvinyl alcohol (PVA)-blended spinel phase NiNdxFe2- xO4 nanoferrites were successfully prepared with a different composition (x = 0.01, 0.03, 0.05, 0.07, and 0.09). The spinel cubic structure was revealed from X-ray diffraction pattern. These nanoferrites showed insulating behavior with an enhanced energy bandgap when compared with PVA-unblended nanoferrites. The obtained dielectric loss and real and complex dielectric constants were in the microwave region (frequency ∼2.9–5.95 GHz). Pseudocapacitance and resistive behavior were explored from impedance analysis. The magnetization hysteresis plot of nanoferrites showed a soft ferromagnetic nature. It was found that reduction in saturation magnetization of NiNdxFe2- xO4 nanoferrites obtained by PVA doping has the strong microwave absorption capacity.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the design and development of a dual-functional magnetic nanoparticle platform for potential treatment of H. pylori infection. We show that an ultralow concentration of Mn0.3Fe2.7O4@SiO2 nanoparticles subjected to a moderate AC magnetic field, without bulk heating effect, can deposit heat locally and effectively inhibit H. pylori growth and virulence in vitro. When coupled with antibiotic amoxicillin, the dual-functional amoxicillin-Mn0.3Fe2.7O4@SiO2 further decreases the bacteria survival rate by a factor of 7 and 5, respectively, compared to amoxicillin treatment and nanoparticle heating alone. The synergistic effect can be partially attributed to the heating induced damage to the cell membrane and protective biofilm, which may increase the permeability of antibiotics to bacteria. Our method provides a viable approach to treat H. pylori infection, with the potential of reducing side effects and enhancing the efficacy for combating drug resistant strains.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Titanium oxide (TiO2)nanotube array is prepared by an anodization method, and the TiO2 nanotube array and a lithium foil are used as working and counter electrodes, respectively, to assemble a lithium-ion battery. After discharge to 0.01 V, the TiO2 nanotube array is reducible. Metallic Co nanoparticles are in-situ deposited into the discharged TiO2 nanotube array in saturated cobalt acetate in N-N dimethylformamide solution for the first time. The sample exhibits enhanced magnetic properties after calcination at 500 °C in a reducing agent. The morphology, structure and magnetic properties of the samples are characterized and analyzed in detail. This work provides a new method for the synthesis of one-dimensional functional materials by using TiO2 nanotube array template.© 2019Transport properties of bulk samples and melt-spun ribbons of Mn2CoSn alloy were investigated. It was found that Mn2CoSn is a high-resistance compound with the value of electrical resistivity ρ ∼ 300 μOhm·cm at room temperature and demonstrates semiconducting behavior of ρ as a function of temperature. A change in the dominating conductivity type from hole-like to electron-like takes place upon heating above ≈137 K. Abnormal Hall coefficient RS is large and depends on electrical resistivity as RS ∼ ρ2.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Coscinodiscus diatomite was used as a template to fabricate uniform flaky magnetic particles by means of electroless nickel deposition. The morphology, coating composition, and magnetic properties of the prepared nickel-coated Coscinodiscus diatomite (magnetic microdisks) were characterized in detail using scanning electron microscopy (SEM), energy dispersive spectrometry (EDS), X-ray diffraction (XRD), and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The results indicated the successful deposition of a uniform and compact nickel coating on the template, with flaky magnetic particles of good surface quality. A rotating magnetic field generated by a Helmholtz coil system was used to align the magnetic microdisks dispersed in PDMS. The results showed that the magnetic microdisks could be driven to align parallelly with the plane of the rotating magnetic field, and a highly ordered alignment was achieved due to the time-varying magnetic torque.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic metamaterials operating at low megahertz frequencies provide various important commercial and research applications. In this work, we investigate the control of wave propagation in two-dimensional (2-D) tunable magnetic metamaterials for wireless power transfer (WPT). The propagation control is achieved by using reconfigurable defect cavities formed in the metamaterial, which allows for the dynamic creation of various waveguide configurations with switching control. The physical mechanism for creating the cavity is described using Fano interference, in which the resonant frequency of the cavity falls into the bandgap of the metasurface. And the routing and transmission control of the proposed waveguide is easily achieved by resonant switching. The proposed approach allows highly localized, strong field confinement in the deep subwavelength scale of 2.6λ × 10−3. The transmission losses and bandwidths of various dynamically tunable metamaterial waveguides are experimentally characterized. This result can find useful applications for integrated surface wave devices and planar WPT.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report the magnetic dilution effect on the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of Gd1-xYx 2NiSi3 (x = 0.25, 0.5, 0.75) compounds by partial substitution of Y ions in Gd2NiSi3. The X-ray diffraction studies indicate all theses compounds form in AlB2 type hexagonal crystal structure. The dc magnetic measurements reveal the compounds undergo antiferromagnetic like phase transition below 11.5, 7.2, and 3.1 K for x = 0.25, 0.5 and 0.75 compositions, respectively. The magnetic ground state of the compounds becoming increasingly fragile with the increase in Y concentration, and results in magnetic field induced ferromagnetic transition. Such change in magnetic spin configuration is responsible for moderately large magnetic entropy change (ΔSM ∼19.3 J/kg-K, 14.8 J/kg-K and 9.8 J/kg-K for x = 0.25, 0.5, and 0.75, respectively, for ΔH = 7 T) in the cryogenic temperature region. The relative cooling power (RCP) has also been estimated for all the compounds that appears to be modest (∼503 J/kg for 7 T magnetic field change) for x = 0.25 analogue and reduces further with magnetic dilution effect caused by Y substitution.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline samples with formula Bi1−xBaxFeO3 (x = 0.0–0.25) were fabricate by solid state reaction technique. Synchrotron XRD diffraction confirmed that the rhombohedral structure is transformed to pseudo cubic. The Mössbauer spectra inferred the existence of only Fe3+ ions, these results also indicated the destruction of spiral spin structure with increasing Ba doping level. The magnetic measurements showed that the coercive field is increased from 22.4 to 2600.2 Oe and the remnant magnetization is increased from 0.67 μemu/g to 0.49 emu/g on increasing Ba concentration. This increase in ferromagnetism can be attributed to the destruction of spiral spin structure, which is indicated from the Synchrotron XRD and Mössbauer results.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Soft magnetic composite material consisting of iron powder insulated by Ni-Zn ferrite nanofibres was prepared, where the nanofibres were bonded by the resin in various amounts in order to find the ratio for optimal insulation coating. The structure of material was documented and the magnetic and electrical properties were analysed. The optimal ratio of ferrite nanofibres to resin was found to be ½:½, as this sample exhibited the highest total and differential permeability, the lowest hysteresis and total energy losses and the highest number of active magnetic objects, found from the excess loss analysis, which revealed the highest proportion of domain wall displacements within the magnetization process. The magnetic properties values were reached better than for previous iron-resin composites. The relatively high real part of complex permeability was obtained together with its relatively high frequency stability. The optimal coating from ferrite nanofibres probably improved magnetic interaction between ferromagnetic particles by means of lowering inner demagnetizing fields.© 2019High in-plane charge carrier mobility and long spin diffusion length makes graphene a unique material for spin-based devices. However, in a vertical graphene junction, the 2pz orbitals of carbon atoms in graphene can be tuned via suitable magnetic substrates; this would affect the spin injection into graphene. Here, a vertical spin switch has been designed by embedding a single layer of graphene as a tunnel layer between the Ni (1 1 1) substrate. Periodic density functional approach in conjunction with Julliere's model is used to calculate the tunnel magnetoresistance (TMR). Further, single-layered hexagonal Boron Nitride (h-BN) is sandwiched between the graphene and Ni (1 1 1) substrate to understand the role of hybridization at the interface on TMR. Our calculation shows that in contrast to the graphene junction, a much higher TMR value is obtainable in the case of the graphene/h-BN multi-tunnel junction (MTJ). The TMR in graphene junction is found to decrease with the increase of an externally applied electric field, and drops to zero for a field greater than equal to 0.16 V/Å. Similar phenomenon was observed in the case of h-BN/graphene MTJ, where TMR value remains unchanged for electric field up to 0.1 V/Å beyond which it drops to zero. The change in hybridization and charge-carrier-population at the interface modifies the magnetic exchange interaction and magnetic anisotropy resulting in a spin flip at interface, leads to rapid drop in TMR after a threshold electric field. The high and tunable TMR value suggests h-BN assisted high performance graphene based vertical spin switch.© 2019We find that the long range magnetic ordering is absent and electrical conduction suppressed in Y1.7Bi0.3Ir2O7/YSZ(1 0 0) thin film prepared by pulsed laser deposition. The sharp down-turn of inverse magnetic susceptibility χ-1(T) from the conventional Curie-Weiss behaviour below T∗∼168K suggests an inhomogeneous ferromagnetic Griffiths like phase. The transport and magnetic properties are explained on the basis of the coexistence of mixed oxidation states of Ir, (i.e. Ir4+ and Ir3+) leading to non-magnetic defects and reduction in t2g density of states at the Fermi level.© 2019Cationic distribution and magnetic properties of partially rare-earth (R) doped NiFe2O4 (NFO) compounds, i.e. NiFe2- xRxO4 (x = 0 and 0.075; R = Gd, Dy and Ho) were investigated, and the results are discussed and presented in this paper. All the compounds were found to stabilize in the cubic inverse spinel structure with the space group Fd3-m. The analysis of the results based on X-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS) and X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD) measurements are primarily focused on the valence state information of constituting rare-earth or transition-metal ions, cationic distribution, and the coupling between their magnetic moments. The XAS data revealed that nickel is in Ni2+ valence state while iron is mainly in the Fe3+ valence state though some perceptible traces of Fe2+ were observed. The rare-earth ions are in trivalent states. The partial doping causes differences in the cationic distribution of Ni2+ and Fe3+ ions which obviously results in differences in the net Fe or Ni magnetic moments. Furthermore, 57Fe Mössbauer spectra revealed altered hyperfine field parameters upon the Gd3+, Dy3+ and Ho3+ substitution and all the compounds were found to exhibit collinear ferrimagnetic structures. The results are relevant for the investigation of orientation of individual magnetic moments and to obtain site-specific information related to all the cations involved in the rare-earth doped nickel ferrite structures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Effects of disorder, frustration and low dimensional character occur in mixed magnetic Co1−xNixCl2·H2O, examined by dc magnetization and susceptibility measurements across the composition range. The pure components are quasi-one-dimensional antiferromagnets ordering at 15.0 K (Co) and 5.65 K (Ni), with susceptibility maxima at 16.2 and 8.4 K respectively; a spin glass transition also appears in the cobalt system near 8 K. In each compound weaker antiferromagnetic interchain exchange interactions supplement dominant ferromagnetic exchange along MCl2MCl2M… chemical and structural chains. High temperature magnetic susceptibilities are analyzed to yield Curie and Weiss constants in χM = C/(T − θ). Regular but not mean-field composition dependences appear for C and θ. The former is not linear and the latter displays a minimum near x = 0.30. Notable is a susceptibility maxima varying in location only weakly from x = 0.10 to x = 0.70, decreasing markedly only for higher x. Magnetization isotherms evolve regularly as x varies, with systematic composition dependences of a metamagnetic transition field and hysteresis through x = 0.70. A qualitative change in the isotherms occurs for x = 0.90, but substantial curvature still appears with smaller but definite hysteresis. A thermoremanent magnetization is seen in all mixtures, and is largest for the composition extremes. Thus, nonequilibrium magnetic behavior characteristic of the cobalt component, in contrast to the more conventional nickel component, occurs even when the latter is present in strong majority.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Quasicrystals have been the subject of intense research in the discipline of condensed matter physics due to their non-trivial characteristic features. In the present work we put forward a new prescription to realize both charge and spin current rectifications considering a one-dimensional quasicrystal whose site energies and/or nearest-neighbor hopping (NNH) integrals are modulated in the form of well known Aubry-André or Harper (AAH) model, a classic example of an aperiodic system. Each site of the chain contains a finite magnetic moment which is responsible for spin separation, and, in presence of finite bias an electric field is generated along the chain which essentially makes the asymmetric band structures under forward and reverse biased conditions, yielding finite rectification. Rectification is observed in two forms: (i) positive and (ii) negative, depending on the sign of currents in two bias polarities. These two forms can only be observed in the case of spin current rectification, while charge current shows conventional rectification operation. Moreover, we discuss how rectification ratio and especially its direction can be controlled by AAH phase which is always beneficial for efficient designing of a device. Finally, we critically examine the role of dephasing on rectification operations. Our study gives a new platform to analyze current rectification at nano-scale level, and can be verified in different quasi-crystals along with quantum Hall systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Experimental lattice constant has been used for theoretical predictions on structural, elastic, mechanical, electronic magnetic thermoelectric and thermodynamic properties of Sr2MnTaO6 double perovskite oxide within well-known ab-initio density functional theory. Optimized lattice constant has been employed for obtaining spin involved electronic structure results within generalized gradient approximation (GGA), Hubbard approximation (GGA + U) and modified Becke Johnson approximation (mBJ). Electronic results show half-metallic nature with majority spin channels as metallic and minority spin channels as semi-conducting. Magnetic moment calculated within GGA + U was found equal to 4 µb. Calculated large value of Bulks modulus (B) and Young modulus (Y) characterize it as hard and stiffer material. Pugh ratio (B/G) and Cauchy pressure (C12–C44) portray its brittle nature. Using Boltztrap code we have calculated the variation of electrical conductivity (σ/τ), Seebeck coefficient (S), electronic thermal conductivity (k/τ) and Power factor (PF) in both spin channels. (σ/τ) is found to have decreasing nature in spin up states and increasing nature in spin down states, hence confirms the metallic nature in spin up states and semi-conducting in spin down states. Seebeck coefficients (S) reveal the presence of positive charge carriers in spin up states and negative in spin down states. The computed value of total power factor was found to be 1.99 × 1012 WK−2 m−1 s−1 at 1000 K. Furthermore, we have computed pressure and temperature dependent thermodynamic parameters for this compound in the temperature range of 0 K to 1000 K and pressure range of 0 GPa to 18 GPa with a step size of 3 GPa.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.To understand the effect of particle size on magnetorheological effect two magnetorheological (MR) fluids, composed of nano-hollow spheres (NHSs), of diameters 250 nm (MRF250) and 700 nm (MRF700), are studied. The results are compared with their solid counterpart with Fe3O4 nanoparticles (NPs) based MR fluid of 100 nm diameter (MRF100). To understand the MR mechanism the flow curves (shear stress vs shear rate) are fitted with different established models and our samples are found to follow the Bingham Plastic model. The yielding behavior of the MR fluids is found to be morphology dependent. The MR fluid with larger particles show maximum yield stress ∼830 Pa at an applied field 0.4 T, due to the combined effect of larger surface area and higher magnetism. Hollow nano spheres show better stability than that of NPs due to compatible density with the carrier fluid.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.• Electronic conductance of an magnetic chain in the presence of thermal magnonic excitations. • A model based on Green's function method, tight-binding approach and equilibrium ensemble. • Performing numerical calculation for including gap and gapless configurations. © 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we study the effect of thermal magnonic excitations on the electronic conductance of an anti-ferromagnetic nanowire which is coupled to two electrodes in the framework of equilibrium statistical mechanics. The electron-magnon scattering is assumed to be present only in the center part, not in the electrodes. For each magnonic mode of the chain, we calculate a Green's function and the corresponding mode-dependent transmission coefficient via the linear response theory. Then, the total electronic transmission through the system is obtained by the summation of the mode-dependent ones. We examine the influence of magnonic waves on three different configurations for the center wire including uniform, alternative on-site (AB) and polyacetylene like (PA-like) chain. Two types of nonmagnetic and ferromagnetic structures are chosen for the left and right leads. The results show that the effect of magnonic excitations on the electronic conductance of the considered systems is important at high temperatures. Especially, the electron tunneling conductance is improved in the presence of magnonic excitations in the PA-like and AB nanowires in contrast to the uniform one. While for all configurations, the conductance decreases in the resonance region by increasing the magnonic effects. Finally, we discuss the spin polarization and we show that the effect of thermal magnonic excitations is more observable in AB with respect to PA-like and in PA-like with respect to the uniform configuration of the center wire.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The retarded vector potential of a point magnetic dipole possessing an arbitrary time dependence and undergoing an accelerated relativistic motion is derived. A novel expression for the angular distribution of the radiated power of an arbitrarily moving magnetic dipole is obtained. In particular, the case of an uniformly accelerated particle with a constant magnetic moment is considered. The resulting equations are verified by showing that the fields reduce to less general forms found in the literature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetoelectronic structures, and the charge and spin conductance spectra of topological Dirac semimetal (TDS) nanowires are calculated by adopting the tight-binding Hamiltonian model in combination with the Green's-function-based Landauer-Büttiker formula. Anisotropic electronic structures and magneto-transport properties are found in TDS nanowires with different confinement and magnetic field directions. With respect to in-plane-confinement TDS nanowires, trivial surface/corner states are observed and they are split into two spin-polarized states with oppositive signs when a weak out-of-plane magnetic field is applied. Moreover, the spin-polarized surface states will be transformed into bulk and corner states as the magnetic field strength is increased. Therefore, quantized spin conductance energy windows and fully-spin-polarized conductance can be achieved in the normal/out-of-plane-magnetic-field-modulated/normal TDS system in the case of the weak and strong fields, respectively. However, chiral surface states are generated when an in-plane magnetic field is applied, resulting in the perfect charge conductance steps of the normal/in-plane-magnetic-field-modulated/normal TDS system. With respect to the TDS nanowire with both the in-plane and out-of-plane confinements, nontrivial spin-momentum-locked helical surface states are observed. However, the helical character of the surface states will be destroyed and nontrivial-trivial topological phase transition happens as a high in-plane magnetic field is applied. In addition, the energy position of the surface subband inside the bulk energy gap is shifted so that the surface state transport can be switched on or off by tuning the magnetic field strength. Interestingly, the surface subband situated inside the bulk energy gap is split into two subbands with opposite spin signs as an out-of-plane magnetic field is added. Therefore, the topological phase transition between the quantum spin Hall and spin-polarized quantum Hall phases in the TDS nanowire, and the spin-polarized transport in the normal/out-of-plane-magnetic-field-modulated/normal TDS system, can be controlled by varying the magnetic field strength. These effects may benefit both the fundamental understanding of the magneto-electronic characters of the TDS nanostructures and the design of low-dissipation (spin) electronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic materials with high specific loss power (SLP) are desirable for magnetic hyperthermia to minimise the amount of material required to obtain the therapeutic temperature (42–46 °C) to destroy the cancer cells. The exchange coupled core-shell structure and the nanoclusters of magnetic nanoparticles having high SLP values are the most suitable candidates for this purpose. Herein, a simple method has been demonstrated for the synthesis of exchange coupled magnetic nanoflowers consisting of γ-Fe2O3 magnetic grains grown over the surface of MnFe2O4 core. The aqueous ferrofluid of nanoflowers displayed higher SLP values than single phase MnFe2O4 core. The intrinsic loss parameter for the nanoflowers was 3.30 nH m2 Kg−1 at an applied magnetic field of amplitude 250 Oe and frequency 113 kHz, which was significantly higher than the commercially available ferrofluids. The cytotoxicity of the nanoflowers were studied with HeLa cells. The magnetic hyperthermia treatment for 30 min with 0.75 mg/mL ferrofluid of the nanoflowers demonstrated a temperature rise to 46 °C and decreased the cell viability to 17% for HeLa cells. These nanoflowers (size around 40–60 nm) showed better magnetic properties viz. higher saturation magnetisation, initial susceptibility and lower coercivity, making them a suitable candidate for biomedical applications.© 2019Devices based on soft ferromagnetic materials are promising for high-frequency flexible electronics. Especially, wide-range tunable ferromagnetic resonance response of ferromagnetic microwires and ribbons can be functionalized in the form of magneto-impedance sensors in stretchable, bendable and twistable environments. A vector network analyzer calibrated by standard techniques is required to characterize the high-frequency properties of such devices. However, most of the calibration techniques necessitate calculations, computer simulations, and/or fabricating calibration kits in the shape of various test fixtures. Here, we employ a fixture calibration method for high-frequency (up to 4 GHz) impedance measurements of CoFeSiB microwires and melt-spun ribbons taking zero applied magnetic field as the reference. This method is based on a virtual de-embedding procedure, in which a reference signal is subtracted from all the subsequent measurements, which reduces the time for the total calibration procedure down to few minutes. Applications of the method are not limited to the cases where applied magnetic field varies. Any external parameter (strain, temperature, pressure etc.) that can change the impedance is allowed by this method.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nanoporous Ni doped ZnO is prepared in the configuration NiO(x)·ZnO(1−x) (x = 0, 0.02, 0.04, 0.06, 0.08 and 0.10) using sol-gel combustion technique. The crystal structure, morphology, elemental composition, magnetic and dielectric properties of NiO(x)·ZnO(1−x) are determined from XRD, FE-SEM with EDX, VSM and LCRQ meter, respectively. XRD investigation confirms the presence of wurtzite hexagonal structure of ZnO in all the prepared samples. At low doping level of Ni, the crystal structure remains identical to ZnO meanwhile some structural imperfection is observed on increasing the doping concentration. FESEM images indicate the occurrence of nanopores distributed uniformly in the NiO(x)·ZnO(1−x). Magnetic characteristics of the samples found enhanced with increasing dopant concentration till x = 0.06. The possible explanation for the origin of the dielectric and magnetic behaviours of NiO(x)·ZnO(1−x) are discussed. Based on the obtained results, NiO(0.06)·ZnO(0.94) is a suitable candidate for Diluted Magnetic Semiconductors for spintronic applications.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe steady increase in performance and speed of modern integrated circuits is continuously supported by constant miniaturization of complementary metal-oxide semiconductor (CMOS) devices. However, a rapid growth of the dynamic and stand-by power due to transistor leakages becomes a pressing issue. A promising way to slow down this trend is to introduce non-volatility in circuits. The development of an electrically addressable non-volatile memory combining high speed and high endurance is essential to achieve these goals. To further reduce the energy consumption, it is essential to replace SRAM in modern hierarchical multi-level processor memory structures with a non-volatile memory technology. The spin-orbit torque magnetic random access memory (SOT-MRAM) combines non-volatility, high speed, and high endurance and is thus suitable for applications in caches. However, its development is still hindered by relatively high switching currents and the need of an external magnetic field for deterministic switching of perpendicularly magnetized layers. The switching by means of two orthogonal current pulses allows achieving deterministic sub-500 ps and magnetic field-free switching in perpendicularly magnetized rectangular structures. Complementing the two-pulse switching scheme with weak perpendicular interface-induced magnetic anisotropy reduces the switching current significantly for achieving sub-500 ps switching in in-plane structures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Fe/Fe3O4 core-shell structure soft magnetic composites were synthesized by in-situ oxidation method, the shell thickness control method and its effect on magnetic properties was investigated. The formation of Fe3O4 shell will decrease eddy-current loss for its high resistivity but reduce the permeability and saturation magnetization for its ferrimagnetic characteristics, appropriate shell thickness is the key factor to obtain a good performance of composites. The magnetic loss decreased dramatically due to the existence of a dense insulation layer and increased slightly owing to the presence of cracks in the insulation layer with the shell thickness increase further. The optimum magnetic properties of the composites were obtained for the composites with about 0.17 μm shell thickness, which exhibits a high permeability (μ) of 55, a high magnetization of 232.1 emu/g at 1 T and a low magnetic loss (W) of 30.56 w/kg at 20 mT and 100 kHz.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We propose a new optical biosensor based on photonic spin Hall effect (PSHE) for detection of DNA hybridization. This device consists of BK7 prism, Ag, SiO2, Au and graphene-MoS2 heterostructure which produces waveguide coupled surface plasmon resonance (WCSPR) effect to enormously enhance PSHE. The adsorption of graphene-MoS2 heterostructure to biomolecules changes the refractive index of the sensing medium, thereby affecting spin-dependent splitting in PSHE. The 2 × 2 transfer matrix method is applied to calculate the generalized Fresnel reflection and we deduce the reflected light shifts in PSHE. We study the correlation between spin-dependent displacements and the refractive index variations of sensed solution to obtain the highest sensitivity in the proposed sensor. However, the PSHE exists in the proposed biosensor is extremely weak, so a signal enhancement technology called weak measurement is adopted to amplify the PSHE shift. Thus, the proposed biosensor can successfully detect the hybridization of probe DNA with target DNA. These results may provide practical applications for PSHE in biological monitoring, medical diagnosis, and food safety.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetism at the nanoscale is intriguing, but that on the magnetic properties of a dilute antiferromagnetic (AFM) system is rarely studied. Presence of uncompensated spins at the lattice as well as on the nanoparticle surfaces could lead to interesting magnetic behaviour. We present the combined effect of reduction in particle size and dilution of exchange interactions on the magnetic properties of an AFM perovskite oxide. A dilute AFM compound, La2Fe0.875Cr0.125GaO6 nanoparticles (average particle size ∼ 44.5 (7) nm), has been synthesized where non-magnetic Ga-ions are introduced to interrupt the superexchange pathways. The compound crystallizes in orthorhombic structure with Pbnm space group, where Fe, Cr and Ga ions are distributed randomly in the B-site. DC magnetic studies show superparamagnetic behaviour at room temperature, spin-flop transition and a prominent hysteresis loop with sufficiently high coercivity around 6.69 kOe at ∼138 K. The analysis of thermoremanent and isothermoremanent magnetization curves reveal SPM behaviour at 300 K and 2-dimensional dilute antiferromagnetic in field like nature at 5 K. AC magnetic susceptibility analysis confirms the presence of non-interacting clusters having SPM behaviour with blocking temperature ∼280 K. Furthermore, temperature variation of coercivity shows a Gaussian nature, mainly associated with competing Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interactions between disordered B-site ions along with strong uncompensated surface spin effects.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Present investigation deals with the exploration of magnetic susceptibility (χ) of doped GaAs quantum dot (QD) in a noisy ambience and following the variations of a few important physical quantities. The focus being to understand the interplay between noise and those physical quantities and how the interplay happens to modulate χ. Noise invoked here is of Gaussian white character and the impurity potential is also represented by a Gaussian function. The physical parameters involve magnetic field, confinement potential, dopant location, dopant potential, noise strength, aluminium concentration (in view of AlxGa1-xAs alloy QD), spatially-varying effective mass, spatially-varying dielectric screening function, anisotropy, hydrostatic pressure (HP) and temperature. The study also reveals the importance of the mode through which noise may enter the system. Whereas the additive mode of application of noise fails to affect χ noticeably from a noise-free state; the multiplicative mode of applying noise does the same quite conspicuously. Moreover, in general, whereas the system exhibits diamagnetism in absence of noise and under the supervision of additive noise; it is multiplicative noise which often induces paramagnetism in the system.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigate throughout this paper the contributions of the damping effects and inhomogeneous exchange on the propagation of magnetic waves in ferrites. Indeed, we focus our attention on a nonlinear evolution system derived by Kuetche and coworkers (2015 J. Magn. Magn. Mater. 374 1), that takes into account the contributions that we aim at studying. We first proceed by some analytical analysis of the contribution of damping effects on the solutions to the system of our interest and after, the contribution of the inhomogeneous exchange, to unearth analytical expression of a solution that well approximates the above mentioned global system. It appears as a result that contribution of damping reduces the amplitude of waves during its motion. We unearth two types of inhomogeneities that effects act on the waves in different manner by increasing or decreasing the width of the soliton in ferrites. For ferrites made of poly-crystals in which involves the two types of inhomogeneities appearing periodically, wave moving therein will breath as it moves and there must be a case in which the two types of inhomogeneities can be combined in such a way to reduce their effects on the dynamics of the wave. We confirm the validity of the analytical analysis carried out by proceeding to some numerical simulations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the unsteady magnetohydrodynamic forced convection of Fe3O4-water ferrofluids inside the backward facing step benchmark is investigated. A rotating cylinder with fixed dimensions is located inside the flow domain and one phase model is used to simulate the ferrofluid. The dimensionless governing equations are discretized using the Galerkin finite element method in space and the Crank-Nicolson scheme in time. The discrete system of equations in each time level is treated with the help of Newton's method and the resulting linearized problems are computed using multigrid approach. Wide ranges of the governing parameters are considered such as the Hartmann number 0⩽Ha⩽100, the magnetic field inclination angle 0°⩽γ⩽90°, the angular velocity -75⩽Ω⩽75, the Reynolds number 10⩽Re⩽200 and the nanoparticle volume fraction 0⩽ϕ⩽0.15. It is observed that the average Nusselt number and lift coefficient are enhanced by the increase in either nanoparticle volume fraction or Reynolds number, while the drag coefficient takes its minimum in case of the fixed cylinder (Ω=0). In addition, the lift coefficient takes its minimum at value of the magnetic field inclination angle equals π/6. Moreover, the electromagnetic force slowdown the ferrofluid flow but the drag coefficient is enhanced. Also, the average Nusselt number decreases with ratio 53.12% as the Hartmann number increases from 0 to 100.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we propose a concept of a microwave to optical photon converter for applications in Quantum Information (QI) that is based on travelling magnons in a thin magnetic film. The converter employs an epitaxially grown Bi-substituted yttrium iron garnet (Bi-YIG) film as the medium for propagation of travelling magnons (spin waves). The conversion is achieved through coupling of magnons to guided optical modes of the film. We evaluate the conversion efficiency for this device theoretically. Our prediction is that it will be larger by at least four orders of magnitude than experimentally obtained in a similar process exploiting a uniform magnetization precession mode in a YIG sphere. By creating an optical resonator of a large length from the film (such that the traveling magnon decays before forming a standing wave over the resonator length) one will be able to further increase the efficiency by several orders of magnitude, potentially reaching a value similar to achieved with opto-mechanical resonators. An important advantage of the suggested concept of the QI devices based on travelling spin waves is a perfectly planar geometry compatible with the optical lithography process and a possibility of implementing the device as a hybrid opto-microwave chip.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThin-oxide Z2-FET cells operating as capacitor-less DRAM devices are experimentally demonstrated. Both the retention time and memory window demonstrate the feasibility of implementing this cell in advanced 28 nm node FDSOI technology. Nevertheless a performance drop and higher variability with respect to thicker oxide Z2-FET cells are observed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A phase diagram of the magnetization dynamics is studied by numerically solving the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert (LLG) equation in a spin torque oscillator consisting of asymmetric two free layers that are magnetized in in-plane direction. We calculated the dynamics for a wide range of current density for both low and high field cases, and found many dynamical phases such as synchronization, auto-oscillation with different frequencies, and chaotic dynamics. The observation of the synchronization indicates the presence of a dynamical phase which has not been found experimentally by using the conventional electrical detection method. The auto-oscillations with different frequencies lead to an oscillation of magnetoresistance with a high frequency, which can be measured experimentally. The chaotic and/or periodic behavior of magnetoresistance in a high current region, on the other hand, leads to a discontinuous change of the peak frequency in Fourier spectrum.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nonlinear magnetoelectric effects in a disk-like heterostructure composed of a layer of amorphous ferromagnet (FeBSiC) mechanically coupled to a layer of piezoelectric ceramics (lead zirconate titanate) were studied both experimentally and theoretically. The structure was excited by alternating electrical and magnetic fields far from its acoustic resonance frequency. This induced changes in the magnetic induction within the heterostructure which were recorded using an electromagnetic coil. The experiments were performed for excitations with electric and magnetic fields up to 250 V/cm and 6 Oe, respectively, and bias permanent magnetic fields up to 60 Oe. For large excitation fields, a generation of the second harmonic and harmonics corresponding to the sum and difference frequencies were observed. The coefficient of the frequency doubling for the converse magnetoelectric effect and the coefficient of mixing of electrical and magnetic field frequencies were found to be 4.6∙10−6 G cm2/V2 and ∼1∙10−2 G cm/(Oe∙V), respectively. A simple theoretical model qualitatively describing the experimental findings was proposed. It was shown that the nonlinearity in the converse magnetoelectric effect arises due to the nonlinear dependence of magnetic induction in the ferromagnetic layer on mechanical stress.© 2019 Elsevier LtdTCAD models of the ballistic mobility are developed where the mean ballistic velocity is not a fitting parameter, but a function of either the quasi-Fermi potential or the density. In the first case, a local version can be derived which is more robust when used together with a model for source-to-drain tunneling. The second form conserves the thermionic ballistic current and better matches the on-currents of short-channel FETs obtained from a quantum-transport solver, in particular at low source-drain bias. It requires the iterative extraction of the top-of-the-barrier density. This is the only non-local remnant of the hydrodynamic term in the balance equation for the mean velocity which is discarded in all commercial 2D/3D device simulators. The ballistic mobility, used with the Matthiessen rule, substitutes for this term and prevents that the drift-diffusion current diverges in the limit of zero gate length. The numerical integration of the models with the TCAD simulator S-Device is set out, and simulated transfer characteristics of In0.53Ga0.47As double-gate ultra-thin-body FETs with gate lengths ranging from 7 nm to 40 nm are compared with the corresponding quantum-transport results. It is shown that under conditions of dominant source-to-drain tunneling, the concepts of local quasi-Fermi potential and mean ballistic velocity break down. Suggestions for non-local modifications of both the mobility and tunneling models are given that would allow to use the same setup for all gate voltages from deep sub-threshold to deep inversion.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of the CoPt/CoOx bilayers have been investigated in this work. Compared with the CoPt single layer, enhanced perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) and strong perpendicular exchange bias (PEB) have been observed in the CoPt/CoOx bilayers. The thin CoOx layer with Co at different oxidization state, formed by controlling the oxygen gas flow rate ratio in the oxygen and argon gas mixture during the magnetron sputtering, has been found to significantly affect the magnetic anisotropy and exchange bias of the films. Up to 20% oxygen flow rate ratio, the oxidization of Co in CoOx layer monotonously promotes the PMA. While the maximum value of PEB is obtained at 10% oxygen flow rate ratio, and then decreases for further oxidation due to the phase transition from CoO to Co3O4 with a smaller AFM anisotropy constant. Our study provides useful information for fabricating and understanding ferromagnet/antiferromagnet thin films with strong perpendicular magnetic anisotropy and perpendicular exchange bias.© 2019 Elsevier LtdDigital logic technology has been extraordinarily successful and has been fueled by incredible gains in integration density and performance achieved over the years following Moore's law. This has led to societal changes where more and more everyday functions are aided by smart devices following the path to artificial intelligence. However, in the field of deep machine learning, even this technology falls short, partly because device scaling gains are no longer easy to come by, but also due to intractable energy costs of computation. Deep learning, using labeled data, can be mapped onto artificial neural networks, arrays where the inputs and outputs are connected by programmable weights, and which can perform pattern recognition functions. The learning process consists of finding the optimum weights however this learning process is very slow for large problems. Exploiting the fact that weights do not need to be determined with high precision, as long as they can be updated precisely, the device community has recognized that analog computation approaches, using physical arrays of memristor (programmable resistor) type devices could offer significant speedup and power advantages compared to pure digital, or pure software approaches. On the other hand, the history of analog computation is not reassuring since the rule has been that more capable digital devices invariably supplant analog function. In this paper I will discuss the opportunities and limitations of using analog techniques to accelerate the learning process in resistive neural networks.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nested square 2D lattice of gold nanospheres encased in a film of bismuth-substituted yttrium iron garnet (Bi:YIG) have been studied. Symmetry, structural and dielectric parameters of such nanostructures have been found to define the number of plasmon resonances and their spectral positions. As compared with a conventional film of Bi:YIG, the magneto-optical response of the studied nanostructures considerably increases due to the plasmon resonances, and the sign of polarization rotation is defined by a configuration of the localized near fields. Also, we demonstrate that, due to the nested arrangement, the optical and magneto-optical responses of the nanostructures can be strongly altered with a negligible change in their structural parameters.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In search of lightweight, broadband and stable microwave absorbing material, here we have presented a morphology dependent study of microwave properties on Nickel Ferrite (NFO). A comparative study of permittivity (ε), permeability (μ), Reflection Loss (RL) and Shielding efficiency (SE) on NFO nano hollow spheres (NHS) with its nano particles (NPs) and bulk counterpart has been performed for widely used X-Band (8–12 GHz) on composites filled (25 wt% and thickness of 2 mm) with each sample. Interestingly, NFO nano hollow spheres (NHS) are found to be highly efficient material towards microwave attenuation. An optimal RL of ∼−59.2 dB is obtained for frequency ∼11.7 GHz with a broad band-width (W) of ∼(9.18–12) GHz having RL < −10 dB (absorption >90%). Hollow cavity of NHS leads to a lower density (∼3.91 g/cc) as well as multiple internal reflections, which enhances wave absorption. Excellent impedance matching with free space, accompanied by proper dielectric and magnetic loss contributes towards maximization of RL for NHS. These properties enhance the potentiality of NFO NHS as an efficient microwave absorbing material suitable in various microwave devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The manifestations of the dipolar interaction in magnetic nano-devices can take subtle forms. In this work, we address the effects of dipolar interactions on skyrmions textures. The so-called twisted skyrmion is a natural state between the Bloch skyrmion, that arises from the bulk-like Dzyalonshinskii-Moriya (DM) interaction, and the Néel-skyrmion, that results from the interfacial form of the DM interaction. Often neglected, or approximated by local interactions, we show how, when explicitly included, dipolar interactions generate gaps in the phase diagram for certain helicities. Besides, this interaction allows the existence of skyrmions with two chiralities, which are unstable when the dipolar interaction is approximated by a shape anisotropy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Thin magnetic cylinders are in focus of interest due to peculiar features of domain wall motion like absence of the Walker breakdown. Here, we propose an experimental technique based on magneto-optical Kerr effect that allows surface studies of a domain wall shape in thin microwires. Our setup is optimized for characteristic optical and magneto-optical features of thin magnetic cylinders. Time-resolved measurements of a magnetic contrast along the circumference of wire are used to reconstruct a three-dimensional image of a surface domain wall shape. Our measurements confirmed a tilted shape of domain wall, in agreement with previous observations of microwires with positive magnetostriction alloy. The experimental technique represents a new way for direct visualizations of a surface magnetism of thin cylinders in optical range.© 2019 A tetranuclear iron grid-type spin crossover complex, [Fe II 4 (HL) 4 ](BF 4 ) 4 ·6H 2 O (1) (H 2 L = 2-(4-hydroxyphenyl)-4,5-bis{6-(3,5-dimethylpyrazol-1-yl)pyrid-2- yl}-1H-imidazole), was synthesized. Magnetic susceptibility measurements revealed that 1 shows gradual spin crossover behavior above 200 K. The electronic states of the compound were elucidated by Mössbauer spectra.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The aim of this experimental assessment is to examine the influence of an oscillating magnetic field on the thermal-conductivity of a water-Fe 3 O 4 and water-Fe 3 O 4 /CNT ferro-fluids. Magnetic field is created by an electromagnet composed of a core made of ferrite and two copper windings. The impacts of magnetic field strength and frequency are also examined and the findings are compared with those of the constant magnetic field. The outcomes revealed that the pattern of thermal-conductivity in the attendance of a constant magnetic field is initially ascending and then descending. In addition, it was found that the descending trend of the thermal-conductivity can be prevented by using an oscillating magnetic field. Moreover, the results depicted that the most effective oscillating magnetic field has a frequency equal to the inverse of one minute less than time to reach the highest thermal-conductivity in the attendance of constant magnetic field. According to the results, the highest increase in the average thermal-conductivity of the water-Fe 3 O 4 and water-Fe 3 O 4 /CNT ferro-fluids in the attendance of an oscillating magnetic field of 700 Gauss in comparison to the case of a constant magnetic field of 700 Gauss, is respectively 22.62 and 24.25%.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Multi-main-phase (MM 0.3 Nd 0.7 )-Fe-B (MM = Misch Metal) magnets were prepared by sintering the mixture of Nd-Fe-B and MM-Fe-B powders. In order to further enhance the coercivity of the magnet, Nd 8 Cu 2 eutectic alloy powders were added to the magnets as a variable. When the addition of the Nd 8 Cu 2 powders increases from 0 to 5 wt%, the H cj of the magnets increases by 56.8% (7.01–10.99 kOe). Microstructural investigations show that after the addition of 5 wt% Nd 8 Cu 2 powders, the thickness of continuous grain boundary layers are over 2.1 nm, which effectively block the short-range exchange coupling between adjacent grains, contributing to the improvement of H cj . The Selected Area Electron Diffraction images show that the Cu exists in the form of NdCu 2 in the grain boundary layers.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe formation of a multi-crystalline HfO2 film, containing the ferroelectric phase OII (Pmn21) after a high-temperature annealing at 1100 °C, was experimentally observed by HREM for the first time in silicon-on-sapphire (SOS) structures obtained by direct bonding and a hydrogen transfer of silicon layer on Si or C-sapphire substrates, respectively. PEALD HfO2 interlayers with the thickness of 20 nm were deposited on silicon before bonding to reduce the defects and magnitude of their charge at the SOS and silicon-on-insulator (SOI) interfaces. SOS pseudo-MOS transistors demonstrate standard drain-gate characteristics with the same charge carrier mobility as in bulk silicon and a small positive fixed charge (≤1.2 × 1012 cm−2). Moreover, a stable ferroelectric hysteresis with ΔVG ∼700 V observed only in SOS FETs is promising for the embedded memory formation and it extends the functionality of logic circuits. It was concluded that the OII phase is stabilized mainly by a high compressive stress and it can be responsible for the hysteresis in the case of SOS pseudo-MOSFETs opposite to the SOI-structure.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. CuFe 1− x Ti x O 2 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.08) ceramics are synthesized by solid state reaction method to investigate the effect of Ti substitution on the microstructure, vacancy-type defects, the local electron density, and magnetic properties. The XRD and Raman spectra results show that all experimental samples possess the characteristic peak of CuFeO 2 ceramics. SEM observations indicate that Ti substitution has obvious influence on the morphologies of experimental ceramics, and the microvoids increases significantly with increasing Ti content. Positron annihilation lifetime and Doppler broadening spectra results indicate that the vacancy concentration increases rapidly and then reaches a higher platform (>35%) as x > 0.01, and Ti substitution does not change the defects species in CuFe 1- x Ti x O 2 ceramics. The electron density decreases with increasing x and then reaches a low plateau (≈5.7) at x = 0.08. The χ- T curves reveal that the T N1 is independent of Ti content, while, the T N2 decreases with increasing x at x = 0.00–0.02 and even disappears in the magnetization curves as x > 0.02. The M-H curves indicate that the coexistence of weak ferromagnetism and antiferromagnetism for all the samples could be found. The possible reasons for the above observations are discussed in detail.© 2019 Elsevier Ltd The degradation behaviors of flip-chip 260 nm ultraviolet light emitting diodes (UVC-LEDs) were studied using in-situ accelerated system and different analytical technologies. The optical power of LEDs stressed at a constant DC current of 20 mA decreased to ~63% of the initial value after 150 h of operation. The failure mechanisms were investigated systematically by using current-voltage measurements, Secondary Ion Mass Spectroscopy, Transient Thermal Analysis, Scan Electron Microscopy, etc. The results show that: the concentration of H in p-GaN layer decreased from 4.5e17 atoms/cm 3 for the unstressed samples to 6.0e16 atoms/cm 3 for stressed sample, while there is no change for the Mg concentration, indicating the hydrogen dissociated from the Mg-H complex resulting from the activation of the Mg-dopant during the initial period; the increase of the current for the reverse bias region and the low-forward bias region during stress is due to the increase of defect-assisted carrier tunneling; the electro-migration of contact metal may generate the current leakage channel, which degraded the optical power of the LEDs. These results will help to improve the reliability design of AlGaN-based deep-UV LEDs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The microstructure and magnetic properties of nanocrystalline Fe-Si soft magnetic material fabricated by high energy vibratory milling are investigated. Fe-Si × wt% (x = 1.78, 3.51, 3.80, 5.08, 6.06, 6.98, 8.04) compositions are studied, with the 3.5 wt% case being used as a model system to investigate effects of processing time. X-ray diffraction (XRD) measurements indicate that the Si is fully in solution in the Fe lattice and no ordered phases are present. It is shown that microstructural evolution is accelerated compared with previously observed lower energy milling processes of iron-based alloys. It is also shown that magnetic properties are in disagreement with the formulas derived from the random anisotropy model, and explanations are provided for potential sources of this discrepancy in this and other reported work.© 2019 Pulse laser deposited cobalt ferrite CoFe 2 O 4 (CFO) thin films were transformed to CFO/Co-Fe solid solution hard/soft nanocomposite thin films by annealing the CFO films in hydrogen atmosphere. By controlling the annealing time, the level of transformation between the two phases was controlled thereby the exchange coupling and magnetic properties of the nanocomposite layer. X-ray diffraction patterns showed the formation of (0 0 l) orientation for the CFO hard phase and (0 l l) orientation for bcc Co-Fe solid solution soft phase in all samples. Atomic force microscopy images revealed that by increasing the annealing time, the surface roughness of the films increased. Magnetic measurements demonstrate that the more the annealing time, the higher the saturation magnetization and the lower their coercivity and magnetic anisotropy. Hysteresis loops of the films show that these samples behave like single-phase materials indicating the presence of exchange coupling between two different hard and soft phases. Using X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS), we determined the cations distribution variation in our samples thus a change in the spinel inversion parameter (y) from 0.70 for the as-deposited CFO to 0.49 for the films reduced in hydrogen for 60 min. The Raman spectroscopy confirms the XPS results in our samples. The present approach may help the development of methods for tuning the saturation magnetization, coercivity and magnetic easy axis direction in magnetic nanocomposite thin films and magnetic oxide-based spintronic devices.© 2019 We have systematically studied the effect of oblique angle deposition (OAD) on the transport properties of Permalloy (Ni 81 Fe 19 ) thin films. Films deposited at oblique angles larger than 50° exhibit a resistivity minimum that can be further manipulated by changing the oblique angle. A minimum in temperature dependent resistivity is manifested as a deviation from the usual phonon-scattering behavior. Furthermore, a change in the magnetic anisotropy in the films is clearly demonstrated in their magnetoresistance that shifts from negative to positive with increasing glancing angle. OAD results in the formation of columns-like microstructures on the films, while their porosity greatly enhances. The microstructural evolution induced by OAD modifies the fundamental electron scattering process in the films. The modifications in the scattering mechanism outcomes in a resistivity minimum in the films grown at high oblique angles. The possible mechanisms responsible for the observed behavior are discussed.© 2019 The Authors Fe-doped D0 19 Mn 3 Ga films were studied in terms of both their in-plane and perpendicular exchange bias field, H ex , induced in the attached ferromagnetic layer. The (Mn,Fe) 3 Ga films were deposited on a Si substrate with a Ru buffer layer with a (0 0 0 1)-oriented single D0 19 phase at room temperature. Consequently, in-plane and perpendicular H ex were measured in bilayers with a CoFe layer and a [Co/Pt] multilayer, respectively. In-plane H ex was found to be dependent on the Fe compositions, showing the largest value of 446 Oe at 120 K for 10-nm-thick Mn 1.99 Fe 0.41 Ga. Perpendicular H ex was dependent on not only the Fe compositions but also the thickness of (Mn,Fe) 3 Ga, exhibiting the maximum of 163 Oe at 120 K for 5-nm-thick Mn 1.96 Fe 0.67 Ga. The median blocking temperature of both in-plane and perpendicular H ex systems for 10-nm-thick (Mn,Fe) 3 Ga were measured to be 235 and 240 K, respectively. The measured in-plane and perpendicular H ex induced by (Mn,Fe) 3 Ga are generated by a spin structural change from noncollinear to noncoplaner in ab-plane as expected from the previous theoretical study [A. Kundu and S. Ghosh, Intermetallics 93, 209 (2018)].© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this letter, we study the transverse magneto-optical Kerr effect (TMOKE) in a bi-gyrotropic superlens, and its dependence on the losses of both permittivity and permeability functions, which is a determining factor for the existence of the TMOKE. We found extreme values for this effect for both p- and s-polarized waves, and in particular the conditions under which these extreme values occur for a wide-range of the angle of incidence.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A facile solution combustion synthesis method was successfully applied to synthesize single rock-salt structural (Co 0.2 Cu 0.2 Mg 0.2 Ni 0.2 Zn 0.2 )O high-entropy oxide (HEO) nanocrystalline powder with chemical homogeneity. The XRD patterns with Rietveld refinement reveal the formation of single-phase rock-salt structure occurs only at the synthesis temperatures ≥ 1123 K, and the average nanocrystalline size is about 43 nm. Moreover, two series of experiments confirm the effect of configurational entropy on phase stabilization. Furthermore, the as-synthesized single-phase (Co 0.2 Cu 0.2 Mg 0.2 Ni 0.2 Zn 0.2 )O nanocrystalline powder exhibits long-range antiferromagnetic behavior below Néel temperature (T N = 106 K), which can be well understood by the super-exchange interactions in the rock-salt HEO. The powder also shows lower T N due to the significant amount of nonmagnetic ions suppressing the antiferromagnetic order.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We have found that the Curie temperature (T c ) of Co-based amorphous alloy Co 90 Nb 10 Ta 3 (T c = 360 K) is much lower than many amorphous alloy systems. Through further research, we have found Co 90 Nb 10 Ta 3 exists second-order ferromagnetic (FM) to paramagnetic (PM) phase transition near the T c . Co 90 Nb 10 Ta 3 amorphous alloy near the T c has a larger magnetocaloric effect (MCE), under the ΔH = 60 kOe, -ΔS M max =2.43 J kg −1 K −1 , relative cooling power (RCP) can reach 203.55 J/kg. Compared with Fe-B-Cr, Fe-Cr-Cu-Nb-Si-B, FeCoSiAlGaPCB and FeCrMoCuGaPCB amorphous alloy, the Co-Nb-Ta amorphous alloy has better properties. Co-Nb-Ta amorphous alloy has better mechanical and chemical properties than other amorphous alloys, it is a potential MCE material.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper discusses the impact of both contact and channel resistance on capacitance and conductance characteristics measured with pseudo-MOSFET method by analyzing the impedance and admittance in frequency domain. We clarify the mechanisms affecting the ac response of pseudo-MOSFET structure for SOI wafer with thin SOI film by using simple series and parallel circuits composed of resistance and capacitance. Our measurement results show the gate bias range where the influence of the contact resistance becomes dominant in measurements with single and multiple probes. The degradation of the capacitance measured at high frequency is also analyzed by constructing an equivalent circuit, which detach the influence of the contact and channel resistances quantitatively. The necessity to carefully account for the influence of the contact resistance in pseudo-MOS method is clarified.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The problem of an unsteady squeezing flow of fluid between two parallel plates under the influence of an inclined magnetic field is analyzed. The longitudinal inclination angle of the applied magnetic field varies from 0 to 90 degrees. Viscous dissipation, Joule heating and the stretching velocity of the lower plate with suction or injection are also taken into account. The transformed nonlinear governing equations are solved numerically by a fourth-order Runge-Kutta scheme coupled with the shooting method. Impacts of the squeeze number, the magnetic parameter, the magnetic inclination angle, the lower-plate stretching parameter, the lower-plate suction/injection parameter and Eckert number on the velocity and temperature are pointed out, respectively. It is found that the inclination angle of the applied magnetic field also plays an important role in the velocity and heat transfer in squeezing flows. The influence of changing the magnetic field strength on the velocity and temperature can also be approximately achieved by adjusting the inclination angle of the applied magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We propose a theoretical model to study the spin transport, particularly the interfacial resistance in a noncollinear system with a diffuse interface. The realistic interface region arising from the sputtering process is first modeled by using Fick's law. Subsequently, the spin transport behavior in magnetic system is determined via a generalized spin accumulation model taking into account spin dephasing term. Our model is able to deal with magnetic systems with arbitrary orientation of magnetization by employing the transfer matrix approach. The model is first used to investigate spin accumulation in a bilayer system consisting of a ferromagnet (FM) and a non-magnet (NM). The influence of important transport parameters: spin dephasing, interdiffusion, injected current density and spin polarization on magnetoresistance (MR) are studied. Next we investigate the transport properties of a FM/NM/FM system where the interface disorder giving rise to enhanced spin dephasing is modeled. We found that the interdiffusion of the FM/NM/FM interface gives rise to large spin scattering, which enhances the GMR. The results also show that including the disorder arising from interface diffusion is an important contribution to the transport properties.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Rapidly increasing demand for high-energy permanent magnets and volatility of the rear-earth market encourage a search of hard magnetic materials that can compete with those based on the Nd 2 Fe 14 B phase. Sm-Fe compounds with the ThMn 12 -type crystal structure are considered as promising candidates for it. However, their synthesis and achievement of theoretically predicted magnetic properties are still challenging tasks that have not been solved yet. This paper addresses this problem. Its aim was to synthesize and to study magnetic properties of the (Sm 0.9 Zr 0.1 )Fe 11 Ti compound with ThMn 12 -type structure. Initially amorphous alloy was obtained by melt spinning and its subsequent heat treatments were performed. Structural and phase transformations of the (Sm 0.9 Zr 0.1 )Fe 11 Ti alloy with annealing temperatures were studied along with magnetic properties. For the optimally annealed alloy features of magnetization reversal were discussed and temperature dependences of coercivity and maximum energy product were obtained.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. FeSiAl/Fe 3 O 4 core-shell composite particles and transformed Fe 3 Si/Al 2 O 3 composite compacts have been prepared via ball milling coating combined with subsequent spark plasma sintering (SPS) process. The formation mechanism of the Al 2 O 3 insulating layer and the magnetic properties of the Fe 3 Si/Al 2 O 3 composite compacts have been investigated systematically. The FeSiAl particles are coated with uniform Fe 3 O 4 nanoparticles by ball milling method. And during SPS process, the new phase Fe 3 Si/Al 2 O 3 composite compacts are formed due to the high temperature solid phase reaction between FeSiAl alloy core and Fe 3 O 4 coatings. The Fe 3 Si phase possesses excellent soft magnetic properties and the uniform Al 2 O 3 layer shows good insulativity. Therefore, the Fe 3 Si/Al 2 O 3 composite compacts exhibit superior soft magnetic performance such as enhanced saturation magnetization, reduced coercivity, good permeability stability, high resistivity and thus low core loss at high frequency compared with the original FeSiAl compacts. The investigated results in this work indicate that FeSiAl alloy particles coated with iron oxides can be transformed into soft magnetic composite materials with new insulating layer via high temperature solid phase reaction, which provides a promising approach to develop new-style soft magnetic composites with excellent electro-magnetic properties.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nanometer sized Permalloy antidot arrays with different square hole sizes have been fabricated using field emission scanning electron microscopy technique. The dynamic properties of the antidot arrays are measured at GHz frequencies using a Vector Network Analyzer. For a given applied magnetic field, we observe three resonance frequencies – one corresponds to that of a uniform mode in an infinitely extended film, and the other two (above and below this mode in frequency) correspond to modes associated with finite structures. These two modes exhibit an effective uniaxial in-plane anisotropy. The static behavior of the antidot arrays are simulated using a micromagnetic model and the electromagnetic signal transmission is analyzed using an analytical model. The results show that the three different resonance frequencies are due to the different localized shape anisotropies created by the nonmagnetic holes in the antidot array. Possible application as a magnetically tunable local band-pass filter at 5G frequency band is also studied.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We first propose the nonlinear spin Hall effect of light (SHEL) and MOSHEL (magneto optic spin Hall effect of light) through a multilayer with graphene and nonlinear substrate (NLS) in terahertz region. The MO transfer matrix method is modified to calculate the SHEL shift in a nonlinear system. The NLS brings bistable characteristics for SHEL in which nonlinear splitting of left-handed circularly polarized (LHCP) and right-handed circularly polarized (RHCP) components can be observed. The Faraday rotation of light in terahertz region causes the asymmetrical SHEL shifts distribution of LHCP and RHCP components. Meanwhile the MO effect of graphene brings modulations for nonlinear SHEL and MOSHEL which provide us new and flexible methods to control spatial light field distribution. In addition, as the delay effect causes the chaos of bistable state system, the SHEL shift can be used as a quantum point for the chaos phenomenon.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The magnetic and structural properties of metallic α-Fe magnetic nanoparticles synthesized by electric explosion of wire technique were investigated. As-prepared particles are highly crystalline and present a high saturation magnetization (M S = 186 ± 3 emu/g) that is slightly lower than bulk value (M α-Fe = 218 emu/g) due to the presence of a very thin non-magnetic FeO x shell, which increases the chemical stability and biocompatibility, making the particles of great interest for a number of applications, including sensing and biomedicine. When the particles are pressed, strong dipole-dipole interactions arise, giving rise to collective ferromagnetic-like behavior observed with magnetic force microscopy, which results in a reduction of the coercivity, thus suggesting that the interparticle interactions can be used as an additional tool to tune the magnetic properties.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Tb-Co perpendicular magnetization films are mother materials for perpendicular magnetic recording media. Since the magnetic recording technique is based on magnetic switching of a material, investigating a magnetic the response of the material to a magnetic field is important. The magnetic response of the entire system is the net of each microscopic response of the spin magnetic moment and orbital magnetic moment of the elements. Herein we study the magnetization processes of the spin, orbital, and the element-specific magnetic moments by measuring the magnetic field dependence of the magnetic Compton profile of a Tb 12 Co 88 film. The spin and orbital magnetic moments have opposite orientations. Similarly, Tb and Co magnetic moments have opposite directions. When the total magnetic moment reverses, the orientation of spin and orbital magnetization as well as Tb and Co reverse. Decreasing the temperature, the fluctuation of the magnetic moment of Tb in the perpendicular direction decreases. So the cancelation between the Tb and Co moments reduces total magnetic moment.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this study, ferromagnetic cobalt ferrite (CoFe 2 O 4 ) fibers were synthesized by electrospinning technique using a DMF/ethanol mixed precursor solution of poly (vinyl pyrrolidone) (PVP) and cobalt and iron (III) nitrates. The as-spun precursor fibers were characterized using thermogravimetric analysis (TGA), scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and Fourier-transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR) analyses and calcined at 500, 600 and 800 °C with a heating rate of 2 °C/min to obtain CoFe 2 O 4 fibers. Morphological studies confirmed the formation of a continuous bead-free fiber structure in the calcined samples with an average fiber diameter and particle size of 208 nm and 48 nm respectively. Magnetic hysteresis loops of CoFe 2 O 4 fibers revealed their ferromagnetic nature, with a maximum saturation magnetization of 76.5 emu/g and a coercivity of 948 Oe. At room temperature, the variation of resistance and the corresponding response toward various test gases of different concentrations were systematically investigated. The sensing response of CoFe 2 O 4 fibers toward ammonia was found to be better than toward other test gases such as ethanol, methanol, acetone, and 2-propanol. CoFe 2 O 4 fibers showed good reproducibility and a maximum response of 0.42 at 900 ppm concentration of ammonia. They also exhibited the ability to sense a very low concentration of ammonia (even at 25 ppm) at room temperature.© 2019 To develop a high voltage read margin ΔV rd , deep reset engineering and defect engineering are proposed. To realize the defect engineering, the amount of oxygen vacancy of the resistor was controlled by optimizing the material of the reservoir (RSV) and switching oxide. We investigated the barrier height modulation, which was formed by the Ru bottom electrode (BE) having a high work function, to demonstrate the concept of deep reset engineering by reducing the set current (I set ) of the HfO 2 resistor (1R) to the turn-on current (I th ) of the selector device (1S). Further, we identified the causes of the negative set fail through the chemical analysis of the HfO 2 /BE TiN interface to improve the reset switching fail. Unstable TiON and TiOx chemical species, which present in the interface of HfO 2 /BE TiN, take oxygen from the resistor HfO 2 and create the parasitic defect (or filament), which was injected from BE TiN. To improve the negative set fail of RRAM, we proposed the O 3 surface treatment of BE TiN at a high temperature (∼320 °C) and the BE Ru with a superior oxidation resistance. By using deep reset engineering, we successfully increased the ΔV rd of 1S1R by more than 0.5 V. We also demonstrated that Ru BE and the O 3 surface treatment of BE TiN improved both the reset window and the negative set.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In view of the importance of inducing magnetism and large perpendicular magnetic anisotropy in silicene, the influence of an external electric field on the magnetism and the magnetic anisotropy of the Fe(15, 18, 21 monolayers)/silicene heterostructures are investigated by using first-principles calculations. The results show that the magnetic moments and the magnetic anisotropy of the Fe/silicene heterostructures are mainly from Fe films. With increasing the thickness of Fe film, the easy magnetization axis of the Fe/silicene heterostructure changes from out-of-plane to in-plane direction. In addition, the magnetic moments in all the Fe/silicene heterostructures are insensitive to the electric field. Particularly, under the positive electric field, the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy of the Fe(15 monolayers)/silicene can be enhanced, the magnetic anisotropy of the Fe(18 monolayers)/silicene increases from in-plane magnetic anisotropy to perpendicular magnetic anisotropy, and the magnetic anisotropy of the Fe(21 monolayers)/silicene also increases although its easy magnetization axis is still along in-plane direction. The mechanism of the electric-field-driven modulation of magnetic anisotropy is mainly from the increase of the positive contribution from spin-orbit coupling interaction between opposite spin d z 2 and d yz orbitals of the second Fe layer from the Fe/silicene interface. Our study reveals that the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy can be achieved or enhanced by applying positive electric field if the thickness of Fe film in Fe/silicene heterostructure is suitable.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This paper presents a systematic study of magnetic non-destructive evaluation of corrosion attack in rope wires via Barkhausen noise emission. Reduction of the effective cross-sectional area due to corrosion is a major factor affecting rope wire bearing capacity. To investigate the potential of Barkhausen noise technique for such purpose, wires of variable corrosion extent were measured and the correlation between the corrosion depth and Barkhausen noise parameters was analysed. It was found that Barkhausen noise parameters exhibit very good sensitivity to the variable corrosion depth. However, the evolution of the magnetic parameters saturates when the corrosion depth exceeds 300 μm. Furthermore, it was observed that Barkhausen emission arises from the wire itself as well as from the corroded layer, including a mixture of oxides and non-corroded fragments.© 2019A detection procedure by employing the induced magnetic signature characteristics for magnetic targets detection and identification is proposed in this paper. The highly sensitive tunneling magnetoresistive (TMR) sensor with low self-noise is adopted, while the magnetic target is traveling along a straight line at various speed and CPA (closest path approach) for magnetic anomaly detection (MAD). The triple-axis TMR sensor is characterized with a high sensitivity around 100 mV/V/Oe in a linear range of ±1 Oe and a self-noise of 170 pT/√Hz at 1 Hz. The signature waveform width and sensing range angle are used to analyze the signatures. It is found that the sensing range angle is independent of changing velocity and CPA. The proposed signature interpretation strategy is demonstrated by both experimental and simulated data.© 2019 Elsevier LtdComprehensive Testing of Microwave Monolithic Integrated Circuits (MMICs) and Very Large Scale Integrated (VLSI) circuits is a problem of growing sophistication and importance. A commensurate problem involves the increasing relevance of hardware security, with rapidly increasing dependence of U.S. industry on imported electronics. Non-destructive, unobtrusive testing techniques are especially useful but hard to implement. In this paper, we report on using THz scanning of MMICs and VLSI circuits for testing, identification, and validation by measuring the circuit response at the pins. This technique could also be used to evaluate the reliability and lifetime of integrated circuits. This technique was demonstrated using a working and damaged MMIC with just a few transistors. For larger-scale circuits, this technique can be combined with machine learning for establishing the evolving database of the responses processed by an artificial-intelligence algorithm.© 2019 Elsevier LtdVariability is one of the major roadblocks for III-V semiconductors in nanoscale devices, according to the recent International Roadmap for Devices and Systems (IRDS). A particular concern is the detrimental effect of variability of threshold voltage due to channel compositional variations. In this paper, we investigate the impact of this variability source and the effects of scaling on the performance of Dual-Gate-Ultra-Thin-Body (DG-UTB) In0.53Ga0.47As MOSFETs. We model mole fraction variations in terms of the Indium content by taking into account the spatial inhomogeneity of the channel and the corresponding bandgap variations, analyzing the effects on threshold voltage variability. We thus define a variability source, i.e., Band Gap Fluctuation (BGF), and we compare the associated variability with the ones from other important sources, namely, Random Dopant Fluctuation (RDF), Work Function Fluctuation (WFF), Body- and Gate-Line Edge Roughness (B-LER and G-LER). We then define three corner cases for mole fraction variations to determine worst-case variability. Finally, the impact of scaling on variability is assessed by comparing results for two technology nodes on the linear and saturation threshold voltage, VT,lin, VT,sat, on-current, ION, leakage current, IOFF, and linear and saturation sub-threshold slope, SS. We find that although scaling has no impact on BGF-induced VT variability, it increases the total VT,lin variability as well as that for ION and IOFF.© 2019 Four isostructural heptanuclear clusters [LnIr 6 (ppy) 12 (bpp) 2 (bppH) 4 ](CF 3 SO 3 )·xH 2 O (Ir 6 Ln, Ln = Eu, Tb, Er, Yb) are reported, where the lanthanide ions are six-coordinated by the phosphonate oxygen donors from six [Ir(ppy) 2 (bpp)] (ppy − = 2-phenylpyridine, bpp 2− = 2-pyridylphosphonate) chromophores. All show phosphorescence originating from the Ir III moieties. For compounds Ir 6 Er and Ir 6 Yb, field-induced slow magnetization relaxation is also observed, thus providing the first examples of Ir-Er or Ir-Yb complexes showing bifunctional phosphorescence and field-induced single ion magnet behaviors.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We use first principles calculations to study the electronic and magnetic properties of undoped and Al-doped SnS and their dependence with space-group symmetry. The formation of a magnetic moment due to an impurity element was analyzed by substitutional doping in Pnma(62)-SnS and C2mb(39)-SnS symmetries. The holes introduced by cation Al-doping leads to the formation of a magnetic moment of 1.0 μ B /impurity, and a half-metallic behavior. Orbital configurations with local magnetic moments are established due to strong hybridization between {s;p}-Al orbitals and {s;p}-S orbitals. The collective magnetic order was analyzed by the effective exchange-coupling parameters between Al atoms at different atomic cationic sites, and different hole concentrations. These results indicate that the stabilization of the magnetic order presents a strong dependence with the spatial arrangement and the exchange pathways. For nearby dopants, and at the same holes concentration, both the Pnma and the C2mb symmetries present an AFM behavior. This collective magnetic order changes to a ferromagnetic coupling for the case in which the dopants are further away or when there is a higher holes concentration. The origin of such magnetic ordering can be understood based on the competition between hole-mediated superexchange and double exchange mechanisms. Our predictive results offer the possibility to distinguish between holes doping effect and the role of symmetry in the coordination of the dopant, of great importance to the understanding of the origin of defect-induced magnetism.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The Fe 15− x Mn 40 Al 45+ x (x = 0, 1, 2 and 3) and Fe 15 Mn 40− y Al 45+ y (y = 1, 2 and 3) alloys were prepared by arc melting and annealed at 1000 °C for 7 days. The microstructure and magnetic properties are characterized by XRD and VSM. Corresponding corrosion potential and hardness are measured by electrochemical workstation and Vickers hardness tester. All samples have CsCl type Cubic structure. And for Fe 15 Mn 40− y Al 45+ y alloys, with increasing Mn content, the lattice parameters increase from 2.9613 Å to 2.9678 Å, while the curie temperatures can be tuned from 288 K to 330 K. As for Fe 15− x Mn 40 Al 45+ x alloys, the curie temperatures rise from 315 K to 340 K with lattice parameters increasing from 2.9658 Å to 2.9689 Å. The peak values of magnetic entropy change under 5 T are −2.4 and −3.1 J·kg −1 K −1 for Fe 15 Mn 40 Al 45 and Fe 14 Mn 40 Al 44 respectively. The values of refrigerant capacity power are 223.4 and 232.5 J·kg −1 under 5 T. The Arrott plots are also employed to investigate the magnetic phase transition, showing all samples undergo second order ferro-paramagnetic phase transition. Furthermore, these alloys have good hardness and corrosion resistance properties. The potential applications of these alloys as magnetic refrigerant will be also discussed in this paper.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Columnar nanostructures or ordered nanoarrays of CoFe 2 O 4 (CFO) thin films are desirable in applications. While, the difficulties in achieving large-area columnar CFO thin films with a tunable lateral size and a controllable height/length ratio have limited their applications as synthesizing heterostructures and composites. Herein, CFO thin films with vertically aligned nanorod structures from bottom to up have been achieved on silicon substrates by high magnetic field assisted pulsed laser deposition. Lateral size of the nanorod decreases with increasing the magnetic field. Moreover, both the coercivity and the magnetization at room temperature increase with increasing the magnetic field in deposition. These results will provide a feasible route to deposit large-area and technologically relevant to advance the applications of CFO thin films.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We demonstrate that perpendicular anisotropy can be induced in Co 2 FeAl 0.5 Si 0.5 by depositing the Heusler alloy on a tungsten seed layer. This is increased by elevating the deposition temperature to a moderate value up to 335 K. These perpendicular layers can be implemented into GMR devices, showing layer-thickness dependent switching without the use of an antiferromagnetic pinning-layer. These layers can be implemented into the manufacturing process of read-heads, where temperatures are limited.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The current-driven domain wall motion in a planar nanowire with a square hole located at its center is studied by micromagnetic simulations. We show the existence of four regimes that depend both on the geometrical parameters of the hole and the nanowire, as well as on the applied current density. These regimes determine a pinning-depinning pattern characterized by: i) the domain wall remains pinned in its initial position; ii) the domain wall is released from its initial position and reaches the square hole, remaining pinned in that position; iii) the domain wall reaches the hole and passes it without major obstacles, reaching the other end of the wire; iv) the domain wall reaches the hole and suffers a series of complex transformations that annihilate it, giving rise to the nucleation of a new domain wall, which is what reaches the other end of the wire. Our finding could be of practical use in the engineering of logic devices based on the movement of domain walls.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis work presents a detailed characterization of 28 nm FDSOI CMOS process at cryogenic temperatures. Electrostatic, Analog and RF Figures of Merit (FoM) are studied. At liquid nitrogen temperatures, 30% to 200% enhancement of drain current, Id, and maximum transconductance, gm_max, values are demonstrated. Current gain cutoff frequency, fT, increase by about 85 GHz is shown. Temperature behavior of analog and RF FoMs is discussed in terms of mobility and series resistance effect. This study suggests 28 nm FDSOI as a good contender for future read-out electronics operated at cryogenic temperatures (as e.g. around qubits or in space).© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we propose a method to analytically solve some types of DC lumped-parameter equivalent circuit models for solar cells with S-shaped I-V characteristics measured under illumination. Based on the models proposed previously by other authors, we present the set of equations describing solar cell's terminal current and voltage, derive the analytical solutions of I-V characteristics, and give discussions about the effects from the model parameters on solar cells’ I-V characteristics. The comparisons between the proposed solutions and the least square method results illustrate that the solution calculation scheme is not only both accurate and efficient, but also valid in the whole operation regime of solar cells especially for the S-shaped kink in the first quadrant. Finally, the solutions are validated by the reconstructed experimental data to demonstrate that they can be adopted in the practical applications of solar cells. As a result, the feature of the proposed solutions can decrease computation complexity, ease the extraction process of the solar cells’ model fitting parameters, and increase simulation accuracy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The 43-xFe-28Cr-23Co-3Mo-2V-1Zr-xY; x = 0, 0.5, 1.0, 1.5, 2.0, 2.5, 3.0 wt% permanent magnets were produced through casting, thermomagnetic annealing and aging treatments. Magnetic and microstructural properties were improved by Y addition and process optimization. The Y element modifies the morphology of ferromagnetic F-Co rich phase, introduces filed anisotropy and contributes in coercivity enhancement. XRD and EDS results showed that Y free 43Fe-28Cr-23Co-3Mo-2V-1Zr alloy is composed of Fe-Co-V (54.4%) and Cr-Mo-Zr (45.6%) phases while Y doped 41Fe-28Cr-23Co-3Mo-2V-1Zr-2Y alloy is consists of Fe-Co-V-Y (55.7%), Cr-Mo-Zr (29.3%) and Y 1 Co 5 (15%) magnetic phases. Micrographs obtained by scanning transmission electron microscope elucidate nanostructural exchange coupled Fe-Co-V-Y (15–20 nm), Cr-Mo-Zr and Y 1 Co 5 (10 nm) phases for 41Fe-28Cr-23Co-3Mo-2V-1Zr-2Y alloy. Pole figures and ODFs deduced sharp magnetic {1 1 0}〈0 0 1〉 textures or preferential orientation of Fe-Co rich rod like particles. Henkel plots deduced strong ferromagnetic exchange interactions between the magnetic phases. The 43Fe-28Cr-23Co-3Mo-2V-1Zr alloy yields B r of 0.71 T, H c of 97 kA/m and (BH) max of 51.3 kJ/m 3 which were remarkably improved to B r of 1.05 T, H c of 130 kA/m and (BH) max of 61.6 kJ/m 3 with 41Fe-28Cr-23Co-3Mo-2V-1Zr-2Y alloy.© 2019 As the emerging ambient low-cost magnetic refrigeration system, the substitution effects on the magnetic properties and magnetocaloric effects in Al 1− x Si x Fe 2 B 2 (x = 0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3) and Al 1− y Ga y Fe 2 B 2 (y = 0.1 and 0.2) have been studied. The single phase is formed in a wide substitution composition region. All phase transitions in these compounds are of second-order and their Curie temperature (T c ) increases with more Si and Ga substitutions. For a field change of 5 T and 7 T, the maximum of entropy change (ΔS max ) of 4.9 J Kg −1 K −1 and 6.3 J Kg −1 K −1 are obtained and not dependent on the Si substitution amount in Al 1− x Si x Fe 2 B 2 . As comparison, by Ga substitution, for the field change of 7 T and 5 T, the ΔS max have been increased to 7.5 J Kg −1 K −1 and 6 J Kg −1 K −1 respectively. The tunable ambient T c and considerable ΔS max suggest that AlFe 2 B 2 -based compounds are potential low-cost ambient magnetic refrigeration candidates.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. This study deals with different magnetic additives based on ferrites (MnZn, LaCa (Co and Ti)), carbonyl iron (CI), and iron filaments (IF) formulated in epoxy resin. Morphological and structural characteristics of the additives were evaluated. Based on these additives samples with both different thickness and weight fractions (1–70 wt%) were prepared. The formulated composites were analyzed considering different electromagnetic characteristics: reflectivity, shielding effectiveness, the complex parameters of dielectric permittivity (ε) and magnetic permeability (µ), and the corresponding loss tangents in the microwave X-band. Scanning electron microscopy assisted with energy-dispersive spectrometry (SEM-EDS) analyses show that the additives have different morphologies, with varied sizes, shapes, and compositions. X-ray diffraction (XRD) analyses allowed determining the structural phases of the magnetic additives: CI and IF are constituted by Fe-α phase, the ferrite of MnZn has an unique phase, and the two ferrites of LaCa-Co and LaCa-Ti have the same phase in the presence of different metallic oxides. In general, the complex parameters of ε and µ increased with the additive concentration increase in the composites, as expected, considering the magnetic characteristics of all additives studied. Reflectivity measurements show different attenuation values with promising results for composites based on CI, IF, and MnZn ferrite. The composites based on the ferrites show the worst performance on the reflectivity measurements. The shielding effectiveness measurements show good results (20 dB) over the entire X-band for specimens based on the LaCa-Co ferrite. In this case, the dominant shielding mechanism is due to the multiple scattering (SE M ) in the material.© 2019 A variety of triangular wavelike FeNi films have been obtained on the annealed single-crystalline Al 2 O 3 substrate by magnetron sputtering and photolithography. Nanoscale patterns and microscale stripes in double-layer FeNi nanofilm have also been studied. Properties relating to the morphology, and static and dynamic magnetic properties of materials were measured by AFM, SEM, vibrating sample magnetometers, and vector network analyzers. The surface of the annealed sample was wavy, and its wavelength and peak were 80 nm and 15.4 nm, respectively. Lithography formed 15-μm-wide lines on the surface. Compared with nano-scale patterns, the micro-scale stripes, and overlay patterns, f r increased to 4.5 GHz after superposition and FeNi was used as a soft magnetic material. H c should have been small but, after superimposing the pattern, increased significantly. H c along the easy axis increased to 18 Oe and that along the hard axis to 50 Oe. This was related to the coupling effect of the multilayer film.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The interfaces between different materials in multisegmented nanowires act as pinning centers for domain walls, making these nanowires attractive materials for 3D memory devices. Here, the switching events which accompany a domain wall pinning and depinning in two-segmented Co/Ni nanowires with 80 nm in diameter have been simulated for various segment lengths, using the MAGPAR package within the Virtual Micromagnetics environment. Different switching mechanisms of the magnetization were found for nanowires with different segment lengths, contributing to different values of the pinning and depinnning fields. Domain wall pinning is caused by the stray field from the Co segment; therefore, the position of the pinned domain wall depends on the cobalt segment's length: in case of the smaller segment lengths, the domain wall is pinned at the interface itself, whereas in case of 700 nm segments a 150 nm displacement of the pinned domain wall from the interface is found, consistent with experimental reports. Domain wall pinning is manifested as a plateau in the magnetization curve. In case of nanowires with shorter segments, another plateau is observed that is related to the creation of a magnetic vortex structure. These findings are crucial towards determining the minimum segment length to achieve a higher bit density that displays optimal pinning and depinning fields.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Investigation regarding magnetic nanoparticles suspensions and their flow characteristics and the application prospects is active research area. Especially the biomedical utilizations and analysis about rheological aspects of such materials acquired great motivation. Magneto nanoparticles has meaningful impact on magneto-viscous behavior of ferroliquids which lead to stable viscosity alterations and manifestation of viscoelastic properties in fluids. Keeping such significance of ferroliquids in view our interest here is to elaborate nonlinear radiation impact in stretching flow subject to magnetic dipole. Rheological relations of Carreau material are employed for flow formulation. Buongiorno nanoliquid model elaborating thermophoretic and Brownian movement characteristics is employed for modeling and analysis. Besides the heat generation and viscous dissipation aspects are also accounted. The well-known Shooting scheme is implemented to compute the nonlinear systems. Impacts of sundry variables are described through graphical outcomes and numeric data. Our results reveal decay in velocity field subjected to larger ferrohydrodynamic interaction variable whereas thermal field increments when ferrohydrodynamic interaction variable is increased.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Copper ferrite (CuFe 2 O 4 ) nanoparticles were synthesized by sol–gel auto combustion method using cow-urine as a chelating agent. The obtained ferrite nanoparticles are heat treated at different temperatures (450 °C and 750 °C) in order to study their size dependent structural and magnetic properties. Energy Dispersive X-ray (EDX) spectra showed the maintenance of stoichiometry of elemental composition of ferrite system. Secondary phases of CuO and α-Fe 2 O 3 are identified from the X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns and these phases seem to be reducing with the heat treatment improving the ferrite phase of the sample. A systematic variation of structural parameters that is decrease of lattice parameter (8.379–8.369 Å) and increase in average crystallite size (13.7–18.2 nm) have been found with the heat treatment. The average particle size estimated from Field Emission Scanning Electron Microscopy (FE-SEM) micrographs (14.5–22.3 nm) is slightly bigger than the average crystallite size estimated from XRD is due to the coalescence of crystallites which can be identified in FE-SEM micrographs. The obtained vibrational frequencies in the range of 550–450 cm −1 confirm the ferrite phase of copper ferrite. The splitting observed at the octahedral vibrational band is assigned to the secondary phase of α-Fe 2 O 3 . The saturation magnetization (Ms) is increasing with the heat treatment and highest value of Ms = 35.4 emu/g was reported. The results are discussed in terms of variation of particle sizes presuming the core–shell interactions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A novel Co 35 Cr 5 Fe 20 Ni 20 Ti 20 high entropy alloy (HEA) is synthesized through mechanical alloying (MA). The synthesized HEA is comprised of mixture of FCC and BCC phases and exhibits soft magnetic properties with M s = 46 emu/g and H c = 15 Oe. After annealing at 200 °C, the value of Ms is increased approximately two times and coercivity remains the same to as synthesized HEA. The found value of Ms (81 emu/g) is the highest value of Ms for the CoCrFeNiTi-based HEA, reported so far.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents an extensive characterization and modeling of a commercial 28-nm FDSOI CMOS process operating down to cryogenic temperatures. The important cryogenic phenomena influencing this technology are discussed. The low-temperature transfer characteristics including body-biasing are modeled over a wide temperature range (room temperature down to 4.2 K) using the design-oriented simplified-EKV model. The trends of the free-carrier mobilities versus temperature in long and short-narrow devices are extracted from dc measurements down to 1.4 K and 4.2 K respectively, using a recently-proposed method based on the output conductance. A cryogenic-temperature-induced mobility degradation is observed on long pMOS, leading to a maximum hole mobility around 77 K. This work sets the stage for preparing industrial design kits with physics-based cryogenic compact models, a prerequisite for the successful co-integration of FDSOI CMOS circuits with silicon qubits operating at deep-cryogenic temperatures.© 2019 Exchange coupled hard/soft nanocomposite ferrites consist of BaFe 12 O 19 / Ni 0.5 Zn 0.5 Fe 2 O 4 (BaM/NZFO) in 70/30 wt ratio were prepared by sol–gel auto combustion method. Effect of annealing temperature (950 °C–1150 °C) on structural, magnetic and microwave properties have been investigated. The X-ray diffraction pattern confirms co-existence of both BaM and NZFO phases without any secondary phase. TEM micrographs showed well distinguished particles of BaM and NZFO with different symmetry. Saturation magnetization (M s ) increased from 58 emu/g to 65 emu/g with drastic decrease in coercivity (H c ). Higher M s and low H c than theoretical calculated values suggested that phases are well exchange coupled. A sharp Curie temperature (473 °C) for the composite was observed. The variation in M s and H c demonstrated that annealing temperature has strong influence on exchange coupling. Reflection losses in K u -band were found to increase with a maximum value of −38 dB for the composite annealed at 1050 °C. Loss frequency also shifted toward lower values as a consequence of annealing temperature and exchange coupling.© 2019 Elsevier LtdUpcoming mass production of energy efficient spin-transfer torque magnetoresistive random access memory will revolutionize microelectronics by introducing non-volatility not only in memory but also in logic. The pressing issue is to boost the sensing margin by improving the tunneling magnetoresistance ratio. We demonstrate that spin-dependent trap-assisted tunneling in magnetic tunnel junctions can increase the tunneling magnetoresistance ratio. The impact of spin decoherence and relaxation on the current and shot noise at trap-assisted hopping is investigated in both normal contact-trap-ferromagnet and ferromagnet-trap-ferromagnet systems. In addition, our approach resolves a controversy between the two theoretical approaches to spin-dependent trap-assisted tunneling available in literature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A thorough theoretical study of the spinel Co 3 O 4 compound subjected to pressures from 0 to 30 GPa has been performed by using density functional theory and by probing different exchange-correlation (XC) potentials to depict the experimental facts. It is found that GGA-PBE XC functional correctly describes the structural properties of the antiferromagnetic normal-spinel phase at P = 0, while the Becke-Johnson XC potential correctly describes its electronic structure and the gap of 0.76–0.82 eV, reported in the most recent experimental studies. It is concluded that the inverse-spinel phase does not form within the investigated pressure range. Instead, it is found that the Co 3 O 4 exhibits a phase transition at the pressure of 10.7 GPa, maintaining its global crystal structure but exhibiting different local structural characteristics (Co–O bond lengths, oxygen positions) and changing its electronic and magnetic properties. At this pressure, the band gap exhibits a sudden drop and the magnetic moment of the tetrahedral Co completely disappears, so the compound undergoes a phase transition from normal-spinel antiferromagnetic phase to spinel non-magnetic phase. While electronic and magnetic properties of the Co 3 O 4 under pressure were not investigated experimentally yet, its pressure dependent structural properties agree well with the most recent experimental study.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nanostructured ferromagnetic materials are applicable in a broad range of technologies, especially in the areas of data storage and spintronics. In addition, special structures are of high interest in basic research, aiming at understanding magnetization reversal processes on the nano-scale and thus possibly creating new applications. The strong influence of the shape anisotropy in magnetic nanoparticles enables tailoring magnetization reversal processes by the shape of such a particle. Typically, symmetrical structures are investigated, such as nano-dots, doughnuts, squares, rectangles, etc. Here we report on spiral nano-structures with constantly varying bending radii, modelled according to the Fibonacci spiral which is well-known from diverse plants and biological processes and also related to many mathematical problems. The magnetic Fibonacci nano-spirals with a thicker and a thinner lateral structure size as well as a mirrored form, building a heart-like shape, show large numbers of steps in the hysteresis loops, corresponding to stable intermediate states, due to nucleation and annihilation of domains which do not propagate along the spirals. The numbers of these stable intermediate states which could be utilized for data storage as well as the coercive fields depend strongly on the spiral dimensions and the orientation of the external magnetic field. Simulating minor loops showed the high stability of the intermediate states and thus underlined the possibility to use such structures for data storage.© 2019 Elsevier LtdPrior work on Silicon Carbide (SiC) power devices has been silent on the exact procedure to be employed for designing the Floating Field Rings (FFRs) meant for raising avalanche breakdown voltage of these devices. On the other hand, prior procedures for designing FFRs in Si devices do not work for kV range breakdown associated with SiC devices, and employ 10’s of μm long rings. We propose a systematic procedure for deriving the number and spacing of the FFRs of any ring length required for achieving an arbitrary breakdown voltage. The procedure can be adapted to implement any one of the ring spacing strategies, namely - constant, decreasing or increasing as one moves outward from the main junction. The procedure is demonstrated for the linearly increasing ring spacing case using TCAD simulations, considering 1.7–5.5 kV 4H-Silicon Carbide devices and a 700 V Si device reported in literature. The FFR structures resulting from our procedure are found to have a total length which is 24.5–75% of that published in literature, and breakdown voltage which is more than 92% of the plane parallel value.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We have studied the charge distribution in the γ-Fe 2 O 3 interface with H 2 O, for two different structures (films and spherical nanoparticles) with Density functional (DFT) molecular dynamics calculations. Our results show that the adsorption energy depends on the shape of the surface and in the case of the films also on the orientation of the crystal and that the ionic state of iron atoms increases with the addition of water in both structures while the magnetic moments of the structures do not show any significant change. The mean displacement of the charge with temperature is significant only in the spherical nanoparticles. The average electrostatic potential decreases with the addition of water and shows an oscillatory behavior near the surface..© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The effect of a 1.5 nm thick CoX layer (CAP) of high Curie temperature T C , deposited on top of an L1 0 Fe 50 Pt 50 layer (MAG) on the properties of the MAG/CAP bilayer is investigated. Two series of samples are studied: “w/o CAP” are single MAG layers of thickness in the 3.8–10.5 nm range and “w/CAP” are MAG/CAP bilayers of MAG thickness in the 3.8–10.5 nm range and 1.5 nm CAP. For both series, magnetization reversal is investigated at T RT = 300 K and is shown to be coherent rotations up to a MAG thickness threshold of t cr ∼ 7.5 nm and incoherent, domain-wall mediated, above t cr . The dependence of dH RC /dT T=T C , where H RC is the remanence coercivity, on the MAG thickness indicates t cr is poorly dependent on temperature from T RT up to the MAG T C . The MAG T C distribution, of average 〈T C 〉 and standard deviation σ TC , is evaluated for both series. The results indicate 〈T C 〉 is higher and σ TC /〈T C 〉 is lower w/CAP than w/o, particularly at low MAG thicknesses. This behavior is interpreted as a consequence of spin exchange hardening in the MAG layer in the proximity of the MAG/CAP interface. For the w/CAP case, the saturation field of the Thermoremanent magnetization exhibits a non-motononic dependence on the MAG thickness, displaying a maximum. This behavior indicates the CAP assists the applied field to set the MAG layer magnetization during a HAMR process, the assist effect becoming more efficient the lower is the MAG thickness.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Anomalous deposition of multi-element nanowires continuously interests scientists to study such a system. In this paper, two types of magnetic nanowires were electrodeposited: multilayered and alloy-like. Fe-Co and Fe-Ni nanowires with various relative molar ratio were prepared by DC electrodeposition in aluminum oxide matrix, with a mean pore diameter of 140 ± 20 nm. The nanostructures were investigated in two states: released and within the matrix, using the following techniques: Scanning Electron Microscopy, Energy Dispersive X-ray spectroscopy, X-ray diffraction, Infrared, and Mössbauer spectroscopy. The Scanning Electron Microscopy showed that the length of Fe-(Co, Ni) nanowires is of the order of 3 µm and the diameter determined by the pores of the anodic aluminum oxide templates. The X-ray diffraction and Mössbauer spectroscopy also showed that the fabrication method allows for the obtainment of both multilayered as well as alloyed nanowires with tunable magnetic properties which depend on both the elements’ relative ratio and its ordering. The magnetic texture observed by Mössbauer measurements demonstrated the almost random distribution of magnetic moments of iron in the studied samples which are rather unusual in layered systems.© 2019We describe here recent work on the electronic properties, magnetoexcitons and valley polarised electron gas in 2D crystals. Among 2D crystals, monolayer MoS2 has attracted significant attention as a direct-gap 2D semiconductor analogue of graphene. The crystal structure of monolayer MoS2 breaks inversion symmetry and results in K valley selection rules allowing to address individual valleys optically. Additionally, the band nesting near Q points is responsible for enhancing the optical response of MoS2.We show that at low energies the electronic structure of MoS2 is well approximated by the massive Dirac Fermion model. We focus on the effect of magnetic field on optical properties of MoS2. We discuss the Landau level structure of massive Dirac fermions in the two non-equivalent valleys and resulting valley Zeeman splitting. The effects of electron-electron interaction on the valley Zeeman splitting and on the magneto-exciton spectrum are described. We show the changes in the absorption spectrum as the self-energy, electron-hole exchange and correlation effects are included. Finally, we describe the valley-polarised electron gas in WS2 and its optical signature in finite magnetic fields.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic energy of nanorings with variable anisotropy along their radius have been studied using analytical calculations and micromagnetic simulations. Based on the geometric characteristics of nanorings, four magnetic states are considered, looking to the relatively lower energy magnetization configuration as a function of anisotropy and geometry. Analytical phase diagrams with these states are presented showing that changes in the anisotropy yield the appearance of new magnetic states, here called meron and knot-like states, appear. Nevertheless, micromagnetic simulations evidence that the knot-like state can be interpreted as a vortex configuration with a magnetization that rotates around the border of the ring. The possibility of obtaining new magnetic states is interesting as from fundamental as from applied viewpoint.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe thoroughly compare the DC electrical behavior of n-MOS transistors based on Si nanowires with 〈100〉 and 〈110〉 channel orientations by means of Multi-Subband Ensemble Monte Carlo simulations. We find that the drain current depends on the nanowire diameter and it is slightly, but consistently, larger for 〈100〉 than for 〈110〉 nanowires. The observed differences in mobility, velocity and spatial charge distribution are interpreted in terms of the effective masses and populations of the different Si conduction band valleys, whose sixfold degeneracy is lifted by quantum confinement in narrow nanowires. Finally, we study the scaling behavior for channel lengths down to 8 nm, concluding that the differences observed between orientations are minimal.© 2019 Elsevier LtdQuantum drift diffusion corrections, models for the one- and two-dimensional density of states, a non-local model for source-to-drain tunneling, and a simple ballistic mobility model are jointly used to simulate IDVGS-characteristics of scaled III-V-channel nFETs. The sub-threshold swing of double-gate ultra-thin-body and gate-all-around nanowire geometries are extracted for different gate lengths, and the semi-classical results are compared with those from the quantum transport simulator QTx. The low-dimensional density of states in combination with the ballistic mobility yields an overall good agreement with the QTx transfer curves after the onset of inversion and decreases ION by two orders of magnitude in comparison to the simulation with a large diffusive mobility. It is shown that source-to-drain tunneling sets a limit to scaling at a gate length of about 10 nm due to the degradation of the sub-threshold swing. Simulating this effect with a low-dimensional density of states reveals inconsistencies. They are attributed to the tunneling model, which had been derived for a three-dimensional electron gas.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this work, Ni-Co-Mn-Ti ferromagnetic shape memory alloy thin films, which consists of all 3d metals, are well prepared by direct-current (DC) double targets magnetron co-sputtering method. The deposition temperature (DT) dependence of microstructure and magnetic properties is studied in these thin films. The elemental compositions of these thin films are almost invariable, while the average grain size increases with the increasing DT. Micro-morphology shows that the crystal grains of films are spherical and homogeneous. For the samples deposited at 523 K and 573 K, an unusual magnetization reversal behavior is observed at ∼342 K and ∼225 K, respectively, in the thermomagnetic curves at the applied field μ 0 H = 1 T. Meanwhile, the hysteresis loops at ambient temperature demonstrate that in Ni-Co-Mn-Ti thin films the ferromagnetic contribution increases at the expense of diamagnetic one as DT increases. The reasons for these results are discussed.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, a charge-based analytical model for intrinsic capacitances in tunnel field-effect transistors (TFETs) is presented. The model is derived for a Si Double-Gate (DG) n-TFET whose flexibility is applicable to single-gate or p-type TFETs as well. The model is verified comparing with the TCAD simulations as well as measurements data. Considering the capacitances of fabricated Si planar p-TFETs on Ultrathin Body, some deviations between TCAD simulations, compact model and measurements are observed. Here the effect of Schottky barriers at NiSi2 contacts are analyzed and a theory for the reason associated deviations and the unexpected behavior of intrinsic capacitances is evolved. Furthermore, a technique to include this effect in the aforementioned model is also presented.© 2019 In this paper, the challenge is to investigate the possibility to have the ferromagnetic or/and ferrimagnetic behavior connected to Sn 0.98 Mn 0.02 (O 1-x C x ) 2 system at low concentration (x = 0.02, 0.03, 0.04 and 0.05) at room temperature (RT). We utilized the Korringa-Kohn-Rostoker method combined with the Coherent Potential Approximation (KKR-CPA). The C-doped SnO 2 induced the half-metallic characteristic located on the Fermi level and the presence of the double-exchange coupling type belongs to the ferromagnetic (FM). The Sn 0.98 Mn 0.02 O 2 shows the antiferromagnetic (AFM) stability belongs to super-exchange coupling type. For Sn 0.98 Mn 0.02 (O 1-x C x ) 2 system, we predicted two statements, the presence of the FM stability where (x = 0.03) and the ferrimagnetic stability where (x = 0.02, 0.04, 0.05). The Curie temperature (T C ) can be estimated within the mean field approximation (MFA), our calculations predicted 358.45 K for Sn(O 0.95 C 0.05 ) 2 and 402.26 K for Sn 0.98 Mn 0.02 (O 0.95 C 0.05 ) 2 . The ferrimagnetic materials are useful for many applications.© 2019 Elsevier Ltd An effective and simple approach for gate-recessed normally-off GaN-based MISFETs is proposed to suppress the high temperature induced degradation during low pressure chemical vapour deposition (LPCVD) in gate-recessed normally off GaN-based MISFET. After a N 2 O plasma treatment on GaN channel prior to LPCVD SiN, the LPCVD SiN/GaN MISFET exhibits a maximum drain current of 607 mA/mm, 3 times higher than that without N 2 O plasma pretreatment, a threshold voltage of +1.2 V at I D = 0.1 mA/mm, off-state hard-breakdown voltage of 1348 V with L GD = 20 μm, and gate leakage current below 15 nA/mm in the whole gate swing to +20 V. The interface states characterization in MISFETs show that about 3 times lower interface trap density was achieved in MISFET with N 2 O plasma pretreatment compared to that in SiN x /GaN transistor without such surface treatment.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this study, mixed convection and entropy generation in a square cavity containing nanofluid subjected to magnetic field has been studied. A two-phase model (mixture) was used to simulate Newtonian fluid flow and heat transfer in a cavity with rotating cylinders. The Richardson and Hartman numbers ranges are 1 ≤ Ri ≤ 100 and 0 ≤ Ha ≤ 30 respectively. The laminar, two-dimensional (2D), steady and Newtonian flows are assumptions that are considered in this study. The angle of cavity (θ) and dimensionless angular velocity of cylinders (Ω) ranges are 0° ≤ θ ≤ 90° and −3 ≤ Ω ≤ −1 respectively. The effect of insulation and isothermal (T = T c ) cylinders on the flow field and heat transfer has been investigated. The distribution of nanoparticles inside the cavity for different Hartman numbers and Richardson numbers also is investigated. In addition, the effect of the presence of the cylinder on the cavity in stationary and rotating states on the flow field and the increase of the heat transfer rate has been studied. Average and local Nusselt number in terms of Hartman numbers, volume fractions, angles of cavity, isothermal (and adiabatic of cylinders) and angular velocity of cylinders were obtained. The effect of the magnetic field intensity on total entropy generation has been investigated. It's found that by reducing Hartmann number, reducing Richardson number and increasing volume fraction, heat transfer will increase. The presence of the cylinder and its angular velocity also improve the heat transfer. In addition, isothermal cylinders will have a great effect on increasing heat transfer.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The role of excess Ni in Ni 2+x Mn 1−x Sn (x = 0.05, 0.1) Heusler alloys has been reported using temperature dependent magnetic Compton spectroscopy. The experimental Compton profiles from magnetic electrons have been analyzed to quantify the contribution of Mn 3d electrons, Ni sites and sp-electrons in building-up the total spin moments. The experimentally deduced spin momentum densities, total and element-specific spin moments are examined using theoretical investigations within the spin polarized relativistic Korringa-Kohn-Rostoker method. The build-up of spin moments has been explored in terms of total and projected density of states. Site-dependent Ni magnetic moment is also discussed. Heisenberg exchange coupling parameters are also computed to study the change in Ruderman-Kittel-Kasuya-Yosida type exchange interaction on increasing Ni concentration in the Ni-Mn-Sn system.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The Cr doped hematite (α-Fe 1.4 Cr 0.6 O 3 ) system has been prepared by chemical route. The chemical routed sample has been thermally annealed at different temperatures in the range 800–1000 °C to study modified lattice structure and magnetic spin order. The present Cr doped hematite samples do not exhibit Morin transition, a typical temperature that marks spin orientation from in-plane spin to out of plane directions in hematite system. A distinct change in magnetic properties has been seen by increasing the annealing temperature. The sample prepared by annealing at 800 °C showed superparamagnetic blocking of particles below 38 K. Ac susceptibility data have been used to study the mechanism of spin dynamics around the blocking temperature. Such blocking behaviour of particles is not observed in the samples annealed at 900–1000 °C. The modified spin order in the samples has been understood by using core-shell model of antiferromagnetic particles. Mössbauer spectra of the samples have confirmed a transformation of the spin order with the increase of annealing temperature and support the features observed from dc magnetic measurements.© 2019 Elsevier LtdQuantum computing promises to solve problems, which are impossible for classical computers. Among the different schemes of how to design a quantum computer, one particularly exotic version has raised a lot of attention lately. Although so-called topological quantum computing is a rather young concept, it promises to reduce the required overhead of physical quantum bits per logical quantum bit by a factor of 100–1000, due to an intrinsic protection against certain quantum errors. Once the fundamental mechanism – braiding of Majorana zero modes – is demonstrated, the topological scheme could become the most promising in terms of scalability. This article offers a short introduction to the topological concept and also aims to review the latest developments and efforts in this rapidly evolving field. In addition to this, it discusses different platforms for experimental realization of topologically protected devices. One particularly promising platform might evolve when in-situ fabrication techniques are applied to magnetically doped topological insulators. As a result, it should become possible to fabricate high fidelity Majorana devices for quantum computational tasks in a scalable fashion.© 2019 The magnetic properties of Pd–Co alloys and their hydrides were investigated. From the temperature dependences of magnetization of Pd–Co alloys, simple ferromagnetic behaviors were observed, and the Curie temperatures are estimated to be 220, 315, and 350 K for Pd 0.96 Co 0.04 , Pd 0.92 Co 0.08 , and Pd 0.90 Co 0.10 , respectively. The Pd–Co alloys were hydrogenated under 100 kPa hydrogen gas pressure. After hydrogenation, the temperature variations of magnetization revealed two magnetic transitions implying that there are two phases in the hydrogenated Pd–Co: the hydrogen dissolution and hydride phases. The hydrogen contents ([H]/[Pd–Co]) and the Curie temperature (T C ) of the hydride phase are deduced that [H]/[Pd–Co] = 0.53, 0.43 and 0.36 with T C = ≤50, 100 and 120 K for Pd 0.96 Co 0.04 , Pd 0.92 Co 0.08 , and Pd 0.90 Co 0.10 hydrides, respectively. The magnetization against externally applied field measured at 50 and 300 K indicated that the magnetic moments per a single ion (Pd, Co) of the hydrides are always smaller than those of the original Pd–Co alloys. First principle calculations for the magnetic moments provided quite consistent results with the experimental ones.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Materials having strong coupling between different degrees of freedom such as spin, lattice, orbital, and charge are of immense interest due to their potential device applications. Here, we have stabilized the 9R phase of BaMnO 3 , by Sr (Ti) doping in the Ba (Mn) site using solid-state route at ambient pressure, which otherwise requires high-pressure conditions to synthesize. Crystal structure, phonon spectra, and their evolution with temperature are investigated using X-ray diffraction and Raman spectroscopic techniques. Temperature-dependent magnetization data reveal an antiferromagnetic transition at around (T N =) 262 K and 200 K for Ba 0.9 Sr 0.1 MnO 3 and BaMn 0.9 Ti 0.1 O 3 , respectively. No structural phase transition or lattice instabilities are observed in the measured temperature range (80–400 K) for both the compounds. We have observed anomalous behaviour of four different phonon modes involving Mn/O-vibrations at low temperatures which have been attributed to spin-phonon coupling.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Magnetic hyperthermia has received much attention during the last decade due to its implementation in cancer treatment. Recently, functionalized superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPION) emerged as a strong alternative adjuvant treatment approach, which complements conventional methods such as chemotherapy. In this study, we demonstrate the anticancer effect of Poly(acrylic acid)-coated, anti-HER2-tagged SPIONs on breast cancer cells using a low magnetic field strength of 0.8 kAm −1 , which is significantly lower compared to the literature, with a frequency of 400 kHz. Specificity was achieved via anti-HER2 antibody attachment to nanoparticles. HER2-positive SKBR3 and MDA-MB-453 cell lines internalized the nanoparticles successfully. These nanoparticles, which were not toxic to these cell lines, led to a prominent decrease in cell proliferation and survival in MDA-MB-453 cells when subjected to hyperthermia. Therefore, the hyperthermia-targeted SPION approach could be developed as a potential cancer treatment approach against breast cancer and possible other cancer types.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this work, the increase on the filament conductivity during the 1st Reset operation, by using the incremental step pulse with verify algorithm, is investigated in HfO2-based 1T1R RRAM devices. A new approach is proposed in order to explain the increase of conductivity by highlighting the crucial roles played by both metal-oxide interfaces. The top metal-oxide interface (HfO2-x/TixOy) plays a role in the forming operation by creating a strong gradient of oxygen vacancies in the hafnium oxide layer. The bottom metal-oxide interface (TixOyNz/HfO2-x) also creates oxygen vacancies, which strengthen the conductive filament tip near to this interface at the beginning of the 1st Reset, leading to the reported conductivity increase. After the 1st Reset operation the conductive filament stabilizes at the bottom interface suppressing this behavior in the subsequent reset operations. By modifying the programming parameters and the temperature, it was confirmed a constant current increase of about 9 μA during the 1st Reset regardless the operation conditions imposed.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper reports an improved method for estimating the thermal resistance of a MOSFET device using the inverse of the transistor efficiency as a function of the power applied to the transistor's channel. This method was deduced considering that the main effect of the self-heating is on the carriers’ mobility, where the temperature dependency, vertical/lateral field degradation and saturation velocity were taken into account. After performing the analytical considerations, the method was validated through numerical simulations to verify if its results were compatible with other traditional pulsed-like method for the thermal resistance extraction. This improved method was applied experimentally to attest its robustness. The advantages of this method are the use of DC measurements only and differences smaller than 10 K in the estimation of the absolute channel temperature due to the self-heating effect compared to a traditional pulsed-like method for the UTBB SOI studied in this work.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The coercivity of Nd-Fe-Al amorphous ferromagnetic materials originates from the combination of magnetic interaction and strong pinning of domain walls. Using Nd 60 Fe 30 Al 10 alloys made under three cooling rates, we discovered an important microstructure parameter that can be used to strengthen interaction and pinning. By tuning the variations of composition difference between Nd-rich and Fe-rich amorphous regions, we enhanced the magnetic interaction and increased maximum restoring force per pin of Nd nanocrystals (with size <30 nm embedded in amorphous matrix). We were, however, not able to change pinning force by changing the grain morphology and the size of Nd nanocrystals (<30 nm).© 2019 Elsevier LtdWith the gate length shrinking to a few tens of nanometers, junctionless double-gate field-effect transistors (JL DG FETs) have become widely studied. In the subthreshold region, the electrical characteristics of JL DG FETs are sensitive to device parameters such as channel length, channel thickness, oxide thickness, doping concentration, and whether there are source/drain (S/D) extension regions or not. Therefore, it is essential for device engineers to develop compact models to run circuit simulations. In this paper, a compact JL DG FET model including S/D extension regions in the subthreshold region is proposed. Based on the superposition of the 1D Poisson equation and the 2D Laplace equation, the potential model is developed with and without S/D extension regions. Moreover, the subthreshold current, subthreshold slope, threshold voltage, and the drain induced barrier lowering are extracted without numerical iteration. The modeling results were verified with an ATLAS TCAD simulator and compared with a conventional undoped DG FET. We showed that the JL DG FET using the proposed compact model has better short-channel characteristics than the undoped DG FET with S/D extension regions, and we recommend that the doping concentration in the JL DG FET should be lighter for better subthreshold characteristics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The magnetic properties and AC heating characteristics of Ni 1-x Zn x Fe 2 O 4 nanoparticles were investigated. Magnetization measurements conducted on various sample compositions revealed that the magnetization of the nanoparticles was maximum for x = 0.75 sample. Ni 0.25 Zn 0.75 Fe 2 O 4 nanoparticles were exposed to plasma for 30 min. The resultant, magnetization (M), blocking temperature (T B ), superparamagnetic transition temperature (T m ), heating temperature, and specific absorption rate (SAR) of Ni 0.25 Zn 0.75 Fe 2 O 4 nanoparticles before and after plasma treatment showed that the plasma treatment enhanced the magnetic and thermal properties. To determine the improved characteristics in more detail, we obtained Mössbauer spectra at various temperatures. Analysis of the Mössbauer spectra of Ni 0.25 Zn 0.75 Fe 2 O 4 nanoparticles revealed two sets of six lines for tetrahedral (A) and octahedral (B) sites. Also, Mössbauer spectra with an external field up to 1 T were performed and the spin canting angles in Ni 0.25 Zn 0.75 Fe 2 O 4 before and after plasma treatment were determined.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetoelastic lap-shear behaviors of isotropic magnetorheological (MR) elastomers containing different concentration of silicon oil were investigated under a gradient magnetic field produced by a permanent magnet. Taking into account the elastic property of matrix material and the interaction between the magnetized particles and external magnetic field, an extended theoretical model to qualitatively elucidate the magnetoelastic shear responds of this kind of magnetoactive composites was proposed. Results show that the shear modulus of the isotropic MR elastomer is markedly enhanced with increasing magnetic field, but declined with an increase of the concentration of silicon oil in compound sample. The magnetoelastic performances, such as magnetic-field induced modulus, magnetorheological effect, etc., are strongly dependent on the axial magnetic field gradient. The lower gradient of the applied magnetic field leads to more significant reinforcing effect than the higher one, mainly because there is more magnetic energy input per unit volume. It can be concluded form the comparison between theoretical modeling and experimental results that the model can well describe the magnetoelastic properties of MR elastomers in different conditions. The effect of particle volume fractions, matrix's elasticity coefficient and gradient of magnetic field on magnetorheological effect of MR elastomers is presented as well. The results might be able to provide some basic guidelines for design and optimization of practical application of related projects.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The paper presents the proportions of the reversible and the irreversible magnetization processes along DC hysteresis loops of selected soft magnetic composite materials (Somaloy 700, also mixed with Vitrovac 6155 and Fe-phenolformaldehyde resin composites), obtained from the differential and the reversible permeability measurements. The magnetization reversal was described along minor hysteresis loops with different maximum inductions. The influence of ferromagnetic filler content, particle size distribution and ferromagnetic component type (selected) on the magnetization processes proportions was analysed, as well as the relations between these proportions and magnetic properties (coercive field, total energy losses and maximum permeability) were found.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We have carried out detailed structural, magnetic and thermal properties studies of the Mn(Se, S) system. The detailed structural studies using synchrotron X-ray and neutron diffractions on MnSe confirm the coexistence of cubic and hexagonal phases at low temperature, which shows strong thermal hysteresis suggesting the first-order nature of the transition. Based on the temperature-dependent magnetic susceptibility, we confirmed that the substitution of the sulfur element to selenium critically modified the complex magnetism observed in MnSe. It was to our surprise to observe a magnetic anomaly at 16 K way below the antiferromagnetic order that sets at about 160 K in MnS. Our neutron study at low temperature did not reveal any additional magnetic structure below 16 K. However, the specific heat of MnS shows a clear T 1.5 temperature dependence below 16 K, suggesting the possible emergence of a weak ferromagnetic order.© 2019 Elsevier Ltd The effect of a thin pentacene anode buffer layer on the performance of small-molecule organic solar cells (OSCs) was experimentally investigated primarily from morphological and crystallographic viewpoints. The OSC had a structure of indium-tin oxide (ITO, anode)/pentacene (anode buffer)/copper phthalocyanine (CuPc, donor)/fullerene (acceptor)/bathocuproine (cathode buffer)/Ag (cathode). The thin pentacene layer provided an enhanced initial device performance, that is, an increase of 5–29% in the short-circuit current density, resulting in an increase of 10–43% in the power conversion efficiency η p . Atomic force microscopy showed that the roughness of the pentacene surface was large and that this roughness was increased and transferred to the overlaid CuPc surface. X-ray diffraction and near-edge X-ray absorption fine structure spectroscopy analyses showed that the standing-up CuPc crystallite orientation became randomized as the pentacene thickness was increased. The pentacene layer did not bring about the lying-down configuration of CuPc film molecules with respect to the substrate surface. The origin of the increase in η p was the increase in the area between the donor–acceptor interface with enhanced roughness, which brought about an increase in the number of carriers generated at the interface. The reduction of energy barrier height for hole extraction from CuPc to ITO was also a possible reason for the increase in η p .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Fe-based soft-magnetic amorphous and nanocrystalline ribbons made with a single-side fast-cooling process always suffer from the surface crystallization which deteriorates the magnetic properties and inhibits the wide applications. In this study, a static magnetic field assisted melt-spinning process was employed to prepare the typical Fe 84.75 Si 2 B 9 P 3 C 0.5 Cu 0.75 alloy ribbon with an attractive application prospect. According to the comparative investigations of the crystallization behavior, structural evolution process and magnetic properties, it is found that the applied magnetic field can effectively inhibit the formation of compound phases and decrease the size of textured α-Fe grains in the surface layer of the as-spun ribbon. The Fe 84.75 Si 2 B 9 P 3 C 0.5 Cu 0.75 samples made with low purity raw materials and under an optimal field exhibit superior magnetic properties, including a high saturation magnetization (B s ) over 1.82 T, low coercivity (H c ) of 8.5 A/m, high permeability (μ) of 2.76 × 10 4 at 1 kHz and much lower losses, after nanocrystallization by annealing. The apparent effect of the applied magnetic field was discussed from the disturbance of a Lorentz force of the fast-moving molten alloy and a magnetic force of preformed grains in a magnetic field during the melt-spinning process. These results provide a novel solution of surface crystallization and an effective route for improving magnetic properties of Fe-based amorphous and nanocrystalline alloy ribbons.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Magnetic properties and FMR of pulsed laser deposited Y 3 Fe 5 O 12 (YIG) thin film on Gd 3 Ga 5 O 12 (1 1 1) substrate have been investigated in the temperature range 4.2 ≤ T ≤ 300 K. The effective saturation magnetization (4πM eff ), obtained from Ferromagnetic Resonance at room temperature, is found to be 2600 G, which is higher than SQUID measured 4πM S value of 1770 G. This implies that the value of 4πM eff can only be accounted by considering a negative anisotropy field (H U ) of around 830 Oe at room temperature. Such an anisotropy is attributed to a compressive stress (−1.70 × 10 10 dyne/cm 2 ) induced in the film closer to the film-air interface. The presence of this stress in YIG film was confirmed using multiple {hkl} stress measurements with grazing incidence X-ray diffraction performed at different depth of penetration on the YIG film.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe built-in bipolar junction transistor (BJT) of a BIMOS fabricated in 28 nm ultra-thin body and BOX (UTBB) fully-depleted silicon-on-insulator (FD-SOI) high-k metal gate technology is investigated in common-emitter mode and in built-in metal-oxide-semi-conductor field effect transistor (MOSFET) off-state. In the weak VBE regime, field-effects dominate, generating a negative base current and making the current gain β0 meaningless. For VBE high enough, the BJT works normally but with a very low gain below 1.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe innovative contribution of this paper is to derive polarization charges in hexagonal and triangular GaN/InGaN/GaN core/shell/shell nanowire solar cells considering effect of degree of strain relaxation (R) and appropriate stiffness coefficients. The crystal orientation angle, φ and non-linear effect of spontaneous polarization are tailored with strain calculations for a better precision of polarization charges in nanowire type devices. The article also formulated the effect of polarization charges while InGaN layers are grown above or below GaN layer in both types of nanowires depending on the lattice expansion or compression. The model accounts an innovative concept of polarization charges distribution with respect to growth of crystal orientation and strain relaxation. It is observed that nanowire solar cell with triangular geometry could be good enough for efficient generation of power as compared to hexagonal nanowire solar cell. This concept of one triangular nanowire solar cell exhibits an efficiency of 3.18% with 90.34% fill factor under 1 Sun AM1.5 illumination with 20% ‘In’ composition.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe propose for the first time a method based on C-V measurement to extract the bridge doping profile which governs the operation and performance of A2RAM capacitorless memory cell. Assessed with TCAD simulation and simple extraction model adapted from bulk devices, this technique is validated with experimental data.© 2019 Elsevier LtdA Near-Field Scanning Microwave Microscope (NSMM) for the characterization of semiconductor structures has been designed, simulated and fabricated. The present NSMM system is based on a home-made coaxial-cavity resonator which is fed by a Keysight N5242A PNA-X Network Analyzer. The inner conductor of the coaxial resonator is connected to a sharpened tungsten tip, which was fabricated by an electrochemical process. The reflection and transmission coefficients S11, S21, the resonance frequency fr and the quality factor Q of the resonant cavity are measured as the semiconductor structure is scanned by the sharpened probe tip while the sample-tip distance is kept constant in the near-field region. The interaction between the probe tip and the sample under test provides variations of these parameters which are related to the topographical and dielectric properties of a very small region of the material under the probe tip. Thus, a 2D image of the evolution of the S11, S21, fr and Q parameters on the surface of the device under test is obtained. This image can be related to space changes in the topography, dielectric properties and composition of the semiconductor structure.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.• Joint research of structural and magnetic properties of Fe0.89Ga0.11 (Fe-Ga) thin films. • The Fe-Ga samples were grown by magnetron sputtering on glass, Si(1 0 0) and MgO(1 0 0) substrates. • The crystalline texture depends on the substrate and also on the post growth thermal treatment. • By modifying the substrate, it is possible to obtain different degrees of texture. From non-textured to monocrystalline samples. • The magnetic properties are correlated with the structural ones. © 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this work we present a careful study on the relationship between the magnetic and structural properties of a highly magnetostrictive Fe 0.89 Ga 0.11 (Fe-Ga) alloy deposited onto glass, Si and MgO substrates. When grown on glass, the films are polycrystalline with randomly oriented grains without any texture, while the ones on Si and MgO present preferred growth directions. Fe-Ga/Si films show a [1 1 3] fibre-like texture, and Fe-Ga/MgO presents a quasi monocrystalline behavior with the (1 0 0) film plane direction parallel to the substrate surface. When Fe-Ga/MgO films are annealed an additional (1 1 0) texture is also observed. Magnetometry and ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) show that the magnetic behavior is closely related to the structural observed textures. Furthermore, the structural analysis allowed us to get a deeper understanding of the magnetic behavior. This point is very important to get the ability of controlling the crystalline texture by means of growing onto different substrates and/or thermal treatments, which in turns opens the possibility of handling the magnetic texture which is particularly important in magnetostrictive materials for electronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier LtdGDNMOS (Gated Diode merged NMOS) and GDBIMOS (Gated Diode merged BIMOS) were fabricated using the 28 nm node ultra-thin film UTBB FD-SOI high-k metal gate CMOS technology. The anode current and voltage were measured and simulated for a high number of variants with different connectivity conditions on the terminals. The devices are reconfigurable and promising for high voltage ESD protection applications.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper investigates the digital circuit-level performance of an inverter realised with n- and p-type tunnel field-effect transistors (TFETs) integrated on the same InAs/Al0.05Ga0.95Sb tech nology platform in the presence of interface traps and localized strain. The TFET-based inverter is simulated for two different IOFF values, namely 100 nA/μm and 10 pA/μm to target both high-performance and low-power applications. Based on 3D full-quantum simulations, interface traps induce a significant degradation of the voltage gain, noise margin and transient performance despite the better subthreshold slope. The effect of localized strain at the source/channel heterojunction caused by lattice mismatch, while being beneficial in terms of on-current, is unable to recover the circuit-level performance of the ideal case. The device with traps and localized strain is able to outperform the ideal one only in terms of switching transients for IOFF=10 pA/μm.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The present study is devoted to the analysis of the wetting dynamics of ferrofluid droplets on glass substrates presenting different hydrophilicities. By using the sessile drop technique, we investigate how the relaxation dynamics of the contact angle is affected by an external magnetic field. Our results show that the field effects on the shape and contact angle of ferrofluid drops are strongly sensitive to the effective interaction between the carrier liquid and the solid substrate. Considering a spherical cap approximation to the magnetic fluid droplet, we use the molecular-kinetic theory to analyze the time evolution of the contact angle. In particular, we estimate how the magnetic field affects the wetting free-energy and the surface density of adsorption sites. The present results show that the external magnetic field might play a significant role in the wetting dynamics of hydrocarbon-based magnetic droplets by affecting its activation free energy, the surface density of adhesion sites and the equilibrium contact angle. © 2019 Elsevier B.V.• Ferrofluid deformations present a transient behavior during the wetting dynamics. • Magnetowetting dynamics is sensitive to nature of ferrofluid-substrate interaction. • Field contribution to the wetting parameters depends on the substrate hydrophilicity.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The effects of microstructure parameter upon the magnetic properties of anisotropic nanocomposite permanent magnet (ANPM) Pr 2 Fe 14 B/α-Fe were investigated by Micromagnetic finite-element method. The results show that soft magnetic phase filling in the intergranular layer between the hard magnetic phase grains is more favorable for obtaining excellent ANPM Pr 2 Fe 14 B/α-Fe. The maximum energy product ((BH) max ) of ANPM Pr 2 Fe 14 B/α-Fe can reach 762 kJ/m 3 for the ideally oriented magnet with the mean grain size of 5 nm and the intergranular layer thickness of 2 nm. The larger (BH) max mainly derives from the contribution of higher remanence which is ascribed to the intergranular exchange coupling between soft and hard magnetic phase. In addition, the reverse magnetization process of ANPM Pr 2 Fe 14 B/α-Fe has been studied. It is found that the magnetic moments coherently reverse in reversal magnetization process for ANPM Pr 2 Fe 14 B/α-Fe. The study takes the specific composition Pr 2 Fe 14 B/α-Fe as an example, however, the results about reasonable microstructure and demagnetization mechanism are still applicable to ANPM with other different hard and soft magnetic phase materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Acquisition of large coercivity remains as a key issue in MnAl permanent-magnet alloys. In this work, we successfully introduce rhombohedral nanoprecipitates with the size of ∼20 nm into L1 0 MnAl alloys via doping 0.2 at.% Tb and melt spinning technology. The motion of magnetic domain walls can be more effectively pinned by the dispersive nanoprecipitates. This results in an improved coercivity of 5.43 kOe in Tb-0.2 at.% powders which is 22% larger than that of the binary powder without significant degrading in saturation magnetization and magnetocrystalline anisotropy. This work may provide a new method to improve the coercivity in MnAl permanent magnets.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents a study of the impact that several widely used threshold voltage (VT) extraction methods have on semiconductor device variability studies. The second derivative (SD), linear extrapolation (LE) and third derivative (TD) extraction techniques have been compared to the standard method used in variability, the constant current criteria (CC). To estimate the influence of these methods on the results, an ensemble of 10.7 nm gate length Si FinFETs affected by RD variability have been simulated. We have shown that variability estimators like the σVT,〈VT〉 and the VT shift, are heavily affected by the selected extraction methodology, with up to 30% differences in the standard deviation. We have demonstrated that being aware of which VT extraction technique has been used in a variability analysis is crucial to properly interpret the results as they may be heavily method-dependent.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The experimental study of the dynamic magnetic susceptibility of the powder of superparamagnetic nanoparticles of magnetite is presented. The powder has been obtained by removal (evaporation) of the liquid base of the magnetic colloidal solution (ferrofluid). The temperature dependences of the real and imaginary parts of the magnetic susceptibility at different frequencies of the measuring field have been obtained. The experimental findings are compared with the results of the simulations based on the numerical solution of the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation for the interacting superparamagnetic nanoparticles system. The conclusion has been made on the significant influence of the interparticle interactions on the magnetite superparamagnetic nanoparticles powder properties evidenced, in particular, by the decreased effective system relaxation time.© 2019We demonstrate magnetization reversal features in NiFe/IrMn/NiFe thin-film structures with 40% and 75% relative content of Ni in Permalloy in the temperature range from 80 K to 300 K. The magnetization reversal sequence of the two ferromagnetic layers is found to depend on the type of NiFe alloy. In the samples with 75% relative content of Ni, the bottom ferromagnetic layer reverses prior to the top one. On the contrary, in the samples with 40% of Ni, the top ferromagnetic layer reverses prior to the bottom one. These tendencies of magnetization reversal are preserved in the entire range of temperatures. These distinctions can be explained by the morphological and structural differences of interfaces in the samples based on two types of Permalloy.© 2019 In present study, surfactant assisted ball-milling method was applied to prepare SmCo 5 nanoflakes, which were then magnetically aligned and warm compacted with a liquid binder to make bulk anisotropic SmCo 5 bonded magnets. Warm compaction with magnetic-field-assisted liquid phase processing can decrease the viscosity of the binder to enhance the alignment of the magnetic nanoflakes, and thus can produce high density magnets, providing a novel method to fabricate anisotropic bonded magnets. The magnetic properties, microstructure, and crystal alignment of both nanoflakes and bonded magnets are systematically investigated. The X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) characterizations suggest that the obtained liquid phase bonded magnets exhibit enhanced magnetic anisotropy compared with those without magnetic field alignment and the solid phase bonded anisotropic magnets. The remanence of anisotropic phenol formaldehyde (PF) bonded magnets (4.43 kG) is higher than isotropic bonded magnets (3.76 kG), and the energy product of bonded magnets increases from 3.4 MGOe to 4.8 MGOe under the effect of the magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. • Spin fluctuations enhance the maximum of temperature-dependent specific heat in Qpa state. • Suppression and shift of specific heat maximum with increasing transverse magnetic field. • Spin-3/2 TIM better describes CoNb 2 O 6 than spin-1/2 model at high field and high © 2019 Elsevier B.V. The temperature and transverse field dependence of the entropy and the specific heat of ferroics in the quantum paramagnetic (QPa) state is investigated using the transverse Ising model (TIM) with different spin values within mean field and Gaussian spin fluctuation approximations. A maximum peak of the temperature dependence of the specific heat curves is enhanced in the QPa state due to spin fluctuations. This peak shifts to higher temperature region and its magnitude reduces with increasing transverse field. In addition, the temperature corresponding to this maximum depends linearly on the deviation of the transverse field from its critical value. The obtained specific heat qualitatively agrees with the experimental observation for the quasi-one-dimensional (1D) Ising ferromagnet CoNb 2 O 6 in the QPa phase. It is also shown that the spin-1/2 three dimensional (3D) TIM clearly describes the specific heat of CoNb 2 O 6 in the QPa states near the critical temperature. However, the spin-3/2 3D-TIM is more adequate than the spin-1/2 3D-TIM for describing the thermal behavior of CoNb 2 O 6 in the QPa states at high fields and at elevated temperatures.© 2019 A sign reversal of magnetization is observed in Sm 2 CrMnO 6 synthesized via the citrate-gel method. The material crystallizes in monoclinic crystal structure with P121/n1 space group. The presence of Cr 3+ and Mn 3+ cations is confirmed by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy analysis. The transition temperature (T C ) is found to be at 50 K from the thermomagnetic data. The magnetization reverses its sign below a particular temperature under field cooled condition and the effect is reduced and disappeared at higher applied magnetic fields. The combined interaction between different magnetic components due to the presence of Sm 3+ , Cr 3+ , and Mn 3+ leads to the sign reversal of magnetization.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this work, an automatic and flexible measurement setup, which allows a massive electrical characterization of single RRAM devices with pulsed voltages, is presented. The evaluation of the G-V maps under single-pulse test-schemes is introduced as an example of application of the proposed methodology, in particular for neuromorphic engineering, where the fine analog control of the synaptic device conductivity state is required, by inducing small changes in each learning iteration. To describe the obtained data, a time-independent compact model for memristive devices is used. The fitting parameters statistical distributions are further studied.© 2019 Elsevier LtdCharge trapping effects are considered as one of the most severe reliability issues in gallium nitride (GaN)/aluminium gallium nitride (AlGaN) metal-insulator-semiconductor HEMTs (MISHEMTs). Thus, the identification of the origin and the physical properties of active defects is one of the key factors to improve the stability of GaN technology. In this work, we suggest two neighboring nitrogen vacancies as the origin of correlated random telegraph noise (RTN) emissions in a GaN/AlGaN fin-MISHEMT. We determine the magnitude of electrostatic coupling between these two defects by using three different approaches and verify the results by simulating the RTN emissions of a similar system using a Hidden Markov Model (HMM).© 2019 Elsevier B.V. • SrF(Zn 1-2x Mn x Cu x )Sb is a new diluted magnetic semiconductor with highest Tc ∼ 40 K. • Doping only Cu into the parent compound SrFZnSb does not induce any type of magnetic ordering. • The antiferromagnetic interaction inhibits the ferromagnetism in high doping level. • SrF(Zn 1-2x Mn x Cu x )Sb has a negative magneto-resistance effect. © 2019 Elsevier B.V. We report the synthesis and characterization of a new bulk form fluoride-antimonide diluted magnetic semiconductor SrF(Zn 1-2x Mn x Cu x )Sb with ZrCuSiAs-type structure, which is the same quasi-two-dimensional crystal structure as that of 1111-type iron-based superconductors. Doping only Cu into the parent compound SrFZnSb does not induce any type of magnetic ordering. Only when Mn and Cu are codoped into Zn sites, where Mn substitution for Zn and Cu substitution for Zn introduce spins and carriers, respectively, can ferromagnetic ordering form. Bulk form samples SrF(Zn 1-2x Mn x Cu x )Sb with x = 0.05, 0.075, 0.10 and 0.15 exhibit ferromagnetic transition, with highest T C ∼ 40 K for the doping level of x = 0.10. Iso-thermal magnetization measurements show that they have a relatively larger coercive field ∼8000 Oe. The electrical resistivity measurements indicate that SrF(Zn 1-2x Mn x Cu x )Sb DMSs display semiconducting behavior, with the negative magneto-resistance effect up to 27% under 9 T at 2 K.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The structure, microstructure, valence states, non-stoichiometry, dielectric and magnetic properties of lanthanum-modified multiferroics have been studied by X-ray diffraction, thermogravimetric, iodometric titration, SEM, XPS, dielectric spectroscopy and magnetic methods. Multiferroics of bismuth ferrite have been obtained by a rapid liquid phase sintering method under different pressures, P, for compacting stoichiometric mixture of precursors. On the basis of the experimental data, the molar formulas of real BiFeO 3−δ and Bi 0.9 La 0.1 FeO 3−δ structures have been determined. The real structure contains Bi 3+ , La 3+ , Fe 3+ , Fe 2+ and O 2− ions as well as cation V ( c ) and anion V ( a ) vacancies. The optimal temperature regimes of the rapid liquid phase sintering method for obtaining the single-phase Bi 0.9 La 0.1 FeO 3−δ , whose composition corresponds to the concentration region of destruction of a spin cycloid, have been defined. It has been established that oxygen non-stoichiometry δ and concentration of Fe 2+ strongly depend on the pressure P. The initial dielectric permittivity of the Bi 0.9 La 0.1 FeO 3−δ multiferroics can be controlled and changed by the pressure P more than 5000 times. The correlations between the composition, structure, non-stoichiometry, dielectric and magnetic properties in the BiFeO 3−δ and Bi 0.9 La 0.1 FeO 3−δ have been established. In the pure BiFeO 3−δ at room temperature, rhombohedral distortions of a hexagonal structure with indications of a ferromagnetic double exchange have been detected. The magnetic structure of the single-phase Bi 0.9 La 0.1 FeO 3−δ is homogeneous with a large value of coercivity, H C ≥ 10 kOe, at room temperature. An analysis of the magnetic properties indicates the appearance of a weak ferromagnetism due to the destruction of the spin cycloid by lanthanum ions.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis paper presents the extension of proposed physically-based continuous compact analytical model of triple gate junctionless nanowire transistors for accurate description of device electrical characteristics in a wide temperature range from room temperature up to 500 K. The model validation is performed by comparison against tridimensional numerical simulation and experimental data showing very good agreement, with continuous description of drain current and its derivatives in all regions of operation and temperatures.© 2019 Elsevier LtdFeasibility of fabricating plasmonic circuits by complementary metal–oxidesemiconductor (CMOS) compatible processes is presented, and the circuit performances are numerically and experimentally discussed from the viewpoint of operating speed and energy loss. The transmission speed of plasmonic signals, which is governed by the dispersion of circuits, is calculated to be about two orders of magnitude higher than that of electric signals. The energy loss per single transmitted-bit is estimated using shot-noise limits, and it is clarified that plasmonic signals are superior to electric ones if the transmitted distance is set to an area within a few hundred micrometers. Based on these results and the experimental results of each plasmonic components, the feasibility of plasmonic circuits are demonstrated. In addition, the feasibility of the functional expansion of plasmonic circuits, such as wavelength-division-multiplexing networks, is discussed using experimental values of plasmonic components fabricated by CMOS-compatible processes. These plasmonic circuits and networks can be merged into silicon integrated circuits on a silicon substrate using CMOS compatible processes.© 2019 Elsevier LtdCo-doped Si-NCs have been introduced into MIS structures gate dielectric layers. The fabricated test devices were characterized by means of stress-and-sense measurements in terms of device capacitance, flat-band voltage shift, and retention time. Comparison between results for HfOx and SiO2 gate dielectric layers is shown and discussed. Presented findings are promising for possible applications of Si-NCs in memory structures.© 2019 The soft magnetic films (SMFs) using in monolithic microwave integrated circuits (MMICs) are suffered from the lower ferromagnetic resonance frequency f FMR and resistivity. In this study, Fe 0.5 Co 0.5 -ZnO films with high resistivity were fabricated by a compositional gradient sputtering on (0 1 1) lead zinc niobate–lead titanate (PZN-PT) substrates. It is interesting to note that the resistivity of the ZnO-doped Fe 0.5 Co 0.5 films is 10–30 times larger than that of pure Fe 0.5 Co 0.5 films. An ultrahigh f FMR of 10.48 GHz were achieved at electric field of 8 kV/cm without bias magnetic field. The excellent microwave ferromagnetic performances in as-deposited films can be attributed to two reasons: (1) the large uniaxial anisotropy field induced by gradient composition of doping ZnO, (2) the strong magnetoelectric coupling between the ferromagnetic/ferrielectric interfaces under the condition of high resistivity in Fe 0.5 Co 0.5 -ZnO films.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We show by micromagnetic simulations that the magnetization reversal and magnetic spectra can be effectively controlled by patterning a ferromagnet into novel Sierpinski-fractal structure. As the number of iterations increases from 1 to 6, the knees in the hysteresis loop rise from 1 to 27 and the way of magnetization reversal changes. Moreover, the influence of Sierpinski-fractal structure on magnetic spectra increases as the iteration number increases, especially for the fifth- and sixth-iteration films, all the resonant peaks in the magnetic spectra are caused by the fractal structure. A blueshift of the resonance peaks occurs as the number of iterations increases, which is due to the increasing number of corners associated with fractal structures. Temperature has little influence on the hysteresis loop and the magnetization reversal mode for the third-iteration sample, while results in the decrease of the coercivity for the sixth-iteration one. addition, the remanence states of the Sierpinski-fractal structures have a character of self-similarity, typical for fractal structures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. BiFeO 3 is widely known multiferroic compound with high ferroelectric polarization but low magnetization values due to antiferromagnetic ordering. We used allied strategy of particle size reduction and structural modulation to improve the magnetization. Calcium doped Bismuth Ferrite nanoparticles were synthesized by sol-gel route. The Rietveld refinement of X-Ray Diffraction patterns indicates single phase formation with distorted rhombohedral (space group R3c) structure. The average crystallite size varies from 72 nm to 27 nm. The Unit cell volume decreases with increase in Ca concentration. The structural distortion is confirmed by Raman spectra through line width broadening and shifting of phonon frequencies. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy revealed Fe +3 oxidation state and slight shifting of Bi 4f peak indicating the substitution of Ca 2+ at Bi-site. The field dependent magnetization measurements show remnant magnetization up to 0.265 emu/gm and coercivity up to 543 Oe in Ca substituted samples.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The ferromagnetic properties of the double perovskite La 2 NiMnO 6 are governed by the Ni 2+ –O 2− –Mn 4+ superexchange interaction. The Ni 2+ and Mn 4+ valence states along with the antisite disorder strongly influence the magnetic interactions in the compound. Here, we report on the effect of high temperature annealing on the antisite disorder and related properties of La 2 NiMnO 6 . X-ray absorption measurements reveal nominal changes in the local environment around B/B′ sites of all samples. However, saturation magnetization decreases due to increased antisite disorder, which enhances the Ni 2+ –O 2− –Ni 2+ and Mn 4+ –O 2− –Mn 4+ antiferromagnetic exchange interactions. At 5 K, a large saturation moment of ∼4.95 μ B /f.u. is observed for the sample annealed at 950 0 C. For all samples, the ferromagnetic–paramagnetic transition is observed at 280 K, which is attributed to the fact that the Ni–Mn interatomic distance remains constant for all the samples. Our study suggests that the Ni/Mn valency and Curie temperature are insensitive to the antisite disorder present in the system.© 2019 We study the problem of an electron, neutrally charged donor impurity (D 0 ) and acceptor impurity in a two-dimensional (2D) semiconductor quantum dot (SQD) with parabolic potential in the presence of an external magnetic field within the effective-mass approximation by using the numerical matrix diagonalization method. The energy spectrum is calculated for an electron, donor impurity and acceptor impurity as a function of the magnetic field. We find the ground state (GS) magnetic moment (μ gs ) and the GS magnetic susceptibility (χ gs ) of an acceptor impurity system, It only shows zero temperature diamagnetic peaks, but an electron and the donor impurity does not. The position and the number of these zero temperature diamagnetic peaks depend on the strength of the confinement potential(ω 0 ). The binding energies of the few low-lying states are also obtained by directly calculating the energies of an electron and donor impurity and it shows that the donor impurity is stable in a parabolic quantum dot (PQD). The theory is applied to a GaAs PQD.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The influence of a patterned substrate on obliquely deposited, exchange biased Co/CoO films was studied. It was found that substrates decorated with nanoparticle patterns provide the option to manipulate the orientation of the magnetic easy axis in obliquely deposited thin films. The complementary methods of SQUID magnetometry and polarized neutron reflectometry were used to disentangle the different contributions to the magnetic hysteresis of such complex magnetic systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Bundled cobalt ferrites (CoFe 2 O 4 ) nanowires (BNWs) were successfully prepared by nanocasting pathway with ordered mesoporous SiO 2 (SBA-15) templates. The well-dispersed CoFe 2 O 4 nanowires (NW S ) were separated from CoFe 2 O 4 BNWs by centrifugal technology. Microstructure characterization indicated that CoFe 2 O 4 BNWs and NW S possessed the same diameter and similar length. Thus, the influence of surface spins interaction between neighboring nanowires on the magnetic properties could be distinguished and discussed excluding the difference of morphology. Both samples presented ferromagnetism with the wasp-waisted hysteresis loops and the exchange bias effect was observed above 100 K. The surface spins interactions between the neighboring nanowires not only recombined the mismatch spins at the surface to form antiferromagnetic surface, but also inhibited the shape anisotropy of nanowires, leading to the decrease of saturation magnetization and coercivity of CoFe 2 O 4 BNWs. The wasp-waisted hysteresis loops was attributed to the low temperature spin reorientation caused by the inclined spin on the surface of nanowires.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Magnetic skyrmions, being one of the most promising candidates for the next generation memory-type application due to their nanometer-size and efficient current-driven dynamics, are mainly found and studied in alloy helimagnets in which the spin-orbit coupling induced by Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) enables noncollinear spin alignment and skyrmion formation. In this paper, we report a possible finding of skyrmions crystal near room-temperature in centrosymmetric structures perovskite manganite La 0.8 Sr 0.2 MnO 3 (LSMO). Based on the measurements of isothermal magnetization around the Curie temperature (∼298 K), an unusual magnetic behavior of a discontinuous magnetization was observed and existed only at moderate magnetic field region together with a narrow temperature range from 306 to 290 K. Apart from this range, all curves return to conventional magnetic behavior of continuous change with external magnetic field. This characteristic has been frequently observed in some reported helimagnets (such as FeGe, MnSi), implying the possible existence of skyrmions crystal in LSMO. To further unveil the physical origin and underlying mechanisms, we performed the first-principles calculation for LSMO compound and a large DMI (ΔE DMI = 13.46 meV, d 1 = 1.68 meV) was found to exists at the interface of LaMnO 3 /SrMnO 3 layers. This result not only supports our experimental findings in the present composition but also is consistent with the formation mechanism of magnetic skyrmions. © 2019 Elsevier B.V. • The electronic phase separation has been observed in La 0.8 Sr 0.2 MnO 3 . • The state of magnetic skyrmion exists in the temperature region of 290 K–306 K. • A large DM interaction exists in the interface of LaMnO 3 /SrMnO 3 .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. It is well-known that the fraction of surface atoms and the number of defects in an antiferromagnetic particle increase with a decrease in the particle size to tens of nanometers, which qualitatively changes the properties of the particle. Specifically, in antiferromagnetic nanoparticles, spins in the ferromagnetically ordered planes can partially decompensate; as a result, an antiferromagnetic particle acquires a magnetic moment. As a rule, uncompensated chemical bonds of the surface atoms significantly weaken the exchange coupling with the antiferromagnetic particle core, which can lead to the formation of an additional magnetic subsystem paramagnetic at high temperatures and spin-glass-like in the low-temperature region. The existence of several magnetic subsystems makes it difficult to interpret the magnetic properties of antiferromagnetic nanoparticles. It is shown by the example of NiO nanoparticles with an average size of 8 nm that the correct determination of the contributions of the magnetic subsystems forming in antiferromagnetic nanoparticles requires magnetic measurements in much stronger external magnetic fields than those commonly used in standard experiments (up to 60–90 kOe). An analysis of the magnetization curves obtained in pulsed magnetic fields up to 250 kOe allows one to establish the contributions of the uncompensated particle magnetic moment μ un , paramagnetic subsystem, and antiferromagnetic particle core. The μ un value obtained for the investigated NiO particles is consistent with the Néel model, in which μ un ∼ N 1/2 (N is the number of magnetically active atoms in a particle), and thereby points out the existence of defects on the surface and in the bulk of a particle. It is demonstrated that the anomalous behavior of the high-field susceptibility dM/dH of antiferromagnetic NiO nanoparticles, which was observed by many authors, is caused by the existence of a paramagnetic subsystem, rather than by the superantiferromagnetism effect.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn modern nanometer-scale CMOS technologies, time-zero and time-dependent variability (TDV) effects, the latter coming from aging mechanisms like Bias Temperature Instability (BTI), Hot Carrier Injection (HCI) or Random Telegraph Noise (RTN), have re-emerged as a serious threat affecting the performance of analog and digital integrated circuits. Variability induced by the aging phenomena can lead circuits to a progressive malfunction or failure. In order to understand the effects of the mentioned variability sources, a precise and sound statistical characterization and modeling of these effects should be done. Typically, transistor TDV characterization entails long, and typically prohibitive, testing times, as well as huge amounts of data, which are complex to post-process. In order to face these limitations, this work presents a new method to statistically characterize the emission times and threshold voltage shifts (ΔVth) related to oxide defects in nanometer CMOS transistors during aging tests. At the same time, the aging testing methodology significantly reduces testing times by parallelizing the stress. The method identifies the Vth drops associated to oxide trap emissions during BTI and HCI aging recovery traces while removing RTN and background noise contributions, to avoid artifacts during data analysis.© 2019 Elsevier LtdAn analytical model for threshold voltage of Ge dual material gate (DMG) FinFET by self consistently solving 3D Poisson's and 2D Schrödinger's equation is developed. The model includes the quantum effects as well. The potential distribution in the channel region is developed by solving 3D Poisson's equation. The expression for wave function and quantized energy levels are derived by solving 2D Schrödinger's equation. The model for inversion charge is derived by using the expression of quantized energy levels. The threshold voltage model is derived by equating inversion charge with the threshold charge estimated from TCAD simulator. The proposed models are validated with a numerical simulator for a wide range of geometrical parameter and drain bias values.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThis work evaluates the operation of p-type Si0.7Ge0.3-On-Insulator (SGOI) nanowires from room temperature down to 5.2 K. Electrical characteristics are shown for long channel devices comparing narrow Ω-gate to quasi-planar MOSFETs (wide fin width). Analysis is performed starting from basic MOSFET electrical parameters extraction, evidence of quantum transport, transconductance and capacitance step-like behavior. Temperature and fin width influence over mobility results are discussed for uniaxial and biaxial compressive strained SGOI. Results are also compared to unstrained p-type SOI nanowires and effective mobility enhancement for SGOI nanowires is still observed for devices with fin width scaled down to 20 nm. Narrow SGOI NW presents mobility improvement over quasi-planar SGOI structure for all temperature range due to beneficial uniaxial strain over biaxial one. Cryogenic operation of nanowires allowed the dissociation of phonon and surface roughness mobility contributions, which are also discussed in this work. Similar phonon-limited mobility contribution dependence on temperature is obtained for both narrow SGOI and unstrained SOI transistors. In order to provide a complete study on the performance of SGOI nanowires, temperature influence is also investigated over analog parameters for narrow SGOI transistor.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this article, we present a new analytical formulation for calculation of the mutual inductance between two circular filaments arbitrarily oriented with respect to each other, as an alternative to Grover (1944) and Babič et al. (2010) expressions reported in 1944 and 2010, respectively. The formula is derived via a generalisation of the Kalantarov-Zeitlin method, which showed that the calculation of mutual inductance between a circular primary filament and any other secondary filament having an arbitrary shape and any desired position with respect to the primary filament is reduced to a line integral. In particular, the obtained formula provides a solution for the singularity issue arising in the Grover and Babič formulas for the case when the planes of the primary and secondary circular filaments are mutually perpendicular. The efficiency and flexibility of the Kalantarov-Zeitlin method allow us to extend immediately the application of the obtained result to a case of the calculation of the mutual inductance between a primary circular filament and its projection on a tilted plane. Newly developed formulas have been successfully validated through a number of examples available in the literature, and by a direct comparison with the results of calculation performed by the FastHenry software.© 2019Methods for characterization of MOSFET gate overlap capacitances are briefly discussed. Considerations of their shortcomings due to the neglected shortening and/or narrowing of the MOSFET channel in relation to its drawn size have led to development of a new method for a simultaneous extraction of the gate overlap capacitances and of the channel width and length variations. The approach is presented and illustrated using experimental data obtained by C-V measurements of the MOSFETs in a CMOS test structure. The characterization results are compared with the parameters obtained via I-V measurements of the corresponding devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of the single crystalline Cr 5 Te 8 have been studied. Temperature dependent dc and ac magnetization of Cr 5 Te 8 , upon cooling, reveals a paramagnetic to ferromagnetic transition at ≈ 220 K (T C ). Field dependent magnetization in the ordered state at 2 K reveals strong anisotropy with c-axis as the easy axis of magnetization. A weak itinerant behaviour of Cr-spins is also ascertained from the magnetization studies. Magnetocaloric effect in terms of isothermal magnetic entropy change has been estimated to be ≈-2 J/kg·K near T C for a field change of 70 kOe. The magnetic transition at T C is found to be second order. Critical behaviour analysis along the easy axis direction in Cr 5 Te 8 suggests that this system does not belong to a particular universality class. However, the estimated critical exponent values β = 0.363, γ = 1.399 and δ = 4.83 from modified Arrott plots and scaling of magnetocaloric behaviour satisfactorily obeys the scaling hypothesis wherein the experimental isothermal magnetization curves collapse onto two branches of universal curves below and above T C . Our critical behaviour analyses confirm the quasi-2D weak itinerant ferromagnetic short range type interaction in Cr 5 Te 8 .© 2019Optical communications is the linchpin of modern communications delivering vast majority of the online traffic worldwide at the terabit-per-second rate. However, an exponential growth of this traffic requires proper increase in transmission rate, which, in turn, puts more pressure on finding new technological solutions to meet these demands. A possible direction of this search is application of plasmonics. Plasmonics has the potential to combine the best properties of both electronic and photonic worlds leading to the development of new units of optical systems in nanoscale footprints. Application of plasmonics in optical communications would lead to integration of plasmonic circuitry with digital electronics, which in turn would open new opportunities in research applications and lay the foundation for the next generation digital technology. This paper is the attempt to make one more step in this direction. Specifically, we propose the structure for plasmonic field modulation and demodulation under two conditions: (1) The work is done for narrow-band coupling conditions and (2) graphene is used as an intermediate layer between the conductor and the cover to increase the coupling efficiency at the 1550-nm wavelength. The results include a unique description of the plasmonic coupling and resonance peak for the proposed structure and analysis of the enhancement in modulation performance caused by the insertion of the graphene layer in the plasmonic structure. The possible applications of the proposed structure are also considered.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Magnetization measurements were carried out in the in field-cooled (FC) and in zero-field-cooled (ZFC) conditions versus temperature, T, and external magnetic field, H, on a sigma-phase Fe 47 Mo 53 compound. Analysis of the measured M FC and M ZFC curves yielded values of characteristic temperatures: magnetic ordering (Curie) temperature, T C , irreversibility temperature, T ir , temperature of the maximum in M ZFC , T m , identified as the Nėel (T N ) temperature, and cross-over temperature, T co . Based on these temperatures a magnetic phase diagram in the H-T plane was outlined. The field dependences of the characteristic temperatures viz. of the irreversibility and of the cross-over temperatures were described in terms of a power law with the exponent 0.5(1). In the whole range of H i.e. up to 800 Oe, except the one H ≤ 50 Oe, a rare double re-entrant transition viz. PM → FM → AF → SG takes place. For small fields i.e. H ≤ 50 Oe a single re-entrant transition viz. PM → FM → SG is revealed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Ultra-thin soft magnetic amorphous ribbons of Co-Fe-B-Si-Nb alloy were synthesised by a single step rapid-quenching approach to acquire advantage of improved material performance and lower costs over commercial amorphous alloys. The amorphous ribbons of approximately 5.5 µm thicknesses were quenched by a single roller melt spinner in a single-step production process and characterised for their structural and magnetic properties. The disordered atomic structure of amorphous ribbons was confirmed by the X-ray diffraction. A surface morphology study revealed the continuity of ultra-thin ribbons without pores over a large scale. The amorphous alloy showed the ultra-soft magnetic properties in the as-quenched state. The observed thickness dependency of the magnetic properties was attributed to the increased surface roughness and possibly due to a lack of densely packed atomic structure resulting from the extremely high cooling rates experienced by ultra-thin ribbons. We propose that in-situ thinning process of amorphous ribbons significantly reduces the basic material cost and eliminates the need for post-processing steps; hence it provides the opportunity for mass production of high-performance soft magnetic amorphous ribbons at relatively lower costs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The nonlinear analysis of magnetic liquid free surface deformation under the influence of a static vertically oriented magnetic field produced by a pair of Helmholtz coils in a 3D space is presented in the article. The hexagonal pattern of peaks resulting from the Rosensweig or normal instability, occurs when the magnetization of the magnetic liquid exceeds the critical value. To predict the amplitudes and distance between peaks in the pattern, nonlinear analysis should be performed with employed higher order terms in the mean curvature expression of the free surface. The computational strategy presented in the article is divided into two stages. At the first stage, the magnetic field in the 3D space is calculated by the FEM based software Opera Field, while the second stage is devoted to determining the surface profile by minimizing the energy functional using a Differential Evolution algorithm in Matlab. The amplitudes of the central spike and wave number have been computed for the various values of the excitation magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this work, the influence of BEOL process on poly-Si grain boundary traps passivation in 3D NAND flash is investigated. Two hydrogenation methods in final passivation process are compared and hydrogen in passivation layer is found to be more effective for poly-Si grain boundary traps (GBT) passivation, according to device characteristics. Interlayer used as copper cap layer can also act as potential hydrogen diffusion source as well as final passivation layer. Besides, different interlayer films in BEOL process are found to be critical to cell device characteristics. It is considered that BEOL film stacks can influence poly-Si GBT density and cell device characteristics during subsequent hydrogen passivation process.© 2019 Co 20 Fe 60 B 20 /MgO/Co 20 Fe 60 B 20 perpendicular magnetic tunnel junctions with Mo seed and capping layers were patterned into sub-100 nm diameter devices. The resulting devices were imaged in plan view by scanning electron microscopy and in cross-section by scanning transmission electron microscopy. The tunnel magnetoresistance was ∼125%. The coercivity dropped off below 35 nm, and the stray field increased with decreasing diameter. The voltage controlled magnetic anisotropy effect was observed for all sizes, though it was convoluted with thermal and stray field effects for the smaller diameters.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We have successfully synthesized Y 3 Fe 5 O 12 (yttrium iron garnet, YIG) nanotubes (NTs) of different diameters using a conventional sol-gel method in anodized aluminum oxide (AAO) templates. An annealing process at 800 °C is performed to get a pure phase of YIG. The room-temperature magnetization measurements show that the coercivity decreases significantly as the diameter of nanotubes increases. The temperature dependence of magnetic moments in field-cooled (FC) and zero-field-cooled (ZFC) modes indicates that YIG NTs transform from ferromagnetic-like (FM-like) state to superparamagnetic (SPM) state when temperature decreases (in the region of 310 K–400 K). The Blocking temperature dramatically decreases as the size of YIG NTs reduces. In the FM-like state, the temperature-dependent coercivity in three different samples yields a 1/2 power law of the temperature. The temperature dependence of saturation magnetization in three different samples can be well fitted to Bloch's T 3/2 law. Characterization of ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) is conducted, which indicates the Gilbert damping parameter of YIG NTs is around 7–9 × 10 −3 .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Nd 12.2 Fe 81.8 B 6 and Tb 17 Fe 75 B 8 powders were mixed to prepare sintered magnets by the powders preparation, pressing and sintering. With a small addition of Tb 17 Fe 75 B 8 powders the coercivity increases largely in the Nd-Fe-B/Tb-Fe-B magnets. For the addition of 0.5 g Tb 17 Fe 75 B 8 (the mass ratio 0.5:9.5 of Tb 17 Fe 75 B 8 and Nd 12.2 Fe 81.8 B 6 ), the coercivity increases to 15.8 kOe, 2.2 times of that in Nd 12.2 Fe 81.8 B 6 . With more amount addition of Tb 17 Fe 75 B 8 powders the coercivity keeps to increase, and the increase is larger than that of the conventional dual-alloy method. The magnets consist of two main phases, but the atomic interdiffusion is evident for Nd and Tb. Via the investigation of thermal activation it shows that the domain walls size decreases for a little amount addition of Tb 17 Fe 75 B 8 powders. So the magnetocrystalline anisotropy increases near grain boundary of Nd-Fe-B phase owing to Tb diffusing and substituting for Nd, which is beneficial to the enhancement of coercivity. For the addition of Tb 17 Fe 75 B 8 more than 0.7 g the domain wall size doesn't decrease evidently, suggesting that the existing of interfacial exchange coupling which also contributes to the increase of coercivity in the sintered composite magnets.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Targeted delivery of therapeutic agents such as stem cells and drugs using magnetic nanoparticles with the aid of an external magnetic field is an emerging treatment modality for many diseases. To this end, understanding the effect of magnetic field on hemodynamics in human body is of great importance. In this article, the effect of external magnetic field, induced by a straight current wire, on hemodynamics of blood flow in a 90° horizontal bend vessel with circular cross section was investigated numerically using ANSYS Fluent®. The blood was considered as laminar, Newtonian, steady and incompressible. To investigate the effect of non-uniform magnetic field effects on the blood flow, the ferrohydrodynamics principles (FHD) were employed. A user-defined function (UDF) was developed to apply the magnetic field effects as source terms. The magnetic susceptibility of blood in oxygenated (in arteries) and deoxygenated (in veins) blood vessels were considered negative and positive values, respectively. The effect of magnetic number, Reynolds number, curvature coefficient and the position of the current wire on flow velocity, static pressure, and shear stress were investigated. The results showed that the Wall Shear Stress (WSS) and static pressure were enhanced with the increase of magnitude of magnetic number. In addition, it was observed that magnetic field has superior impact on the hemodynamic of venous vessel (deoxygenated blood) in comparison with the hemodynamic of artery vessel (oxygenated blood). By studying the effect of curvature coefficient and Reynolds number on WSS, it is concluded that in high curvature coefficient and low Reynolds number, the effect of magnetic field is greater than low curvature coefficient and high Reynolds number, respectively.© 2019 We have studied the magnetic properties and electronic structure of 2 nm Fe 3 O 4 film on GaAs substrates, which evolve in a nano-tip structure and compared it with 150 nm thick Fe 3 O 4 film. Valence band studies reveal a drop in density of states at Fermi level for 2 nm film as compared to thicker film. XMCD studies divulge the unusual high magnetization value of ∼5.1 μ B /FU in 2 nm film compared to 3.9 μ B /FU observed for bulk Fe 3 O 4 or thicker Fe 3 O 4 films. The excess moment is shown to be due to orbital moment contribution.© 2019A micromagnetic code based on Voronoi tessellation and the non-uniform fast Fourier transform (NUFFT) method is presented. The code is capable of efficiently and accurately simulating magnetization dynamics in large and structurally complex granular systems, such as multilayer granular media used for perpendicular magnetic recording, bit patterned media, granular nanowires, and read heads. In these systems the granular microstructure and distributions in grain and interface properties play an important role in device performance. The presented Voronoi simulator allows comprehensive studies to be performed as it accounts for the detailed granular microstructure and distributions that characterize true systems. Simulation time is greatly reduced by a non-uniform fast Fourier transform algorithm and implementation on graphics processing units (GPUs). Simulations of conventional magnetic recording, heat-assisted magnetization reversal, domain wall dynamics in granular nanowires, and particulate tape recording are presented.© 2019In this paper, we investigate the magnetic properties of the spin Lieb nanolattice for three sublattice with spins S = 1/2, σ = 3/2 and q = 1, in the presence of sites dilution. Furthermore, in order to study the effect of disorder, the spins S and/or q are diluted, while the spinσ stays pure. The work is carried out according to the Monte Carlo Simulations. We start this research by giving the total and partial magnetizations, then we present magnetic susceptibilities of the studied system. In addition, the variation of the magnetization with temperature of mixed spins (s,σ and q) with dilution is presented. The total magnetization with crystal and external fields and with dilution of mixed spins is obtained. Besides, we have presented the magnetic hysteresis cycles of spin Lieb structure, for different values of crystal-field and temperature and for different dilution values. To the best of our knowledge, no single research has been reported in the study of the dilution effect on the magnetic properties in the studied system.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The electronic structure, phase stability and magnetic properties of cubic and hexagonal type Fe 2 MnGe were investigated and compared with the well-known Heusler alloy Fe 2 MnSi. Three different structures L2 1 , DO 3 and DO 19 were considered for them. In both alloys the cubic phase (L2 1 and DO 3 ) has a lower total energy comparing with the hexagonal DO 19 phase at 0 K. But in Fe 2 MnGe the energy difference between the DO 19 and L2 1 phases is much smaller than Fe 2 MnSi. The DO 3 disorder can lower the stability of the cubic phase further and make the total energies of hexagonal and cubic phases closer, this can help the DO 19 phase gain stability. Finally, in Fe 2 MnGe, the energy difference is 0.12 eV/f.u., much smaller than the 0.41 eV/f.u. in Fe 2 MnSi. That is the possible reason why Fe 2 MnGe DO 19 phase can be synthesized experimentally and Fe 2 MnSi cannot. L2 1 type Fe 2 MnGe is a half-metal with 100% spin polarization and has a total spin moment of 3μ B /f.u. The spin polarization ratio of DO 3 phase is also high. But for the DO 19 hexagonal phase, a normal ferromagnetic metal character is observed. The calculated total moment for DO 19 type Fe 2 MnGe is larger than 6μ B /f.u. This total moment comes mainly from the large and parallel coupled partial spin moments of Fe and Mn.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Gas-atomized Nd-Fe-B magnetic powders were subjected to magnetic pulse compaction, which is very high-energy compaction method, can be densified in a short time with various binder contents at different compaction pressures. The powders were rapidly forced together with in an abbreviated period, and formed a well-packed dense sample with full density during the magnetic pulse compaction process. The influence of density on the magnetic properties of the Nd-Fe- B magnet was investigated. The relative density increased with pressure and highest density of 6.9 g/cm 3 was achieved at a consolidation pressure of 3 GPa. The optimized binder content and pressure were found to be 1 wt% and 3 GPa, respectively, for achieving the highest density. The remanence and maximum energy product of the Nd-Fe-B magnets gradually increased with increasing density. The significant improvement in density can effectively offers high remanence of 6.635 kG and maximum energy product of 8.5 MGOe.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. This work demonstrates a possibility of creating a magnetic field sensor based on magnetoplasmonic crystal with permalloy layer. Experimental results show that sensitivity of such sensors strongly correlates with the magnetic properties of magnetoplasmonic crystals and slightly depends on the value of transverse magneto-optical Kerr effect. The achieved sensitivity to DC magnetic field at local area of 1 mm 2 was found to be 10 −6 Oe in modulating field of 5 Oe.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Rhombohedral structural Ca 3 CoMnO 6 was prepared. The microstructure, chemical composition, morphology were checked and the magnetic properties were investigated in detail. Due to the “order-by-disorder” phenomenon, the ZFC curve presents negative susceptibility in low temperature region. Besides the antiferromagnetic transition around T N = 13.5 K, another abnormal peak around T f = 172 K was also observed. The shift of the abnormal peak towards low temperature with the field increases, magnetic relaxation experiment and the training effect confirm the freezing spin glass characteristic. The broadening of the freezing peak in higher field can be well explained by the reduction of short-range magnetic correlation length. Due to the competing antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic interactions, obvious exchange bias effect was observed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nanofillers were frequently used since last decade to improve the properties of rubber nanocomposites. Here, new hybrid rubber nanocomposites reinforced with multi-wall carbon nanotubes (MWCNTs) and iron particles (IP) were prepared by dispersing them in room temperature vulcanized (RTV) silicone rubber. The significance of using nanofiller MWCNTs helps in improving the modulus of the specimen at low filler loadings. The mechanical properties were investigated through compressive tests and at a filler content of 60 phr, the compressive modulus was 285% (electrolyte hybrid) and 210% (carbonyl hybrid). The magnetic effect (defined as orientation of IP particles in the direction of applied strain) was studied from the mechanical properties by curing at room temperature for 90 min under magnetic field of 0.5∼2.0 Tesla (T). Mechanical measurements show that smaller iron particles (S1640) can easily response to the magnetic field than bigger iron particles (Fe#400). The improved features of the magneto-rheological elastomers (MREs) might be suitable in industrial applications such as vibrational absorbing.© 2019 The nanoparticles of the Zn x Fe 3−x O 4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.5) ferrites have been synthesized using a simple co-precipitation method under air atmosphere at room temperature. The Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy and X-ray diffraction patterns confirm the formation of spinel mono-phase structure in all the samples. The results show that the crystallite size relates to the cationic distribution. The cation distribution is derived from the X-ray diffraction patterns enabling determination of ion coordination, ion occupancy and unit cell parameter. The magnetic hysteresis loops reveal that the magnetization increases with Zn content up to x = 0.3 and then decreases with further Zn doping, which is explained in terms of the competition between the influence of crystallite size and cations distribution (site occupancies). The thermal behavior of magnetization for the selected x = 0.3 sample is described by a modified Bloch law, based on the spin wave excitations in the particle core. Furthermore, the temperature of the AC magnetic susceptibility peak increases up to 0.3 Zn, then decreases by further Zn doping. The frequency dependence of AC magnetic susceptibility indicates the presence of strong interparticle interactions resulting in a superspin glassy state. The experimental evidence of memory effect in x = 0.3 sample further confirms the frustrated magnetic state in the compounds. The potential application of these materials for hyperthermia based therapy has been estimated. The results show that in the studied series, Zn 0.3 Fe 2.7 O 4 with highest loss power is the best candidate for this therapy.© 2019We fabricate a floating fin-body MOSFET with charge trap layer on p-type (1 0 0) Si wafer and investigate the characteristics of the fabricated device as a synaptic device. To implement the long-term potentiation (LTP) and long-term depression (LTD), the change in conductance of the proposed device is investigated by adjusting the amount of charge in charge trap layer. A pair of synaptic device with these LTP and LTD is suggested to express the synaptic weight update in a multi-layer neural network. In addition, we show suitable weight-updating method using the proposed devices for implementing multi-layer neural networks. A 3-layer perceptron network consisted of 784 input, 200 hidden, and 10 output neurons was simulated using the conductance response of the proposed devices. In pattern recognition for 28 × 28 MNIST handwritten patterns, high learning performance with a classification accuracy of 95.74% is obtained when the unidirectional weight update method (B) is used.© 2019 Elsevier Ltd The dependency of the inverter voltage gain on the current level (I Level ) of depletion mode (D-mode) thin-film transistors (TFTs) has been investigated with only n-type oxide semiconductor-based TFTs. It is clear that the voltage gain strongly depends on the D-mode I Level . To investigate the dependency, photo stress was applied to the D-mode TFT to compare the inverter characteristics depending on the D-mode I Level . As the photo stress time increased, the D-mode I Level increased, and the voltage gains were degraded as a result. This was mainly because the I Level of the D-mode is formed in the high section of the subthreshold slope (S.S) of the enhancement mode (E-mode) TFT when the photo stress was applied. By designing an inverter with a low D-mode I Level , a high voltage gain of 9.85 was obtained at V DD = 3 V. It is important to note that the S.S value of the E-mode and the I Level of the D-mode should be optimized for high voltage gain for the application of next generation integrated circuits and highly sensitive photodetectors.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Diluted magnetic semiconductors (DMSs) exhibit room temperature ferromagnetic behavior and have recently been used in a broad range of applications including spintronic devices. Here, we present a simple co-precipitation method to synthesize pure CuO and diluted Cu 1−x Fe x O (x = 0.05 and 0.1) nanoparticles (NPs) with different annealing temperatures (T a ) ranging between 500 °C and 900 °C, achieving ferromagnetic DMSs with a monoclinic structure at room temperature. The mean NP size, evaluated using a field-emission scanning electron microscope, was found to increase with increasing T a . A red shift was observed in UV–visible spectra and indicated the successful substitution of Fe ions in the CuO NPs, confirming the absence of impurity phases in the resulting structures. Investigating magnetic properties by hysteresis loop measurements, maximum saturation magnetization and coercive field values were obtained to be 4.8 emu/g and 325 Oe, respectively, for 10% Fe-doped CuO NPs at T a = 900 °C. First-order reversal curve analysis was used to study detailed magnetic characteristics of the NPs. While a soft magnetic phase with superparamagnetic fractions ranging from approximately 41% to 53% dominated magnetic behavior at T a = 700 °C, a strong hard phase determined the average magnetic properties of Fe-doped CuO NPs with nanocrystalline structure at T a = 900 °C.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThree different methods of experimental mesoscopic physics, namely, weak antilocalization effects, universal conductance fluctuations, and Aharonov-Bohm oscillations, have been used to extract the electron phase-coherence scattering rate in two-dimensional gas of InGaAs/AlInAs heterostructures. The Aharonov-Bohm oscillations reveal strong beating effects, indicating the existence of two similar periodicities of the flux dependencies. As suggested by certain theoretical models, such a behavior might be expected from the so-called Berry phase acquired by electrons with different spin orientations in the presence of strong spin-orbit coupling and Zeeman splitting. In our paper we deduce the experimental values of the dephasing length and try to compare the observed beating pattern with possible scenarios for the appearance of the Berry phase.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Monte Carlo calculation of magnetoresistance in Co/Cu(100)/Co nanostructure with magnetization in plane is carried out. • Calculation of magnetoresistance in model Pt/Co/Cu(100)/Co/Pt nanostructure with magnetization out plane is realized. • Case of anisotropy out plane in Pt/Co/Cu(100)/Co/Pt leads to considerable increase of magnetoresistance for structures with thicknesses of cobalt films N⩽11 ML. The results of Monte Carlo study of influence of magnetic anisotropy on magnetoresistance in magnetic multilayer nanostructures are presented. Influence of anisotropy reorientation on magnetoresistance is considered on example of Co/Cu(100)/Co structure with anisotropy in plane of cobalt films, which is changed to anisotropy out plane in Pt/Co/Cu/Co/Pt structure with insertion of ultrathin films of platinum. It was shown that case of nanostructure with anisotropy out plane is characterized by important increase of magnetoresistance for structures with thicknesses of ferromagnetic films N⩽11 monolayers.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The regions of stability of two collinear quasiclassical phases within the zero-temperature quantum phase diagram of the spin-[Formula presented] J 1 –J 2 –J 1 ⊥ model on an AA-stacked bilayer honeycomb lattice are investigated using the coupled cluster method (CCM). The model comprises two monolayers in each of which the spins, residing on honeycomb-lattice sites, interact via both nearest-neighbor (NN) and frustrating next-nearest-neighbor isotropic antiferromagnetic (AFM) Heisenberg exchange interactions, with respective strengths J 1 >0 and J 2 ≡κJ 1 >0. The two layers are coupled via a comparable Heisenberg exchange interaction between NN interlayer pairs, with a strength J 1 ⊥ ≡δJ 1 . The complete phase boundaries of two quasiclassical collinear AFM phases, namely the Néel and Néel-II phases on each monolayer, with the two layers coupled so that NN spins between them are antiparallel, are calculated in the κδ half-plane with κ>0. Whereas on each monolayer in the Néel state all NN pairs of spins are antiparallel, in the Néel-II state NN pairs of spins on zigzag chains along one of the three equivalent honeycomb-lattice directions are antiparallel, while NN interchain spins are parallel. We calculate directly in the thermodynamic (infinite-lattice) limit both the magnetic order parameter M and the excitation energy Δ from the s T z =0 ground state to the lowest-lying |s T z |=1 excited state (where s T z is the total z component of spin for the system as a whole, and where the collinear ordering lies along the z direction), for both quasiclassical states used (separately) as the CCM model state, on top of which the multispin quantum correlations are then calculated to high orders (n⩽10) in a systematic series of approximations involving n-spin clusters. The sole approximation made is then to extrapolate the sequences of nth-order results for M and Δ to the exact limit, n→∞.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In an effort to create high-performance permanent magnets with reduced critical rare earth content, we explored the CeCo 5-x T x (T = transition metal or metalloid) family of compounds to investigate the effect of substitution on the material's magnetic properties. In our exploration of the CeCo 5-x Zn x system, we discovered a continuous solid solution at 900 °C between the CeCo 5 and CeZn 5 binary phases with ferromagnetism existing from the CeCo 5 compound to the intermediate CeCo 2.75 Zn 2.25 compound. Single crystal studies were also conducted revealing a relatively large anisotropy field of 11.5 T at 300 K for Ce 0.96 Ta 0.04 Co 4.35 Zn 0.65 . The addition of iron Ce 0.79 Ta 0.07 Co 3.77 Fe 0.89 Zn 0.47 yielded further increases in Curie temperature and saturation magnetization to 800 K and 85.5 emu/g, respectively.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A three-dimensional reconstruction method of a small-scale magnetic target is studied in this paper. Firstly, the tilt angle and local wavenumber are calculated from the measured magnetic gradient tensor data, leading to estimates of an approximate horizontal boundary and central depth of the magnetic target. From these, a spatial range of the inversion space and depth weighting function of the magnetic target are determined. Secondly, the inversion space is divided into cuboid cells, and the inversion equations for the magnetic parameters are established. They are regularized subject to the determined spatial range and depth weighting. Finally, a generalized cross validation method is used to obtain optimal regularization parameters, allowing the magnetization intensity of each cuboid to be estimated, and the three-dimensional profile of magnetic target to be delimited. Our simulation and experimental results show that the proposed method can realize, with a high degree of fidelity, the three-dimensional reconstruction of a simple small-scale magnetic target.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The universality classes of amorphous alloy system Fe 73.5−x Cr x Cu 1 Nb 3 Si 13.5 B 9 with x = 0, 2, 4, 6, 8, and 10 are studied by determination of the static critical exponents (β, γ, δ), and critical temperatures from magnetization measurements using two independent methods, namely the Kouvel-Fisher method and the Berger-Campillo et al method. The found values for these critical exponents depend on the content of Cr and interestingly vary from values that correspond to universality classes of standard models (Ising (sample with x = 0), XY (sample with x = 2), and Heisenberg (sample with x = 4)) with short-range interactions to universality class of mean field model (samples with x = 6, 8, and 10) with long-range interactions. The critical temperature decreases quasi linearly with the increase of Cr content. The possible mechanisms leading to such universality classes and shift including the spin-orbit interaction, shape anisotropies, direct exchange and itinerant exchange are analyzed. In addition, X-ray diffraction and Mossbauer spectroscopy studies performed on this alloy system reveal that it has a heterogeneous structure.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We study flow structure modifications due to agglomeration, aggregation and chain formation, also known as elongational flow effect for the flow of a ferrofluid in the gap between two concentric rotating cylinders. The system is subjected to either transverse, axial and oblique magnetic field. Consider elongational flow the torque is found to increase or decrease with variation of elongational flow parameter. Furthermore the 3D flow structures themselves are modified, e.g. resulting in variation of different energy portions/contents and the angular momentum transport. The detected modifications are explained by the fact that real ferrofluids consist of a suspension of particles with a finite size in an almost ellipsoid shape as well as with particle–particle interactions that tend to form chains of various lengths and also have a tendency to agglomerate. To come close to such realistic situation for ferrofluids, we consider elongational flow effects incorporated by the symmetric part of the velocity gradient field tensor, which can be scaled by a so-called transport coefficient λ 2 . The complexity of structures and modifications depend on the magnetic field configuration. In general complexer oblique fields result in stronger interactions and modifications.© 2019 A full capacitance model for Amorphous Oxide Semiconductor Thin Film Transistors (AOSTFTs), considering the effect of the drain contact overlap in bottom gate passivated structures is presented. It is shown that this drain overlap, on top of the passivation layer, serves as a second gate with an applied voltage equal to V DS . When V DS > V T the semiconductor-passivation (S-P) interface will be in accumulation and the behavior of the different capacitance is affected. An expression to represent this effect is included in the present model. The overlap capacitance between gate and drain/source, as well as the effect of reducing the channel capacitance as the drain is increased, are also considered by the model. The calculated capacitance is a function of the threshold voltage, (V T ) , the mobility and saturation parameters (γ a , α s ), and the sharpness of the knee region m, which are extracted using the Unified Model and Extraction Method (UMEM) for AOSTFTs. Results are compared with simulated and experimental data.© 2019We report simulation of the conduction band alignment in tensile–strained GaP–enriched barrier structures and experimental results on injection lasing in the green–orange spectral range (558–605 nm) in (AlxGa1–x)0.5In0.5P–GaAs diodes containing such barriers. The wafers were grown by metal–organic vapor phase epitaxy side–by–side on (8 1 1)A, (2 1 1)A and (3 2 2)A GaAs substrates, which surface orientations were strongly tilted towards the [1 1 1]A direction with respect to the (1 0 0) plane. Four sheets of GaP–rich quantum barrier insertions were applied to suppress the leakage of non–equilibrium electrons from the gain medium. Two types of the gain medium were applied. In one case 4–fold stacked tensile–strained (In,Ga)P insertions were used. Experimental data shows that self–organized vertically–correlated quantum dots (QDs) are formed on (2 1 1)A– and (3 2 2)A–oriented substrates, while corrugated quantum wires are formed on the (8 1 1)A surface. In the other case a short–period superlattice (SPSL) composed of 16–fold stacked quasi–lattice–matched 1.4 nm–thick In0.5Ga0.5P layers separated by 4 nm–thick (Al0.6Ga0.4)0.5In0.5P layers was applied. Laser diodes with 4–fold stacked QDs having a threshold current densities of ∼7–10 kA/cm2 at room temperature were realized for both (2 1 1)A and (3 2 2)A surface orientations at cavity lengths of ∼1 mm. Emission wavelength at room temperature was ∼599–603 nm. Threshold current density for the stimulated emission was as low as ∼1 kA/cm2. For (8 1 1)A–grown structures no room temperature lasing was observed. SPSL structures demonstrated lasing only at low temperatures <200 K. The shortest wavelength (558 nm, 90 K) in combination with the highest operation temperature (150 K) was realized for (3 2 2)A–oriented substrates in agreement with theoretical predictions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Recently the new scheme of layered composite with shape memory effect (SME) for thermal and magnetic actuation was suggested and proved to demonstrate the reversible actuation on micro- and nanoscale. The principles of magnetic field induced martensitic transition (MFIMT) and magnetic field controlled shape memory effect (MFCSME) have the advantages of magnetic-field-controlled actuation at constant temperature, extremely small size of an actuator and compatibility with modern nanotechnologies. The present paper is devoted to experimental study of MFCSME in two ferromagnetic Heusler alloys Ni 54 Mn 21 Ga 25 and Ni 50 Mn 41.2 In 8.8 with positive and negative shift of the martensitic transition temperature in a magnetic field. The three points bending device for dilatometric tests of plate-like samples of the alloys was designed and placed in the field of Bitter coil magnet. The bending deformations versus temperature were measured at various magnetic fields up to 10 T and at mechanical stresses up to 45 MPa. The temperature shifts of thermoelastic martensitic phase transition were found to be 0.55 K/T and −0.95 K/T for Ni 54 Mn 21 Ga 25 and Ni 50 Mn 41.2 In 8.8 respectively. For direct MFCSME study the dependences of the bending deformation on magnetic fields up to 14 T were also obtained at constant temperatures for these alloys. Practically complete recoverable deformation of 0.2% due to MFIMT was obtained at 14 T in Ni 54 Mn 21 Ga 25 alloy in temperature range 316–318 K and stress 8.6 MPa. The new variant of the layered functional composite actuator scheme based on the alloys with MFCSME is suggested. The proposed functional composite combines the layers of the alloys with positive and negative temperature shifts of martensitic transition temperature in magnetic field. It is argued that this combination of the alloys can improve the performance of the composite actuators driven by MFCSME, particularly, it can provide higher generated force, actuation stroke, sensitivity to magnetic field and frequency of actuation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We study the domain wall depinning from a triangle-shaped notch in Ni 80 Fe 20 /Pt bilayer nanostrips using electrical detection technique. It is found that for the 630 nm wide strip, the depinning fields are distributed in a narrow range. While for the 300 nm wide strip, the depinning fields are distributed in two distinctly separated ranges. Micromagnetic simulations show that for the 630 nm wide strip, the depinning corresponds to vortex domain wall, while for 300 nm wide strip, the depinnings of both the vortex wall and the transverse wall are observed. The chirality of vortex wall and the polarity of transverse wall have strong influence on the depinning field. Electrical current has a clear impact on the depinning, but its influence is different for different wall configuration. It can decrease or slightly increase the depinning field of the vortex domain wall depending on the wall chirality and the current direction. The depinning field of the transverse domain wall exhibits an oscillation variation with the current density. Compared to the depinning process of the domain wall in a control sample Ni 80 Fe 20 /Au, it can be inferred the current influence on the domain wall depinning is caused mainly by the current-induced spin-orbit torque.© 2019 Elsevier Ltd In this work, the comparison of source/drain electrodes in thin film transistors (TFTs) based on room temperature deposited Zinc Nitride (Zn 3 N 2 ) films is presented. Aluminum and aluminum doped zinc oxide (AZO) films are used as electrodes. Both devices exhibit an on/off-current ratio of 10 4 and a subthreshold slope close to 1 V/Dec. The extracted field-effect mobility was 4.5 cm 2 /Vs and 1 cm 2 /Vs for TFTs using aluminum and AZO, respectively. Better electrical characteristics are achieved with aluminum electrodes. However, AZO electrodes made possible the fabrication of fully transparent Zn 3 N 2 TFTs, reported for first time in this work.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The MnP thin films were grown on Si (1 0 0) substrates at 300 and 400 °C using molecular beam epitaxy (MBE). The films crystallize in an orthorhombic structure. FE-SEM images indicated that both films are composed of vertically aligned MnP nanorods. However, the density of the nanorods in the film grown at 400 °C is higher than that grown at 300 °C, leading to a considerable decrease of resistivity in this sample. Both films showed a ferromagnetic behavior, but the Curie temperature increased from 275 K for the film grown at 300 °C to 325 K for the film grown at 400 °C. Anomalous Hall effect (AHE) and negative magneto-resistance (MR) were observed in the films. While both films exhibited a metallic behavior, a higher thermoelectric power factor (PF) was achieved for the film grown at 400 °C.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Magnetic transitional behaviors and magnetocaloric effect of the intermetallic compound Ho 3 Pd 2 have been studied. It exhibits a second order magnetic transition from ferromagnetic (FM) to paramagnetic (PM) states at a Curie temperature (T C ) of 9.6 K. In the PM region, the magnetic susceptibility of the Ho 3 Pd 2 compound follows the Curie-Weiss law. The paramagnetic Curie temperature (θp) was evaluated to be 5.3 K, and the effective magnetic moment (μ eff ) to be 10.5 μ B /Ho. The positive value of θp indicates the ferromagnetic interactions in the ordering state of Ho 3 Pd 2 and the effective magnetic moment is close to the theoretical value 10.6 μ B for the Ho 3+ ion, which suggests that the Pd ions in Ho 3 Pd 2 are non-magnetic. Under the magnetic field change of 0–5 T, the maximum magnetic entropy change (−ΔS M ) and the refrigerant capacity (RC) for this compound are evaluated to be 18.3 J kg −1 K −1 and 301.5 J kg −1 , respectively, with no thermal and field hysteresis loss.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The aim of this research is to propose a normalization principle for the Barkhausen noise response eliminating a dynamic contribution to the basic signal. To achieve this, it is suggested to reduce the rms profile (envelope) of the Barkhausen noise by the square root of the field rate of change, i.e. U rms (H)/dH/dt. This derived from our recent findings showing that the total rms intensity of the Barkhausen noise rises as the square root of the magnetizing frequency 〈U rms 〉∝f mag and that the rms profile of the Barkhausen noise is determined by the field rate of change U rms (H)∼dH/dt. Validity of the suggested normalization principle has been proved for various iron-based steels starting from harder steels with a high coercive field H c of several kA/m up to a soft electrical steel and a nanocrystalline ribbon with dc H c ≃10-30 A/m. At low magnetizing frequencies, the proposed normalization fully compensates the envelope differences giving a stable quasi-static peak near H c . The shape of these stabilized peaks demonstrates a strong resemblance to the differential permeability curves obtained from the concurrent measurements of the magnetic hysteresis loops.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Lanthanide pyrogermanates of general formula Ln 2 Ge 2 O 7 (Ln = Tb, Dy, Ho, Er) were synthesized by molten-salt synthesis. Single-phase, impurity-free materials were obtained, which belong to the tetragonal P4 1 2 1 2 space group. Highly aggregated powders with good crystallinity were visualized by transmission electron microscopy techniques. Optical-vibration properties of the pyrogermanates were examined by Raman scattering. Lattice vibrations related to lanthanide ions presented upshifts due to decreasing lattice volumes (from Tb to Er), while Raman modes related to Ge-O vibrations remain unchanged or with little shift. Dy 2 Ge 2 O 7 clearly shows a peak in the dc magnetic susceptibility around 2.5 K under a relatively low applied field (paramagnetic to antiferromagnetic transition), while long-range magnetic ordering for the Tb-, Ho- and Er-containing ceramics could be observed down to 2 K. Curie-Weiss curves showed a higher Weiss temperature compared to literature in the case of Tb 2 Ge 2 O 7 , suggesting a weak long-range order at low temperature, in the case of our sample. For the Er 2 Ge 2 O 7 compound, the presence of small Curie-Weiss temperatures reinforces the idea that antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic dipolar exchange interactions between nearest neighbors compete at low temperature in our powders. All these features are coherent with a magnetic frustrated complex ground state such as the ones observed in the spin ices. Isothermal magnetization curves almost overlapped for the Dy, Ho and Tb compounds while it shows a sensitive non-standard behavior at low field in the case of the Er 2 Ge 2 O 7 .© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The Mn-Zn ferrite nanoparticles with a spinel structure were successfully prepared by using chemical co-precipitation method. The formed magnetic ferrite particles were coated on the surface of Fe-6.5 wt%Si alloy particles with the epoxy resin to prepare the powder core. The influence of magnetic ferrite insulation on the magnetic properties of the powder core was studied. Insulating with a moderate quantity of ferrite was found to improve the effective permeability and the loss of the powder core, while the inadequate insulation and the excessive insulation with ferrite led to the rapid growth of the eddy-current loss at high frequency and the remarkable decrease of the effective permeability, respectively. The effective demagnetizing field determined by the core's density and the magnetic nature of the ferrite were proposed to be the main causes of the variation of the core's magnetic performance. Loss separation fitting revealed that the hysteresis loss is much higher than the eddy-current loss for the core measured at the frequency lower than 120 kHz. This suggested that improving the effective permeability and the loss of the powder core in low-frequency range should focus on the means of reducing the effective demagnetizing field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The magnetocaloric effect, that consists of adiabatic temperature changes in a varying external magnetic field, appears not only when the amplitude is changed, but in cases of anisotropic magnetic materials also when the direction is varied. In this article we investigate the magnetocaloric effect theoretically for the archetypical single molecule magnets Fe 8 and Mn 12 that are rotated with respect to a magnetic field. We complement our calculations for equilibrium situations with investigations of the influence of non-equilibrium thermodynamic cycles.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We present a comparison of the rotating magnetocaloric effect (R-MCE) carried out on TmB 4 , a strongly anisotropic magnetic system, which is based on the determination of the entropy S and entropy change ΔS. Both quantities are determined using independent measurements of the heat capacity and the magnetization as a function of temperature and magnetic field. The comparison of these two approaches shows that estimates of the R-MCE, in particular the estimate of the temperature difference ΔT that occurs during sample rotation in magnetic field H, based on magnetization measurements (which usually present a simpler and faster way to obtain the necessary data) provide similar results to those obtained from detailed temperature dependencies of heat capacity. However, to take the advantage of magnetisation measurements it is necessary to make an approximation concerning heat capacity data. There one has to be careful and use the right approximation for the ΔT estimate. In case of materials with a complex temperature dependence of the heat capacity common approach can lead to significant errors. Our results here suggest for the entropy calculation from magnetic data sets the following procedure: first determine the zero-field (H = 0) contribution to S from heat capacity data, then add to this the magnetic entropy change contribution determined from magnetization measurements.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We evaluate the influence of the shape on hysteretic properties in ferromagnetic/antiferromagnetic core/shell nanoparticles using Monte Carlo simulations. Exchange bias and coercive fields were estimated in nanoparticles with shapes ranging from octahedra to spheres to cubes. The net magnetic moment in the shell interface, produced by uncompensated spins responsible for the appearance of exchange bias, was found to vary significantly with the nanoparticle shape. Strong and intermediate exchange bias fields were found in octahedral and spherical nanoparticles, respectively, while a nearly zero exchange bias field was found in cubical nanoparticles. In general, decreasing exchange bias and increasing coercive fields were observed as the nanoparticle shape varied from nanoparticles with many to few uncompensated spins in the shell interface. A faster increase (decrease) of the exchange bias field (coercive field) as function of the magnitude of the interfacial exchange interaction was observed in nanoparticles with higher uncompensated interfaces. Furthermore, a predominance of shape effects over size effects on the hysteretic behavior of the nanoparticles was observed in the results.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. For the fundamental research and industrial application of ferrofluids, the particle size distribution (PSD) of magnetic nanoparticles is crucial to characterize their material properties. This work aims to develop efficient and robust PSD estimation methods for ferrofluids without interacting particles under two cases, known and unknown distribution types. The main task of the first case is to estimate the distribution parameters for a given PSD. For this purpose, L p norm method is employed to convert the PSD estimation matrix equation into a constrained nonlinear programming problem. Then the nonlinear programming method (NPM) is presented to estimate the PSD parameters based on the magnetization data. The main tasks of the second case are to reconstruct the PSD curve and estimate the distribution type and parameters. To achieve these goals, an improved Bayesian method is proposed by using the estimation obtained from NPM as its prior information. Then a non-parameter hypothesis test method, Shapiro-Wilk test is introduced to determine the distribution type of the PSD. To illustrate the effectiveness of the proposed methods, theoretical analysis and Monte Carlo simulation are conducted based on the material parameters and experimental results of two ferrofluid samples. Through the comparison, it is found that the NPM is less sensitive to the noise like measurement errors and it can provide more accurate estimations than conventional inversion methods. Moreover, the proposed improved Bayesian method is efficient and robust to the noise, which can be used to reconstruct the PSD curves of ferrofluids without using the conventional time-consuming experimental methods like transmission electron microscopy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A ferrite composite material composed of ZnFe 2 O 4 and LiFeO 2 has been successfully prepared by a facile sol-gel process. The crystal phase composition and micro-morphology of the as-prepared LiFeO 2 /ZnFe 2 O 4 composite was analyzed by X-ray diffractometer (XRD) and scanning electron microscope (SEM). The electromagnetic and microwave absorbing properties of the as-prepared composite were investigated by means of the transmit-line theory. It is found that the as-prepared composite has a minimum reflection loss value of -10.4 dB at 17.7 GHz with a matching thickness of 16.7 mm. In addition, the electromagnetic characteristics of the as-prepared composite showed that the reflection curve presents several strong absorption peaks in the range of 2–18 GHz, compared with the reflection curve of single component ZnFe 2 O 4 that reported elsewhere. It also proposed a method to prepare the multiphase materials by the facile sol-gel process, which is an effective way in adjusting electromagnetic parameters of as-prepared materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In skyrmion-based racetrack memories, the information encoded by skyrmions may be destroyed due to the skyrmion Hall effect, which can be surmounted by using synthetic antiferromagnetic racetracks. Hence, the manipulation of skyrmions in synthetic antiferromagnetic racetracks is important for practical applications. Here, we computationally study the interaction between a pair of skyrmions and a locally modified region in a synthetic antiferromagnetic racetrack, where the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy or thickness is locally adjusted to be different from that of the rest region of the racetrack. It is found that the skyrmions can be attracted, repelled, and even trapped by the locally modified region in a controllable manner. Besides, we demonstrate that the skyrmion location can be precisely determined by the locally modified region. The possible manipulation of skyrmions by utilizing locally modified regions in a synthetic antiferromagnetic racetrack may be useful for future skyrmion-based applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Zinc oxide doped with different concentrations of Co 2+ ions (ZnO:Co) nano-powders were synthesised by co-precipitation method using complexes zinc acetate dihydrate and cobalt acetylacetonate. The mass ratios of Co/Cd in the investigated samples were 0.5% 1%, 2%, and 3%. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) study confirmed the formation of single-phase crystalline hexagonal Wurtzite structure, thus, Co ions were successfully doped into ZnO lattice forming substitutional solid solutions. The purpose of the present study is to synthesise and investigate the possible creation of room-temperature ferromagnetic (RT-FM) properties in host ZnO for DMS applications. The magnetic analysis has showed that the magnetic behavior of the as prepared ZnO:Co samples is dominated by a paramagnetic component over ferromagnetic component, which is an indicative of dominant uncoupled Co spins. However, the same samples exhibited pronounce room temperature ferromagnetic behavior (RTFM) when they were hydrogenated, which was attributed to the role of oxygen vacancies (V O ) in accordance with the Bound Magnetic Polaron Model (BMP). Furthermore, the analysis of the magnetization reversal via fluctuation fields for the hydrogenated samples shows that the distribution of activation energies arises from both, the dispersion of anisotropy fields and the sizes distribution of FM ordered regions. Due to the dispersion of anisotropy fields, the mediated exchange coupling through vacancies at low ions concentrations provide stronger RTFM behavior than the highly concentrated ones. Accordingly, it believed that increasing the ions concentrations to enhance the direct ions coupling may destabilize the polarons structure and then weaken the irreversible magnetic behavior.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In order to control and manipulate a new degree of freedom of the charge carries, the scientific community has been focused the attention on the valley polarization and its consequences, since this effect opens doors for a plenty of new technological devices. The aim of the present work is to describe how external mechanisms on graphene flakes, like mechanical stress combined with crossed real electric and magnetic fields, lead to the emergence of a significant valley polarisation with inversion symmetry broken. We show, numerically and analytically, that the valley characteristics written on the beating pattern of the de Haas-van Alphen oscillations can be directly measured. We also verified that the period of these beats is related to the valley asymmetry.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We study transitions of the Néel vector out of a metastable state to a more stable one in the presence of a polarized current. The discussion is general although the system considered is an antiferromagnetic spintronic. The presence of the current allows one to study transitions of the Néel vector as a function of temperature with the effect of dissipation that can be varied from positive to negative depending on the sign of the current. This is different than the usual case where one only has one type of positive dissipation when only magnetic field is being applied to an antiferromagnet. Using the method of path integral, we derive the expression for the rate of transitions of the Néel vector. A cross-over temperature T 0 between quantum and thermal transitions is determined. The expressions for the rates of quantum transitions below the cross-over temperature, and of thermal transitions at and above it are presented. The expression of the polarized current that diminishes the effect of dissipation is also presented as a function of temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We report the low temperature physical properties of polycrystalline R 3 NiSi 3 (R = La and Ce) which crystallizes in orthorhombic (Space group Immm) structure. The results of our comprehensive study by means of magnetic, electrical transport and thermodynamic measurements suggest that Ce 3 NiSi 3 orders antiferromagnetically below T N ∼6 K. Electrical resistivity and magnetoresistance data of Ce 3 NiSi 3 resembles with that observed in usual Ce based Kondo lattice/heavy fermion (HF) compounds. Electrical resistivity and heat capacity are significantly influenced by the crystal electric field (CEF) effect. An enhanced value of Sommerfeld coefficient (∼118.5 mJ/mol K 2 ) strongly indicates HF behavior of Ce 3 NiSi 3 .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We present the theory of a dynamic variant of the non-local coherent potential approximation (DNLCPA) to investigate the spin dynamics in ultrathin magnetic cobalt-gadolinium random alloy films Co 1-c Gd c n , n atomic monolayers being their thickness. This novel theoretical approach in the classical spin wave representation introduces the idea for the scattering potential of a defect as an operator built up from the phase matching of the spin dynamics on the defect site with the spin dynamics in an otherwise virtual crystal. The scattering potentials are then used to establish a dynamic formulation of the CPA employing the Dyson's formalism. A mathematical approach is rigorously developed to solve analytically the Dyson T-matrix equation, and determine the unique physical solution for the configurationally averaged Green's function propagator of the disordered system. The DNLCPA numerical calculations for the Co 1-c Gd c n systems yield the characteristic eigenmodes and energy dispersion curves of the confined spin wave excitations and their corresponding lifetimes, for arbitrary alloy concentration and diverse film thickness. Our theoretical results for the lifetimes of spin waves depend strongly on their wave vectors, and are in general agreement with recent experimental data. The developed DNLCPA theoretical method is general and can be applied to compute the spin dynamics for any magnetic random binary alloy nanostructure.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe NEREID project (“NanoElectronics Roadmap for Europe: Identification and Dissemination”) is dedicated to mapping the future of European Nanoelectronics. NEREID's objective is to develop a medium and long term roadmap for the European nanoelectronics industry, starting from the needs of applications to address societal challenges and leveraging the strengths of the European eco-system. The roadmap will also identify promising novel nanoelectronic technologies, based on the advanced concepts developed by Research Centres and Universities, as well as identification of potential bottlenecks along the innovation (value) chain. Industry applications include Energy, Automotive, Medical/Life Science, Security, loT, Mobile Convergence and Digital Manufacturing. The NEREID roadmap covers Advanced Logic and Connectivity, Functional Diversification (Smart Sensors, Smart Energy and Energy for Autonomous Systems), Beyond-CMOS, Heterogeneous Integration and System Design as well as Equipment, Materials and Manufacturing Science. This article gives an overview of the roadmap's structure and content.© 2019 Elsevier LtdFuture Nanoelectronic devices faces substantial challenges, in particular increased power consumption, saturation of performance, large variability and reliability limitation. In this respect, novel materials and innovative device architectures will be needed for Nanoscale FETs. This paper presents some promising solutions for the end of the roadmap with Multigate Nanodevices, Nanowires, Tunnel transistors, Ferroelectric FET, and Hybrid Nanocomponents using Phase Change materials or nanofilament. Other alternative materials, as ultra-thin films, 2D and 1D nanostructures, Heterostructures using strained or III-V materials, will also allow to boost these advanced nanotransistors.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Sm 17 (Co 1− x Cu x ) 83 and Er 17 (Co 1− x Cu x ) 83 (at. %, x = 0–1) alloy thin films are prepared on Cr(100) single-crystal underlayers at 500 °C by molecular beam epitaxy. The effect of Cu/Co composition on the ordered phase formation is investigated. Sm 17 (Co 1− x Cu x ) 83 (112¯0) films with hexagonal Sm(Co,Cu) 5 (D2 d ) ordered phase grow epitaxially on the underlayers for all the compositional range of x = 0–1. On the contrary, the structure of Er 17 (Co 1− x Cu x ) 83 film varies depending on Cu composition. Amorphous phase is formed in the Er 17 Co 83 (x = 0) film. Er 17 (Co 1− x Cu x ) 83 (112¯0) epitaxial films with Er(Co,Cu) 5 (D2 d ) ordered phase are obtained for the compositional range of x = 0.25–0.5. With further increasing the x value, the crystallographic phase varies to a phase other than D2 d . Partial substitution of the Co sites in ErCo 5 structure with Cu atoms and control of the amount of Cu atom are important to stabilize the Er(Co,Cu) 5 phase.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The temperature dependence of the resistivity of magnetic NiCu alloys was fitted using an equivalent circuit containing free electron (FE) and itinerant electron (IE) channels. The spin-independent FEs, which moved within a crystal lattice potential field, were not restrained by the electronic orbitals of any ions. The IEs were restrained by the outer electronic orbitals of the ions and could transit with a certain probability between adjacent ions. Below Curie temperature, T C , the electrical transport of the IEs was spin-dependent. The variation in the T C of the NiCu alloys as a function of the Cu content was fitted using the Weiss electron pair model. We therefore provided a scheme to explain both electrical transport and magnetic properties using valence electron structure.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWhile materials design for many device applications usually relies on adding impurities, recent advances in scaling-down heterostructures with improved interfacial properties offer a different way to transform a large class of materials. A given material can be drastically changed by inheriting properties leaking from its neighboring regions, such as magnetism, superconductivity, or spin-orbit coupling. While these proximity effects often have a short range and are considered negligible, the situation is qualitatively different in atomically thin and two-dimensional materials where the extent of proximity effects can exceed their thickness. Consequently, proximitized materials have a potential to display novel properties and device opportunities, absent in any of the constituent region of the considered heterostructures. Such proximitized materials could provide platforms for a wide range of emerging applications: from seamless integration of memory and logic, to fault-tolerant topologically protected quantum computing.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We present thermal expansion studies on single-crystalline LaFe 1-x Co x AsO with doping levels of x = 0, 0.026, and 0.034, and on BaFe 2 As 2 . Anomalies in the thermal expansion coefficient α enable reading off the structural and magnetic transition temperatures T S and T N . The evolution of the orthorhombic distortion at T S is illustrated by length changes of the a- and b-axes and the experimentally determined orthorhombicity δ. The results are compared to BaFe 2 As 2 . Finally, the electronic phase diagram is discussed.© 2019 Pressless heat treatment (PHT) at different temperatures was carried out on the samples cut off from the hot-deformed (HD) Nd-Fe-B magnets. It showed remarkably influence on both the remanence and coercivity of the HD samples. When the PHT temperature was higher than 850 °C, the HD samples exhibited a drastic remanence increase from 13.58 kGs to 14.45–14.69 kGs and dramatic coercivity decrease. This declined coercivity could be raised by 3 kOe when the HD sample experienced a second stage of PHT at 700 °C for 2 h. The texture of the HD samples with enhanced remanence was evaluated by X-ray diffractometry (XRD), suggesting the texture improvement after the PHT at 900 °C and 1080 °C. The microstructures of these HD samples were examined by scanning electron microscopy (SEM), which revealed the inherited crystalline orientation during the growth of nanosized Nd 2 Fe 12.8 Co 1.2 B platelets into microsized grains after PHT. Backscatting electron (BSE) SEM and energy dispersive spectroscopy (EDS) revealed the aggregation of Nd-rich phase both at ribbon boundary and grain boundary at the PHT temperature of 900 °C, which plays an important role in the dramatic decrease of coercivity. The BSE-SEM further revealed that the increase of coercivity during the secondary stage of PHT at 700 °C was ascribed to the improved distribution of aggregated Nd-rich phase.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this work, the structural and magnetic properties of multiferroic La 1-x Y x FeO 3 perovskites, (x = 0.00, 0.05, 0.10, 0.15, 0.20, 0.25 and 0.30) synthesized through Sol-gel auto-combustion technique were investigated.The room temperature synchrotron X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis revealed that the all the synthesized samples consisted of the polycrystalline orthorhombic structure perovskites (space group pnma), and tolerance factor confirmed the phase stability of the prepared perovskite system.The Williamson-Hall plots based on synchrotron XRD data were employed to estimate the average particle diameter and vary from 18.8 nm to 37.5 nm.For a deeper insight into the crystal structure, high-resolution transmission microscopy imaging (HRTEM) was performed.The estimated values of crystallite size from HRTEM and synchrotron XRD data were coincident.Many of crystallographic parameters and electron density measurements were calculated by Rietveld refinement of synchrotron XRD data.La 1-x Y x FeO 3 perovskite crystals are canted antiferromagnets with a weak ferromagnetism at room temperature.Selected Area Electron Diffraction (SAED) patterns of the investigated samples exhibited spotty ring patterns, confirming the polycrystalline character.The magnetic properties were gotten through analyzing the magnetization versus temperature M(T) and M(H) hysteresis loop which characterized by a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). The orthoferriteLa 1 -xY x FeO 3 crystals are a promising candidate for optical device applications in broad temperature range and high power system.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The magnetic state and the spin-phonon coupling in the Eu 0.75 Y 0.25 MnO 3 are investigated using temperature dependent magnetization, Raman spectroscopy and Mossbauer spectroscopy measurements. The magnetization data showed bifurcation in zero-field cooled and field-cooled warming curves and indicate two antiferromagnetic transitions at 47 K and 22 K. Short range ferromagnetic correlations are clearly observed well above the antiferromagnetic transition temperatures, which are attributed to the presence of Griffiths-like phase. The temperature dependent Raman spectroscopy measurements showed anomalous softening of phonon modes well above the antiferromagnetic ordering temperature of ∼47 K and also showed signatures of both the ordering temperatures. The Mossbauer spectra showed anomalous changes in hyperfine field as a function of temperature which match with the temperature at which B 2g phonons showed softening.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This article has been retracted: please see Elsevier Policy on Article Withdrawal (https://www.elsevier.com/about/our-business/policies/article-withdrawal). This article has been retracted at the request of the Editor-in-Chief. The corresponding author used a previously published figure and claimed it now characterizes a different material. This is an ethics violation. The corresponding author also did not make coworkers/coauthors aware of the submission and the infringement. As such this article represents a severe abuse of the scientific publishing system. The scientific community takes a very strong view on this matter and apologies are offered to readers of the journal that this was not detected during the submission process.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we have investigated the bismuth-substituted yttrium iron garnet (Bi-YIG) thin films prepared on glass substrate by modified metal-organic decomposition method. Real-time Faraday rotation spectrometer was used to characterize the magneto-optical properties of Bi-YIG films. The reliability of the measurement system and optimized analyzer setup was confirmed by comparing the Jones matrix calculations and measured results. The effect of annealing condition on the structural, magnetic and magneto-optical properties was investigated. A clear garnet-phase without secondary phase was observed for the Bi-YIG films annealed above 800 °C. Faraday rotation spectra of these films reveal the correlation between their crystallinity and magneto-optical properties. The highest Faraday rotation angle of −3.1 °/μm was achieved for 800 °C annealed sample. Simultaneous evaluation of real-time Faraday rotation spectra and the corresponding hysteresis loops can establish a path for the application of time-resolved magneto-optical spectroscopic analysis of magnetic thin films.© 2019We evaluate the characteristics of the vertically stacked graphene-layer infrared photodetector (VS-GLIP). Each period of the stack (which constitutes the GLIP) consists of a GL (serving as a photosensitive element with a floating potential) sandwiched between barrier layers made of the van der Waals materials, and highly conducting emitter and collector contact n-GLs. The operation of VS-GLIPs is associated with the interband photoexcitation of electrons from the GLs (direct or followed by the tunneling), injection of the electrons from the emitter layer and the collection of both the photoexcited and injected electrons by the collector layer. At a small probability of the electron capture into the floating GLs, each GLIP section exhibits an elevated photoconductive gain. Due to the vertical multi-GLIP structure the absorption efficiency can be close to unity. Due to this and because the photocurrents produced by each GLIP in the stack are summarized, the VS-GLIP can exhibit elevated detector responsivity and detectivity, in particular, exceeding those of the GLIPs.© 2019 Elsevier LtdPower grids are distributed over vast geographical areas and have sophisticated multilayered architecture. The structure of the grid distribution layer is often poorly documented and sometimes unknown, presenting additional challenges to the development of systems for automated monitoring of power delivery to consumers. The proposed system performs the simultaneous functions of estimating the power grid topology (map) and monitoring of the grid operation. The core of the system is the distributed network of sensors installed at the branching points of electrical conductors. The sensors periodically measure the RMS current in the conductor, and the phase shift between current and voltage. Localization and time synchronization of sensors are performed using GPS modules. The sensors communicate over the powerline conductor. Transformers block communication signals, separating the network into clusters. The maps of the grid segments are reconstructed for each network cluster and then combined into the full grid map. The map is used for real-time monitoring of inconsistencies in the grid behavior to detect conductor breakage, powerline overload and possibly electricity theft. The autonomous sensors are inductively powered; auxiliary solar cells are installed as backup power source.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Spinel cobalt ferrites (CoFe 2 O 4 ) with varying inversion degrees were prepared via a citrate-nitrate sol-gel method. The gels, prepared with different cation stoichiometries, were dried at 110 °C, further treated at 850 °C and subjected to structural and magnetic characterization. X-ray diffractograms of the samples confirm the successful synthesis of the spinel. The synthesis conditions displayed a strong influence over the positioning of the cations in the crystal structure of these ferrimagnets. Mössbauer spectra yield inversion degrees of approximately 1.0 and 0.0 for the samples prepared with excess cobalt and excess iron, respectively. These cationic arrangements are also confirmed via Raman spectroscopy, which shows a larger splitting of the A 1g signal in the sample with the highest inversion degree. The magnetic character of the samples at room temperature does not agree with what should be expect from the net magnetic moments per unit cell. However, this phenomenon was explained by the different exchange integrals at play in each of the systems, as shown by the magnetic critical temperature of each arrangement, which differed by approximately 100 °C. The proposed pathway has proven to be an accurate method for completely switching the cationic arrangement of CoFe 2 O 4 , further enabling the application of this material in advanced magnetoresistive and spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier LtdThe recent rise of GeSn-based optically pumped lasers have multiplied the efforts to fabricate a fully CMOS compatible and group IV-based light emitter. Their integration with Si-based electronics may yield heavily reduced power consumption in integrated circuits and pave the way towards new sensing or medical applications. Here, we discuss the epitaxy of group IV GeSn and SiGeSn semiconductors and show their suitability for light emitting applications. Double and multi quantum well heterostructures are evaluated, whereby the latter enables an inherently easier control over the formation of deleterious misfit defects. Consequently, microdisk lasers fabricated from those show greatly enhanced light emission and reduced lasing thresholds. The use of in-situ p-i-n doping schemes allow the formation of light emitting diodes, resulting in electrically-enabled light emission already at room temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We demonstrate a three-axis atomic magnetometer capable of measuring the magnitude and direction of a magnetic field based on the spin self-sustaining method using a rubidium vapor. Vectorial capability is added by precise compensation in three components of the magnetic field since the Larmor precession frequency is stable and constant in this process. A mean sensitivity of 0.78 pT/Hz in the measurement of the field magnitude and a sensitivity of 3.5×10 -6 rad/Hz in the measurement of direction are realized. The coherence lifetime of atomic spins is lengthened to 340 ms and the sensitivity improves with time following a much faster τ -1 rule which enables the magnetometer to reach the quantum shot noise floor in a much shorter time.© 2019 Elsevier LtdElectrostatic doping aims at replacing donor/acceptor dopant species with free electron/hole charges induced by the gates in ultrathin MOS structures. Highly doped N+/P+ terminals and virtual P-N junctions can be emulated in undoped layers prompting innovative reconfigurable devices with enriched functionality. The distinct merit is that the carrier concentration and polarity (i.e., electrostatic doping) are tunable via the gate bias. After presenting the fundamentals, we review the family of electrostatically-doped devices fabricated with emerging or mature technologies (nanowires, nanotubes, 2D materials, FD-SOI). The multiple facets of the Hocus Pocus diode are discussed by underlining the difference with classical physical diodes. Electrostatic doping gave rise to a number of band-modulation devices with outstanding memory and sharp-switching capability. The concept, intrinsic mechanisms and typical applications are described in detail.© 2019 Elsevier LtdApplications of the wide band gap (WBG) semiconductors, such as GaN, AlGaN, and InGaN, range from lighting and ultraviolet (UV) technology to high power, radiation hard, high temperature, terahertz (THz) and sub-THz electronics and pyroelectronics. Wurtzite (hexagonal) symmetry makes these materials to be quite different from conventional cubic semiconductors. Spontaneous and piezoelectric polarization associated with the wurtzite crystal structure induces two-dimensional electron gases at AlGaN/GaN, AlInN/GaN, and AlGaN/InGaN interfaces with sheet concentrations 10–20 times higher than those in Si CMOS. A high current carrying capability and a high breakdown field make these materials perfect for high power applications. Adjusting the energy gaps of AlxGa1−xN and of InxGa1−xN by varying the molar fraction changes the wavelength of light they emit or absorb and enables light and UV emitters, solar cells, and photodetectors operating from THz and infrared to deep UV range. Blue, green, and white LEDs using InGaN revolutionized smart solid-state lighting. AlGaN UV LEDs are used for water purification, fighting antibiotic resistant bacteria and viruses, and dramatically increasing produce storage time. InN, ZnO, and BN have potential to compete with the AlN/GaN family. Diamond has re-emerged not only as a substrate for a record heat removal but also as a viable THz detector material. The WBG technology has many difficult problems to solve. High dislocation density in the WBG materials leads to a low efficiency of deep AlGaN UV LEDs and reliability problems of high power devices. Non-uniformities of the electric field distribution cause a premature breakdown. Using ultrathin WBG quantum well layers and nanowires and exploring radically new physics-based device designs might alleviate or even solve these problems.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn order to access exotic Dirac and Majorana states in (Bi,Sb)-based topological insulators (TIs), the physical surface of those crystals should not be exposed to air. 2–3 nm of in situ deposited Al on top of pristine TI thin films immediately oxidizes after taking the sample to ambient conditions. The native AlOx provides a favorable hard capping, which preserves the topological surface states during ex situ device fabrication. Here, we present a process on how to construct superconductor – topological insulator – superconductor (S-TI-S) junctions from in situ capped thin films comprised of 15 nm Sb2Te3 on top of 6 nm Bi2Te3. The thicknesses of the Sb2Te3 and the Bi2Te3 layer allow us to precisely tune the Fermi level of the upper surface of the Sb2Te3 layer. The challenge is to provide a transparent interface between Sb2Te3 and the superconductive Nb, while assuring an AlOx-capped weak link in between two closely separated Nb electrodes. Low temperature experiments on our junctions provide evidence for charge transport mediated by coherent Andreev states. Magnetic field dependent measurements yielded Fraunhofer-like patterns, whose periodicities are in good agreement with the effective areas of the respective junctions. Transmission electron micrographs of the narrowest junction confirm a crystalline and capped weak link. Our results provide the first reported signatures of induced superconductivity in S-TI-S junctions, which are capped by native AlOx. The presented process allows for accessing S-TI hybrid devices via magnetic flux, while assuring in situ conserved weak links. This makes as-prepared junctions a promising platform for proposed flux-controllable Majorana devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Four magnetoelectric (ME) composite systems: having composition [80 wt% BaFe 12 O 19 (BaM) – 20 wt% Na 0.5 Bi 0.5 TiO 3 (NBT)] considering the variation of grain size of both the phases are synthesized by solid state method. X-ray diffraction, FESEM and TEM studies are employed to confirm the pure phase formation, grains size and connectivity of both the phases in composite systems. The exchange-spring mechanism (ESM) has been examined with the help of MH loops and magneto transport studies. From analysis it has been found that spin polarized electron tunnelling at ferromagnetic (FM)-insulator (I) interfaces has significant effect on ESM.© 2019 Elsevier LtdSilicon photonics routers and band-pass filters employing ring resonators are usually constrained by a trade-off between quality factors and insertion loss, which is even more pronounced in compact designs. Device real estate is another factor to be considered for compactness and cost reduction. We propose an approach to simultaneously reduce insertion losses and increase the quality factor in such devices, while minimizing footprint. This approach consists in replacing the standard SiO2 top cladding of Si devices by erbium-doped Al2O3 films with a single post-processing step. Experimental results confirm the effectiveness of the method, where 1 dB output power increase is observed for a single ring device, in addition to an increase of 5% in the Q factor. In some cases of structures comprised of multiple coupled resonators, i.e., photonic molecules, the observed value of power increase is as high as 2.6 dB, with a Q factor increase of 25% and loss reduction of 3 dB.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Systematic trends connect detailed composition, lattice parameters and magnetic transition temperatures in the ferromagnetic intermetallic compound AlT 2 X 2 with the Mn 2 AlB 2 -type crystal structure, where T = Mn, Fe, Ni, Co and X = B, C. Data were derived from both literature reports and from experiments performed on synthesized samples (T = (Fe 1−x Ni x ) 2 , x = 0, 0.05, 0.1; X = (B 0.9 C 0.1 ) 2 ). It is observed that compositional variation alters specific bonds responsible for the magnetic phase transition response, which ranges from 200 K ≤ T t ≤ 310 K. Elemental composition that provides changes in the c-axis length and the associated (T-T) c -axis interatomic distance contribute the largest bonding effects to magnetic phase transition temperature T t , alterations. Overall, these results are attributed to the dependence of T t on the specifics of the Fe sublattice occupancy, electronic state and T-T bonding. In contrast, T t is found to be largely independent of the (b/a) axial ratios and the associated (T-X) b -axis /(T-X) ( ac )-plane interatomic distance ratios, indicating that interatomic interactions along the a-axis have little effect on the T t .© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The phase structural, optical and magnetic properties of a new (1 − x)Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 + xMgMnO3− δ compound were investigated. The MgMnO3− δ -modified Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 materials were fabricated using sol–gel method. Results of X-ray diffraction and Raman scattering indicated that the MgMnO3− δ materials were good solid solutions in the Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 compound. The random distribution of Mg and Mn cations in the host lattice of Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 materials reduced the optical band gap from 3.11 eV to 1.99 eV for 9 mol% MgMnO3− δ-modified Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 materials. The complex magnetic behaviour in MgMnO3− δ-modified Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 materials was obtained. The weak ferromagnetism vs. diamagnetism transformed to ferromagnetism vs. para/antiferromagnetic property depending on the concentration of MgMnO3− δ solid solution in Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 samples. Our work can further contribute to the study of current injection ferromagnetic material in host lead-free ferroelectric materials for smart electronic device application.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The mechanical and magnetic properties of the newly discovered MAB-phase class of materials based upon AlFe 2 B 2 were investigated. The samples were synthesised from stoichiometric amounts of all constituent elements. X-ray diffraction shows that the main phase is orthorhombic with an elongated b-axis, similar to AlFe 2 B 2 . The low hardness and visual inspection of the samples after deformation indicate that these compounds are deformed via a delamination process. When substituting iron in AlFe 2 B 2 with manganese, the magnetism in the system goes from being ferro- to antiferromagnetic via a disordered ferrimagnetic phase exhibited by AlFeMnB 2 . Density functional theory calculations indicate a weakening of the magnetic interactions among the transitions metal ions as iron is substituted by manganese in AlFe 2 B 2 . The Mn-Mn exchange interactions in AlMn 2 B 2 are found to be very small.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Geometrically frustrated magnetic materials possess multiple exotic states associated by lattice architecture induced competing magnetic interactions. It has been found that in case of Ho 2 Ti 2 O 7 , where quantum critical region existed up to ∼28.5 K, both single ion spin freezing (T f ) and spin ice freezing (T ice ) follows the (H − H C ) 1/2 variation with different values of the critical field. Where as in case of Dy 2 Ti 2 O 7 , it follows a liner relation. Accordingly, a H-T phase diagram, for this spin freezing phenomenon, has been presented for these compounds. The studies on magnetically distorted Ho 2 Ti 1 . 9 Mn 0 . 1 O 7 & Dy 2 Ti 1 . 9 Mn 0 . 1 O 7 compounds, lead us to conclude that competing magnetic interactions acting in different temperature regime are one of the preliminary factors responsible for the alteration in quantum critical point. These results provide a new platform for the experimental investigation and description of multiple exotic states occurring in frustrated magnets in term of quantum criticality.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The research of chiral materials in microwaves is attractive in a lot of physical disciplines. Compared to the field of optics, where many theoretical and measurements analysis tools and techniques exist, in microwaves, the study is at its initial stages of development. Recently, microwave devices based on a ferrite disk resonator with magneto-dipolar-mode (MDM) oscillations that allow creation of near fields characterized by helical structure have been developed. These near fields, called magneto-electric (ME) fields, are essential for the chirality characterization of the sample. For effective focusing of the ME fields a special microwave device based on a metallic wire positioned above a ferrite disk was developed. Such a device allows to narrow down the effective area of the ME fields by more than an order. In this work, we show a theoretical analysis of the localized ME fields generated by a metallic wire on a ferrite disk operating as the microwave microscope. Realization of such localized ME fields is an important step in the development of a microwave sensor for effective sensing of natural and artificial enantiomeric materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The temperature dependences of magnetization and surface magnetic anisotropy are reported by reversing electric fields at the interface of a Ni 80 Fe 20 /PbZr 0.44 Ti 0.56 O 3 multiferroic heterostructure. Both the in-plane magnetization variation and the isotropic ferromagnetic resonance field suggest that the magnetoelectric coupling effect arises from the interfacial accumulation or depletion of spin-polarized electrons, rather than the strain. As the temperature decreases, the ferromagnetic resonance field shifts left and the surface magnetic anisotropy deduced from the shift of ferromagnetic resonance field increases faster than the saturation magnetization. The strong temperature dependences of magnetization and surface magnetic anisotropy are related to the changes in the spin-polarized electron density due to the thermal motion.© 2019 The AuthorsTo meet the growing need for energy efficiency in power electronics and electric machines, a number of new soft magnetic materials are being investigated. Among them, high silicon Fe-Si alloy has been recognized as a promising candidate for low-to-medium-frequency applications. Compared to the currently most widely used 3 wt% silicon steel, the steel containing 6.5 wt% Si possesses more favorable properties, including high electrical resistivity, good saturation magnetization, and near-zero magnetostriction. However, the high silicon content facilitates the formation of ordered phases, resulting in severe brittleness that prohibits mass production using the economical conventional processing methods. A number of new processing routes have been investigated and inspiring progress has been made. Prototypes of motors and transformers using high silicon steel have been demonstrated with improved efficiency and power density. If the processing cost and limitations of size and shape are properly addressed, high silicon steel is expected to be widely adopted by the industries. Among all the investigated processing techniques, rapid solidification appears to be the most cost-effective method for mass producing thin sheet of high silicon steel. This paper reviews the current state-of-the-art of the Fe-Si based soft magnetic materials including their history, structure, properties, processing, and applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Various compositions of Fe 1−x Zn x PO 4 (x = 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, and 0.5) were synthesized by solid-state reaction and chemical lithium deintercalation processes, and their magnetic properties were characterized based on Mössbauer analysis. The synthesized Fe 1−x Zn x PO 4 have orthorhombic structures with space group Pnma. The magnetization curves of Fe 1−x Zn x PO 4 show the antiferromagnetic behaviors and magnetic phase transition caused by the strong crystal field in the FeO 6 octahedral sites. The Néel temperature (T N ) of Fe 1−x Zn x PO 4 for x = 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, and 0.5 was found to be 97, 82, 63, and 62 K, respectively. Mössbauer spectra below T N appeared to have eight Lorentzian lines with antiferromagnetic ordering. The charge state of Fe ions is the high spin state of Fe 3+ , as characterized by an isomer shift (δ = 0.28–0.43 mm/s). The value of magnetic hyperfine field (H hf ) decreased with increasing Zn concentration because the superexchange interaction via Fe–O–Zn link is weaker than that via Fe–O–Fe link. Also, the value of electric quadrupole splitting (ΔE Q ) gradually decreased with increasing Zn concentration due to the substitution of a Zn ion for the Fe ion, inducing a change in the charge asymmetry at the FeO 6 sites. The Debye temperatures are found to decrease with increasing Zn concentration.© 2019P-doped 6H-SiC substrates were implanted with Fe ions. During implantation the samples were maintained at 550 °C with energies ranging from 30 to 160 keV in order to produce a diluted magnetic semiconductor (DMS) with a 2% Fe homogeneous concentration to a depth of about 100 nm thickness. The effects of rapid thermal annealing on the microstructure were examined by atom probe tomography (APT). The study shows evidence of the formation of Fe rich nanoclusters after annealing which contain core magnetic phases that contribute to the magnetic properties.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. An exhaustive study of the influence of disorder on anomalous Hall (AH) resistivity (ρ xy AH ), longitudinal resistivity (ρ xx ), magnetoresistance and magnetization of Co 2 FeSi (CFS) Heusler alloy thin films of fixed (50 nm) thickness, deposited on Si (1 1 1) substrate, reveals the following. Regardless of the degree of disorder present, the side-jump mechanism gives a dominant contribution to ρ xy AH . A new and novel contribution to both ρ xx and ρ xy AH , characterized by the logarithmic temperature (-lnT) dependence at temperatures below the minimum (T<T min ), exclusive to the amorphous CFS films, originates from the scattering of conduction electrons from the diffusive hydrodynamic modes associated with the longitudinal component of magnetization, called ‘diffusons’. The electron-diffuson, e-d, scattering and weak localization (WL) mechanisms compete with the inelastic electron-magnon, e-m, scattering to produce the minimum in ρ xx (T), whereas the minimum in ρ xy AH (T) is caused by the competing contributions from the e-d and e-m scattering, as WL does not contribute to ρ xy AH . Another novel finding is that the e-d scattering contributions to ρ xy AH (T) and ρ xx (T) scale with each other. In sharp contrast, in crystalline films, enhanced electron-electron Coulomb interaction (EEI), which is basically responsible for the resistivity minimum, does not contribute to ρ xy AH with the result that no minimum in ρ xy AH (T) is observed. The conventional ρ xy AH = f(ρ xx ) scaling breaks down completely in the present case. However, when ρ xy AH (T) is corrected for the e-d contribution and ρ xx (T) for both e-d and WL contributions (only EEI) in the amorphous (crystalline) films, the AH coefficient, R A (T) = ρ xy AH (T) / 4πM s (T), (calculated from the corrected ρ xy AH and spontaneous magnetization, M s ), perfectly scales with ρ xxT , the temperature-dependent part of the corrected ρ xx , for all the CFS thin films.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In the past century, there have been revolutionary inventions and developments in both information and computational devices. The advances of nanotechnology have continued to miniaturize these devices in solid-state platforms. This trend will eventually reach the ultimate limit of single atoms and molecules. Scanning tunneling microscopy and spectroscopy (STM/STS) have been highly useful tools to investigate electronic and magnetic properties of individual atoms, molecules, and nanostructures on surfaces. Manipulating the electron spin degree of freedom at the atomic level may allow us to write, store, and read binary information of the smallest unit – atoms and molecules. At this length scale, quantum mechanics governs the behavior of individual spins and their interactions. Understanding temporal stability, accessibility, and spin lifetime at the atomic scale is essential to exploit the possibilities for using atoms and molecules as a basic unit of memory. This review introduces various STM-based research efforts toward single atom memory realization.© 2019 We studied on magnetoelectric behaviors of magnetically strained magnetostrictive materials-ferroelectric materials-magnetostrictive materials sandwich-type multilayered thin films. The sandwich-type multilayered thin films were deposited on Pt substrates by PLD system with a KrF excimer laser (λ = 248 nm). In particular, thin films were studied for their crystal structure and surface/interface microstructure as well as magnetic and electrical properties. The experimentally measured results have proved that saturated magnetizations (Ms) of CoFe 2 O 4 (20 nm, 20 nm, 200 nm)/BaTiO 3 (200 nm, 100 nm, 200 nm)/CoFe 2 O 4 (20 nm, 20 nm, 200 nm) sandwich-type multilayered thin films are measured as 23.58 emu/cm 3 , 38.52 emu/cm 3 , 103.71 emu/cm 3 and the capacitance of those increased more under the magnetic field (1000 Oe) than zero field by 2.4%, 7.8%, 11.5% respectively. Our work suggests the possibility of enhanced magnetocapacitance under magnetic field by controlling the interfacial compressive/tensile stress of thin film. As a results we have compared the experimental and theoretical values depending on the parameters such as thickness and potential distribution of magnetostrictive materials through the simulation program COMSOL physics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Fe 3 C magnetic nanoparticles were synthesized by solvothermal assisted technique. The X-ray and electron diffractions have confirmed the formation of monophasic iron carbide (Fe 3 C) nanoparticles. Transmission electron microscope analysis validated that the size of the particles was around 19–34 nm. The presence of only Fe and C in Fe 3 C was asserted by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS). The room temperature Mössbauer spectroscopy also corroborates the occurrence of only this carbide phase. The saturation magnetization at ±2 T and at 300 K was obtained to be around 88 Am 2 /kg with a coercivity of 17.3 mT and remanence of 6 Am 2 /kg. The oleic acid based ferrofluid of this carbide nanoparticles exhibited good heating ability in the presence of external alternating current (AC) magnetic fields. The optimum specific absorption rate and intrinsic loss power values were 85 W/g and 0.97 nHm 2 /kg at 23 mT and 261 kHz. Due to lack of reports on magnetic hyperthermia response for iron carbides, the values were compared with iron oxides. The values were found to be comparable.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The ground state structures, spin, orbital magnetic moments and magnetic anisotropies of bimetallic clusters Mn 13-n Co n (n = 0–13) are systematically investigated by using density functional theory (DFT) with and without spin-orbit coupling. The studies reveal a transition from icosahedron (ICO) to the hexagonal bilayer (HBL) structure, following the rule putting Mn in a central position and Co in the surface of icosahedrons. The magnetic moments of clusters increase to the maximum in Mn 9 Co 4 (39µ B ) and then decrease as a function of Co concentration. Besides, we find that the orbital moments of all clusters are dominated by Co atoms, as the composition of Co increases, the orbital moments increase from 0.01µ B (Mn 13 ) to 1.34µ B (Co 13 ). The magnetic anisotropies and magnetic anisotropy energies (MAEs) are tiny in all clusters.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Polycrystalline nano grain size Na 0.5 Bi 0.5 TiO 3 (NBT) system is synthesized by using modified sol–gel method. X-ray diffraction (XRD), Transmission electron microscopy (TEM) studies and Field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM) are employed for structural and morphological confirmation. Electrochemical transport properties of this nano system have been investigated systematically in the range of temperature (30 °C−450 °C) and frequency (100 Hz−1 MHz) with the help of complex impedance spectroscopic technique. From impedance and modulus results, two (one at low and another at high temperature regime) positive temperature coefficient of resistance (PTCR) to negative temperature coefficient of resistance (NTCR) transitions are observed which is useful for electrochemical temperature sensor application. From electric transport analysis it found that due to small polaron hopping of charge carriers at NBT-NBT interfaces system shown PTCR nature. However, the system has shown both −ve magnetoresistance [MR (%)] and magnetocapacitance [MC (%)] at RT due to overlapping of large polaron tunnelling (OLPT) at NBT-NBT interfaces (which is explored with the help of magnetic transport analysis).© 2019 Surface nitridation has been used to fabricate the insulation coatings of the Fe, FeSi, FeSiAl and FeSiCr soft magnetic composites (SMCs). Effects of the nitridation conditions on the magnetic performance of the SMCs have been investigated. Detailed growth mechanism and models of the coating layers for different alloy systems have been established based on combined thermodynamic and kinetics analysis. For Fe and FeSi SMCs, nitride coatings containing α-Fe(N) forms, while coexistenc of α-Fe(N) and Fe 4 N is obtained for the FeSiAl SMCs. For the FeSiCr system, the nitride coating is composed of α-Fe(N) and CrN with relatively large electrical resistivity, giving rise to enhanced magnetic performance compared with that of the SMCs prepared via traditional phosphoric acid passivation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Geometrically frustrated Dy 2 Ti 2 O 7 spin ice is known for robust magnetic behavior where structural and dielectric properties are coupled with its magnetism. Herein, effects of Fe substitution, at the magnetic Dy site (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.15) in Dy 2 Ti 2 O 7 compound have been systematically examined in terms of structural distortions and magnetic perturbations through structural, dielectric, optical and magnetic studies. The experimental findings suggest that Fe substitution does not change the crystal electric field acting on the rare earth ion, though it produces significant structural distortions. These findings suggest that spin dynamics non-monotonically depends on the nature and dynamics of neighboring magnetic ion's spin (Fe spin in this case), because of existing strong spin correlations. This dependency provides a new possibility to tune or modify the spin dynamics of the correlated magnetic states in these materials via magnetic perturbations, which can be controlled by the externally applied magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Magnetorheological elastomers are composite materials made of micron sized magnetic particles embedded in an elastomer matrix. By applying a magnetic field, the Young's modulus of those materials can be controlled, which leads to the so-called magnetorheological effect and defines them as a smart material. In most papers dealing with magnetorheological elastomers, the particles are only specified by brand name and mean size, without mentions of the size distribution of the particles. Nevertheless, it is already known, that the particle size can have a significant impact on the magnetorheological effect. In this paper, magnetorheological effects of magnetorheological elastomers with iron particles of four different size fractions are compared. Size distributions have been analyzed using laser diffraction measurements and X-ray microtomography measurements. The results show a clear dependence of the magnetorheological effect on the particle size fraction.© 2019We report on the effect of the beveled mesa angle on the performance of 4H-SiC avalanche photodiodes (APDs) with various active areas between 100 and 500 µm. The mesa structure was beveled with a smaller slope angle by using a photoresist reflow technique to suppress edge breakdown. Some beveled mesa APDs with a small angle of 10.5° were studied using high-resolution transmission electron microscopy and an electrical and optical measurement system compared with APDs with large slope angles of 28.5°. The study results show that a small-slope beveled mesa APD shows more uniform dark current level in the linear region, regardless of the active area with a sharp breakdown, and a lower dark count rate than the larger slope-angle APD.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Formation of the L1 0 structure in FePd alloys doped with nonmetallic elements is studied on melt-spun and annealed samples. The melt-spun Fe 41 Pd 41 P 18−x−y B x Si y (x = 0–14; y = 0, 6) ribbons were annealed at the temperatures of 400–650 °C for different holdings in the range from 5 min to several hours and studied by X-ray and thermomagnetic analysis and TEM. The saturation magnetization, Curie temperature of the L1 0 phase, and grain size of the melt-spun doped Fe 41 Pd 41 P 18−x−y B x Si y ribbons decrease in comparison with those of the melt-spun binary FePd alloy. The refined grain structure results in enhancing coercivity. Among all as-annealed samples, the P addition favors the amorphization of the as-spun Fe 41 Pd 41 P 18 ribbons and refines grains of the formed L1 0 phase, but decreases magnetization. Substitution of B for P gives rise to magnetization of the Fe 41 Pd 41 P 18−x−y B x alloys, but decreases their coercivity. A partial substitution of Si for B at the same P content refines grains and enhances the coercivity without a decrease in the magnetization of the Fe 41 Pd 41 P 4 B 8 Si 6 alloy. It is suggested that P and B atoms occupy interstitial sites in the L1 0 lattice in the iron plane, weakening the exchange interaction and decreasing the Curie temperature. The additions of P, B, and Si to the FePd alloy allowed us to obtain the Fe 41 Pd 41 P 4 B 8 Si 6 ribbons with the coercivity of 1560 Oe, which is 2.6 times higher than that of the melt-spun ribbons of the FePd alloy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The temperature dependent magnetoresistive behaviour of field cooled naturally oxidised specular spin valve systems has been studied in the temperature range of 300–10 K. Inconsistent to the non-specular spin valve system, an anomalous behaviour was evolved with large exchange bias and higher coercivity, below 200 K. The structural investigations inferred the formation of magnetic oxides with higher density gradient in the pinned layer, and the observed anomalous behaviour at low temperatures was correlated with the antiferromagnetic ordering of these oxides in spin glass state. The uncompensated interfacial magnetism of the nano-oxide layer was further confirmed by comparing with low temperature magnetoresistive behaviour of non-magnetic oxide based specular spin valve systems.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this work, the (1 1 1)-oriented Fe 3 O 4 /BiFeO 3 (BFO) multiferroic heterostructures were fabricated on the flexible muscovite (mica) substrate by magnetron sputtering. Hysteresis loops reveal the obvious exchange bias effect in the flexible Fe 3 O 4 /BFO heterostructures and demonstrate that this effect related to the coupling interaction at the interface between the Fe 3 O 4 and the BFO. In the inward or outward bending heterostructures, the decrease of the exchange bias field (H EB ) is resulted from the variation of the Fe A 3+ −[O 4 ] Fe3O4 8− −Fe BFO 3+ bond length and bond angle or/and the charge reconstruction effect of the Fe 3 O 4 thin film in bending states. This exchange bias effect in the flexible Fe 3 O 4 /BFO heterostructures will contribute to the development of the next generation flexible storage device.© 2019 Elsevier Ltd Germanium is a promising material for the laser that can be monolithically integrated on Si complementary metal-oxide-semiconductor platform and has emission wavelength of 1550 nm for optical interconnect. To obtain significant optical gain, it is necessary to achieve high n-type doping concentration level, while avoiding the damage to Ge crystalline quality. In this paper, we report an ex-situ phosphorus diffusion doping of Ge film, based on low-temperature phosphosilicate glass (PSG) pre-deposition process such as spin-on-glass and sub-atmospheric chemical vapor deposition (SACVD) methods. Closely related to optical gain properties of Ge for Ge-on-Si laser application, the photoluminescence characteristics of Ge epitaxial film after P diffusion doping were investigated. In particular, SACVD-processed PSG deposited directly on Ge film without any Si capping layer successfully led to high phosphorus doping concentration of ∼10 19 cm −3 deep inside Ge and dramatically enhanced photoluminescence intensity by more than 10 times compared to intrinsic Ge film. By using the SACVD-PSG based P doping process, we developed an inverted-rib Ge waveguide structure for more effective optical gain. In the inverted-rib Ge structure, the mode will be positioned upward and stay relatively away from the Ge-Si interface where many dislocations are located and, as a result, we can expect less optical loss due to scattering and the overall higher mode gain. As a very promising preliminary result, from optical-pumping of the inverted-rib Ge, a threshold-like behavior starting at 18 kW/cm 2 and amplified spontaneous emission around 1570 nm were demonstrated.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The magnetic properties and critical behavior near the Curie temperature T C in the double perovskite RE 2 CoMnO 6 (RE = La and Eu) were systematically investigated via the modified Arrott plots (MAP), the Kouvel-Fisher plot (K-F), and the critical isotherm analysis (CI). The reliable value of critical parameters (β δ and γ) obtained from K-F plot are to be 0.4704, 0.9978, and 3.12 with T C of 210.8 K for La 2 CoMnO 6 , and to be 0.6065, 0.9237, and 2.52 with T C of 130.3 K for Eu 2 CoMnO 6 , respectively. Moreover, the reliability of critical parameters of two samples was further verified by different methods including the Widom scaling relation and the magnetic equation. The obtained values of critical parameters are all close to the value of the mean-field theoretical model which manifested the presence of the long-range FM order for RE 2 CoMnO 6 (RE = La and Eu) compounds.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Electronic properties of gapped graphene structure taking into account the effects of interaction between electrons and Einstein phonons have been addressed. Specially we study the temperature dependence of electrical conductivity and density of states of the structure. The effects of gap parameter, magnetic field and electron doping on electrical conductivity of the system have been studied. Gap parameter is defined as the on-site energy difference of atoms on two different sublattices of honeycomb structure. Green's function method has been implemented to obtain electronic density of states of the system in the context of Holstein model Hamiltonian. One loop electronic self-energy of the model Hamiltonian has been obtained in order to find interacting electronic Green's function. The electrical conductivity of graphene structure in the presence of electron-phonon coupling can be readily found using interacting Green's function based on Kubo formula. We present the numerical results of energy dependence of density of states for different values of gap parameter and magnetic field in the presence of Holstein phonons. Finally the temperature dependence of electrical conductivity of gapped graphene structure due to electron phonon interaction and magnetic has been investigated. Our results show turning on magnetic field leads to appear double van Hov singularity for each value of electron phonon coupling.© 2019In the present study, we present new experimental and calculated results of Co nanowires synthesized by the solvothermal method. The coercivity of 8.7 kOe and the energy product of 31.4 MGOe were obtained for wires of average diameters of 20 nm and average lengths of 200 nm. The experimental and numerical results of nanowires were discussed. Micromagnetic simulations were conducted to study the dependence of the magnetic properties on the nanowire aspect ratios, diameters, and various magneto-crystalline easy axis deviation angles from the long axis of Co nanowires. The calculation with a magneto-crystalline easy axis deviations from long axis show a better accordance with experimental results. The state graphs for reversal modes versus the magneto-crystalline easy axis deviation angles in Co nanowires were presented.© 2019 The AuthorsGrain size and precipitates have a significant effect on the mechanical properties of steels and it is desirable to be able to characterise these in a non-destructive manner. Grain and precipitate sizes and their spatial distributions in both an extra-low-carbon steel and a laboratory model steel have been individually varied and compared with a variety of characteristic magnetic parameters measured from major and minor magnetisation loops. These magnetic parameters are shown to be very sensitive to grain size distribution when there are no precipitates within the grains. However, the magnetic parameters exhibit complex behaviours with precipitate size distribution, which is linked to a critical precipitate size for effective pinning and another critical precipitate size for strongest pinning to domain walls. The interaction between grain size and precipitate distribution effects on the minor loop properties in the studied steels are discussed.© 2019 Given the various applications of half-metals in the spintronics devises, we studied the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of transition-metal (TM) (Cr, Mn, Fe, Co, Ni, and Cu) adatoms on WS 2 monolayer by performing first-principles calculations. Based on the adsorption energy, TM atoms prefer to occupy the T W site, above the W atoms, for all the cases. The results indicate that systems of Cr, Mn, Fe, and Co adsorbed on WS 2 monolayer are magnetic, while in Ni and Cu atoms adsorbed don't have any magnetic properties. The TM atoms are adsorbed chemically to the WS 2 layer. The obtained values of the total magnetic moment vary from 4 μ B to 1 μ B in case of Cr to Co adsorption, respectively, which agree with the Slater-Pauling rule. Based on the magnetic moment of 0.00 μ B , non-magnetic states are realized for Ni and Cu adsorption. More importantly, the high spin polarization of 100% at the Fermi level is achieved in the Cr, Mn, Fe and Co adsorption, which implies the potential for application in spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.• High-frequency/high-field electron spin resonance measurements. • Magnetic phase diagram of S = 1 honeycomb-lattice system. • Short-range order up to 5 TN. © 2019 Elsevier B.V. The decisive role of magnetic anisotropy even in systems with small anisotropy is illustrated for the honeycomb-layered antiferromagnets A 3 Ni 2 SbO 6 with A = Li and Na. Both systems evolve long range magnetic order below T N = 14 and 16.5 K, respectively. The magnetic phase diagrams obtained from static magnetisation studies up to 15 T imply competing antiferromagnetic phases and a tricritical point at T N . The phase boundaries are visible in the dynamic response of the antiferromagnetic resonance modes, too, which investigation by means of high frequency/high field electron spin resonance enables precise determination of magnetic anisotropy. The anisotropy gap amounts to Δ=360±2 GHz in Na 3 Ni 2 SbO 6 while in Li 3 Ni 2 SbO 6 orthorhombicity is associated with Δ=198±4 and 218±4 GHz. Above T N , the data imply short-range antiferromagnetic order up to at least 80 K. The data suggest a crucial role of anisotropy for selecting the actual spin structure at B=0 T.© 2019 Non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) accounts for 80–85% of all lung cancer which is the leading cause of cancer death worldwide. Eighty percent of NSCLC patients exhibit high levels of epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) expression. In recent years, Doxorubicin (Dox, a widely used chemotherapeutic drug) and/or Cetuximab (Cet, an EGFR-targeted inhibitor) combined with nanoparticles for cancer therapy have attracted significant attention due to their efficient targeting and the resulting increased cytotoxicity on tumor cells. Herein, we report the effects of Dox and Cet, co-conjugated to dextran-coated Fe 3 O 4 magnetic nanoparticles (Dox-NPs-Cet) on the NSCLC cell line A549, which expresses a high level of EGFR. Cytotoxicity, cell proliferation and intercellular uptake were investigated after treatment with this conjugate. The results indicate that Dox-NPs-Cet significantly suppress cell proliferation of A549 cells as compared with A549 cells treated with NPs only conjugated with Dox. In summary, our study demonstrates that Dox-NPs-Cet could serve as a promising candidate for targeted therapy of NSCLC.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization reversal in 330nm triangular prismatic magnetic nanoelements with variable magnetocrystalline anisotropy similar to that of partially chemically ordered FePt is studied using micromagnetic simulations employing Finite Element discretizations. Several magnetic properties including the evaluation of the magnetic skyrmion number S are computed in order to characterize magnetic configurations exhibiting vortex-like formations. Magnetic vortices and skyrmions are revealed in different systems generated by the variation of the magnitude and relative orientation of the magnetocrystalline anisotropy direction, with respect to the normal to the triangular prism base. Micromagnetic configurations with skyrmion number greater than one have been detected for the case where magnetocrystalline anisotropy was normal to nanoelement's base. For particular magnetocrystalline anisotropy values three distinct skyrmions are formed and persist for a range of external fields. The simulation-based calculations of the skyrmion number S revealed that skyrmions can be created for magnetic nanoparticle systems lacking of chiral interactions such as Dzyaloshinsky-Moriya, but by only varying the magnetocrystalline anisotropy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Two metamagnetic Heusler alloys based on Ni 45 Cr 5 Mn 37 In 13 with differing Mn concentrations (by 0.2 at. %) were studied using magnetization, resistivity, and Hall resistivity measurements. It is shown that this small variation in composition leads to fundamental changes in magnetic properties. Near the martensitic phase transitions, the anomalous Hall coefficient (R S ) was found to increase with temperature while the resistivity (ρ) decreases. Thus, in the case of Ni 45 Cr 5 Mn 37 In 13 , the general correlation between R S and ρ considered as applicable for all crystalline and amorphous ferromagnetic alloys, breaks down completely. We explain this behavior in the framework of an s-d model where it is assumed that the resistivity and anomalous Hall effect are determined by different groups of current carriers.© 2019 A resistive switching random-access memory (ReRAM) device with TiN/HfO 2 /SiO 2 /p + -Si stack is analyzed for synaptic behavior. Fabricated RRAM device stack consists of heavily doped p-type silicon bottom electrode (BE), HfO 2 as a switching layer, SiO 2 as a tunneling barrier layer and TiN as a top electrode (TE). The RRAM cell successfully shows I-V curves including SET and RESET operations in DC sweep mode. By inserting a SiO 2 tunneling barrier layer, gradual switching characteristics are obtained by pulse operation. By optimizing the pulse scheme applied to the device, biological synaptic plasticity of long-term potentiation and depression is demonstrated. Finally, spike rate-dependent plasticity (SRDP) learning rule is realized by applying pulses with different frequencies to both terminals of the ReRAM device.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A model of structured Magneto-rheological Elastomer made of a soft matrix filled by magnetic particles was studied for energy harvesting, in pure shear condition. The particles were supposed to be aligned in a chain along which the magnetic field is applied and considering a shear strain applied in a plane perpendicularly to the chain. As the strain is applied and assuming the deformation is homogeneous and the particles remain aligned, both of the axis of their alignment and inter-distance between particles change, affecting their magnetic state. The aim of this work is to evaluate how far the magnetic induction variation induced by mechanical solicitation can be converted into electric signal. We firstly analyzed the magnetic susceptibility of a particle in the chain, and then derived an analytical expression for the composite permeability as a function of shear strain. FEM simulations taking into account the particle magnetic saturation was also performed to estimate the optimal conditions (magnetic field values, shear amplitude, etc.) maximizing the energy conversion potentials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this paper, we report the structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of La 0.65 Nd 0.05 Ba 0.3 Mn 1−x Cr x O 3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.15) system synthesized by conventional solid-state reaction method. Phase identification is performed by X-ray diffraction analysis, which shows the rhombohedra crystal structure with R -3 c as a space group. Magnetic measurements show that all our samples undergo a second order paramagnetic (PM) – ferromagnetic (FM) transition when the temperature decreases. However, The M(T) shows a decrease in a Curie temperature (T C ) from 330 K for x = 0 to 275 K for x = 0.15 as a Cr ion increases. This decrease can be explained by the decreasing number of hopping electrons, which reduces the double exchange (DE) interaction of Mn 3+ -O-Mn 4+ . The role of the trivalent ions Cr 3+ is merely to dilute the DE interactions between Mn sites. Moreover, the maximum magnetic entropy change −ΔS M calculated from the M(μ 0 H) measurements are found to be 4.26, 4.03, 3.97 and 3.55 Jkg −1 K −1 under an external field change of 5 T for x = 0, 0.05, 0.1 and 0.15, respectively. However, the temperature-averaged entropy change (TEC) over 10 K temperature span under same field, TEC (10 K, 5 T), are 4.19, 3.91, 3.86 and 3.47 Jkg −1 K −1 . This finding suggests that our samples can be used as a magnetic refrigeration material around room temperature. Furthermore, the ΔS M –T curves collapse onto a single master curve confirming the second order phase transition. Additionally, a phenomenological universal model is used to predict the magnetocaloric properties for Cr substituted samples.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Results on the influence of glass-removal on the magnetostriction, magnetic switching properties and domain wall propagation in amorphous Fe 77.5 Si 17.5 B 15 microwires are reported. Glass removal releases high thermoelastic stresses originated by the difference in thermal expansion coefficients of glass and metal, which reduces the coercivity, increases the domain wall mobility and decreases the local nucleation fields and their distributions. Evening the distribution of nucleation fields and eliminating the local surface defects due to glass removal increase the field range of single domain wall propagation regime. It was also found that the saturation magnetostriction coefficient significantly decreases after glass removal, which strengthens the impact of the reduced magnetoelastic anisotropy. The effect of glass removal on magnetostriction was previously observed only in Co-rich microwires with small negative magnetostriction. Understanding the factors that control the magnetic switching and domain wall dynamics is of interest for practical applications in sensing, storage and logic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The electronic, magnetic, and magnetocaloric properties of the intermetallic TbCu 2 Si 2 compound are studied. From Ab-initio calculations, we found that the magnetic moment and the exchange coupling interactions values are 5.93μ B and J 1 = 0.58 meV, J 2 = -0.69 meV and J 3 = 0.41 meV, respectively. On the other, the magnetic and magnetocaloric properties are calculated using Monte Carlo simulation based on the Ising model. The intermetallic TbCu 2 Si 2 compound exhibits a second-order antiferromagnetic-paramagnetic phase transition around T N 8K, as well as a large MCE has been obtained for different external magnetic field values. Besides, the maximum values of the magnetic entropy change (ΔS mag ) and the relative cooling power (RCP) are found to be 40.78 J/Kg.K, 71.58 J/kg, respectively, at h = 2 T. Additionally, by increasing the magnetic field, it is shown that the maximum of ΔS mag increase widely and T N shifts to lower temperature.© 2019 Elsevier LtdGate-all-around (GAA) metal-oxide-semiconductor field-effect transistors (MOSFETs) is one of the mainstream research topics of the current era in the field of semiconductor devices since they are the most efficient architectures among all multiple-gate (MG) devices. Incorporating strain in GAA device can boost the device performance significantly. As such, strained-Si (S-Si) GAA MOSFETs can have vast technological importance in future high performance logic technologies. Due to imperfections in the fabrication process, the cross-section of a GAA device may deviate from its ideal circular nature, giving rise to an elliptical structure. Capacitance-Voltage (C-V) characteristics is an important tool for characterizing such devices. For the first time, we analytically model the quasi-static C-V characteristics of elliptical S-Si GAA MOSFETs for various operating regions. We have incorporated quantum mechanical effects (QMEs) which cannot be neglected in devices having ultra-nanometre dimensions. Computations were carried out to investigate the effects of device dimensions, interface trap charges, doping concentration, germanium mole fraction and stress on the C-V characteristics of S-Si GAA MOSFETs. The possibilities for enhancing the device performance by using high-k dielectrics have also been investigated.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Samples of Nickel-Zinc ferrite, Ni 1− x Zn x Fe 2 O 4 (x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8 and 1.0), were synthesized by a solid state reaction method. The morphology of four of the samples (x = 0.0, 0.4, 0.6 and 1.0) was observed with 3D X-ray imaging. The distortion caused by the increase of zinc in the ferrite structure and the respective movement of the trivalent (Fe) and divalent (Ni) ions from the tetrahedral- to the octahedral-sites cause some vacancies which act as positron traps. Doppler broadening of annihilation radiation experiments have been performed with a variable energy monoenergetic positron beam. The positron results as a function of the energy/depth implantation are presented in this work.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We report the structural and magnetic properties of a new system LiRhMnO 4 (LRMO) through X-ray diffraction, bulk magnetization, heat capacity and 7 Li nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) measurements. LRMO crystallizes in the cubic space group Fd3¯m. From the DC susceptibility data, we obtained the Curie-Weiss temperature θ CW = −26 K and Curie constant C = 1.79 Kcm 3 /mol suggesting antiferromagnetic correlations among the magnetic Mn 4+ ions with an effective spin [Formula presented]. At H = 50 Oe, the field cooled and zero-field cooled magnetizations bifurcate at a freezing temperature, T f = 4.45 K, which yields the frustration parameter [Formula presented]. AC susceptibility, shows a cusp-like peak at around T f , with the peak position shifting as a function of the driving frequency, confirming a spin-glass-like transition in LRMO. LRMO also shows typical spin-glass characteristics such as memory effect, aging effect and relaxation. In the heat capacity, there is no sharp anomaly down to 2 K indicative of long-range ordering. The field sweep 7 Li NMR spectra show broadening with decreasing temperature without any spectral line shift. The 7 Li NMR spin-lattice and spin-spin relaxation rates also show anomalies due to spin freezing near T f .© 2019 Following its discovery in the aftermath of Nd 2 Fe 14 B, Sm 2 Fe 17 N 3 seemed to offer intrinsic magnetic properties that were superior or comparable to those of its famous predecessor. But the promise of the new material to challenge Nd 2 Fe 14 B was not realized, mainly because the 2:17 nitride powder, prepared by a low-temperature gas-phase interstitial modification process, was unstable at the temperatures needed to process dense sintered magnets. Here we discuss the magnetic properties of Nitroquench, a melt-spun Sm-Fe-N material, which offers superior corrosion resistance and thermal stability compared to melt-spun Nd-Fe-B. The powder, with a crystallite size of approximately 30 nm is in the form of flakes 15–18 µm thick and about 100 µm in diameter. Room-temperature coercivity is 690 kAm −1 after saturation in 14 T, with a remanence of 92 Am 2 kg −1 and an extrapolated saturation magnetization of 160 Am 2 kg −1 . The remanence enhancement is reflected in a preferred orientation seen in 57 Fe Mössbauer spectra of magnetized isotropic powder, which exhibits different relative intensities of the ΔM = 0 absorption lines according to the direction of the field used to saturate the magnetization. When measured in zero internal field, the remanence ratio M r /M s is 64%. The remanence enhancement is attributed to a nanocrystallite size that is not very much greater than the exchange length. The maximum energy product for the powder, assuming full density, is 162 kJm −3 . Nitroquench powder may be used to produce bonded magnets with an energy product >100 kJm −3 .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Multiferroic materials, such as the BiFeO 3 , have been investigated as emergent material to technological purposes. Other multiferroic materials reported in literature are PbNiO 3 , NiTiO 3 and FeTiO 3 . In this work, we decide to investigate a new series of multiferroic materials composed by Fe 3+ in A and B sites of R3c structures, resulting in AlFeO 3 , FeAlO 3 , FeVO 3 , BiFeO 3 and PbFeO 3 . Therefore, a DFT/B3LYP investigation was employed to evaluate the structural, electronic, topological analysis, ferroelectric and magnetic properties, as well as the magnetoelectric coupling. Our results indicates that the multiferroism were theoretically evidenced in these materials since a magnetic resultant is oriented along [1 1 1] direction of unit cell (as ferromagnetic as antiferromagnetic materials) while the ferroelectricity is oriented along z [0 0 1] direction. In all materials, it was observed a D 3d distortion on clusters and its characteristic energy levels pattern for t 2g and e g . In particular, the electronic structure of PbFeO 3 material indicates that Pb atoms presents a spin contamination caused by unpaired electrons from Fe in the structure and also suggesting a half-metallic ferromagnetism pointing it as important alternatives to spintronic devices development. The results for energetic stability suggest that all materials are stable under high pressures and room conditions.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We carefully investigated the influence of the thickness of TaO x buffer layer on the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy and spin-obit torques in Pt/Co/Pt trilayers. Using the first and second harmonic Hall voltage measurements, we found that both the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy field and the damping-like field are sensitive to the thickness of the TaO x layer. The damping-like torque with various TaO x thickness changes synchronously with the resistance of the device, which can be explained by the buffer TaO x layer induced current distribution changes in the bottom and top Pt layers. Through the current-induced magnetization switching measurement, we found that an optimal switching efficiency can be obtained by tuning the thickness of TaO x buffer layer.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The properties of a domain wall between axial domains in a bi-stable microwire are studied in this paper. The axial dimension of a long planar static domain wall is calculated using a simple theoretical model. The obtained value of a few millimetres is in good agreement with known experimental values. The dynamic properties of the domain wall were analysed using wall velocity versus applied field dependences v(H). Based on a simple model which includes standard damping mechanisms (eddy current damping and spin relaxation damping), the experimentally observed decrease in wall mobility in v(H) can be caused by decrease in the wall axial dimension, its length. This should be accompanied by changes in the voltage peaks induced in the pick-up coil in the Sixtus–Tonks experiment which was, however, not observed. Taking into account a stray field around the moving wall, the voltage peaks were calculated for the situation when the pick-up coil radius was much larger than the wire radius. The calculated peaks are relatively wide also for very short domain walls, and they are only slightly influenced by the wall length. This indicates that obtaining information on the wall length and changes in its length and shape from the induced voltage peaks is very difficult.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Nitrogen ion implantation is employed to improve the soft magnetic properties of commercial amorphous Fe-Si-B ribbons. The effects of implantation dose and acceleration voltage on the micro-structure, crystallization behavior and magnetic properties are systematically investigated. 1 × 10 16 ions cm −2 is determined to be the most suitable dose value to generate one layer with nitrogen implanted as well as keeping the ribbon amorphous. The maximum saturation magnetization of 1.69 T is obtained under this dose, which may be due to the contribution of the formed nanostructured nitride with higher magnetization. Continuing to increase the dose, the magnetization starts to decrease because of the crystallization of the amorphous matrix. Under different acceleration voltages, the structure of the Fe-Si-B ribbons keeps amorphous. Moreover, the largest magnetization is achieved at 150 kV.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The effect of substitution of Fe in place of Cr on structural, electronic and magnetic properties of quaternary Co 2 Cr 0.5 Fe 0.5 Al Heusler alloy has been investigated. The study of X-ray diffraction (XRD) and Mössbauer spectroscopy of annealed sample have a highly ordered B2-type phase. The parameters extracted from the XRD have been used to analyze half metallicity of B2-phase theoretically. The first principal calculations based on generalized gradient approximation predict half metallic ferromagnetic with an energy gap of 0.319 eV in the minority spin channel around the Fermi level. On substitution of Fe in Co 2 CrAl, DC magnetization studies show an increase in saturation magnetization (3.02 µ B /f.u.) and Curie temperature (910 K) compared to its parent alloy Co 2 CrAl at room temperature. Structural, electronic and magnetic properties of quaternary Co 2 Cr 0.5 Fe 0.5 Al Heusler alloy show that the half metallicity is retained even on partial substitution of Cr by Fe with predominant B2 ordered structure. Thus Co 2 Cr 0.5 Fe 0.5 Al in B2-phase brings excellent structural ordering, high magnetic moment and Curie temperature while retaining the half-metallicity that is useful for spintronics applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We systematically investigated the ferromagnetic properties of LaMnO 3 (LMO) films grown on SrTiO 3 (STO) substrates with varying deposition oxygen pressure P O 2 (0.2 ≤ P O 2 ≤ 200 mTorr). It was found that the films only deposited with P O2 ≤ 20 mTorr showed exchange bias behavior and meantime the coercive field H C of LMO films deposited below 20 mTorr is about one order of magnitude larger than that of films deposited at 200 mTorr. When the LMO films were deposited at 20 mTorr on different substrates [LaAlO 3 (LAO), (LaAlO 3 ) 0.3 (Sr 2 AlTaO 6 ) 0.7 (LAST), SrTiO 3 (STO) and KTaO 3 ], LMO/STO sample showed the maximum H C , even though all of them exhibit exchange bias behavior. Thickness dependence of magnetic properties in LMO/STO films deposited at 20 mTorr indicated a maximum coercive field and the existence of exchange bias for 20 nm-thick LMO sample. Based on our results, the enhancement of coercive field and exchange bias was attributed to the competition between different magnetic phases induced by oxygen vacancies and Jahn-Teller effect from strain-induced orbital ordering.© 2019 In this paper, the observation of exchange bias in defective ferromagnetic SiC is presented. Two typical features of exchange bias are clearly observed: the shift of magnetic hysteresis upon field cooling and the training effect. A core-shell morphology particle model is employed to quantitatively analyze the exchange bias field dependence on the cooling field. Based on the model, the calculated anisotropy constant is 2.5 × 10 5 erg/cm 3 . The training effect can be described by the Kolmogorov-Avrami model, which is used for the classical exchange bias system. The appearance of exchange bias is the signature of the existence of an interface between ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic layers or cores/shells.© 2019 Super-paramagnetic, mono-dispersed and single-phased Mn-substituted Zn-ferrite nanoparticles (NPs) with a narrow size distribution were synthesized by a one-step citric acid-assisted hydrothermal method. X-ray diffraction (XRD), Scanning electron microscopy (SEM), vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM) and Fourier-transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR) techniques were utilized to determine characteristics of the NPs. The as-prepared Zn 0.3 Fe 2.7 O 4 NPs were highly crystalline with uniform size (14.5±2.65) and good stability in an aqueous medium. The effects of Mn concentration (x = 0.25, 0.5, 0.75 and 1) and pH on the formation of Zn 0.3 Mn x Fe 2.7−x O 4 NPs were thoroughly studied. The maximum saturation magnetization of 55 emu/g was obtained for the Zn-ferrite sample substituted with x = 0.5 of Mn. Increasing x firstly resulted in an increased saturation magnetization from 47.1 emu/g (x = 0.25) to 55 emu/g (x = 0.5), followed by a decrease to 37 emu/g (x = 1). The variation of saturation magnetization was correlated with the distribution of Mn 2+ ions in tetrahedral and octahedral sites.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.This study deals with the magnetohydrodynamics flow of viscous fluid induced by the ciliary propulsion in a porous medium which has an application to control diseases in respiratory track. A symplectic metachronal wave of the micro-organism is considered for the MHD fluid flow. The continuity and momentum equations are simplified under the long wave length and small Reynolds’ number approximation. The modeled partial differential equations are solved by analytical technique Fourier series expansion method. Velocity profile, stream function and pressure gradient are plotted to see the effect of magnetic field and porous medium.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this work we have used micromagnetic simulations to report four ways to build traps for magnetic skyrmions. Magnetic defects have been modeled as local variations in the material parameters, such as the exchange stiffness, saturation magnetization, magnetocrystalline anisotropy and Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya constant. We observe both pinning (potential well) and scattering (potential barrier) traps when tuning either a local increase or a local reduction for each one of these magnetic properties. It is found that the skyrmion-defect aspect ratio is a crucial parameter to build traps for skyrmions. In particular, the efficiency of the trap is compromised if the defect size is smaller than the skyrmion size, because they interact weakly. On the other hand, if the defect size is larger than the skyrmion diameter, the skyrmion-defect interaction becomes evident. Thus, the strength of the skyrmion-defect interaction can be tuned by the modification of the magnetic properties within a region with suitable size. Furthermore, the basic physics behind the mechanisms for pinning and for scattering is discussed. In particular, we discover that skyrmions move towards the magnetic region which tends to maximize its diameter; it enables the magnetic system to minimize its energy. Thus, we are able to explain why skyrmions are either attracted or repelled by a region with modified magnetic properties. Results here presented are of utmost significance for the development of future spintronic devices, in which skyrmions will work as information carriers.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The magnetic properties of interfaces between LaAlO 3 /SrTiO 3 are studied by on-axis sputter deposition at high oxygen pressure. The high pressure sputtering does not induce conductance at these interface, and without conductance, they should not be magnetic either. We find that a possible contribution of SrTiO 3 can not be ruled out fully as the bare SrTiO 3 substrate also shows a magnetic signal. All interfaces reported in literature grown by either PLD or MBE which are conducting, also have magnetism which arises from the onset of conductivity. If one is missing, the second does too as in the case reported here while SrTiO 3 contributes substantially to the conductance of the interface.© 2019Magnetoplasmonic crystals represent a special class of hybrid structures consisting of one-dimensional periodic diffraction grating combined with a ferromagnetic layer. Magnetoplasmonic crystals are functional materials, which can be used for high precision magnetic sensors, given that their magneto-optical activity is enhanced by the plasmon resonance. Sensitivity and magnetic field range of such sensors strongly depend on magnetic properties of magnetoplasmonic crystals. Here, we analyse magnetic properties of iron/silver magnetoplasmonic crystals depending on geometrical parameters of the diffraction grating, as well as on the ferromagnetic layer thickness. As a result, we demonstrate an efficient way to control magnetic properties of magnetoplasmonic crystals.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Salvia hispanica (chia) essential oil was applied for successful production of magnetic nanorods. The influence of several parameters, i.e. temperature of the reaction mixture, volume of the S. hispanica essential oil solution, stirring speed of the reaction mixture, and flow rate of the N 2 protective gas, on their axial length was studied. A design of experiments (DOE) approach followed by the response surface methodology (RSM) identified the optimal conditions for synthesis of ∼3 nm magnetic nanorods. The granulometric and magnetic properties of these magnetite nanorods were analyzed using transmission electron microscopy (TEM), energy dispersive X-ray scattering (EDX), selected area electron diffraction spectroscopy (SAED), X-ray diffraction (XRD), and superconducting quantum interference device (SQUID) magnetometer. These methods revealed that the produced magnetic nanorods had a crystalline cubic inverse spinel structure with an average axial length of 43.4 ± 20.5 nm, diameter of 3.6 ± 0.9 nm, and aspect ratio of 12.1 ± 5.2 nm, and they suggested the presence of spin glass-like (mictomagnetic) behavior with both ferro- and antiferromagnetic interactions. In addition, attenuated total reflectance Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (ATR FT-IR) was used to identify functional groups of the organic compounds present in S. hispanica essential oil that were possibly responsible for production and surface functionalization of the magnetite nanorods. The resultant magnetic nanofluid displayed electromagnetic excitation when exposed to microwave radiation, and therefore it could be useful in microwave-imaging of tissues.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Magnetic nanoparticles of iron oxides have received extensive attention in the biomedical research, e.g. as prospective contrast agents for T 2 -weighted magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). The ability of a contrast agent to enhance the relaxation rate of 1 H nuclei in its vicinity is quantitatively described by its relaxivity. Among the polymorphs of the iron(III) oxide, the nanoparticulate ε-Fe 2 O 3 , distinguished by its high magnetocrystalline anisotropy resulting in a blocked state of single-domain particles up to the Curie temperature of ∼500 K, has never been studied as a contrast agent for MRI before. We analyzed r 1 and r 2 relaxivities of ε-Fe 2 O 3 nanoparticles coated with amorphous silica, particularly with the aim to determine their dependences on the external magnetic field, temperature, and thickness of the silica coating. The r 2 relaxivity was interpreted within the motional averaging and static dephasing regimes. MRI images at 11.75 T confirmed high applicability of ε-Fe 2 O 3 -based contrast agents in ultra-high fields. We present the first case study considering ε-Fe 2 O 3 nanomagnets for prospective application in biomedicine, in particular for MRI in ultra-high fields. The study is complemented by a thorough investigation of magnetic properties of the nanoparticles, revealing some interesting anomalies.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Single phase polycrystalline DyMnO 3 (DMO) was synthesized using acrylamide polymer gel template method. We report the structural, magnetic, specific heat and dielectric properties of DMO over wide experimental conditions. Room temperature XRD pattern shows the formation of singe phase material without any impurity. The magnetic properties such as magnetization versus temperature (M vs. T) and magnetization versus magnetic field (M vs. H) were studied around the transition temperatures region. The temperature dependent magnetization data suggest two phase transitions corresponding to the lock-in temperature below which ferroelectric ordering exist (around 19 K; T lock ) and antiferromagnetic (AFM) ordering of Dy spin (around 8 K; T N (Dy)). The magnetic hysteresis obtained were fitted to extract weak ferromagnetic (FM) and antiferromagnetic/paramagnetic (AFM/PM) contribution to the magnetic data. The order of magnetic transitions were analyzed from Arrott plot. The temperature dependent specific heat measurement shows all three phase transitions corresponding to (i) AFM ordering of Mn spin (around 38 K; T N (Mn)), (ii) T lock transition and (iii) T N (Dy) transition. The effect of magnetic field to the transitions were studied using specific heat capacity measurement. The peak intensity of T N (Dy) decreases on the application of magnetic field whereas peak intensity of T lock increases with increase in magnetic field in specific heat measurement. Further the third anomaly, T N (Mn) remains more or less unaffected by the application of magnetic field. The intrinsic dielectric behaviour of the material was observed up to 160 K, above this temperature there is large increase in dielectric value due to the contribution from Maxwell- Wagner polarization.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In single crystals of the solid solution Cs 2 CuCl 4-x Br x (0⩽x⩽4), depending on the growth conditions, two structural modifications with a tetrahedral or an octahedral Cu environment can be realized. The border compounds (x = 0 and 4) with a tetrahedral Cu coordination have been recognized as model systems for quasi-2D frustrated anisotropic triangular quantum antiferromagnets. This holds true also for the newly discovered stoichiometric compounds with x = 1 and 2. In contrast, the systems exhibiting an octahedral Cu environment can be classified as quasi-2D ferromagnets characterized by ferromagnetic layers with a weak inter-layer coupling. Here we study the magnetic and magneto-elastic couplings for the low-dimensional Heisenberg quantum magnet Cs 2 CuCl 2 Br 2 with octahedral Cu coordination. By applying magnetic susceptibility measurements under varying hydrostatic (He-gas) pressure, χ(T,p), we determine the pressure dependence of the magnetic coupling constant ∂J/∂p and estimate the magneto-elastic couplings ∂J/∂∊ v . These values are enhanced by almost one order of magnitude compared to Cs 2 CuCl 2 Br 2 with tetrahedral Cu coordination.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Despite the critical contribution of dipolar interparticle interactions to the hysteretic magnetization curve of superparamagnetic nanoclusters, the quantitative analysis of dipolar field remains a major challenge at room temperature. To investigate such demagnetizing effect due to a close core-to-core distance within a nanocluster, we evaluate the symmetry of ac minor magnetization hysteresis in the presence of static magnetic field. While the nanoclusters are immobilized in a gelatin matrix, we record their dynamic magnetizations for a given 100-kHz sinusoidal magnetic field perpendicular to the static field and further correlate the changes in the coercive fields and remanences with the dipolar field and its demagnetization ratio, respectively. In this work, we also show that the dipolar field-induced shift of the magnetization loop is size-dependent. Under high static bias field, larger core size proportionally enhances the resulting dipolar field. Meanwhile, the cluster size appears to be influential to the dipolar magnetism triggered at low bias field. This study conclusively highlights the distinguishable dynamics between randomly oriented and collaterally aligned magnetic moments.© 2019Based on density functional theory and non-equilibrium Green's function method, we studied noncollinear magnetism and electronic transport in zigzag graphene nanoribbon (ZGNR) doped with Li atom. Compared to pristine ZGNR, the Li-doped ZGNR presents characteristic features of magnetization distribution, which depends on the position of Li atom. When the magnetizations of two leads are parallel, i.e. θ=0° the Li atom induces an antiferromagnetic order on the edge, which is attributed to the change in exchange strength due to charge transfer. As for nonzero θ the magnetization distribution in the case of interior adsorption shows obvious spin spiral. However, in edge adsorption, the spin spiral does not occur and a two-region feature appears. Moreover, the rotation sense of magnetization for edge adsorption becomes counter-clockwise which is different from the interior adsorption. The transmission presents distinct features for edge and interior adsorption. As θ=180° the transmission coefficient at Fermi level is about two for interior adsorption but drops to about one in edge adsorption. These results provide considerable insights into the effect of doping on noncollinear magnetism and spin transport in ZGNR.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The effect of the morphology of the melt-spun powders on the compressive and bending strength of hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets has been investigated. The results suggest that the refinement of the melt-spun powders can effectively reduce the mechanical anisotropy of the hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets in two directions parallel and perpendicular to c-axis without sacrificing the magnetic properties. The observation for microstructure shows that the refinement of the melt-spun powders reduced the shape anisotropy of the particles and improved the mechanical properties of the hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets perpendicular to c-axis, thereby improving the mechanical anisotropy of the hot-deformed Nd-Fe-B magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. Using the DFT calculations, the phase stability, structural deformation and magnetic moment of Fe-riche FeAl alloys in presence of different percents of nitrogen were calculated. The formation enthalpy of these Fe-Al alloys indicates that N preferred the octahedral site than the substitution one. Significant changes occur in this energy, affected by N and Fe content causing local distortions. From 25 at.% N, the phenomenon of saturation appeared and the substitution takes place. The addition of 6 at.% N stabilizes Fe 9 Al 7 and Fe 10 Al 6 . The presence of N atom leading to decrease the total magnetic moment of FeAl nitride when the magnetic order is antiferromagnetic between N and Fe atom. This magnetic moment increased by the ferromagnetic coupling between Fe and N, thus increasing the Fe local magnetic moment and the magneto-volume effect.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Influence of thermal annealing on the ion beam sputtered FeCo(Nb)B quaternary alloy thin films having thickness ∼20 nm and 80 nm was investigated. Regardless of amorphous microstructure, the as-deposited films possess uniaxial magnetic anisotropy (UMA) in the film plane. Annealing at temperature ∼503 K results in amorphous to nanocrystalline phase transformation with precipitation of bcc-FeCo phase. With increasing annealing temperature, magnetic anisotropy gradually decreases and thermal annealing at 773 K results in complete disappearance of UMA. In-plane strain distribution in such nanocrystalline FeCo(Nb)B thin films was obtained by using laboratory and synchrotron X-ray diffraction (XRD) measurements. In-plane and out-of-plane X-ray diffraction measurements suggest, growth induced long range non-uniform tensile stress, as the possible origin of in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy in such films. It is demonstrated that the stress distribution becomes uniform after annealing at 773 K and results in complete disappearance of magnetic anisotropy. The study further suggests that the presence of Nb in FeCoB film improves the thermal stability, inhibits grain growth and stabilizes bcc-FeCo phase up to elevated temperatures. This information is useful for magnetic tunnel junction application, where annealing of FeCoB magnetic electrode is essential.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A finite volume method is used to investigate the unsteady thermomagnetic convection of ferrofluid flow in a miniature channel under the effect of constant and oscillating magnetic fields. A magnetic line dipole as a magnetic source is placed under the lower wall of the two-dimensional channel whose lower and upper walls are subjected to a constant heat flux. To generate the oscillating magnetic field, four different frequency functions including rectangle, sine, triangle and sawtooth functions are implemented in the constant magnetic field. The study parameters include four frequency functions, magnetic field intensity as a magnetic number (Mn = 3.833 × 10 8 , 8.624 × 10 8 , 1.533 × 10 9 ), frequencies (f = 0.5–5 Hz) and Reynolds numbers (Re = 20–40). Results revealed that applying the constant magnetic field enhances heat transfer and as the Reynolds number increases, the effectiveness of magnetic field on heat transfer rate diminishes. The oscillating magnetic field, regardless of the type of the applied frequency function, improves heat transfer rate due to thermal boundary layer suppression and increase in velocity field. For all applied functions, results show that there is an optimum frequency where maximum heat transfer happens and this frequency increases for higher Reynolds numbers. For rectangle and sawtooth functions with instant change in the magnetic field, two simultaneous vortexes emerges which leads to better heat transfer than sine and triangle functions. The alteration of the pressure drop in one period is proportionate with the shape of the applied frequency even though the range of the alterations reduces with the increase of the Reynolds number.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Recently, Bi 2 O 2 Se is discovered as a promising two-dimensional (2D) semiconductor for next generation electronics because of its stability in air, high Hall mobility and on/off ratio at room-temperature. Using first-principles calculations, we predict half-metallicity in Mn-doped monolayer Bi 2 O 2 Se. The magnetism enhancement from 4.0 to 6.0 µ B and half-metal to magnetic semiconductor transition of monolayer Bi 2 O 2 Se are realizable by applying biaxial tensile strain. The symmetry reduction at the elastic-plastic transition is the key factor in controlling the magnetic coupling order between the Mn and the neighboring Se atoms. The results imply a possible way to achieve two-dimensional magnetic semiconductors that have great potential applications in spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The crystallization, microstructure and magnetic properties of Fe 83 Ni x B 16− x Cu 1 (x = 0, 1, 2, 4) alloys are investigated by Mössbauer spectroscopy, X-ray diffractometry and magnetometry. The substitution of Ni for B in the Fe 83 B 16 Cu 1 alloy enriches Fe clusters in melt-spun ribbons and promotes the nucleation of α-Fe(Ni), which is beneficial to the formation of high volume fraction of nanocrystals after crystallization. Furthermore, the addition of 1–2 at.% Ni widens the annealing temperature range for the alloys with low H C . Excellent magnetic properties with high saturation magnetic flux density (B S ) of 1.83 T and low coercivity (H C ) of 9.2 A/m are obtained by annealing the Fe 83 Ni 2 B 14 Cu 1 melt-spun ribbons. In addition, the nanocrystalline alloy with x = 2 possesses a lower saturation magnetostriction (19 ppm) than that of the Ni-free alloy (25 ppm).© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In the work presented the magnetic properties of the high pressure ilmenite phase Mn 2 FeSbO 6 are investigated in detail. It is shown that Mn 2 FeSbO 6 ilmenite is ferrimagnetic (T N ≈ 270 K) and exhibits a near-zero coercive field H C . Furthermore, the Mn 2+ -Mn 2+ , Fe 3+ -Fe 3+ and Mn 2+ -Fe 3+ magnetic exchange interactions exhibit gradual and continuous variations with temperature and magnetic field. The ferrimagnetic moment is unsaturated even at 120 kOe below the theoretical value of 5 μ B per f.u.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Hard/soft magnetic nanocomposites were synthesized with SrAl 2 Fe 10 O 9 as hard and CoFe 2 or Fe as soft magnetic phase. Al-substituted hexaferrite powder with 250 nm particle size is stable in Ar/5%H 2 atmosphere at 315 °C, contrary to non-substituted hexaferrite. Annealing at T > 400 °C under these conditions leads to formation of Fe metal besides remaining hexaferrite phase. Such nanocomposites exhibit hysteresis loops with increased M s . Alternative routes to synthesize nanocomposites were also explored. A mixture of hexaferrite and nanosize CoFe 2 O 4 particles was annealed at 315 °C in Ar/5%H 2 atmosphere. The spinel ferrite particles were reduced to CoFe 2 alloy. Alternatively, soft iron nanoparticles were deposited onto the Al-substituted hexaferrite particles via a sodium borohydride reaction. Annealing at 315 °C in Ar/5%H 2 gives a hexaferrite/Fe composite powder. Room temperature hysteresis loops, however, exhibit a multiple-phase reversal behavior.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Spin-dependent transport through a spin valve consisting of two large-spin molecules, such as single molecular magnets, weakly coupled to external ferromagnetic electrodes is theoretically studied. The main focus is on the dependence of the tunneling current, its spin polarization, differential conductance and tunnel magnetoresistance on the arrangement of molecules embedded in the tunnel junction. These quantities are calculated by using the real-time diagrammatic technique in the lowest-order perturbation theory with respect to the coupling strength. When the molecules’ geometry is parallel, both an enhanced as well as inverse tunnel magnetoresistance can develop depending on the molecule's occupation. On the other hand, if the two molecules form a serial geometry, a strong current-suppression occurs due to the Pauli spin blockade effect, resulting in negative differential conductance. In this transport regime we also find large tunnel magnetoresistance, which now exhibits strong asymmetry with respect to the bias voltage reversal. In addition, we show that an enhanced magnetoresistance and negative differential conductance can develop when a T-shaped molecular geometry is taken under consideration. These effects are explained by invoking particular occupation of molecular states and nonequilibrium spin accumulation that builds up in the case of the antiparallel magnetic configuration of the device.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Modifications of magnetic anisotropy of 30 keV Ga + ion irradiated ultrathin Co films sandwiched between Au or Pt buffer and capping layers are investigated as a function of magnetic layer thickness, d Co , and the ion fluence, F. Maps (d Co , F) of saturation fields have been derived from local magnetooptical polar Kerr effect (PMOKE) measurements. The areas with increased remanent magnetization and/or saturation fields, which are directly related to the uniaxial anisotropy, adopt linear shapes for the two branches in the maps. They are very distinct, especially for the Pt/Co/Pt system irradiated at lower and higher fluence. Replacement of Pt with Au in the buffer layer results in minor influence on the magnetization properties of the irradiated trilayers. Au as a capping layer significantly decreases the anisotropy in the branch appearing at lower fluence. In the Au/Pt/Au sandwich, a severe reduction of induced anisotropy is observed in both branches. The proposed phenomenological model describing experimentally investigated magnetic anisotropies enables separation of surface and volume contributions to both branches of enhanced anisotropy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Currently, metallic soft magnetic composites, due to their high saturation magnetization, have attracted much attention for application in high frequency mobile devices. These composites must approach a full densification to achieve the high permeability and magnetic flux density necessary for mobile device applications. This study was carried out to investigate the effects of Fe nano-powders on the compaction behaviors and magnetic properties of Fe-Si alloy composites. Fe-Si micro-powders were fabricated using a gas-atomizer; then, SiO 2 was coated on them to suppress eddy current loss. Fe-nano-powders were obtained using spray-dried Fe 2 O 3 powders. These nano-powders were homogeneously mixed with Fe-Si micro-powders to increase the density of the compacts. As a result, the composite with 80 wt% micro-powders showed excellent high frequency properties due to high compaction density. Microstructural analysis shows that changes in the magnetic properties of the composites are dependent on the fill factor and electrical path-ways of non-insulated nano-powders in pores between insulated micro-powders.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Near-room-temperature and enhanced magnetocaloric properties are investigated for the chemical combustion synthesized electron-doped manganite La 1−x Zr x MnO 3 with x = 0.05, 0.10 and 0.15. The single-phase rhombohedral crystal structure is observed particularly for the La 0.90 Zr 0.10 MnO 3 (Zr10) system. Importantly, all the samples exhibit the paramagnetic-to-ferromagnetic (PM-to-FM) transition close to the room-temperature with the second-order phase transition. The analysis of the magnetic data in the critical region with different theoretical models such as 3D-Heisenberg, 3D-Ising, Mean-field, and Tri-critical mean-field suggested that the Zr10 sample exhibits the typical 3D-Heisenberg ferromagnetic characteristics. This indicated that the enhanced magnetic and magnetocaloric properties are governed by short-range exchange forces. Furthermore, the obtained data is also fitted with the Kouvel-Fisher method to obtain the transition-temperature, critical exponent β and it is found that the transition temperature and β values are totally consistent to that of the 3D-Heisenberg model. Significantly, the change in entropy |ΔS m | at 5 T is calculated to be 4.04 J·kg −1 ·K −1 at 304 K in case of Zr10 sample indicating that it can be one of the potential material for the future magnetic refrigeration technology working at near room-temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of La 0.8 Ca 0.2 MnO 3 manganese oxides has been analyzed based on the mean-field theory. The Bean-Rodbell equation of state shows a second and first order magnetic phase transition for the sample annealed at 1200 °C (S 1 ) and 800 °C (S 2 ) with a η factor of η=0.6 and η=1.4 respectively. Using the experimental data of magnetization M (H,T), the molecular mean-field parameter are found to be λ 1 = 0.6564 T g eum −1 and λ 1 = 0.8876 T g eum −1 for S 1 et S 2 respectively. Brillouin function allows us to determine the total angular moment J, the saturation magnetization M S and the Lande factor g for all samples. Knowing all these parameters, and by applying the mean-field theory, we simulated the magnetization as a function of the magnetic field and the temperature, as well as the variation of the magnetic entropy change ΔS M (T). We can see that the simulated results are in good agreement with experimental data.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We present a study of a Ho 0.5 Nd 0.5 Fe 3 (BO 3 ) 4 single crystal aiming at understanding the roles of each magnetic sublattices in magnetic transitions at low temperatures. The crystal structure is determined to have the R32 symmetry in whole studied temperature range but the crystal appears to be racemic. Element selective magnetic properties studied with X-ray magnetic circular dichroism at the L 2,3 -edges of Ho and Nd, and at the Fe K-edge at T = 3 K under magnetic fields of ±17 T are compared with the results of macroscopic magnetization measurements in pure and substituted crystals. All three magnetic sublattices are shown to be strongly coupled and to undergo a spin-reorientation transition when magnetic field is applied along the trigonal c-axis. On the contrary, when magnetic field is applied in the ab-plane only the holmium atoms exhibit a sizeable magnetization jump. This result allows us to conclude that the spin-flop transitions observed in macroscopic magnetization curves and associated anomalies of electric polarization are due to the Ho 3+ magnetic moment reorientation.© 2019 The Fe 48 Rh 52 magnetic film with a thickness of 50 nm was grown on a piezoelectric substrate by magnetron sputtering. The chemical composition and crystalline structure were examined by energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy and X-ray diffraction, respectively. Two types of structural phases were detected: a bcc phase chemically ordered to the CsCl-type (B2 or α′) and an fcc γ-phase. Magnetic measurements of the FeRh film helped to observe an antiferromagnetic-ferromagnetic phase transition around 305 K (B = 0.1 T) in heating with a 27 K hysteresis, which is broader than in bulk alloys. A maximum of direct and converse magnetoelectric coefficients around the temperature of the antiferromagnetic-ferromagnetic transition was found during magnetoelectric measurements; they correlate with the results of magnetic measurements.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Effect of uniform and non-uniform magnetic field and jet impingement on the hydrodynamic and heat transfer performance of nanofluids has been investigated numerically. Five types of magnetic field with different strengths (Ha = 0–40) are applied externally to the flow domain under direct and transverse jet (cross-flow) impingement conditions. The effect of Reynolds number (Re = 200–600), nanoparticle type (Cu, Al, TiO 2 , and hybrid (Cu + TiO 2 )), nanoparticle diameter (d p = 20 nm–80 nm) and concentration (Ø = 1 vol% to 3 vol%) on the hydrodynamic and heat transfer behavior under uniform and non-uniform magnetic field are predicted. The presence of magnetic field introduced a Lorentz force responsible for higher values of flow velocity particularly near the walls resulting in the enhancement of average Nusselt number. Moreover, the direct and transverse jet against the applied uniform/non-uniform magnetic field also enhanced the local flow velocity near the impingement region leading to enhancement in the local Nusselt number. Transverse jet exhibits higher average Nusselt number in comparison with direct jet. A maximum heat transfer enhancement of 173% is obtained for 3 vol% Cu nanofluid under magnetic field. Moreover, two equivalent nanofluid pairs are also identified that will provide a better switching option in thermal management of high power electronic devices and nuclear reactors.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Superparamagnetic nanoparticles have astounding applications in the field of biomedical. Co-precipitated Nd 3+ doped Mn 0.5 Zn 0.5 Nd x Fe 2−x O 4 , where x = 0, 0.025, 0.050, 0.075, 0.1 ferrite nanoparticles are examined utilizing various characterization methods at room temperature. XRD, FE-SEM and FTIR analysis reveal the origination of cubical spinel ferrite structure. A transition from paramagnetic to superparamagnetic nature has been observed with Nd 3+ addition (x > 0.025). To comprehend the relationship of structural and magnetic properties a cation distribution has been proposed and found to be in agreement with experimental observations. Absorption spectra show a red shift with Nd 3+ doping. PL spectra show a blue shift in band edge emission upto x = 0.050. The results obtained from UV–visible spectroscopy and PL spectroscopy show an anti-Stokes shift with Nd 3+ doping owing to the photon upconversion process. The obtained magnetic results in fusion with optical results for ferrite nanoparticles are prospective in imaging and biomedical applications.© 2019We report on the magnetic properties and magnetocaloric effect of dysprosium ribbons obtained from a bulk sample by means of cold rolling. A magnetic entropy change ΔS ≈ 5.5 J/(kg·K) and an adiabatic temperature change ΔT ≈ 1.65 K for a bulk sample of dysprosium were observed for in external magnetic field changes of 3 T and 1.9 T, respectively. As compared to the bulk sample, ΔS and ΔT in the cold rolled ribbons is smaller by ∼30% and ∼12%, respectively. These changes in magnetocaloric effect of the cold rolled ribbons are fully reversible and can be restored by additional annealing.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Nano crystalline La 0.8 Ag 0.2 MnO 3 perovskite compound was prepared using sol–gel method. The synthesized nano compound was characterized using X-ray Diffraction (XRD) and High Resolution - Transmission Electron Microscope (HR–TEM). The magnetic and magnetocaloric properties were studied in a broad temperature range, and confirmed the presence of ferromagnetic–paramagnetic (FM–PM) transition around Curie temperature (T C = 306 K). We reported a maximum magnetic entropy change |ΔS M | max = 0.96 J/kg.K with relative cooling power (RCP) = 39.98 J/kg at magnetic field 2 T. Such results could be a significant practical application in magnetic refrigeration. The observed magnetic phase transition in the sample was testified a second order. The critical exponent analysis which define the magnetic transition revealed values 0.4025 for β, 3.33 for δ and 0.93 for γ. These values are closely related to those obtained by the mean field model. The second order magnetic phase transition is further confirmed by constructing a universal curve for variation of |ΔS M |/|ΔS max | vs rescaled temperature (θ) for various magnetic field values.© 2019 Elsevier LtdIn this work we measure the inversion charge density for short UTBB-FDSOI MOSFETs (down to 45 nm) using an accurate method for the extraction of the parasitic components which take into account the effect of the back bias. Based on these results, we propose a modification of the inversion charge density model that uses the simplified Lambert function in order to include the back bias effect. This model is then validated with the experimental data for different gate lengths (from 185 nm to 45 nm). It is shown that this inversion charge model is valid for the mobility extraction and gives very good assessment of the mobility if we know only the IV-characteristic, the threshold voltage (under back bias effect) and the inversion charge capacitance. Finally, this method is used to extract the mobility for short channel devices (down to 40 nm) and it is found that the short channel mobility suffers from degradation even for large back biases. For the shortest device, it is demonstrated that the main source of mobility degradation is caused by oxide charges and interface states located near the S/D extensions and then it is deduced that the mobility reduction for large back biases is related to neutral defects from Si-crystal close to the channel edge.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the magnetization dynamics through magnetoimpedance effect in films of ferrimagnetic insulator yttrium iron garnet capped by copper. Thereby, we explore the magnetoimpedance in systems with magnetic insulators by varying the thickness of the magnetic material, and probe current frequency. We observe that the difference of electrical nature of the layers composing the films gives rise to the magnetoinductive effect in the whole frequency range, as well as favors the appearance of the ferromagnetic resonance effect even at low frequencies. We discuss the experimental results in terms of the structural features of the magnetic material, its magnetic properties, and the different mechanisms governing the magnetization dynamics. The results place the films of ferrimagnetic insulator yttrium iron garnet capped by copper exhibiting magnetoimpedance effect as very attractive candidates for application as probe element in magnetic sensors operating at low frequencies and with energy-efficient technologies. Further, we disclose an auspicious technique to look at the magnetization dynamics in magnetic materials and we provide a new perspective to solve questions related to the integration of insulator ferrimagnetic materials with the coplanar waveguide in broadband frequency applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.It is known that a suspension of relatively large micron-size particles dispersed in a ferrofluid of much smaller particles yields a magnetorheological fluid with superior properties. In the absence of applied field experiment reveals the presence of a nanoparticle cloud surrounding each micron-size particle. The present work derives a thermodynamic model of cloud concentration distribution. It is found that van der Waals forces predominate over magnetic dipolar forces in forming the clouds. Additional analysis reveals that a repulsion force arises due to squeezing of the clouds as two cloud-surrounded particles approach one another. Repulsion aids redispersion of the larger particles by helping to prevent their agglomeration.© 2019 Nanofluids are new generation of heat transfer fluids with enhanced thermal properties. When using nanofluids, one of the major problems is aggregation of nanoparticles. In this study, in order to benefit from controlled aggregation of nanoparticles by application of magnetic field, we used magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) as one of the most useful nanoparticles in recent energy and biomedical researches. To achieve a more precise insight about behavior of MNPs under magnetic field, a water-based nanofluid of Fe 3 O 4 /MWNTs was studied. Due to the importance of thermal conductivity (TC) of nanofluids, it was investigated for the mentioned nanofluid. Taking advantage of magnetic properties of magnetite nanoparticles besides high thermal conductivity of multi-wall carbon nanotubes, a water-based nanofluid of 0.1 wt% Fe 3 O 4 /MWNT was prepared and its thermal conductivity was measured for the situations in which temperature gradient and magnetic field were either parallel or perpendicular. The findings suggested that TC was increased by 52% and 11.9% at H = 0.14 T for the two situations, respectively. This finding proved the anisotropic behavior of magnetic nanofluid. Formation of chain-like structures of MNPs was demonstrated through a novel approach. This phenomenon was found to be the reason of thermal conductivity enhancement. Our findings show that employing Fe 3 O 4 /MWNT is a promising approach for improving heat transfer efficiency of heat carriers.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we discussed the structure and morphologies of monodispersed CoNi nanoplatelets synthesized by hydrothermal reduction. The growth mechanism of platelet-like nanoparticles from precursors were described with reference to the SEM analysis. We further studied the effect of polymer and surfactants on to the structure, surface and magnetic properties of the nanostructures. Furthermore, in order to emphasize a shape-rheology correlation, magnetorheological studies were performed with suspensions containing CoNi nanoplatelets for the concentrations ranging from 5 to 12 vol%. The effect of plate orientation under the oscillatory shear was also investigated and an interesting two-step yielding was observed for the magnetic fluids with high particle volume fraction and under high magnetic fields. This was explained in terms of magnetic structure disintegration under shear flow below and beyond the critical amplitude strain.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we used anti-cancer flutamide (FM) as a radical pair-forming drug to investigate whether magnetic fields can control a liposomal drug release through differences in the physical properties of biomembranes. Irradiations of FM-incorporated liposomal nanoparticles (FM-LNs) were performed using an original air-cooled UV-LED irradiation system. Exposure to a static magnetic field of 0.2 T was performed using a pair of commercially available permanent magnets. For evaluating the drug-release potentials with spin-correlated radical pair mechanisms on the photochemical reactions developing in biomembranes, we prepared various types of FM-LNs equipped with possible magnetic controls. According to the overall result of the prepared FM-LNs, the drug release is deemed not to be caused by only the pair mechanisms. But the tests observing the magnetic field effects on the mechanisms must provide useful information on drug targeting. We strongly propose a new drug-release technology using these liposomal nanoparticles equipped with magnetic controls.© 2019Based on density functional theory combined with nonequilibrium Green's function method, the spin polarization of hybrid interface states in magnetic molecular junctions and their roles in spin-dependent transport are investigated. The results demonstrate that by choosing anchoring atoms with different types of outer orbitals, the spin polarization of the hybrid interface states can be tuned. A dependence of the spin polarization on the atomic electronegativity is revealed, where a high spin polarization is achieved in the case of O atom with large electronegativity. The transport calculation shows that a corresponding adjustable spin-dependent transport is realized, where an enhanced tunneling magnetoresistance and a large spin filtering efficiency are realized by using the anchoring atoms with large electronegativity. This work proposes a valid way to enhance the functionality of molecular spintronic devices by manipulating the hybrid interface states.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A magnetization reversal and a magnetic phase transition induced by an electric field are studied in the coupled XY spin chains model with the next-nearest-neighbor, Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya (S n x S n+1 y -S n y S n+1 x ), and magnetoelectric (S n x S n+1 y -S n y S n+1 x )S n+2 z interactions. Using the linear perturbation renormalization group recursion relations the phase diagram in the plane (temperature, electric field) is found. The phase transitions to two different low temperature phases and a reentrance behavior caused by the electric field are observed. At finite temperature for some range of the interchain interaction values in addition to changing the magnetization sign with reversal of the electric field, there is a possibility to the magnetization sign switch in finite electric field values with no applied magnetic field.© 2019 Elsevier Ltd To improve the integration of reconfigurable antenna systems, a novel high-integration solid state plasma reconfigurable dipole antenna based on surface PiN (SPiN) diodes was presented in this paper. Silicon-based SPiN diodes were the basic building blocks of plasma channel, and carrier concentration within the intrinsic region achieved a relatively high level (exceeding 10 18 cm −3 ). In this paper, parameters of the plasma region have been extensively discussed, and several optimized band stop filters were also introduced to replace the conventional capacitor and inductor. This method greatly improved the integration of antenna system to meet the requirements of modern communications. The resonant frequencies at 2.43 GHz and 2.53 GHz have been achieved by turning on or off different sections of the dipole. The Voltage Standing Wave Ratio (VSWR) of the antenna was 1.03 and 1.34, respectively. Other parameters of this antenna were also investigated in this paper. Experimental results confirm the usefulness of the SPiN diodes within solid state plasma antenna and other semiconductor fields.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A deep study of magnetic and magnetoelastic parameters affecting the magnetoelectric response of laminated composites working on longitudinal-transverse (L-T) mode has been carried out. Parameters such as the piezomagnetic coefficient of the magnetostrictive ribbons and the quality factor of the laminates have been analyzed in 3, 2, 1 and 0.5 cm long Fe 64 Co 21 B 15 /polyvinylidene fluoride (PVDF)/Fe 64 Co 21 B 15 magnetoelectric composites. The obtained results show that the product of piezomagnetic coefficient and the quality factor drives the magnetoelectric response in magnetoelectric laminates, as the theoretical equations predict. Furthermore, the magnetoelectric coupling factor has been deduced from the ratio between the experimental and the expected magnetoelectric coefficients, with maximum coupling values up to 0.89 obtained for the longest laminate.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We present a comparative study on the ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic chiral domain walls under non-gradient spin torques by collective coordinates method. Based on the steady solutions, the stable chiral walls are picked out by linear stability analysis. We find that the spin torques drive the antiferromagnetic wall more quickly and stable than the ferromagnetic one. For the antiferromagnetic wall, the velocity is proportional to the exchange interaction, while Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction for the ferromagnetic wall. Due to the strongness of exchange interaction, the antiferromagnetic wall propagates much faster than the ferromagnetic one. In addition, the antiferromagnetic wall remains the Néel type, while the ferromagnetic wall switches to a Bloch type with the current increasing. Finally, Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction influences the motion direction of antiferromagnetic wall, but has no effect on the magnitude of velocity. For ferromagnetic walls, it determines the magnitude of velocity.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this paper, we explore the effects of defects and S-doping on the electronic and magnetic properties of HfSe 2 using first-principles methods based on density functional theory (DFT). The change in its electronic and magnetic properties is explored by removing Hf or Se atoms in the pristine monolayer HfSe 2 and introducing S atoms at the Se defect corresponding position. The results show that all the defects can induce the transformation of HfSe 2 from semiconductor to metal. Except for the single selenium vacancy (V 1Se ), all the defects can induce to spin total magnetic moment, and the total magnetic moment decreases as the number of Se defect atoms increases, the largest magnetic moment is 2.985μ B which decreases by the third case of two-selenium vacancy ( 3 V 2Se ). When we perform S-doping on the Se defect in the HfSe 2 monolayer, it undergoes a transition from a metal to a non-magnetic semiconductor, and maintain the characteristics of indirect semiconductors. In addition, the band gap of the material can be slightly adjusted by S-doping. The band gap increases with the increasing number of S doped atoms and reaches to the maximum value at six-selenium vacancy V 6Se (0.699 eV). Therefore, we obtain the following conclusions: the defects can exhibit various magnetic moment and induce semiconductor transfer into metal, to the contrary, the S-doping HfSe 2 monolayer can tune the metal to indirect semiconductor as well as regulate the band gap. The above research results can be of important guiding significance for the application of HfSe 2 in semiconductor spintronics and related experiments.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Spin waves in the zigzag ordered state on a honeycomb lattice are investigated within a Hubbard model with spin-dependent hopping terms. Roles of the emergent Kitaev, Heisenberg, Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya, and symmetric-off-diagonal spin interactions are investigated on the stability of the zigzag order. While the DM interactions are found to destabilize the zigzag order, the secondary spin-dependent hopping terms (associated with structural distortions) are shown to strongly stabilize the zigzag order and account for magnetocrystalline anisotropy, easy axis, and spin wave gap. The calculated spin wave dispersion and energy scale are in good agreement with inelastic neutron scattering measurements on α-RuCl 3 and Na 2 IrO 3 .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The influence of the process parameters in Laser Beam Melting (LBM) on the element distribution and magnetic properties of permalloy (Ni 78.5 Fe 21.5 ) is studied. Iron and nickel powders are mixed in the respective proportions to build twenty-five permalloy samples. The process parameters for each sample are varied to achieve different volume energy densities. An increase of the saturation magnetization M S up to 14% of the samples with respect to the initial powder blend is found. For a volume energy density of 428 [Formula presented] we detect a stripe-like segregation of iron and nickel in the uppermost layer. In the volume a homogeneous element distribution is found. The segregation at the surface leads to a sizable uniaxial magnetic anisotropy. When using parameter combinations resulting in similar volume energy densities, we observe different surface morphologies depending on scan speed and laser power. The implications for creating tailored magnetic anisotropy directions in Fe-Ni soft magnets are discussed.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this paper, we report Lorentz Transmission Electron Microscopy (LTEM) observations of magnetic domain structures in a near-eutectoid Co 40 Pt 60 alloy. The crystallographic microstructure is characterized using conventional bright field/dark field TEM imaging. The magnetic induction orientation inside magnetic domains is extracted from Fresnel through-focus images by reconstructing the phase of electron wave using the transport-of-intensity equation. The alloy shows a nano-chessboard pattern composed of the L1 0 tetragonal and L1 2 cubic phases. The magnetization distribution in four neighboring L1 0 tiles in the nano-chessboard structure is found to follow a vortex/anti-vortex configuration to reduce the magnetostatic and magneto-crystalline anisotropy energies. An unconventional domain wall referred to as an inter phase magnetic domain wall (IPMDW) is observed at the inter-phase boundaries of L1 0 and L1 2 phases. Magnetic domain walls in other microstructures (tweed microstructure, macro-twinned structure, coarsened L1 0 plates) are also documented.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The Monte Carlo method was applied to the study of some metallic magnetic alloys which display spin glass behavior. The energies of the alloys are modelled considering the RKKY interaction among the magnetic moments, and the range of the interaction is controlled by introducing a cutoff radius. In the case of very diluted spin glasses (SG), the spin glass transition is only clearly found when distant next neighbors are considered. In that case of very diluted alloys, the Edward-Anderson order parameter shows that first and second neighbor Heisenberg-like Hamiltonians would not present a SG phase transition. The occurrence of the spin-glass condition is due to the RKKY long-range interaction. The presented Monte Carlo results allows a semi-quantitative prediction of the spin glass freezing temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The Rosensweig, or normal field instability, is a well known phenomenon where formation of a spike like shape appears on a magnetic liquid surface when it is exposed to a sufficiently large external magnetic field. While the surface shape of magnetic liquid has an impact on the magnetic field distribution and vice versa, it is somehow essential to know the magnetic field distribution within the magnetic liquid. The aim of the magnetic field calculation is to show that the magnetic field density is distributed similarly as the shape of the free surface. The calculation is placed in the 3D space and performed at the equilibrium state of magnetic liquid using the Finite Element Method based software Opera Field. Only a single spike of the magnetic liquid is included in the computational model, while the pattern of the surface deformation is assumed to be hexagonal and distributed periodically over the surface.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.A novel magnetic nondestructive testing method, that is named eddy current magnetic signature (EC-MS) method, is proposed to evaluate the residual strain in low carbon steels. This method relies on characterization of eddy current signals in the impedance plane if low frequency major magnetization is superimposed. To investigate the mechanism of the proposed method, the eddy current magnetic signatures of a set of tensile test specimens are measured, and their relationship to the residual strain is surveyed. The trajectories of the eddy current signals show significant dependences on the residual strain; the EC-MS changes depending on the three residual strain stages, the region just after elastic limit before yield point, the Lüders-strain region, and the region after start of work hardening. The EC-MS under elastic strain/stress is measured to investigate the influence of stress on the EC-MS. Numerical calculation is performed considering micro-eddy current field associated with moving domain walls and compared with experimental results to interpret the EC-MS phenomena.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. It has recently been found that, for single phase materials, the truncation of the low temperature part of heat capacity curves produces a non-monotonic temperature dependent error in the calculated specific isothermal entropy change (Δs T ) and adiabatic temperature change (ΔT S ). However, it was demonstrated that there is a certain initial temperature for which the errors are zero, regardless of the order of the phase transition. This work extends the demonstration to materials with two non-interacting magnetic phases. It is shown that there exists a temperature region close to the transition temperature of one phase for which the truncation of the curves produce a large error in the calculated Δs T and ΔT S . Away from the vicinity of the phase transition of the phases, it is possible to minimize the errors of the results by choosing a specific initial temperature for integration. A systematic study of the influence of the phase fraction of the secondary phase and distance between transition temperatures is presented.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we use the matched asymptotic analysis to derive a reduced model for domain wall dynamics within thin films of Néel-wall type in soft ferromagnets. It is found that the front dynamics is driven by mean curvature in the absence of external fields, and always relaxes to a planar interface where the one-dimensional ansatz is valid. The analysis predicts a linear dependence of front migration velocity on the field strength if the external magnetic field is weak, which is consistent with the result of Walker's ansatz. Moreover, the derivation also identifies a regime where such an analysis fails, which corresponds to the Walker's breakdown.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The magnetic behavior of the strontium hexaferrite (SrM) with foam structure was studied when copper (Cu) coats its surface. Copper was successfully deposited on the walls of the magnetic foam using the electrodeposition method. Results suggest that copper begins to nucleate on the hexaferrite grains because of a two steps process; the one based on a driving force of the Cu ions by the effect of the electric field, and secondly, the deposition of copper atoms on the non-conductive SrM surface. The SrM and Cu show a hard interaction which modifies the magnetic properties of the SrM foam as copper covers its surface. Hence, the coercive field (H c ) and the magnetization squareness (M r /M s ) have a trend to increase up to a Cu/SrM weight ratio close to 0.5. The dM/dH, M curves (SFD) indicate the presence of two uncoupled magnetic contributions. The copper fixes the magnetic moments of iron at the surface increasing the switching field these particles, whereas in the inner particles the magnetization rotates easily resulting in a widening of the SFD curve.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Magnetization dynamics of Co 2 FeSi full Heusler alloy films have been investigated by time-resolved magneto-optical Kerr effect (TR-MOKE). For the samples grown at a substrate temperature (T s ) lower than 350 °C, an obvious dual frequency phenomenon is found in the TR-MOKE signals due to the coexistence of a strong main precession mode and a weak additional mode. The amplitude of the additional high frequency mode decreases and becomes undetectable with increasing T s . On the contrary, the magnetic damping parameter α 0 measured at the highest external field of H = 15kOe is as low as 0.004 for low T s samples, it rises abruptly at T s > 350 °C and even reaches 0.023 at T s = 480 °C in spite of the improved atomic ordering. We attribute the greatly increased magnetic damping to the enhanced two-magnon scattering occurred at grain-grain boundaries. This study provides a comprehensive insight into the spin precession and magnetic damping behaviors of Heusler alloy films, which will be helpful for developing high frequency spintronic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The electronic structures, magnetic properties and half-metallicity of Heusler alloys CsYO 2 (Y = V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Co, Ni) have been studied by first principles calculations. The results show that the six compounds are more stable in AlCu 2 Mn-type compared to in CuHg 2 Ti-type, and also more stable in the ferromagnetic (FM) state than in the non-magnetic (NM) state. Therefore, the electronic structures, magnetic properties and half-metallic stability of the six compounds were calculated and analyzed in the AlCu 2 Mn-type in the ferromagnetic ground state. It has been found out that the six compounds exhibited half-metallicity. Meanwhile, Y atom is the region of half-metallicity and magnetic moments of CsYO 2 (Y = V, Cr, Mn, Fe, Co, Ni). The magnetic moments of all the six compounds were integers and satisfy the Slater-Pauling rule. In the process of changing the lattice constants of the six compounds and tetragonal deformation, the half-metallic properties kept stable within wide ranges.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A simplified uniaxial anisotropic Heisenberg model is proposed which describes the observed magnetic properties of a family of the Cr 7 M (M = Cd, Ni, Mn) molecular rings, and allows the determination of the coupling parameters which are all transferable among this family of molecular nanomagnets.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Metal organic compound (C 2 H 5 NH 3 ) 2 CuCl 4 belongs to the family of layered perovskite multiferroic materials. It consists of ferromagnetic layers of corner sharing [CuCl 4 ] 2− octahedra connected by organic ions (two layers of [C 2 H 5 NH 3 ] + ). In this work we have studied magnetic properties of (C 2 H 5 NH 3 ) 2 CuCl 4 using SQUID magnetometer and AC susceptometer. Temperature dependence of magnetization showed existence of the antiferromagnetic transition at 10.2 K which changes to ferromagnetic with the application of moderate magnetic field. Near structural transition temperatures the anomaly of magnetization was observed. Hysteresis loops showed ferromagnetic behaviour for T<T N and existence of anisotropy. Results of AC measurements showed no frequency dependence of the susceptibility and obtained temperature dependence of nonlinear susceptibility can be interpreted as a result of successive crossovers between different regimes.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The study deals with tunneling magnetoresistance in a series of composite systems of so-called 0–3 connectivity, in which highly conducting manganite nanoparticles of ferromagnetic groundstate (0-dim objects) are embedded in the (3-dim) insulating matrix of silica. The sample fabrication included the sol-gel preparation of La 1–x Sr x MnO 3 particles of the x = 0.35 composition and 25 nm mean crystallite size, their coating by silica of controlled thicknesses in the 1–5 nm range, and subsequent consolidation by hydrothermal sintering at 300 °C. Temperature dependent electric resistivities of the materials were measured in magnetic fields of 0 and 40 kOe down to 5 K, and field-dependent isothermal curves were taken by sweeping magnetic field up to 140 kOe. The field-dependent effects were interpreted in terms of the low- and high-field magnetoconductance. It is important that extents of these phenomena are markedly independent of the silica amount, despite the five orders change in absolute resistivity values. Microscopic mechanisms of the intergrain transport, applicable to polycrystalline manganites, nanogranular compacts and nanocomposites in general, are proposed.© 2019We have deposited polycrystalline films of barium hexaferrite utilizing aerosol deposition at room temperature. Magnetic orientation was achieved by using a 4 kOe permanent magnet mounted in close proximity to the substrate during deposition. We find that these films show crystallographic orientation and magnetic anisotropy out of plane corresponding to the {0 0 2l} diffraction planes. To further explore the film properties we performed sintering treatments up to 1000 °C and found that the magnetic properties are further improved. For these films the magnetic saturation is 3683 G with a squareness value of 0.82. The magnetic and crystallographic texturing indicate 29% grain orientation with a coercivity of 4.6 kOe. These values indicate that the films are of good quality for potential integration into microwave systems that require high values of saturation magnetization, squareness, and coercivity with a good degree of self-bias.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We have studied magnetic properties of ground state in perfect AA-stacking bilayer graphene quantum dots. Our main model is the single-orbital tight-binding Hamiltonian that is supplemented with a mean field Hubbard term. In addition, density functional method has been exploited to gain more confidence in our findings. The calculations are performed for some random and triangular shape of AA-stacking bilayer quantum dots and always yield an antiferromagnetic ordering with a total spin S = 0 ground state. Despite computational results of Hubbard model is admirably compatible with Lieb's theorem, conventional crystallographic sublattices are not appropriate to interpret our computational results in terms of the theorem. Therefore, we have suggested a new sublattice decomposition to settle our numerical output to the consequences of Lieb's theorem. Especially we demonstrate some characteristic including polarization of local magnetization, degeneracies in the energy spectrum, the ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic coupling of vacancies in our system have decisive compatibility with new proposed sublattice decomposition.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We studied experimentally and by numerical simulations the mechanical response of arrays of macroscopic magnetic spheres when an external stress is applied. First, the tensile strength of single chains and ribbons was analyzed. Then, simple cubic (cP), hexagonal (Hx) and hybrid (cP-Hx) structures, called here magnetocrystals, were assembled and subjected to tensile stress, bending stress and torsion until failure was reached. Atomistic crystalline structures are isotropic, but in the case of magnetocrystals, even when geometric isotropy is obeyed, dipolar magnetic interactions introduce a physical anisotropy which modifies, in a non-usual manner, the structures response to the kind of external stress applied. For instance, cP and Hx magnetocrystals subjected to tension exhibit a behavior akin to a brittle and ductile failure, respectively, but under bending the cP structure becomes ductile while the hexagonal lattice becomes brittle. For the hybrid structure, its elastic response and strength are enhanced or reduced depending on which crystallographic direction the stress is applied. These properties, so far unexplored, give to crystalline magnetic arrays a potential interest in the design of metamaterials.© 2018 Fe thin films are prepared on MgO substrates of (001), (110), and (111) orientations by ultra-high vacuum magnetron sputtering. The magnetostriction behaviors under rotating magnetic fields are observed by using a cantilever method. The relationship between in-plane magnetic anisotropy and magnetostriction behavior is investigated. An Fe(001) bcc single-crystal film is obtained on MgO(001) substrate. A four-fold symmetry in in-plane magnetic anisotropy is observed for the Fe(001) bcc film, where the easy magnetization directions are parallel to bcc[100] and bcc[010]. An Fe(211) bcc bi-crystalline film is formed on MgO(110) substrate and the film also shows an almost four-fold symmetric magnetic anisotropy. The reason is interpreted to be due to an influence of overlap of magnetic anisotropies of two bcc(211) variants with two effective easy magnetization directions which are obtained by projecting bcc[010] and bcc[001] on the bcc(211) plane. An Fe(110) bcc film is epitaxially grown on MgO(111) substrate with two types of variant with the crystallographic orientation relationships similar to Nishiyama-Wasserman and Kurdjumov-Sachs. The Fe(110) film shows an isotropic in-plane magnetic property due to an influence of the variant structure. Usual sinusoidal waveforms of magnetostriction are observed for the Fe(110) film. On the other hand, waveforms measured for the Fe(001) and the Fe(211) films are deformed from sinusoidal shape under low in-plane rotating magnetic fields and the magnetostriction behaviors are similar between the two films. Rectangular waveforms are observed for the bending parallel to easy magnetization directions, whereas triangular waveforms are recognized for the bending parallel to hard directions. The phenomenon is related to the direction difference between applied magnetic field and magnetization in magnetically unsaturated films with in-plane anisotropies. The magnetostriction behavior is influenced by the symmetry of in-plane magnetic anisotropy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Curvature of nanomagnets can be used to induce chiral textures in the magnetization field. Here we perform analytical calculations and micromagnetic simulations aiming to analyze the stability of in-surface magnetization configurations in toroidal nanomagnets. We have obtained that despite toroidal vortex-like configurations are highly stable in magnetic nanotori, the interplay between geometry and magnetic properties promotes the competition between effective interactions yielding the development of a core in a vortex state when the aspect ratio between internal and external radii of nanoturus is ≥0.75.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In Magnetic tunnel junctions, which are applied in spintronic devices, the key issue is low thermal stability. Here, we study the influence of a W spacer on the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) at temperatures up to 525 °C in perpendicular magnetized MgO/CoFeB/MgO structures with thin W spacer. High-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM) analysis shows that the MgO layers are partially crystallized and a significant diffusion of the small number of W elements is detected. The X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) indicates that some WO x compounds were reduced to metallic W and part of MgO were reduced to Mg during annealing. The oxygen released by WO x and MgO combined with Fe and Co, thereby more Fe and Co oxides were formed and thus benefiting the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA).© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A detailed magnetic study on the Fe substituted NdCrTiO 5 is presented. Phase purity of polycrystalline NdCr 0.5 Fe 0.5 TiO 5 prepared by conventional solid-state technique has been confirmed by synchrotron X-ray diffraction (SXRD). Temperature-dependent magnetization (MT) measurements indicate a transition to an antiferromagnetic (AFM) type of magnetic ordering at T N ∼ 10 K. AFM type of order is also supported by magnetocaloric data. Magnetic hysteresis as well as a type of magnetic relaxation behavior collected below T N (at 5 K) indicate the presence of weak ferromagnetism.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The initiation of ferrite nanoparticles has changed the perception of nanotechnology in the biomedical field especially magnetic hyperthermia based application. Wet chemical co-precipitation method has been used to synthesize chitosan-coated Co 1−x Mn x Fe 2 O 4 (0.0 ≤ x ≤ 1.0, in the steps of 0.2) nano ferrites. From the XRD data, the lattice constant, ionic radii and bond lengths at tetrahedral sites and octahedral sites were estimated. The analysis revealed that the hoping lengths at tetrahedral and octahedral sites are increased with the addition of manganese content. The FESEM has shown that the ferrite nanoparticles are agglomerated in the powder sample. The magnetic characterization has been done by VSM. Heating of the nanoparticles is dependent on hysteresis loss that is related to the larger area of the hysteresis loop. In agreement with magnetization data, there shows a transition from ferromagnetic to paramagnetic behaviour revealed by Mössbauer spectra. From Mössbauer spectra, values of isomer shift, quadrupole splitting, and hyperfine field have been measured. Hydrodynamic diameter and polydispersity index (PDI) of all coated samples have been found in the limits that the samples can be used for biomedical applications. Hyperthermia temperatures of all coated ferrite samples have been measured. From the steep slope of time dependence temperature graph, the value of specific loss power (SLP) has been calculated and found that the SLP value is highest for Co 0.8 Mn 0.2 Fe 2 O 4 .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Orthorhombic Pb 2 Fe 2 Ge 2 O 9 antiferromagnetic single crystals have been synthesized by a modified pseudo-flux technique and their magnetic, thermodynamic, and magnetodielectric properties have been investigated. It has been found that, below the Neel temperature (45.2 K), iron moments are arranged in a canted antiferromagnetic structure with a weak ferromagnetic moment parallel to the a axis. According to the specific heat measurement data, the T N value remains invariable in applied magnetic fields of up to 50 kOe within the experimental accuracy. The magnetic entropy in the investigated crystals attains 2Rln(2S + 1) right above T N , which is indicative of a purely magnetic nature of the transition. It has been shown that the weak ferromagnetic moment is induced by the interplay between the single-ion anisotropy and antisymmetric Dzyaloshinskii–Moriya exchange interaction, with the latter contribution being dominant. It has been established from the angular dependences of the magnetization in three orthorhombic planes that the symmetries of the magnetic and crystal structure are identical. The magnetodielectric properties of the Pb 2 Fe 2 Ge 2 O 9 single crystals have been studied at different mutual orientations of the electric and magnetic fields. The most prominent anomalies have been observed in the vicinity of the spin-flop transition in a magnetic field applied along the c axis.© 2019 Elsevier LtdWe propose a method for reconfigurable logic using a single magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) as the main computing element in the single-gate architecture. The introduction of the MTJ to reconfigurable computing provides advantages in layout efficiency, power consumption, and the device variation problem. In this study, we present a three-terminal MTJ implemented by two inputs (ampere magnetic field and spin torque-transfer current) acting as a logic element that performs the Boolean logic functions of NAND and NOR with corresponding programmable input values in a fixed architecture. In addition, the reconfigurable functionality is confirmed through demonstration of carry-out computing across the operator built with single-MTJ logic architecture.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A finite-size ferromagnetic chain of classical XY spins, where each of the two edge spins is exchange-coupled to a fictitious fully-pinned spin, is investigated in the presence of a weak in-plane perturbation (external magnetic field or uniaxial anisotropy). Within a macrospin approximation, the above chain model can be representative of a soft ferromagnetic film consisting of N parallel atomic layers, sandwiched between two magnetically hard films. In zero field, the model has a ferromagnetic collinear ground state and admits a class of metastable helical states containing an integer number of twists. Analytical expressions are obtained for the linear corrections to the helical magnetic configuration and for the local magnetic susceptibility tensor. The dependence of the integral susceptibility of the chain, χ on the number of spins in the chain, N, is also calculated. It is found that χ∝N 3 for small values of the helix mode (m«N), while χ∝N 2 for large values of the helix mode (m≈[Formula presented]).© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Hexagonal barium ferrite films were deposited on Pt(1 1 1)/Si(0 0 1) substrates by pulsed laser deposition. This paper presents an investigation of the crystal structure, morphology and local magnetic properties of the deposited films. The characterization results demonstrated orientation and morphological dependences on the Pt thickness and annealing temperature. A film prepared with a 200-nm-thick Pt buffer layer and an annealing temperature of 900 °C exhibited oriented platelet grains with a mean diameter of ∼400 nm and excellent magnetic properties with a saturation magnetization of ∼311 emu/cm 3 , a uniaxial anisotropy field of ∼15.5 kOe and a remanent squareness in the out-of-plane direction of ∼68.6%. Furthermore, a first-order reversal curve (FORC) diagram showed that the film had a positive mean interaction field (H u ) between particles and broad distributions of coercivity (H c ) centred at H u = 600 Oe and H c = 2500 Oe.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The factors, which influence the internal stresses in glass coated amorphous microwires were discussed in this work in relation to the magnetization behaviour and domain wall propagation. The approach taking into account the technological parameters of manufacturing by Ulitovsky-Taylor method is presented. The magnetization process and domain wall dynamics in Fe 77.5 Si 7.5 B 15 microwires produced under different conditions but with identical geometric parameters were investigated experimentally and analysed on the basis of internal stress formation in different microwire states: as prepared, after glass removal and after annealing. It is demonstrated that the residual stresses in wires of the same composition are not defined exclusively by their geometry but depend on the technological regime. The stress modification due to relaxing treatments also proceeds differently in wires produced under different conditions. These conclusions are evidenced by comparing the domain wall mobilities which strongly depend on the internal stress.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The design of multicore magnetic nanocomposites for hyperthermia therapy is still far from being optimized due to the variable performance found in many iron oxide nanostructure systems. Herein, we present a reproducible synthesis of magnetic mixed manganese-cobalt ferrite nanoparticles Mn 1-x Co x Fe 2 O 4 (0⩽x⩽1) coated with silica (SiO 2 ) and decorated with Au@Fe 3 O 4 nanoparticles as magnetic fluid hyperthermia heat mediators, employing a hydrogel as a tissue-equivalent. Mn 1-x Co x Fe 2 O 4 NPs were synthesized using the thermal decomposition method, then coated with SiO 2 following the Stöber method and decorated with Au@Fe 3 O 4 nanoparticles. Structural characterization was carried out applying X-ray diffraction (XRD), infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), and transmission electron microscopy (TEM). Magnetic properties as a function of the Mn +2 content were studied using a vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) at room temperature. Hyperthermia investigations were performed at 454±20 kHz with a magnetic field amplitude of up to 5.5 mT. The specific absorption rate (SAR) values of the nanocomposites were found to have increased with the Au@Fe 3 O 4 decoration in water. The advantage of the designed nanocomposite system lies in the fact that versatile combinations of magnetic NPs, SiO 2 and Au@Fe 3 O 4 can change the magnetic properties to optimize the Specific Absorption Rate (SAR).© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The rf oblique-angle magnetron sputtering was used to prepare nanocrystalline Fe 77 Zr 7 N 16 (at.%) films (with grain size of 2–7 nm); the phase composition of the films is the α-Fe-based solid solution supersaturated with nitrogen and zirconium. The magnetic structure of the films is represented by stochastic domains. Using the correlation magnetometry method, two modes of stochastic domains were found, which correlate with two modes of the coercive force found in the magnetic hysteresis loops. Both modes of the coercive force are considered in terms of the random anisotropy model.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. To clarify the transport property mediated by bound magnons in a spin nematic state, we investigate the spin Drude weight of a spin-1/2 J 1 -J 2 Heisenberg chain with ferromagnetic J 1 and antiferromagnetic J 2 in a magnetic field by numerical diagonalization. At zero magnetic field, numerical results with up to 24 sites suggest that the spin Drude weight would be zero in the thermodynamic limit, indicating diffusive spin transport. With increasing the magnetic field, the spin Drude weight is enhanced at low temperatures, indicating that bound magnons would contribute to the spin transport.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Materials with room temperature exchange bias (EB) effect are important for future applications in electronics/spintronics industry. Nevertheless, such materials are rare in bulk and show very low exchange bias field (∼100 Oe) at room temperature. In this work, we have shown the appearance of large exchange bias effect in “314-type” SrCo 1−x V x O 3−δ (x = 0.05 and 0.1) materials. X-ray diffraction patterns confirm that all the samples crystallize in a “314-type” tetragonal structure (space group: I4/mmm) with 2a p × 2a p × 4a p type unit cell. Both the samples exhibit ferrimagnetic-type transitions above room temperature. Detailed magnetic measurements highlight a large exchange bias effect with H EB ∼ 1 kOe at room temperature and H EB ∼ 8.22 kOe at 10 K. The introduction of V 5+ in the structure actually breaks the compensated antiferromagnetic (AFM) structure. The existence of nearly compensated host and weakly ordered magnetic regions imparts the exchange bias effect in these samples.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Targeted steering of magnetotactic bacterial microrobots is a growing tendency for their various biomedical applications. However, real-time monitoring during their movements and targeted cell killing in specific locations remains challenging. Here, we steered bacterial microrobots to target and attach to Staphylococcus aureus that was subsequently killed in a magnetic target device, which can realize guiding, mixing, and killing for targeted therapy. The generated focusing magnetic field was applied to magnetotactic bacterial microrobots, and the realizability of control strategies was analyzed. We successfully guided magnetotactic bacterial microrobots in microfluidic chips without real-time monitoring of their location. After mixing with microrobots under a rotating magnetic field for their attachment, the pathogen was killed under a swinging magnetic field. These results suggest that targeted therapy with these microrobots by using a magnetic target device is a promising approach.© 2019 The influence of a 12 Tesla magnetic field on the microstructure of high Chromium-containing steel during tempering was investigated. The experimental results revealed that an external magnetic field significantly increases the number density of carbide (Fe, Cr) 3 C and the dislocation density. The external magnetic field decreases the Gibbs free energy of (Fe, Cr) 3 C and then decreases the nucleation barrier; hence, the number density of (Fe, Cr) 3 C increases by approximately 2.42 times. The higher number density of carbides doubles the dislocation density, corresponding to the larger critical unpinning stress τ c , which results in a dislocation pile-up in front of the carbides. The hardness change is negligible with an external 12 T magnetic field because the increment of hardness due to the denser carbides (Fe, Cr) 3 C and dislocations that originate from the 12 T magnetic field offsets the decrement of hardness that results from the decrease in the solid solution strengthening from the carbon atoms. The investigation of the impact of an external high magnetic field on the behavior of carbides and dislocations can provide a better understanding for the precipitation strengthening mechanism of nuclear fusion steels.© 2019The relevance of the theoretical Suzuki's model of surface state density to determine the surface state distribution at the active layer/silicon dioxide interfaces is carried out in polycrystalline silicon thin film transistors (TFTs) issued from two different crystallization technologies of the active layer: furnace solid phase crystallized (FSPC) and laser solid phase crystallized (LSPC) TFTs. The experimental validation of this model is demonstrated using the field effect conductance method. Results show that distribution is higher for the FSPC TFTs in relationship with the process crystallization of the active layer. In addition, it is shown that the theoretical surface state model allows discriminating dangling bond state and tail state distributions and acts as relevant model to qualify the surface of thin film material.© 2018 We report the hydrothermal synthesis of uniform size (∼6 nm) oleic acid capped CoFe 2 O 4 (OA-CoFe 2 O 4 ) nanoparticles. These OA-CoFe 2 O 4 nanoparticles were initially hydrophobic and not dispersible in water which were transformed into hydrophilic nanoparticles by modifying their surface with citric acid using a rapid mechanochemical ligand exchange process, which makes CoFe 2 O 4 nanoparticles stable colloidal solution in water. The synthesized citric acid coated CoFe 2 O 4 (CA-CoFe 2 O 4 ) nanoparticles show a high enough and stable zeta potential over 120 days. CA-CoFe 2 O 4 nanoparticles exhibited high biocompatibility under in vitro cell studies. The specific absorption rate (SAR) of the CA-CoFe 2 O 4 nanoparticles was measured by induction heating studies. Upon the exposure of AC external magnetic field, the viability of cancer cells was reduced considerably, suggesting efficient potentiality of these CA-CoFe 2 O 4 nanoparticles for Magnetic Hyperthermia Applications. Present mechanochemical ligand exchange method is proposed as an efficient method for large scale production of biocompatible and water dispersible magnetic oxide nanoparticles for Magnetic Hyperthermia Applications.© 2019CuO films were deposited on fused silica substrates by using sol-gel method. Nanocrystalline nickel was incorporated in CuO in varying concentrations to form Ni:CuO films. Field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM), energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy (EDAX), X-ray diffraction (XRD), and Raman spectroscopy measurements were carried out to characterize the films. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) studies indicated that Ni ions successfully substituted Cu in the CuO lattice. Superconducting quantum interface device (SQUID) measurements were carried out to measure the magnetization of the films which decreased with increase in temperature. Coercive field and residual magnetization in the Ni:CuO films were measured as a function of nickel content in the CuO films.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Intercalation of rare earth metals (RE = Eu, Dy, and Gd) is achieved by depositing the RE metal on graphene that is grown on silicon-carbide (SiC) and by subsequent annealing at high temperatures to promote intercalation. STM images of the films reveal that the graphene layer is defect free and that each of the intercalated metals has a distinct nucleation pattern. Intercalated Eu forms nano-clusters that are situated on the vertices of a Moirè pattern, while Dy and Gd form randomly distributed nano-clusters. X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD) measurements of intercalated films reveal the magnetic properties of these REs nano-clusters. Furthermore, field dependence and temperature dependence of the magnetic moments extracted from the XMCD show paramagnetic-like behaviors with moments that are generally smaller than those predicted by the Brillouin function. XMCD measurements of RE-oxides compared with those of the intercalated REs under graphene after exposure to air for months indicate that the graphene membranes protect these intercalants against oxidation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Designing novel structure to optimize the dielectric constant and permeability was believed as an effective way to improve the performances of wave-absorbing material. In this work, PVA coating containing homogeneously-distributed graphene oxide (GO) was firstly deposited onto the surface of carbonyl iron powder (CIP), which was then followed by a heat-treatment to obtain rGO/PVA/CIP composite materials. The electromagnetic parameters (relative complex permittivity and permeability) and corresponding loss mechanism of the as-prepared rGO/PVA/CIP composites were investigated in a frequency of 2.0–18.0 GHz. It was found that the presence of well-dispersed rGO could effectively improve the dielectric loss of the composites and microwave absorption capability without sacrificing magnetic loss. The effective absorbing width (reflection loss lower than −10 dB) of PVA/CIP composite containing 1 mg/g GO was measured to be ∼8.4 GHz.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Present work reports the effects of ferroelastic domains (FE) on the magnetic properties of top magnetic layer. Cobalt film of 15 nm is deposited using electron beam evaporation technique on single crystalline LaAlO 3 (0 0 1) (LAO) substrate which consists FE structural twin domains. LAO substrate is in-situ heated above its FE transition temperature and cooled to room temperature before depositing cobalt film of 15 nm. Textured growth of cobalt film is observed in-situ from reflection high energy electron diffraction (RHEED) patterns. The presence of FE structural twins in LAO substrate is confirmed from the X-ray reciprocal space mapping measurements. From the optical polarization microscopy, it is observed that the different regions consist different modulations viz., lamellar like and square-like structures in LAO substrate. The magnetic anisotropy and magnetization reversal is studied ex-situ using magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) microscopy with different spatial resolutions. The analysis of azimuthal variation of coercivity (H C ) shows the superposition of two-, four- and six- fold anisotropy contribution at different regions of the sample. Twofold anisotropy and weak sixfold anisotropy may due to magneto-crystalline anisotropy, whereas the fourfold anisotropy might be coming because of square-like modulations of the substrate. Moreover, MOKE microscopy reveals the domain wall pinning along the twin boundaries (FE) due to which magnetization reversal is proceed by three distinct mechanisms when field is applied away from easy axis of magnetization and lamellar pattern. As a consequence of this, magnetization reversal proceeds by ‘labyrinth switching’ and abrupt magnetic domain wall switching within individual FE domains.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A large range of nanoscale superparamagnetic materials has been under scrutiny from the point of view of their potential theranostic, multimodal applications. In this paper we have investigated the effect of replacing Fe 3+ cations with Gd 3+ and Tb 3+ in the core of the superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles in search for the optimum level of magnetic core doping with these lanthanides. We have found that the presence of Gd 3+ and Tb 3+ up to 2.5% at. does not alter significantly the crystallographic structure of such nanoferrites and does not compromise the magnetic properties of doped nanoparticles. The doping level, though relatively small, exceeds the levels of currently used radiopharmaceuticals, where only few radionuclides can be incorporated in a single radiotherapeutic molecule. This new type of multifunctional nanoparticles can be used not only as drug carriers or in magnetic hyperthermia, but also in the so-called endoradiotherapy. The latter feature can be easily implemented upon the replacement of “cold” ions of Tb 3+ and Gd 3+ in the superparamagnetic core with their isotopes emitting soft β − radiation suitable for the internal radiotherapy, localized directly within the tumor. Therefore, these nanoparticles can be used simultaneously in targeted drug delivery, hyperthermia and radiotherapy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.It is pointed out that a recent article (Parekh and Upadhyay, 2017) is conceptually wrong. I have shown that authors (Parekh and Upadhyay, 2017) to obtained unreasonably good agreement between the calculated and the experimental data.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Thin films of B x C y N z are grown for the first time using the ammonia assisted Pulsed Laser Deposition (PLD) technique, known for its precise stoichiometry control, and their magnetic and transport properties are carefully studied along with atomistic chemical and microstructural details by using the techniques of X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS), Raman Spectroscopy and synchrotron-based X-ray absorption near-edge structure (XANES) and Valence Band Spectroscopy (VBS). The role of dopants and defects is brought out using a combined comprehensive analysis based on these experimental results and Density Functional Theory (DFT) calculations. An interesting crossover is noted in the transport mechanism of charge carriers with the change in doping level of specific nitrogen defects. A robust and high saturation magnetization is achieved in BCN films which is higher by almost hundred times as compared to that in similarly grown undoped carbon film.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Reply to comments on our paper entitled ‘The effect of magnetic field induced aggregates on ultrasound propagation in aqueous magnetic fluid’ [J. Magn. Magn. Mater. 431 (2017) 74–78]. We show here that comments does not stand valid.© 2018The present work deals with theoretical study of magnetic hyperthermia produced by a system of magnetically interacting ferromagnetic particles, placed in a rotating magnetic field. Our results show that the interparticle interaction significantly enhances the intensity of the heat production; the thermal effect in the rotating field is greater than that in the linearly polarized field with the same amplitude and frequency.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Magnetization reversal and magnetic exchange coupling of (Co/Ni) ×N /Ru/(Co/Pt) ×12 were investigated as a function of the temperature. The number of repeats N of the soft multilayer (Co/Ni) was varied from 4 to 8 bilayers while the number of repeats of the hard bilayers (Co/Pt) was fixed to 12. Two steps hysteresis loops were observed for coupled structure with only 4 repeats of (Co/Ni) in a wide range of temperature (25–300 K). From the shift of the minor hysteresis loop, the antiferromagnetic exchange coupling H ex was measured and then the interlayer exchange coupling J ex was calculated. A non-monotonous dependence of J ex with temperature was observed for N = 4 with a maximum J ex of 0.13 erg/cm 2 at 150 K. The annealing process performed on the same structure confirms the unusual behavior of interlayer exchange coupling J ex . As the repetition number N increases to 8 bilayers the two steps hysteresis loops disappeared in the investigated temperature range, however a small kink appeared in the range of 125 and 225 K for the case of 6 bilayers. From the analysis of the coupled and uncoupled structures, it seems that the dipolar energy overcomes the antiferromagnetic coupling for thicker (Co/Ni) multilayer.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We report on the self-consisted semi-analytical theory of magnetoelastic excitation and electrical detection of spin waves and spin currents in hypersonic bulk acoustic waves resonator with ZnO-GGG-YIG/Pt layered structure. Electrical detection of acoustically driven spin waves occurs due to spin pumping from YIG to Pt and inverse spin Hall (ISHE) effect in Pt as well as due to electrical response of ZnO piezotransducer. The frequency-field dependences of the resonator frequencies and ISHE voltage U ISHE are correlated with experimental ones observed previously. Their fitting allows to determine some magnetic and magnetoelastic parameters of YIG. The analysis of the YIG film thickness influence on U ISHE gives the possibility to find the optimal thickness for maximal U ISHE value.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We have carefully studied the relation between the critical and electrical behavior of rhombohedral La 1−x Sr x CoO 3 (x = 0.2–0.5) compounds prepared by solid-state reactions. The results obtained from analyzing M(T, H) data indicate that all compounds undergo a second-order phase transition and the ferromagnetic-paramagnetic (FM-PM) transition temperature increases from approximate 182 K for x = 0.2 to 253 K for x = 0.5. Basing on the modified Arrott and Kouvel-Fisher techniques, scaling hypothesis, and critical isotherm analysis, we have determined the critical exponent values characteristic of magnetic order of La 1−x Sr x CoO 3 , with β = 0.361–0.489, γ = 1.021–1.346, and δ = 2.99–4.72. Interestingly, though all compounds are metallic ferromagnets, we have found the phase segregation in magnetic order as x > 0.3, where magnetic interactions tend to change from long-to-short-range FM order together with the absence of the insulating-like behavior at temperatures below 100 K. These phenomena are related to the spatial coexistence of multiple electronic and magnetic phases due to the changes in concentration of cobalt ions, spin-state transitions, and the existence of poor-hole anti-FM and hole-rich FM regions.© 2019 The hysteresis losses and their relation to the parameters of the minor static hysteresis loops were investigated in the nanocrystalline Fe 67.5 Co 5 Cu 1 Nb 2 Mo 1.5 Si 14 B 9 alloy with magnetic-field-induced anisotropy. The analysis of experimental data was performed using a power function, which approximated the dependencies between the hysteresis parameters. It is shown that all the experimental dependences in cores with magnetic-field-induced anisotropy in a weak magnetic field are consistent with the formulas derived from the Rayleigh law. It is also shown, that in a nanocrystalline alloy with uniaxial induced anisotropy, certain empirical relationships obtained earlier for isotropic materials are not met, particularly, for the relation of the hysteresis losses to the remanence and the maximal magnetic induction. It has been found, that samples with longitudinal induced anisotropy demonstrate low initial permeability, and the magnetization process in the Rayleigh region is carried out by the domain walls’ displacement at distances comparable to the correlation length L ex . A magnetic hysteresis mechanism associated with the irreversible magnetization rotation in ferromagnetic clusters of nanocrystalline alloys is proposed. Formulas are proposed to calculate hysteresis losses in a soft magnetic nanocrystalline material with a different magnetic anisotropy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Using a simple model of a frustrated helimagnet, the critical behavior is numerically investigated for planar or isotropic spins, and for cases of one or two chiral order parameters. The helical structure in this model arises from the competition between exchange interactions of spins of the first two range orders in one direction (in both directions) of a square lattice. The main result is that the critical and temperature behavior is primarily determined by topological defects that are present in all cases. In the case of planar spins, vortices, fractional vortices and domain walls are present in the system. Their interaction leads to the appearance of the phase of a chiral spin liquid, or induces a single first-order transition, and in the vicinity of the Lifshitz point vortices lead to a reentrant phase transition to the phase with a collinear quasi-long-range order. When transitions in the chiral and continuous order parameters are separated in temperature, they are of the 2D Ising and Kosterlitz-Thouless types correspondingly. In the case of isotropic spins, so-called Z 2 vortices are present. They do not lead to the appearance of a phase with long-range or quasi-long-range order in the case of one chiral order parameter. However, their interaction leads to a sharp change in the temperature dependence of the correlation length (crossover). In the case of two chiral parameters, there are long-range chiral order of the Ising type (chiral spin liquid) and domain walls. However, as a result of the interaction of vortices and walls, the crossover and chiral transition occur at the same temperature as a first-order transition.© 2018In this paper, two-phase flow of blood is considered through a circular tube along with magnetic properties. The tube is considered as a circular cylinder form and the blood is flowing through it under the influence of uniform magnetic field and an external oscillating pressure gradient. Exact solutions for the fluid and magnetic particles velocities are obtained by means of integral transforms. The velocity of the fluid is presented as a sum of post transient and transient solutions. Moreover, a semi-analytical solution based on the Bessel equation and Tzou's algorithm for the inverse Laplace transform is obtained. A comparison among the profiles of the fluid's velocity determined with both solutions is also made. Furthermore, in order to study the influence of the material parameters, numerical simulations and graphical illustrations are used and useful conclusions are summarized.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Among different magnetic thin films, L1 0 FePt due to high magnetocrystalline anisotropy is attracting much attention for applications in new generation of magnetic recording media. In this work, switching time and switching mechanism of magnetization as essential properties of L1 0 FePt film was studied by magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) and time-resolved magneto-optical Kerr effect (TR-MOKE). For this purpose, static in plane and out of plane magnetic hysteresis loop of the 20-nm thick L1 0 FePt film on (1 0 0) MgO was measured and modeled using polar and longitudinal MOKE and mumax code, respectively. Furthermore, the switching time of magnetization was studied using laser-induced ultrafast demagnetization and relaxation of the sample by TR-MOKE, in which for the first time, the magnetic field was applied in the plane of the sample for this measurement.© 2019 The present study reports on the synthesis and characterization of zinc iron oxide ZnFe 2 O 4 magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) using the co-precipitation method. Particular attention has been paid to study the influence of the pH in the range between 9 and 12 on both structural and magnetic properties of the MNPs. X-ray diffraction analysis shows the presence of a single phase of partially invers cubic spinel ferrites ZnFe 2 O 4 . Transmission Electron Microscopy (TEM) analysis shows the formation of highly crystalline MNPs and a change of shape from a polyhedral shape at pH 9 to a spherical-like shape for a pH 12. The MNPs mean-size increases from 19 to 33 nm with the increase of pH value. The ZnFe 2 O 4 MNPs are superparamagnetic at room temperature displaying a magnetization of 12 emu/g at the maximum applied static magnetic field. The heating efficiency of spherical zinc ferrites MNPs was evaluated for hyperthermia application and displays a linear increment of the specific absorption rate (SAR) up to 125 (W/g Fe ) under an alternating magnetic field ranging from 5 to 65 kA/m and operating at a frequency of 355 kHz.© 2019The paper deals with theoretical study of effect of ferrogels uniaxial elongation on magnetic susceptibilities of these composite materials. We have considered the systems with magnetically soft ellipsoidal and spherical particles. The results show that elongation of the composites with the ellipsoidal particles enhances the susceptibility in the direction of the elongation, whereas the deformation of ferrogels with the spherical particles decreases the susceptibility when the particles concentration is small enough and increases it when the concentration exceeds some threshold magnitude.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We study magnetic properties of the 3-state spin (S i =0 and ±1) spin glass (SG) van Hemmen model with ferromagnetic interaction J 0 under a random field (RF). The RF follows a bimodal distribution The combined effect of the crystal field D and the special type of on-site random interaction of the van Hemmen model engenders the unfolding of the SG phases for strong enough RF, i. e., instead of one SG phase, we found two SG phases. Moreover, as J 0 is finite, there is also the unfolding of the mixed phase (with the SG order parameter and the spontaneous magnetization simultaneously finite) in four distinct phases. The emergence of these new phases separated by first and second order line transitions produces a multiplication of triple and multicritical points.© 2018The effect of manganese on high silicon alloyed electrical steel sheets has been investigated. Three alloys with different Mn content (0.20, 0.69 and 1.38 wt%) have been melted on a laboratory scale and processed to fully-finished electrical steel sheets with 0.5 mm thickness. The effect of Mn on the mechanical, microstructural and magnetic properties has been studied. The average grain size decreases as Mn content increases. The texture is hardly affected by a variation of Mn content but the material is strengthened with increasing Mn content by solid solution strengthening. Mn increases the electrical resistance, which results in lower core losses at higher frequencies.© 2019In the framework of the Anderson pf-model, magnetic phase transitions in 5f-ferromagnetic superconductors with hybridization of localized (f-) and delocalized (p-) electrons are discussed. We consider a free-energy functional containing a contribution due to the mode-mode coupling spin fluctuations. The calculated p-T-diagram of magnetic states describes transitions of the first and second order and the region of the ferromagnetic short-range order too. It is shown that when the temperature and pressure change, a shift of the chemical potential to the pseudogap region is possible, with a jump-like increase in the occupation of the spin-symmetrized electronic states and an increase in the screening of the local magnetic moments.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. This research examines the interaction effects of an inclined magnetic field and nanofluid on forced convection heat transfer and flow irreversibility in a duct with an abrupt contraction. This contraction is created by an inclined forward facing step and is simulated using the Blocked region method. To analysis the flow irreversibility, the entropy generation number is calculated based on the second law of thermodynamics. The effects of Hartmann number Ha=0-100, magnetic field inclination angle β=0 Â° -90 Â° and nanoparticles volume fraction ϕ=0-0.06 on the values of friction coefficient, Nusselt number and entropy generation number are shown graphically. The results present that the Hartmann number and inclination angle of the magnetic field have the reverse effects on the heat transfer rate, whiles their influences on the flow irreversibility is significantly increasing. Also, total entropy generation number and average Nusselt number increase as the volume fraction of nanoparticles enhances from 0 to 0.06.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Ce and La as very cheap rare-earth elements were used to substitute Nd in nanocrystalline melt-spun ribbons of nominal compositions (Nd 1−x RE x ) 13.6 Fe bal Co 6.6 Ga 0.6 B 5.6 (x = 0, 0.1, 0.2, … 1 for RE = Ce) and (x = 0, 0.1, 0.2, … 0.5 for RE = La). Ce substitution gradually decreased the Nd 2 Fe 14 B lattice constants and produced CeFe 2 segregation from x = 0.7. La substitution led to lattice expansion along the c-axis and induced segregation of α-Fe and Nd 2 Fe 17 at x = 0.5. Grain coarsening was observed in the Ce-substituted samples while La was found to suppress grain growth. Cerium worsened the magnetic properties of as-spun powders after an initial improvement in (Nd 0.9 Ce 0.1 ) 13.6 Fe bal Co 6.6 Ga 0.6 B 5.6 alloy which showed a coercivity (µ 0 H c ) of 1.54 T and a remanence (B r ) of 0.81 T. Coercivity dropped with increasing La concentration but remanence increased from 0.73 T in the base composition to 0.88 T at x = 0.3. The Curie temperatures (T C ) showed a slight decrease in both cases until x = 0.4. It then dropped abruptly for increasing Ce fractions and increased at x = 0.5 La. For x = 0.2 and 0.3 Ce and x = 0.2 La fractions, the melt-spun samples were further processed by hot-pressing and hot-deformation. The hot-pressed (Nd 0.8 La 0.2 ) 13.6 Fe bal Co 6.6 Ga 0.6 B 5.6 alloy measured lower coercivity but increased remanence comparing to the Ce-substituted alloys. However, this composition responded poorly to hot-deformation, severe cracking being induced in the process. Due to enhanced hot-workability, best magnetic properties were obtained after deformation for the (Nd 0.7 Ce 0.3 ) 13.6 Fe bal Co 6.6 Ga 0.6 B 5.6 alloy (µ 0 H c = 1.09 T, B r = 0.97 T and energy product (BH) max = 170 kJ/m 3 ).© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Previous studies show that FeCrAs and FeMnAs half-Heusler compounds exhibit half-metallic properties. Based on the generalised gradient approximation (GGA) local density approximation (LDA), and +U correction, we discuss the electronic and magnetic properties for the bulk and (0 0 1) surface of Fe(Cr, Mn)As half-Heusler compounds with a Clb structure, based on the first-principle computation. We found that the lattice constant significantly depends on the exchange-correlation interaction, and both alloys demonstrate the half-metallic property with full-spin polarisation with high Curie temperature. In (0 0 1) FeCrAs and FeMnAs surfaces, we noted that the half-metallicity, spin polarisation, and magnetic moment were dependent on the exchange correlation. For Cr-As, we obtained a higher spin polarisation with LDA and GGA + U, with values of 94% and 95%, respectively, and FeCrAs and FeMnAs with LDA + U achieved a value of 94%. In the Mn-As terminated surface, we observed that half-metallicity was confirmed with a spin polarisation equal to 100% with GGA + U only, and for FeCrAs and FeMnAs, a value of 43% with LDA was achieved. These calculations indicate that the effect of correlation is sensitive for the electronic and magnetic properties of both compounds.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The Ni-Mn-Z (Z = Sn, In, Sb, Ga) based alloys are considered as promising magnetic refrigeration materials due to its giant inverse magnetocaloric effect, simple preparation and low cost. In this work, the transformation behavior and magnetocaloric effect of Ni 42 Co 8 Mn 37.7 In 12.3 polycrystalline alloy has been investigated. It is found that both the temperature-induced martensitic transformation and its associated field induced metamagnetic transition occur near the room temperature. The large magnetic entropy change ΔS M of 14.30 J·K −1 ·kg −1 and large refrigeration capacity RC of 549 J·K −1 are achieved under 6 T within the broad ambient working temperature range of 248–295 K. Its magnetocaloric performance is outstanding among a great number of reported Ni-Mn-Z based alloys.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The annealing effects on the exchange bias properties in antiferromagnetic Heusler alloy Ni 2 MnAl/Fe bilayers were investigated. Exchange bias shifts were observed at low temperatures. The sign reversal of the exchange bias shift was observed below the blocking temperature probably due to the training effect. The exchange bias shift showed a peak for the annealing temperature dependence, on the other hand, the blocking temperature increased with the annealing temperature, which closely correlates with the crystallographic grain size of the antiferromagnetic Ni 2 MnAl layer.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We report here the electrical transport and magnetic properties of the newly synthesized quaternary Heusler compounds CoFeTiSn and CoFeVGa. Our study indicates a striking change in the electronic transport properties of CoFeTiSn as the system undergoes the paramagnetic to ferromagnetic transition. While the sample shows an activated semiconducting behaviour in the paramagnetic phase, it turns abruptly to a metallic phase with the onset of ferromagnetic transition. We have compared the system with other Heusler compounds showing similar anomaly in transport, and it appears that CoFeTiSn has much similarities with the Fe 2 VAl compound having pseudogap in the paramagnetic phase. On the other hand, CoFeVGa shows a semiconducting behaviour from high temperature to 90 K. On cooling below 90 K, a broad hump like feature is observed. Both the compositions show negative Seebeck coefficient varying linearly with temperature. The value of the Seebeck coefficient of CoFeTiSn is comparable to that of many Heusler alloys identified as potential thermoelectric materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. To explore the relationship between optical properties, oxygen vacancies and magnetism in SrTiO 3 , we prepared a series of SrTiO 3-δ (δ = 0.00, 0.125 and 0.250) samples by solid state reaction method followed by the creation of oxygen vacancies-δ. Surface composition and chemical valence state in the synthesized compounds were examined by X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS). The Fourier Transform Infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR) spectra showed that the transmission properties change with oxygen vacancies introduction. Ultraviolet–visible absorption revealed that optical properties were highly dependent on oxygen vacancies concentrations. When the magnetic field was applied, magnetization showed weak-ferromagnetism at room temperature on SrTiO 3-δ non-stoïchiometric systems. Yet, it was reversed showing diamagnetism on SrTiO 3 perfect crystal. The large concentration of oxygen vacancies (δ = 0.250) reduced ferromagnetism and optical absorption, implying the possible presence of a relationship between the magnetism and the optical properties. Theoretical results showed two types of electronic contributions to magnetism, one of which emanates from localized states below the conduction band minimum, and the other comes from itinerant electrons of Ti atoms lying further away from the oxygen-vacancy. The electronic structures and magnetic properties were calculated by Full-Potential Linear Augmented Plane Wave (FP-LAPW) method within the Generalized Gradient Approximation (GGA) and the atomic relaxations introduced by the oxygen vacancies host in a fully self-consistent way. The results shed some light on the promising magneto-optical properties of the SrTiO 3-δ materials.© 2019 We report that the unusual behavior of anomalous Hall effect (AHE) in permalloy (Fe 20 Ni 80 , Py) thin film with silicon oxide (SiO 2 ) as an adjacent layer. It is found that sign of AHE changes from positive to negative with decrement in thickness of Py. Through the AHE measurement, we demonstrate that this unusual behavior originates from the interface of Py/SiO 2 rather from the structural inversion asymmetry. In the Pt/YIG/Cu/Py/SiO 2 multilayer structure with a charge current injected in the Py layer, the information on spin accumulation at the YIG/Cu interface induced by the AHE in Py, can be obtained from the nonlocal voltage measured in the Pt layer. Through the nonlocal measurement, it is found, however, the electrons with same spin for interfacial Py near the SiO 2 layer and bulk Py are scattered to the same direction. Hence we can deduce that the sign of spin polarization of the conductivity closely related to the asymmetry in density of states at the Fermi level for interfacial Py and bulk Py should be opposite to each other, which is responsible for the abnormal AHE observed. Our results demonstrate that oxide layer can drive the change of sign of AHE of Py, which provide an alternative way of manipulating the spin-related transport.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Temperature dependent Raman scattering measurements have been performed to explore unusual coupling between magnetism and crystal structure in doped pyrochlore iridate Y 2 Ir 1-x Ru x 2 O 7 with x = 0.0, 0.05 and 0.2. The parent Y 2 Ir 2 O 7 shows an onset of magnetic ordering around ∼160 K (T N ) which monotonically decreases with Ru doping. Further, magnetic moment also decreases with progressive substitution of Ru. Substitution of Ru 4+ (4d 4 ) for Ir 4+ (5d 5 ) does not introduce significant modification in structural parameters, however, the magnetic transition temperature decreases systematically with doping. Raman scattering data show an anomalous change in A 1g and P 3 Raman mode frequency and line-width across T N of individual samples. We further show that the shifting of Raman mode frequency with temperature exhibits a strong deviation from anharmonic decay around and below the T N of respective samples which underlines a spin-phonon coupling in these materials.© 2019Training is a common effect in exchange bias systems and accounts for the decrease of the exchange bias loop shift and coercivity with consecutively measured hysteresis loops until steady values. This is an ageing-like phenomenon that is related to the metastable state of the ferromagnetic/antiferromagnetic interface after field cooling. However, its origin still remains intriguing and not univoquely established. Here, by micromagnetic simulations considering discrete non-interacting antiferromagnetic grains embedded in a ferromagnetic matrix, it is demonstrated that the origin of training in granular Co-CoO exchange bias systems prepared by O ion implantation into Co thin films is linked to the perpendicular anisotropy of rotatable interface uncompensated spins. The simulations are compared to experimental data as reported in Physical Review B 89 (2014) 144407. The out-of-plane nature of the rotatable anisotropy of the system is also responsible for the magnetic reversal asymmetry between the first and the second magnetic reversals, evidencing the interconnection between training and magnetization reversal, suggesting that training effect and magnetization reversal asymmetry are ultimately interconnected through perpendicular anisotropy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this work, the effect of Ga substitution on the crystal structure, phase transitions, magnetocaloric effect, and exchange bias properties, was systematically investigated in Ni 43 Mn 46 Sn 11−x Ga x alloys. With increasing Ga content, the Curie temperature of austenite slightly decreases, while the martensitic transformation temperature shifts to a higher temperature and finally disappears, due to the emergence of γ phase. Large low-field magnetic entropy changes around the martensitic transformation were observed as the transition from a paramagnetic martensitic phase to a ferromagnetic austenitic phase took place. Ni 43 Mn 46 Sn 11 has a reentrant-spin-glass ground state, and Ga doping can enhance the antiferromagnetic interaction arising from lattice contraction, leading to close of intermediate ferromagnetic windows and establishment of canonical spin-glass for x > 2. Prominently, the zero-field-cooled exchange was achieved in the spin-glass region with 5⩽x⩽10.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this study, the microalloying effects of P and Mo on thermal behavior, magnetic softness and magnetization process of FeSiBNbCu(P,Mo) nanocrystalline alloys were investigated systematically. The P and Mo bearing alloys exhibit pronouncedly improved magnetic softness, including extremely low coercivity of about 0.7 A/m, high saturation magnetic flux density of about 1.40 T, high permeability over 3.0 × 10 4 at 1 kHz. The excellent magnetic softness could be attributed to uniform dual-phase microstructure and wide strip magnetic domains after optimum annealing. The P and Mo containing alloys also have good high-frequency characterization, especially, the permeability at 100 kHz is still over 1.53 × 10 4 . These alloys also have relatively low pinning field of 20–30 A/m, which means lesser defects and easier magnetization. Through observing the changes of magnetic domains and μ with applied field increasing, we found that the increase of μ is corresponding to reversible and irreversible movement of domain walls, after reaching the maximum, the decrease of μ is related to the rotation of magnetic moment and the split of domains.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Here, we study the magnetism of the distorted 1T-TcX 2 (X = S,Se) based on first-principles calculation. The magnetism originates from the hole doping due to the density of states near the valence band edge having van Hove singularity feature. The calculated results show that the TcS 2 monolayer can develop an interesting ferromagnetic (FM) half-metallic phase with tunable spin-polarization orientation. The FM half-metallicity and magnetic moments of the hole-doped TcS 2 monolayer are primarily derived from the p orbital of S atoms, then, a FM ground phase with a high Curie temperature (T C ) (larger than 800 K) is obtained due to the strong S p –S p direct exchange interaction. The magnetic order is robust against thermal excitations at finite temperatures because of magnetic anisotropic energy. In the TcS 2 bilayer, the electrons near Fermi level are redistributed when introducing the interlayer interaction, which suppresses the ferromagnetism induced by hole doping. The ferromagnetism can be recovered when the interlayer interaction is weakened.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Experimental and computational evidence of a surface roughness induced magnetic anisotropy in NiFe thin films coated onto substrates of various surface roughnesses is reported. Magnetic coercive fields of 15 nm NiFe thin films coated on substrates with approximately 7 nm average roughness were remarkably 233% larger than identical thin films coated onto smooth substrates with <1 nm average roughness. The NiFe films coated onto rough substrates developed hard and easy axes, normally non-existent in NiFe Permalloy. A linear correlation of the incline angles of the hard axis hysteresis loops to the average roughness values of the individual substrates was observed, with 99% correlation level. Using a modified micromagnetics theory that incorporates the effects of surface roughness, it is shown the observed magnetic anisotropy arises due to the spatial anisotropy of the surface roughness, resulting in an effective in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy with energy density up to 15 kJ/m 3 .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A novel FeCoNiCr 0.2 Si 0.2 (at. %, thereafter, all mean atomic ratios) high-entropy alloy (HEA) was synthesized. The as-cast HEA exhibits a combination of excellent mechanical and magnetic properties with a large plastic deformation of about 60% and low coercivity (H c ) of about 187.9 A/m, which are prominent in the HEAs reported so far. Based on the large plasticity, rolling and annealing were adopted as a strategy for improving magnetic and mechanical properties of the HEA. The process of rolling followed by annealing leads to the significant enhancement of the yield strength (YS) and ultimate tensile strength (UTS) of alloy rolled at 773 K, increasing to 320 and 920 MPa respectively. Meanwhile the large plasticity and good soft magnetic properties remain. The enhancement mechanism of annealed after rolling was analyzed. Consequently, the optimal balance of magnetic and mechanical properties is achieved. The present work suggests a promising way to develop HEAs with a combination of excellent magnetic and mechanical properties.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this work, hard magnetism was studied on cobalt-doped α-Fe 2 O 3 particles, with special regard to the evolution of coercive fields as well as exchange bias fields. It was found that the coercivity of calcined sample fell into decline as temperature rose. Quite on the contrary, the sample prior to calcination exhibited a monotonical increment as increasing temperature. Further studies showed that lattice defects and voids in α-Fe 2 O 3 host, Co-doped α-Fe 2 O 3 colonies, FeOOH magnetic lattice, and CoFe 2 O 4 impurity phase were responsible for such significantly distinct magnetism evolution. The exhibited large coercivity beyond 10 kOe and pronounced exchange bias field of −660 Oe enabled us to gain deep insight into the transition metal doped magnetic semiconductor and to promote its full exploitation in magnetic-relevant applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Barkhausen noise (BN) generated by the stochastic movements of domain walls is one of the most popular non-destructive testing signal. To measure the property of material, the feature(s) extracted from BN signal has been focused by the existing studies. Although the physical characteristic of several BN features could be proven, many features used in the BN-related works are prone to being interfered by the noise, temperature and other measurement conditions. In this paper, to build a stable and unified representation of BN signal, a novel BN feature extraction and hardness prediction method is proposed. The proposed method includes BN-reconstructed AR model, modified slow feature analysis for fusing different AR-order signal and discriminant incoherent component analysis for the hardness prediction. In the experiment, all potential parameters involved in our method were tested to show the relationship between the parameters and hardness prediction accuracy. Then our proposed method was compared with other component-analysis-based methods and self-defined isolated-feature-based prediction methods. The experimental result implies that our proposed method outperforms other methods, including features generated by component analysis methods and the combination of conventional BN features.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We investigate the nature of transport and ferromagnetic properties of the epitaxial GaAs structure with the Mn δ-doped layer. To modify the properties of the structure electrically active radiation defects are created by irradiation with 50 keV helium ions and a fluence in the range of 1 × 10 11 –1 × 10 13 cm −2 . The investigations show that transport properties of the structure are determined by two parallel conduction channels (the channel associated with hole transport in a valence band and the channel associated with electron transport in the Mn-related impurity band) and that ferromagnetic properties are determined by electrons localized at allowed states within the Mn impurity band. The ferromagnetic properties of the Mn δ-layer region cannot be affected by the closely located InGaAs quantum well, since the presence of quantum well has negligible influence on the Mn impurity band filling by electrons.© 2019 Experimental studies of polycrystalline Mn 2 FeAl revealed that it crystallizes in a primitive cubic structure of β-Mn type (space group P4 1 32) and is an antiferromagnet with Néel temperature T N = 40 K. The alloy exhibits temperature dependence of transport properties typical for semiconductors and has abnormally high electrical resistivity (ρ ∼ 238 μΩ·cm at room temperature). High Curie-Weiss temperature Θ CW ∼ –905 K and a large value of the frustration parameter ƒ ≈ 23 points to a strong frustration of the magnetic subsystem. These experimental findings are in contrast with reported results of first-principles calculations which predicted Mn 2 FeAl to be half metallic ferrimagnet crystallizing in the Heusler crystal structure.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.An interesting aspect of antiferromagnetic quantum spin ladders, with complete dimer coverings, is that the wave function can be recursively generated by estimating the number of coverings in the valence bond basis, which follow the fabled Fibonacci sequence. In this work, we derive generalized forms of this sequence for multi-legged and doped quantum spin ladders, which allow the corresponding dimer-covered state to be recursively generated. We show that these sequences allow for estimation of physically and information-theoretically relevant quantities in large spin lattices without resorting to complex numerical methods. We apply the formalism to calculate the valence bond entanglement entropy, which is an important figure of merit for studying cooperative phenomena in quantum spin systems with SU(2) symmetry. We show that introduction of doping may mitigate, within the quarters of entanglement entropy, the dichotomy between odd- and even- legged quantum spin ladders.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The structural and magnetic properties of Y 0.5 Er 0.5 Fe 2 D 4.2 deuteride have been investigated by continuous high field magnetic measurements up to 35 T and neutron powder diffraction experiments versus temperature and applied field. Y 0.5 Er 0.5 Fe 2 D 4.2 crystallizes in a monoclinic structure (Pc space group) resulting from the deuterium order into 18 interstitial tetrahedral sites. At low field, the deuteride is ferrimagnetic (Ferri) up to 38 K, between 38 and 50 K, it undergoes a first order transition towards an antiferromagnetic (AFM) structure, which remains present up to T N = 115 K. Upon applied field, two different types of metamagnetic behavior are observed depending on the temperature range. Below 38 K, a forced ferrimagnetic-ferromagnetic (FM) transition is observed at a transition field B Trans of only 7 T (at 2 K), which is among the smallest encountered for Fe rich intermetallics. B Trans is not very sensitive to temperature changes nor to the Er content and its moderate value is explained by a deuterium induced weakening of the Er-Fe interaction. The second metamagnetic transition, observed between 38 and 150 K, from an AFM (Para) towards a FM structure, is related to the itinerant electron metamagnetic behavior of the Fe sublattice. B Trans increases linearly versus temperature with a dB/dT slope of 0.24 ± 0.01 T.K −1 . Above B Trans , Er moments parallel to the Fe moments are induced.© 2019 In this article, dynamic magnetic properties of La 0.7 Sr 0.3 MnO 3 (LSMO) thin film capped with a Pb-free ferroelectric BZT-BCT layer deposited on two different substrates, i.e. lanthanum aluminate (LAO) and Platinum (Pt), by pulsed laser deposition (PLD) have been investigated using ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) spectroscopy. The heterostructures of BZT-BCT/LSMO on LAO substrate were highly (0 0 l)-oriented whereas these were randomly oriented on Pt substrate. The well-behaved M-H hysteresis loops were observed at room temperature for both heterostructures indicating the ferromagnetic behavior of LSMO. The right shift of the hysteresis loop of the heterostructure was observed due to the magnetoelectric coupling between ferroelectric and ferromagnetic layers. The FMR measurements yield optimum values of different important parameters such as the linewidth offset, Gilbert damping, gyromagnetic ratio, and in-plane uniaxial anisotropy field of the thin films, which are essential to design spin valve and magnetic tunneling based devices. We found the lowest Gilbert damping parameter of ∼0.03 for the BZT-BCT/LSMO/LAO heterostructure due to spin orbit coupling. In addition, the gyromagnetic ratio was also obtained to be small (0.002 GHz/Oe) in the same film. These results open new possibilities to use BZT-BCT/LSMO heterostructure for future spintronic device applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Strong Goss texture ({1 1 0}〈0 0 1〉) in Fe 81 Ga 19 thin sheet is successfully produced by secondary recrystallization process based on the precise control of inhibitor and primary recrystallization texture. Nanometer-sized sulfides of MnS and Cu 2 S are dispersedly precipitated during hot rolling as inhibitors for secondary recrystallization. Primary recrystallization texture is characteristic of weak Goss and strong γ textures distributed through sheet thickness by appropriate rolling and annealing schedule. The composite nanometer-sized inhibitors accompanied with the primary recrystallization texture can provide a well-matched pinning effect on normal grain growth of matrix grains and induce abnormal grain growth of exact Goss grains in final annealing process. The magnetostriction coefficient as high as 285 ppm is obtained in Fe 81 Ga 19 sheet after complete secondary recrystallization. Thus, an efficient method is proposed for developing sharp Goss texture and upgrading magnetostriction coefficient in Fe-Ga sheet.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this study, the magnetotransport properties of the Ni 48.95 Mn 37.74 Sn 13.32 B 3 ribbons prepared by melt-spinning technique were investigated in details. The martensitic-austenite phase transition was obtained between 280 K and 285 K which are near the room temperature. From ρ-H measurements, it was found that an anomalous Hall effect at 281, 283 and 285 K between M s (martensite start temperature) and M f (martensite finish temperature) temperatures is domianant mechanism. It was seen that a voltage variation of 5 µV (between 0 and 10 kOe) at a constant current of 1 mA is one of the best values found for the Heusler alloys. The ρ-H results revealed that the ribbons showed the magnetic field-induced one-way shape memory effect (SME). High voltage change caused by magnetoresistance was reached at a constant current of 100 mA at 298 K. The results suggest that the Ni-Mn-Sn-B ribbon is a potential candidate to prepare a magnetic field sensor operating at the room temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In the present study, spinel copper ferrite (CuFe 2 O 4 ) nanoparticles (NPs) doped with different concentrations of rare earth element (REE) Cerium (Ce 3+ ) ions were synthesized by the simple sol-gel combustion technique. REE Ce 3+ ions were successfully doped into the spinel lattice of CuFe 2 O 4 NPs without any distortion. It was analyzed that the influence of Ce 3+ ions on structure, surface morphology, magnetic behavior and antibacterial activities using different instrumental techniques such as powder XRD, SEM, EDX, TEM, SAED and VSM, etc. Powder XRD results and SEM images along with EDX techniques confirmed the spinel phase formation of pure and Ce 3+ doped CuFe 2 O 4 NPs with spherical shaped morphology without any other secondary phase impurity. It also was further confirmed by TEM and SAED analysis. The magnetic behavior of the Ce 3+ doped CuFe 2 O 4 NPs was recorded using the VSM technique at room temperature (RT). The magnetic characterizations have been altered by the addition of Ce 3+ ions in the CoFe 2 O 4 lattice. The antibacterial properties of Ce 3+ doped CuFe 2 O 4 NPs was found to be enhanced with increase in Ce 3+ concentrations as it cause a reduction in the grain size.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this study, the impact of total film thicknesses on the structural and magnetic properties of multilayers was investigated. The multilayer films were produced by a DC magnetron sputtering system by considering different total thickness values as x[Ni(10 nm)/Cu(30 nm)] (x = 3, 6, 7). A face centered cubic crystalline structure with (1 1 1) preferential orientation was formed for all Ni/Cu multilayers investigated. The number of grains on surface immensely increased and their size significantly decreased as the total film thickness was systematically increased. And also, the arithmetic mean roughness deviation (Ra) and root mean square (Rq) values increased with the increase of total thickness of Ni/Cu films. From scanning electron microscope and atomic force microscope results, the surface roughness increased with increasing the total thickness. The saturation magnetization (M s ), remanent magnetization (M r ) and coercivity (H c ) values were also measured. The M s values increased from 590 emu/cm 3 to 615 emu/cm 3 , M r values decreased from 396 emu/cm 3 to 204 emu/cm 3 and H c values gradually decreased from 116 Oe to 89 Oe as the total film thickness increased from 120 nm to 280 nm. It was found that total thickness of Ni/Cu multilayers is an effective parameter and has a considerable role to adjust the magnetic properties for the intended purposes.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Significant coercivity ( i H c ) enhancement of hot deformed NdFeB magnets made from commercial MQU-F powders doped with 2 wt% R 80 Ga 20 eutectic alloy powders is demonstrated, where R represents Pr, Dy and Tb. The experimental result shows that the coercivity of the hot deformed magnet is improved from 15.0 kOe to 17.2–18.7 kOe by doping R 80 Ga 20 alloys, but (BH) max is slightly decreased from 41.5 MGOe to 34.1–38.7 MGOe. The magnet doped with Tb 80 Ga 20 exhibits higher i H c = 18.7 kOe with moderate (BH) max = 38.7 MGOe among the doped magnets post-annealed at 600 °C. In addition, hot deformed NdFeB magnets doped with Tb 80 Ga 20 alloy powders annealed at various temperatures were also explored. Increasing the annealing temperature from 600 °C to 700 °C, i H c is significantly enhanced to 24.0 kOe with attractive (BH) max of 37.5 MGOe. Post-annealing treatment at higher temperature, i.e., 700 °C, could modify the microstructures and therefore improve the magnetic properties of the hot deformed magnets effectively. TMA analysis shows that the increase of T C with annealing temperature reveals the increased amount of Tb entered into 2:14:1 phase. TEM with EDX analysis shows that the preference of Ga at grain boundary may reduce nucleation sites of reverse domain and strengthen pinning effect, contributing to coercivity enhancement. This study provides a useful method to enhance the coercivity of hot deformed NdFeB magnets larger than 20 kOe, which is also suitable for making thicker NdFeB MQ 3 magnets for high temperature applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Thin-film magneto-impedance (MI) sensors have attracted much attention because of their advantages such as high sensitivity at room temperature and ease of miniaturization. However, further improvement in their sensitivity is required for detecting weak biomagnetic signals such as the magnetic fields of the brain. Since the high-frequency permeability of magnetic multilayer films with insulator layers improves due to the reduction in eddy current loss in the films, sensors using such multilayer films are expected to show a larger impedance change. In this paper, we fabricated sensors using Co 85 Nb 12 Zr 3 /SiO 2 multilayer films and investigated their properties to evaluate the effect of their use on the sensor properties. The high-frequency permeability of the multilayer films improved as compared with that of CoNbZr single-layer films due to the reduction in eddy current loss. Because of the improvement in the permeability, the maximum impedance change ratio (ΔZ/Z) of the sensors using the multilayer films increased from 140% to 280% as compared with that of the sensor using the single-layer films. Thus, the use of magnetic multilayer films is effective for increasing the ΔZ/Z value of MI sensors.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report the growth of room temperature ferromagnetism in Zn doped ZnO thin films deposited on n-Si substrate. The observed ferromagnetism is modulated when annealing of the film is done under magnetic field influence. The hysteresis curves of the deposited samples show the ferromagnetic characteristics i.e. retentivity, coercivity and magnetic saturation. Additionally, structural and surface morphological properties of the normally annealed and samples annealed under magnetic field influence have also been discussed in detail.© 2019We have studied the dispersion in the anisotropy fields axes and the misalignment between the uniaxial and unidirectional anisotropy axes in exchange bias (EB) systems by angular anisotropic magnetoresistance measurements (AMR). We present here how these two important parameters affect the AMR curves. The EB field dispersion results in different resistance values when measured with the magnetic field applied along or opposed to the average bias field direction. We found that a misalignment between the anisotropy axes produces an asymmetry in the angular AMR curves, similar to the asymmetry caused by the misalignment between the anisotropy axes and the current directions. Careful control on the current direction enable us to identify the origin of the measured asymmetry. In addition, we presented the model and protocol used to perform the calculations and obtain the main parameters related to EB.© 2019 High-frequency/high-field electron paramagnetic resonance studies on two homonuclear 12-MC-4 metallacrown complexes Cu 4 Cu and Co 4 Co are presented. For Cu 4 Cu, our data imply axial-type g-anisotropy with g x =2.03±0.01, g y =2.04±0.01, and g z =2.23±0.01, yielding g=2.10±0.02. No significant zero field splitting (ZFS) of the ground state mode is observed. In Co 4 Co, we find a m S =±3/2 ground state with g=2.66. The data suggest large anisotropy D of negative sign.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. The room-temperature magnetoelastic coupling has been demonstrated in (x)NiFe 2 O 4 + (1 − x)BaTiO 3 (where x = 0–1 with a difference of 0.1) composite system by investigating its structural, magnetic and ferroelectric properties. The samples were prepared by the standard solid-state reaction method and characterized by x-ray diffraction, backscattered scanning electron microscopy and energy dispersive x-ray spectroscopy techniques. The temperature dependent magnetization data clearly show significant jumps in magnetization curves at structural phase transitions of BaTiO 3 , signifying the strain-mediated converse magnetoelectric (CME) coupling in NiFe 2 O 4 -BaTiO 3 multiferroic system. The substantial changes observed in the obtained parameters from structural, magnetic and ferroelectric properties clearly ensure the strain-mediated magnetoelectric (ME) as well as CME effects in this system. The present investigation indicates that the NiFe 2 O 4 -BaTiO 3 composite system will be a potential candidate for the future low-power consumption device applications at room temperature.© 2019 The Mn 1−x Ir x Co 2 O 4 spinel crystallizes in the cubic structure with the space group Fd-3 m. The doped Ir 4+ with strong spin-orbit coupling has a significant impact on the magnetic properties of Mn 1−x Ir x Co 2 O 4 . The Ir 4+ ion shares the B site with the Mn 3+ and Co 3+ ion. A metamagnetic transition is observed in the samples with x = 0 and 0.05. One FM, which slightly varies in the range of 166 K–158 K for 0 ≤ x ≤ 0.3, and one AFM, which increases from 133 K to 147 K with 0.1 ≤ x ≤ 0.3 are observed. The sample of x = 0.3 has one more AFM and one more FM transition. The exchange coupling of the FM with the AFM induces the enhanced coercivity and the exchange bias with magnetic frustrations. The coercive field of Mn 1−x Ir x Co 2 O 4 increases greatly from almost zero for x = 0 to 0.52 T with the doped Ir 4+ content as low as 0.05. It suggests that the Ir 4+ ion possesses a strong single-ion anisotropy. The sample of x = 0.2 has the highest coercive field of 0.82 T due to the exchange coupling of the AFM and FM interactions. The exchange bias effect is observed in x = 0.05 after FC at 0.5 T, in x = 0.1 at both the ZFC and FC state, and in x = 0.3 at the ZFC state, but not in x = 0.2. The enhanced coercivity and observed exchange bias effect are resulted from the exchange coupling between a ferromagnet (FM) and uncompensated spins or frustrated spins at the interfacial region of an antiferromagnet (AFM).© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We report on the preparation and transport properties of Gadolinium substituted Ni (1-x) Zn x Gd y Fe (2-y) O 4 (0⩽x⩽1,y=0.1) nano particles using low temperature citrate precursor combustion method. The Rietveld refinement of PXRD data suggests the crystal structure of sample belongs to Fd-3m space group with an octahedral occupation of Gd +3 ions. FESEM micrographs show the existence of porosity in the samples. The dielectric studies reveal the good dielectric behaviour with high dielectric constant in Zn +2 substituted sample (x = 0.4). An increase in a.c conductivity observed in the Zn +2 substituted sample due to the hopping mechanism. The impedance spectroscopy of the samples shows the existence of high grain boundary resistance and an alternate switching of dielectric relaxation from non-Debye to Debye type. The activation energies and Curie temperature estimated using D. C. conductivity measurements drop linearly with an increase in Zn +2 concentration. We attribute the observed transport properties mainly to the hopping of Fe +2 ↔ Fe +3 ions.© 2018 Permalloy (Ni 0.80 Fe 0.20 , or Py) is one of the most thoroughly studied magnetic materials, with well documented properties. By fabricating ferromagnetic alloys between Copper and Py, the values of the exchange stiffness parameter, A ex , and the saturation magnetization, 4πM s , can be controllably adjusted. This proves a simple method for engineering the magnetic properties of materials. Using Brillouin Light Scattering and Broadband Ferromagnetic Resonance techniques, we show that varying the concentration x of Cu in an alloy Cu x Py 1-x from x=0.00 to x=0.37, the saturation magnetization, 4πM s , can be adjusted from 9.46 kOe to 4.21 kOe. Simultaneously, the exchange stiffness parameter, A ex , can be adjusted from 1.115 μerg cm −1 to 0.122 μerg cm −1 .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The present work is devoted to the magnetic behaviour of Mn 12 -stearate single-molecule magnets ([Mn 12 O 12 (CH 3 (CH 2 ) 16 CO 2 ) 11 (CH 3 CO 2 ) 5 (H 2 O) 4 ]·2CH 3 COOH) immobilized inside the SBA-15 mesoporous silica. The stearate's complexed Mn 12 , in contrast to the commonly used Mn 12 -acetate, is soluble in most organic solvents and resistant against water catalyzed reduction. Thus, the precise functionalization of SBA-15 silica by these molecules is possible with no use of sophisticated laboratory equipment. The modified silica matrix in this case provides controlled separation of magnetic molecules, by the use of anchoring units placed inside pores. In order to check the properties of Mn 12 -stearate molecules regularly distributed inside silica matrix, and check their interactions, samples containing three different concentration of Mn 12 -stearate molecules were prepared and compared with the bulk Mn 12 -stearate. All materials have been examined by means of infrared spectroscopy, transmission electron microscopy, X-ray diffraction and squid magnetometry. The obtained results confirmed the successful immobilization of magnetic molecules inside the silica matrices. Moreover, the results of magnetic tests showed a correlation between the amount of magnetic molecules placed inside the mesopores and the magnetic properties of the obtained hybrid materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We present investigation of microwave permeability of thin supermalloy films deposited on a flexible substrate. The permeability measurements are performed by transmission-reflection technique in a coaxial line under external magnetic bias in the frequency range of 100 MHz–20 GHz. It is shown that demagnetization does not affect the measurements when bias is above 150 Oe. Magnetic characteristics of the films are determined by two approaches: (i) fitting of the resonant frequency dependence on magnetic bias by Kittel's equation and (ii) calculation of the parameters from the Landau–Lifshitz–Gilbert dispersion law. Both approaches give close results for values of magnetoelastic field, anisotropy field, saturation magnetization, and damping factor.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The influences of doping Ti on the phases, microstructures and magnetic properties are systematically investigated in (Nd 0.8 Ce 0.2 ) 12 Fe 82−x Ti x B 6 melt spun alloys. It is found that Ti could promote the glass forming ability of the studied alloys and increase the stability of the amorphous phase. Significant coercivity enhancement due to Ti doping is observed. The coercivity increases from 9.5 kOe for Ti-free sample to 18.5 kOe with Ti addition of 5 at%, and further reaches to 19.5 kOe when Ti addition rises to 7 at%. The Fe 2 Ti phase is found to precipitate in the 2-14-1 phase grain boundaries investigated by transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and high angle annular dark field (HAADF). With the Ti contents increasing, the precipitated phase becomes larger and more continuous, which is responsible for the huge improvement of the coercivity.© 2019 The structural and magnetic ordering of Pb 2 FeSbO 6 was studied by means of Mössbauer spectroscopy and neutron powder diffraction in the temperature range from 5 to 300 K. The structural phase transition from the initial cubic phase Fm3¯m to the tetragonal I4/m phase was observed in temperature range 170–190 K. The antiferromagnetic order with a propagation vector q = (½ ½ 0) was found at temperature T < T N = 30 K. The temperature dependences of the hyperfine parameters of Mössbauer spectra and magnetic moments for Pb 2 FeSbO 6 at low temperatures were obtained. The relationships between the short-range cation ordering observed by Mossbauer spectroscopy and the long-range cation ordering observed by neutron powder diffraction are discussed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Focused ion beam (FIB) irradiation was applied to an ultrathin Pt/Co/Pt film to create micrometer-sized, square-shaped regions with perpendicular orientation of magnetization embedded in an in-plane magnetized environment. The FIB parameters like ion fluence and scanning direction are used to control the magnetic properties of the irradiated areas. We have studied the magnetic and magnetooptical properties in the irradiated areas as a function of ion fluence by means of component selective magnetooptical Kerr microscopy that measures separately pure polar and pure longitudinal components of magnetization. Two fluence ranges that induce perpendicular magnetization components were observed. In the higher fluence range, four regions with independently inclined out-of-plane magnetization, depending on FIB fast scan direction, and an unexpected magnetic domain structure were distinguished inside the squares irradiated by FIB.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The physico-mathematical model of collective mechanical and magnetic dynamics of Stoner-Wohlfarth particle couple in liquid with regard to interparticle dipole-dipole and hydrodynamic interaction was developed. It is demonstrated that hydrodynamic interaction leads to formation of rigid doublet, and we also presented the results of numerical study of dipole-dipole interaction influence on magnetic reversal featured as well as on dynamic magnetic hysteresis and alternating magnetic field energy absorption by rigid doublet in solid and liquid suspension. It is demonstrated that taking into account the physiological limitation of amplitude and frequency of the field, the dipole-dipole interparticle interaction does not affect the energy dissipation, but changes the field parameters necessary to achieve the maximum specific absorption rate.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. This experimental study presents the magnetoviscous effect of water based Mn-Zn Fe 2 O 4 with C-TAB as surfactant under the influence of magnetic fields. Mn-Zn Fe 2 O 4 magnetic nanoparticles have been synthesized and characterized using correspondingly co-precipitation method and XRD, SEM and VSM analysis. Effect of various parameters like flow shear rate (0.1–1000 1/s), nanoparticle volume concentration (0.0–0.6%), sample temperature (20–60 °C) and magnetic field (0–600 A/m), has been investigated. The results show that, for the cases without magnetic field, the viscosity behaves shear thinning, Newtonian and shear thickening at respectively low, moderate, and high shear rate values. With applying magnetic fields, the larger the field strength the larger the viscosity value. Also, with nanoparticle volume fraction augmentation as well as field increase, the two shear thinning and shear thickening behaviors have been augmented; Finally, an empirical correlation is proposed to predict magnetoviscous behavior of the ferrofluid as function of the various mentioned parameters. This correlation can be helpful in thermomagnetic convection investigations.© 2019 The concept of more electrical aircraft architecture requires new magnetic materials, with improved magnetic and electrical properties. The paper investigates the soft magnetic materials based on FeCo/Al 2 O 3 core-shell nanoparticles, synthesized by sol-gel technique. These nanomaterials combines the high saturation magnetisation of FeCo compound with the increased resistivity of Al 2 O 3 and allow the decreasing of time-dependent magnetic losses for the bulk sized components, compared with the currently available Fe-Si alloys, used as metallic punched sheets for the building of the magnetic cores in electrical machines. The main physical characteristics of the FeCo/Al 2 O 3 prepared nanomaterials are: saturation magnetisation in the range of 136–213 emu/g, coercivity around 24.5 kA/m (320 Oe) and electrical resistivities of order of 10 14 Ω·m.© 2019The present investigation has been performed to explore the ability of magnetic hysteresis loop technique to detect prior austenite grain size changes due to various austenitizing conditions applied in plain carbon steels. To produce various prior austenite grain sizes, AISI 1045 steel specimens were austenitized at 950, 1000, and 1050 °C for 0.5, 1, and 1.5 h. Optical and scanning electron microscopic observations and X-ray diffraction method were conducted to characterize the microstructural features. It was observed that magnetic parameters extracted from hysteresis loop including maximum flux density, maximum differential permeability, and coercivity are affected by variation in prior austenite grain size. Therefore, these magnetic parameters could be used to estimate the prior austenite grain size. Three different functions introduced to do so, each gets a magnetic parameter and gives the estimated value of prior austenite grain size. To enhance the accuracy, another function which takes all three magnetic properties at the same time, were also introduced. It is suggested that the proposed electromagnetic nondestructive method is a useful and accurate enough tool for characterizing the microstructure and quantitative determination of prior austenite grain size of plain carbon steels.© 2018The movement of magnetic beads due to a magnetic field gradient is of great interest in different application fields. In this report we present a technique based on a magnetic tweezers setup to measure the velocity factor of magnetically actuated individual superparamagnetic beads in a fluidic environment. Several beads can be tracked simultaneously in order to gain and improve statistics. Furthermore we show our results for different beads with hydrodynamic diameters between 200 and 1000 nm from diverse manufacturers. These measurement data can, for example, be used to determine design parameters for a magnetic separation system, like maximum flow rate and minimum separation time, or to select suitable beads for fixed experimental requirements.© 2019 We investigated the magnetic easy axis of ferromagnetic CeAgSb 2 compound by using the first-principles electronic-structure calculations to clarify the role of 4f electrons. Similar to the case of CeCuSb 2 and CeAuSb 2 compounds, the total-energy differences and the density of states for Ce 4f electrons show that it is necessary to include both the spin–orbit coupling (SOC) and the so-called LDA+U method in the spin-polarized calculation to predict correct magnetic easy axis for this compound. Especially, we show that the SOC energy calculated by using l · s matrix elements of f-orbitals indicates that the effects of SOC of Ce 4f electrons plays a crucial role to determine the magnetic easy axes of CeNMSb 2 (NM: Cu, Ag and Au) compounds. Through the SOC Hamiltonian and detailed information on the occupation of individual f-orbitals of Ce atom obtained by the electronic-structure calculations the correct magnetic easy axis can be deduced. Surprisingly, the two Ce atoms in a unit cell of CeAgSb 2 compound should be treated inequivalently, which is similar to the case of antiferromagnetic CeCuSb 2 and CeAuSb 2 compounds, even though the CeAgSb 2 compound is ferromagnetic. The inequivalence of the two Ce atoms is due to the lack of mirror symmetry along the z-axis in this Ce-based compounds.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. The adiabatic temperature change ΔT ad of a Mn 1.3 Fe 0.7 P 0.5 Si 0.55 Fe 2 P-type alloy was measured under different magnetic field-sweep rates from 0.93 Ts −1 to 2870 Ts −1 . We find a field-sweep-rate independent magnetocaloric effect due to a partial alignment of magnetic moments in the paramagnetic region overlapping with the magnetocaloric effect of the first-order phase transition. Additionally, the first-order phase transition is not completed even in fields up to 20 T leading to a non-saturating behavior of ΔT ad . Measurements in different pulsed fields reveal that the first-order phase transition cannot follow the fast field changes as previously assumed, resulting in a distinct field-dependent hysteresis in ΔT ad .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The FM exchange is gradually enhanced in the EuTi 1-x Ni x O 3 (x = 0.05, 0.1) compounds. There are two successive magnetic transitions around liquid helium temperature, and exhibit a giant reversible magnetocaloric effect. The maximum values of magnetic entropy change are 41.9 and 45.5 J/kg K, and the refrigerating capacity were evaluated to be 336.5 and 359.5 J/kg for a field change of 5 T. Especially, for a field change of 1 T, the maximum value of magnetic entropy change is 13.7 J/kg K, the refrigerating capacity reach to 53.4 J/kg, and adiabatic temperature change is 4.1 K for EuTi 0.9 Ni 0.1 O 3 , respectively.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.As a new type of intelligent material with field-dependent properties, Magnetorheological Elastomer (MRE) is attracting more and more attention from domestic and foreign scholars. The MRE devices are expected to be used for vibration reduction in various systems. The requirements of MRE devices motivate the intensive investigations of MREs. The magnetic circuit design of MRE devices is necessary and the magnetic permeability is the premise to implement the design. In this paper, the permeability of MRE was calculated by finite element simulation and compared to the results of Maxwell-Garnet method. A simple chain-like structure of anisotropic MRE was modelled to study the influence of particle gap, particle content and external magnetic field on its permeability. Furthermore, the magnetic properties of MREs with same particle volume fraction and different curing field are tested by vibration sample magnetometer. The results are helpful in understanding the rheological mechanism of MREs, design and applications of MRE devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The defect formation energetics, electronic structure and ferromagnetic properties of carbon group IVA atoms (C, Si and Ge) doped zinc-blende ZnX (X = S, Se and Te) semiconductors are studied using first-principles density functional theory calculations by employing the full-potential linear augmented plane wave (FP-LAPW) method. The thermodynamics of doping carbon, silicon and germanium in the zinc chalcogenide semiconductors are examined for valid limits of the atomic chemical potentials of the atomic species. Our results reveal that some of the non-magnetic carbon group dopants are able to induce long range stable ferromagnetism in ZnX semiconductors. The calculated magnetic moment in the supercell structures are found to be dependent on the electronegativity difference and the bond length between the host and the dopant species. Spontaneous spin-polarization of the electronic structure of doped systems has been found to decrease with increasing hybridization of dopant's 2p/3p/4p states with the Zn-3d states. We show that the magnetic moments in the doped systems originate from the atomic like character of the localized p orbitals of the dopant atom which only loses its atomic character with increase in the charge transfer from Zn and chalcogen atoms to the carbon group dopant atoms.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The Mn 1.2 Fe 0.8 P 0.6 Si 0.4 B 0.05 alloys were prepared by ball milling and melt-spinning methods. The structure and magnetic characteristics of all samples were examined by X-ray diffraction, vibrating sample magnetometer and SEM. Results show that both the ribbon and bulk alloys can crystallize in a hexagonal Fe 2 P-type phase with some impurity phase. The lattice parameters, a and c, of Fe 2 P-type phase are 6.02960 Å 6.03033 Å and 3.42310 Å 3.44431 Å for ribbon and bulk Mn 1.2 Fe 0.8 P 0.6 Si 0.4 B 0.05 alloys, respectively. The Curie temperature increased by 20% from 165 K in bulk to 197 K in ribbon while thermal hysteresis and magnetic hysteresis decreased by 28% and 80% for ribbon sample, respectively. Moreover, the values of magnetic entropy change can be tuned from 15.7 J⋅kg −1 ⋅K −1 in bulk to 21.8 J⋅kg −1 ⋅K −1 in ribbon under 0–5 T, resulting in the effective refrigerant capacity (RCE) increasing from 238 to 286 J⋅kg −1 . The nature of the phase transitions was studied through the Arrott plots, indicating that the samples undergo first-order ferro-paramagnetic phase transitions. The origin of magnetic hysteresis losses is also discussed deeply. Furthermore, this alloys with large magnetic entropy change could be an interest potential for future magnetic refrigeration applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Effect of Tb content and diffusion parameters (diffusion temperature and time) on boundary structure and magnetic properties of Nd-Fe-B sintered magnet was systematically studied by grain boundary diffusion process (GBDP) using Pr 70− x Tb x Cu 15 Al 15 (x = 5, 10, 15, 20, atom fraction) alloys. When x increases from 5 at% to 15 at%, coercivities of diffused magnets increase from the original 11.9 kOe to 22.4 kOe for 5 at% magnet (PTCA-5) and 23.5 kOe for 15 at% magnet (PTCA-15), with a slight decrease in remanence. With x increasing to 20 at% (PTCA-20), coercivity of diffused magnet is only 0.6 kOe higher than that of PTCA-15 magnet, with sharp decrease in remanence. So, Tb content in Pr-Tb-Cu-Al alloy should be limited. And when diffusion temperature and time increase from 600 °C and 2 h to 950 °C and 8 h, coercivities of diffused magnet linearly increase first, and then reach stable. The enhancement mechanisms for magnetic properties contribute to magnetic hardening by Tb-rich shells, magnetic isolation by continuous Nd-rich grain boundary phases and reduced lattice misfit between Nd-rich phases and Nd 2 Fe 14 B grains. Furthermore, distribution of Tb-rich shells along diffusion length can be optimized by adjusting Tb content in diffusion sources and diffusion parameters, contributing to coercivity enhancement of magnet.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of cobalt ferrites nanoparticles prepared using three different processes (thermal decomposition, polyol and co-precipitation synthesis routes) are investigated by X-ray Absorption Spectroscopy and X-ray Magnetic Circular Dichroism. The repartition of cobalt and iron ions amongst the interstitial sites of the spinel structure is determined and correlated with their magnetic properties. The study reports on the influence of the synthesis method on the crystallographic order within a nanoparticle, and hence, on the magnetic anisotropy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this article, we investigate the magnetic and electronic properties of GaN doped with simple and double impurities utilizing Ab initio and Monte Carlo studies. We have predicted that (Ga, Cr)N and (Ga, Cr, V)N compounds exhibit ferromagnetic- and halfmetallic-behavior with 100% spin polarization at the Fermi level. Moreover, we have found that Ga 1−x Cr x N and Ga 1−2x Cr x V x N (x = 0.04, 0.05 and 0.06) show a second order ferromagnetic transition and that their T c is above room temperature. These predictions make (Ga, Cr)N and (Ga, Cr, V)N compounds strong candidates for spintronic technologies.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The ferromagnetism of VS 2 monolayers are studied by the extended Heisenberg J 1 -J 2 model with exchange anisotropy, inter-monolayer coupling J 3 and external magnetic field. With appropriate anisotropy strength and inter-monolayer coupling strength, the Curie point of monolayers can reach room temperature, which is consistent with experiments. The coercivity in our results are compared with the values in experiments at different temperatures. The coercivity for L = 3–5 monolayers are close to the experimental result at T = 50 K, but at T = 300 K the coercivity for L = 4–5 monolayers need larger anisotropy strength. Both the Curie point and coercivity are sensitive to the anisotropy strength and inter-monolayer coupling strength. The reasonable interaction strength between magnetic V-atoms, the exchange anisotropy and the inter-monolayer coupling strength are discussed by comparing our results with experiments. The small exchange anisotropy and large inter-monolayer exchange coupling for L > 1 monolayers may implies that the 1T-VS 2 is more stable for monolayers while the 2H-VS 2 is more stable for one monolayer near room temperature.© 2019 This paper describes the results of studies carried out on bulk amorphous materials with the chemical compositions: Fe 61+x Co 10−x Y 8 W 1 B 20 (where x = 0, 1 or 2). The alloy samples were produced in the form of plates with the following dimensions: 10 mm × 5 mm × 0.5 mm. Massive amorphous glass structures were produced by two methods: injection and suction casting. On the basis of the recorded X-ray diffraction patterns, only the disordered phase was identified within the volume of each alloy. The only exception was the alloy with the chemical composition: Fe 62 Co 9 Y 8 W 1 B 20 , produced by the injection method, in the volume of which an (insignificant) trace quantity of the Fe 5 Y phase was registered. The presence of this phase explains the lower value of the coercive field compared to the other alloys. The investigations confirmed the effect of the cobalt content on the coercive field value, and the Curie temperature, of the amorphous alloys. However, the cobalt content was not found to have a significant influence on the saturation of magnetisation. Also, the method of producing the investigated amorphous materials does not seem to have a significant effect on the magnetic properties of the resulting alloys.© 2019 We present an experimental observation of interfacial spin accumulation induced by anomalous Hall effect (AHE) in ferromagnets (FMs) in a multilayer structure of FM/YIG/Pt, where the direction of charge current injection in FM layer is perpendicular to the direction of voltage detection in Pt layer. In this structure, the magnon-mediated drag voltage (V drag ) due to the interfacial spin accumulation induced by AHE, can be unambiguously separated from spin Seebeck voltage (V SSE ) by sweeping or rotating the applied magnetic field. Field-dependent spin accumulation induced by AHE has been observed by comparison of nonlocal voltages between Ni/Cu/YIG/Pt and Pt/YIG/Pt samples. Furthermore, we demonstrate that the AHE voltage strongly depends on the spin polarization of conductivity and spin Hall angles of electrons with opposite spins in FMs. Our results show a prospect for FMs to be field-control spin generators via AHE, and provide a new viewpoint to realize the AHE.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present experimental intrinsic loss power (ILP) values, measured at an excitation frequency of 1 MHz and at relatively low field amplitudes of 3.4–9.9 kA/m, as a function of the mean core diameter, for selected magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs). The mean core sizes ranged from ca. 8 nm to 31 nm. Transmission electron microscopy indicated that those with smaller core sizes (less than ca. 22 nm) were single-core MNPs, while those with larger core sizes (ca. 29 nm to 31 nm) were multi-core MNPs. The ILP data showed a peak at core sizes of ca. 20 nm. We show here that this behaviour correlates well with the predicted ILP values obtained using either a non-interacting Debye model, or via dynamic Monte-Carlo simulations, the latter including core-core magnetic interactions for the multi-core particles. This alignment of the models is a consequence of the low field amplitudes used. We also present interesting results showing that the core-core interactions affect the ILP value differently depending on the mean core size.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We systematically study the electronic and magnetic properties of Zr 2 CoZ (Z = Al, Ga, In, Tl, Si, Ge, Sn, Pb) compounds by using the first-principle calculations, and further focus on exploring their exchange interactions and Curie temperatures. Results exhibit that Zr 2 CoGa, Zr 2 CoIn and Zr 2 CoTl compounds show a high spin polarization. Moreover, the Heisenberg calculations imply that the Zr(A)-Zr(B), Zr(A)-Zr(A) and Zr(A)-Co(C) exchanges in interactions significantly affect the Curie temperature. In contrast, the Zr(B)-Zr(B), Zr(B)-Co(C) and Co(C)-Co(C) exchanges almost are limited to 15 meV in all cases. Based on these calculated exchange coupling parameters, Curie temperatures are evaluated by adopting the mean field approximation and Monte Carlo simulation, it is found that the Curie temperatures of Zr 2 CoZ (Z = Al, Ga, In, Tl, Sn, Pb) are noticeably higher than room temperature, indicating that they are promising candidates for spintronics applications.© 2018 Magnetostatic field calculations in micromagnetic simulations can be numerically expensive, particularly in the case of large-scale finite element simulations. The established finite element/boundary element method (FEM/BEM) by Fredkin and Koehler (1990) involves a densely populated matrix with unacceptable numerical costs for problems with a large number of degrees of freedom N. By using hierarchical matrices of H 2 type, we show that the memory requirements of this FEM/BEM method can be reduced dramatically, effectively converting the quadratic complexity O(N 2 ) of the problem to a linear one O(N). We obtain matrix size reductions of nearly 99% in test cases with more than 10 6 degrees of freedom, and we test the computed magnetostatic energy values by means of comparison with analytic values. The efficiency of the H 2 -matrix compression opens the way to large-scale magnetostatic field calculations in micromagnetic modeling, all while preserving the accuracy of the established FEM/BEM formalism.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Geometrical frustration arised in spin ices leads to fascinating emergent physical properties. Nowadays there is a wide diversity of the artificial structures, mimicking spin ice at the nanoscale and demonstrating some new effects. Most of the nanoscaled spin ices are two dimensional. Ferromagnetic inverse opal-like structures (IOLS) are among inspiring examples of the three-dimensional system exhibiting spin ice behaviour. However, a detailed examination of its properties is not straightforward. An experimental technique which is able to unambiguously recover magnetization distribution in 3D mesoscaled structures is lacking. In this work, we used an approach based on complementary exploiting of small-angle neutron diffraction technique and micromagnetic simulations. An external magnetic field was applied along three main directions of the IOLS mesostructure. Comparison of the calculated and measured data allowed us to determine IOLS magnetic state. The results are in good agreement with the spin ice model. Moreover influence of the demagnetizing field and vortex states on the magnetizing process were revealed. Additionally, we speculate that this approach can be also applied to other 3D magnetic mesostructures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The optimization of the magnetic energy of nanowires assembly is a delicate balance between the magnetic properties of each nanowire, their organization and their density inside the bulk assembly. As a matter of fact, from the simulation point of view, a dense packed structure of Co nanowires with high magnetocrystalline anisotropy and perfect alignment is the best solution to obtain a high magnetic energy and thus a powerful rare earth free permanent magnet. However, experiments have been shown that this is not a trivial task since the misalignment of nanowires inexorably occurs and likely reduces (more than expected) the magnetic properties of the final nanostructured assembly. Experiments also suggest that when the hardness and/or relative density (%) of the ensemble increases, the magnetic properties decreases casting the seeds of doubt on the realistic possibility of using these sintered materials in a new rare earth technology. Inside this frame, we report here the effect of a realistic misalignment reproducing the one observed experimentally inside the nanowires assembly. We show how, dipolar interactions and macroscopic shape contribute in different ways to destroy the magnetic energy of the bulk nanostructured material. However, we report the critical percentage of misalignment and disorder still affordable to keep the magnetic properties of the bulk material. We also demonstrate that these nanostructured materials can be interesting for their high macroscopic magnetic anisotropy. Last but not least, we show that the macroscopic shape of the nanowires assemblies presents very different critical sensibility to the misalignment/disorder of the arrangement. In particular, we report how a bi-dimensional arrangement of nanowires can be more magnetically stable compared to the tri-dimensional one. All these results give insights on the future strategies to optimize the magnetic properties of cobalt-based nanostructured material.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The patterning of the CoPd films was performed by the deposition of the Co/Pd multilayers on the nanoperforated templates of anodic aluminum oxide (AAO). We observed that the morphology of aluminum oxide is represented by the hexagonal packed hemispherical wells with a pore in the middle. The morphology of the patterned films follows the features of the initial templates; the magnetic material is deposited mainly in the regions between the pores and on their perimeter. The Co atoms diffuse into the Pd layer already during the film deposition, and discontinuous interfaces of Co and Pd are formed leading to the creation of the CoPd solid solution. The out-of-plane hysteresis loops of the nanoporous films exhibited high values of the coercive field (H C = 2.0–3.6 kOe) and squareness ratio (Mr/M S = 0.7–0.8). This indicates that the nanoporous films retain the perpendicular magnetic anisotropy observed for continuous film. Deteriorated values of effective anisotropy constant K eff for the porous films with respect to the continuous film are explained by the complex morphology of the nanoporous films, which leads to partial deviation of magnetic moments from the direction normal to the sample plane. On the other hand the increase of the values of the coercive field H C of the nanoporous films in comparison to the continuous films is related to the pinning of the magnetic moments on the nanopores. We observed the transition of the magnetization reversal mechanism from the domain wall motion observed for the continuous film, to coherent rotation mode for the nanoporous films. We show that this approach allows us to tune the coercive field H C and the effective magnetic anisotropy constant K eff of the CoPd film by engineering the pore size of the templates.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The structure and magnetic properties of polycrystalline BiFeO 3 films grown on glass substrate using Sol-Gel technique have been investigated. X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis revealed the average grain size of about 21 nm. The root mean square (RMS) surface roughness of about 50 nm has been obtained for the film by using scanning electron microscope (SEM) technique. Ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) studies showed the presence of macroscopic ferromagnetic magnetization and uniaxial out-of-plane magnetic anisotropy. The temperature dependences of the magnetization of BiFeO 3 films registered in zero field cooling (ZFC) and field cooling (FC) regimes revealed a spin glass state. The average magnetic crystallite sizes obtained from the magnetizations studies coincide with the values revealed from the structural studies.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. In this study, we report that perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) in Co/Pt multilayers can be achieved by using hcp-Ho(1 0 0) as the seed layer after annealing at 400 °C. M-H hysteresis loops show that the annealing duration required to achieve optimal PMA in Co/Pt multilayers increases monotonically with the Ho seed layer thickness. XRD measurements reveal that Ho transits from amorphous state to hcp structure after annealing at 400 °C, leading to the formation of fcc-Co/Pt(1 1 1). A larger retention of saturation magnetization is also observed when Ho is used as the seed layer as compared to Ru or Pt, which is ascribed to the suppression of interlayer diffusion. This can be attributed to the large grain size of Ho based on the full-width-half-maximum (FWHM) of the Ho peak from XRD results. Synthetic antiferromagnetic (SAF) structures using Ho as a seed layer also demonstrated an exchange coupling strength of J ex ≈ 1.05 erg/cm 2 when the thickness of the Ru coupling layer is 0.4 nm.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We consider the competition of magnetic and charge ordering in high-Tc cuprates within the framework of the simplified static 2D spin-pseudospin model. This model is equivalent to the 2D dilute antiferromagnetic (AFM) Ising model with charged impurities. We present the mean-field results for the system under study and make a brief comparison with classical Monte Carlo (MC) calculations. Numerical simulations show that the cases of strong exchange and strong charge correlation differ qualitatively. For a strong exchange, the AFM phase is unstable with respect to the phase separation (PS) into the charge and spin subsystems, which behave like immiscible quantum liquids. An analytical expression was obtained for the PS temperature.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We report the effect of substituting Co for a metalloid element on the glass formation, thermal properties, and magnetic behaviors of Fe 80 Co x B 14− x Si 2 P 3 Cu 1 (x = 0, 2, 4, 6) alloy ribbons. The addition of Co decreased the thermal stability of the alloy against crystallization and expanded the heat treatment temperature region of this alloy family. Fe 80 Co 4 B 10 Si 2 P 3 Cu 1 alloy, which was annealed under optimal conditions, exhibited good soft magnetic performance that was characterized by a high saturation magnetic flux density of 1.84 T, a high effective magnetic conductivity of 12,601 at 1000 Hz, a low coercivity of 5.3 A/m, and a low core loss of 62 W/kg at 1000 Hz and 1.5 T.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We present results from a study on the influence of the preparation technique on the structural and magnetic properties of Ba 0.5 Sr 1.5 Zn 2 Fe 12 O 22 powders synthesized by citric-acid sol-gel auto-combustion and sonochemistry and characterized by X-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy and magnetic measurements. Two magnetic intermediate phases were observed at room temperature in magnetic fields of moderate strength. Metamagnetic phase transitions were observed in an ac magnetic field. Their temperature increased with the magnetic field amplitude.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. A simple way to synthesise biocompatible superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles coated with ascorbic acid, tartaric acid and a mixture of ascorbic acid and tartaric acid is proposed. The iron oxide nanoparticles were synthesized and coated with the surfactants in one step by co-precipitation method at room temperature in air atmosphere. The samples have the characteristic (2 2 0), (3 1 1), (4 0 0), (4 2 2), (5 1 1), (4 4 0) peaks of cubic spinel structure of iron oxide. Fourier Transform Infrared Spectroscopy analysis revealed that the nanoparticles were coated with the surfactants. The mean physical sizes of core obtained from the transmission electron microscopy images were 7 ± 2 nm. Magnetic measurements by vibrating sample magnetometer indicate that all samples are superparamagnetic at room temperature. And, the saturation magnetization, M s of coated nanoparticles was around 62 emu/g. The effectiveness of the coating on the surface of nanoparticles against oxidation is also an important parameter. The coating agents successfully protected the core against oxidation since the M s stayed almost stable (∼62) emu/g by 12 weeks and then decreased to ∼57 emu/g by 48 weeks. It can be concluded that coated superparamagnetic nanoparticles have high saturation magnetization and high stability against oxidation. Furthermore, the MTT assays were also carried out for cytotoxicity of various concentration of coated nanoparticles by using Hep3B, Saos-2 and HUVEC cell lines. From the MTT assay results, it is observed that the coated nanoparticles are non-toxic for all types of cells investigated and therefore can be biocompatible for potential biomedical applications.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We present results of theoretical study of magnetorheological effect in ferrogels with magnetizable spherical particles chaotically distributed in a current gel. To avoid intuitive constructions with uncontrolled accuracy and adequacy, the analysis is done in the frames of the mathematically regular pair approximation. Our results demonstrate non monotonic increase of the composite shear modulus with the applied magnetic field. This effect is stronger for the systems with the soft gel, than for the relatively rigid ones.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We present a computational study of the compound YCo 1-x-y Fe x Cu y 5 for 0 ⩽x,y⩽0.2. This compound was chosen as a prototype for investigating the cell boundary phase believed to play a key role in establishing the high coercivity of commercial Sm-Co 2:17 magnets. Using density-functional theory, we have calculated the magnetization and magnetocrystalline anisotropy at zero temperature for a range of compositions, modeling the doped compounds within the coherent potential approximation. We have also performed finite temperature calculations for YCo 5 , YCo 0.838 Cu 0.162 5 and YCo 0.838 Fe 0.081 Cu 0.081 5 within the disordered local moment picture. Our calculations find that substituting Co with small amounts of either Fe or Cu boosts the magnetocrystalline anisotropy K, but the change in K depends strongly on the location of the dopants. Furthermore, the calculations do not show a particularly large difference between the magnetic properties of Cu-rich YCo 0.838 Cu 0.162 5 and equal Fe-Cu YCo 0.838 Fe 0.081 Cu 0.081 5 , despite these two compositions showing different coercivity behavior when found in the cell boundary phase of 2:17 magnets. Our study lays the groundwork for studying the rare earth contribution to the anisotropy ofSmCo 1-x-y Fe x Cu y 5 , and also shows how a small amount of transition metal substitution can boost the anisotropy field of YCo 5 .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Perpendicular magnetic tunnel junctions (p-MTJs) attract great interest because of their excellent performance in spin-transfer-torque magnetic random access memories (STT-MRAMs). The annealing process is critical to achieve the required structural and magnetic properties, therefore obtaining high perpendicular tunneling magnetoresistance (p-TMR) and lower switching current. In this work, the CoFeB/MgO/CoFeB-based p-TMR stack was prepared and a high p-TMR value of 155.9% was obtained from CIPT. The p-MTJs were patterned with pillar sizes ranging from 50 nm to 1000 nm and were annealed upon different annealing temperatures (T A ) of 300 and 340 °C. The resistance at parallel (R P ) and antiparallel (R AP ) state in p-MTJs was obtained upon the application of a ±30 mT perpendicular magnetic field, where the angle of magnetization between storage and reference layer at memory state, θ P and θ AP , were derived from the P and AP resistance ratios with and without magnetic field. The condition θ P = θ AP of about 63.5° was found in as-deposited samples, indicating a ferromagnetic interlayer coupling between storage and reference layers, where θ P = 0° and θ AP = 180° at T A = 300 °C and 340 °C demonstrate a stable memory state. The stability of the resistance state was modeled by considering the evolution of effective perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (K eff ) and interlayer coupling constant (J), showing a method to evaluate the ratio of K eff /J via the memory state resistance characterization, where the K eff /J of about −1.26 was obtained in our as-deposited samples. Our study assesses the effect of T A on the θ P and θ AP and supplies the method to enhance the stability through the optimization of perpendicular magnetic anisotropy and interlayer coupling, so to better control the performance of p-MTJ-based STT-MRAMs.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Ensuring a reliable reference in magnetoresistive devices requires robust exchange biased antiferromagnetic/ferromagnetic (AF/FM) bilayers with strong resilience to high temperatures. In this work, we studied the thermal stability of MnPt and MnIr by investigating the exchange bias effect in AF/CoFe bilayers and tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) full stacks. In bilayers, the obtained blocking temperature (T b ) of 380 °C for MnPt is higher than T b of 340 °C for MnIr, indicating a better thermal stability. Based on Malozemoff's model, we developed a comprehensive model to describe the exchange bias field (H ex ) behavior at high temperature by considering the T b distribution and temperature dependence of FM magnetization, giving a good agreement with the experimental data. With increasing temperature, a coercivity (H c ) enhancement peak was observed in MnIr bilayer, which shows a good agreement with T b distribution. This evidences the H c peak is dominated by the thermal activation of AF grains, indicating that the H c peak only appears at T b center , which is lower than overall T b . The structural properties and grain size of AF layers were studied by X-ray diffraction (XRD), where a mean grain size of 10.6 and 12.6 nm were obtained for MnPt and MnIr, respectively. Compared to bilayers, a more stable thermal behavior was observed in full stacks. In conclusions, our study compared the thermal stability of exchange bias coupling using MnPt and MnIr and developed a comprehensive model to study their temperature dependence. This proposed approach can be used for theoretical studies and experimental designs of AF-based materials for spintronic applications, such as magnetoresistive devices and high density memories.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We present the results of neutron diffraction studies on polycrystals of a metallic kagome lattice, Tb 3 Ru 4 Al 12 , reported recently to undergo reentrant magnetism, with the onset of long range antiferromagnetic order below (T N = 22 K) and spin-glass features below about 17 K. The present results reveal long-range antiferromagnetic order of an incommensurate type with the moments oriented along c-axis at all temperatures below T N . There are however notable changes in the T-dependence of propagation vector along b-axis across 17 K. An observation of interest is that there is no decrease of intensity of magnetic Bragg peaks on entrance into the glassy phase (that is, below 17 K). This finding suggests that the magnetism of this compound is an exotic one.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Magnetic transport properties in Co 2 MnSn/IrMn/Pt trilayer structures have been investigated. Spin Hall magnetoresistance (SMR) enhancement in the trilayer structures has been observed, under the premise of exclusion current shunting effect. The experimental analysis indicates that the SMR enhancement may be closely related to the spin current enhancement reflected from the Co 2 MnSn/IrMn interface. Anomalous Hall resistance (AHR) study shows that its variation is quite similar to the SMR, suggesting that the SMR enhancement may also be closely related to spin-orbit coupled (SOC) scattering at the interface due to the coupling between IrMn and Co 2 MnSn layer. Temperature influences the SMR significantly in the trilayer structures at low IrMn thicknesses, which the IrMn has more ferromagnetic or ferrimagnetic orders than antiferromagnetic order. It indicates that the physical mechanism of the influencing of temperature on SMR of FM/AFI(AFM)/Pt trilayer structures need to be further investigated. The SMR changes its sign from positive to negative at temperatures lower than 50 K, revealing that spin-flop coupling between IrMn and Co 2 MnSn could happen at the interface.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. First principles calculations have been carried out to investigate the structural, magnetic and electronic properties of the multiferroic manganite TbMnO 3 with and without Ca doping. For pure TbMnO 3 , results show that spiral-spin antiferromagnetic ordering is energetically found favorable. The presence of Ca doping at the manganite Tb 1−x Ca x MnO 3 with x = 0.25, 0.5 and 0.75 directly affects the Mn ordering. For x ≤ 0.5, the ferromagnetic ordering is most favored. While for x = 0.75, the most stable magnetic configuration is antiferromagnetic arrangement. It is found that the decrease in the intensity of the ferromagnetic double-exchange interaction has been correlated with the increase in the Ca content and the Mn-O-Mn bond angle.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The effect of a giant magnetic resistivity in a magneto-ordered Co/Cu/Co sandwich is experimentally investigated and theoretically analyzed using a phenomenological approach (resistor and two-current models). It is shown that for the boundary values of the thickness d m 2 of the covering (upper) magnetic layer compared to the thickness d m 1 of the base (lower) magnetic layer, the effect is negligibly small. In performing the inequality d m 2 « d m 1 , the resistance of the covering layer is shunted by the resistance of the base layer, while when the opposite inequality d m 2 ≫ d m 1 is performed, the contrasting situation is observed, namely: the resistance of the coating layer shunts (shunted) the resistance of the base magnetic layer. If the thicknesses of the magnetic layers are of the same size (d m 2 –d m 1 ), the shunting effect is absent, and the magnitude of the giant magnetoresistance reaches its maximum value. According to the results of an experimental study of this effect, the method for calculating the bulk asymmetry parameter in the scattering of spin-polarized electrons and the resistivity of the minority electrons is proposed for the first time, assuming that the resistivity of the spin channel of the majority charge carriers coincides with the resistivity of the nonmagnetic layer.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.An influence of corrosion action based on choline chloride ionic liquids on magnetic properties of various grades of stainless steels has been studied. OL44, OL52, S.4571, Monel 400 and Uranus B6 stainless steels were exposured by action of ChCl-Oxalic Acid (1:0.5) M and ChCl-Malonic Acid (1:2) M solutions at 80 °C during 1 month. The temperature dependences of the specific magnetization before and after corrosion action were studied by ponderomotive method in 0.86 T magnetic field in the temperature range of 77–1000 K. Comparative analysis of temperature dependence of specific magnetization before and after ionic liquids exposure confirmed a high corrosion resistance of magnetic characteristics of the investigated stainless steels under conditions of long-term contact with based on choline chloride ionic liquids at 80 °C. Images obtained with an metallographic microscope showed a surface of the steel in an initial state contains defects which become centers of pointed corrosion. Corrosion resistance of stainless steels in contact with solutions based on choline chloride ionic liquids at moderate temperatures is satisfactory for a practical application of these materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Two series of NdNiO 3 /NdMnO 3 heterostructures, S1 and S2, have been deposited respectively on [(LaAlO 3 ) 0.3 (Sr 2 AlTaO 6 ) 0.7 ] and SrTiO 3 single crystals (1 0 0) by pulsed laser deposition method. Here, the constituent materials are both antiferromagnetic at ground state. The number of layers n for each material has been varied from 1 to 4 in order to study the effects on the magnetic properties of these heterostructures. In spite of antiferromagnetic constituent materials, ferromagnetic interactions take place between Mn and Ni ions at the interface and caused magnetic hysteresis for all the heterostructures. In addition to the interfacial ferromagnetic interactions, a negative exchange bias is also realized in both the series. The largest exchange bias is observed at 25 K, which again enhances with an increase in n. The exchange bias decreases with increasing temperature and it vanishes above 90 K in both the series. In addition to exchange bias, a vertical shift in the magnetic hysteresis loop is observed, which varies depending on interfacial area in the heterostructures and the temperature. Our experimental results clearly demonstrate that the exchange bias and the vertical shift of magnetic hysteresis of these heterostructures can be tuned by interface engineering.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The structural and magnetic properties of DyFe 12−x Ta x compounds (with x = 0.5, 0.6, 0.65 and 0.7) have been investigated in detail using dc magnetization, differential scanning calorimetry, Mössbauer effect spectroscopy (5–300 K) and high-resolution synchrotron x-ray diffraction (10–700 K). The easy magnetization directions at room temperature are along the c-axis. With decreasing temperature, the magneto-crystalline anisotropy changes from easy axis at room temperature to easy cone at T sr 2 for all compounds, then to easy plane at T sr 1 . Both T sr 1 and T sr 2 change significantly over the ranges 158–216 K and 239–259 K with increasing Ta content (x = 0.5–0.7) respectively, while the Curie temperature is found to remain essentially unchanged with a value of ∼540 K. Pronounced magneto volume effects have been detected at the Curie temperature while no clear anomalies are observed around the spin reorientation temperatures. Large spontaneous magnetostriction has been detected below T C for all of the compounds.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The effect of hot deformation parameters on the magnetic properties of Mn51Al47C2 (at%) alloy was investigated. The hysteresis loops of cylindrical samples hot compressed to 50% of initial height at temperatures of 600 °C, 650 °C and 700 °C with strain rates 0.001 S −1 and 0.1 S −1 were obtained by means of vibrating sample magnetometer. In order to find the effect of strain on the magnetic properties, hot compressed samples to 30%, 45%, 60% and 75% in a specific temperature and strain rate were investigated. It was found that by increasing strain and strain rate, the coercivity increases and the highest coercivity gained at the temperature of 650 °C. Moreover, by further straining, the developed texture changed and higher remanent magnetization was obtained in axial direction for lower strains and in radial direction for higher strains.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.An alternate method of measuring anisotropy fields in thin film ferromagnets is demonstrated. The method relies on the magnetic susceptibility in a small a.c. magnetic field, measured in situ using the magneto-optic Kerr effect (MOKE), and will be useful in situations where more specialized apparatus are not conveniently available, or constraints discourage the use of a large, static magnetic field. The method is demonstrated for Co/W(1 1 0) films, where it yields anisotropy fields in agreement with previous studies using more conventional torque magnetometry. The sensitivity of the method is demonstrated using CoO/Co/W(1 1 0) bilayer films, where the anisotropy due to interfacial exchange coupling is detected and used to find the Néel temperature of the thin CoO layer.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Future development of spintronic devices urgently requires an advanced control method of spin current. Combining graphene with other various characteristic two-dimensional crystals in different ways can produce a new class of functional materials, which offers a unique platform for spintronics. A specific van der Waals heterostructure consisting of graphene and hexagonal boron nitride (h-BN) as the barrier layer in magnetic tunnel junctions (MTJs) is proposed in this paper. This heterostructure device combines the strong spin filtering effect of graphene/ferromagnet interface and the resonant tunneling effect of graphene/h-BN/graphene van der Waals heterostructure. We demonstrate an effective approach to control spin current based on the bias tunability of the spin resonance tunneling transport. Theoretical research unambiguously reveals that spin resonance appears when the electronic spectra of spin electron in two graphene layers are aligned, which results in a large magnetoresistance and negative differential resistance in the device. The efficient bias controllability of spin current, combined with the excellent magnetoresistance behavior, can be the key building blocks in future spin-based magnetic detection and high-frequency logic devices.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The spontaneous polarization has been found out in solid solutions of barium ferrites partially substituted with In, Al, Ga and Sc ions that is an evidence of their ferroelectric properties. For explanation reasons of appearance ferroelectric properties in these materials have been investigated features of crystal and magnetic structures with using X-ray and neutron time-of-flight diffraction methods in a wide temperature range. The crystal structure of barium ferrites has been refined in the frameworks of centrosymmetric P6 3 /mmc (No. 194) and non- centrosymmetric P6 3 mc (No. 186) space groups. According to analysis of neutron patterns, the distortion of oxygen octahedrons (tetrahedrons and trigonal-bipyramids) has been observed in unit cells both space groups. It was shown that a key role in appearance of spontaneous polarization can be associated with the absence of inversion center in unit cell.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The evolution of crystalline and magnetic structures of Ba 2 FeMoO 6 in a wide temperature range (20–473 K) has been investigated by time-of-flight neutron diffraction method. Analysis of the bond lengths showed that the phase transition of Ba 2 FeMoO 6 compound from cubic (Fm-3 m) to tetragonal (I4/mmm) structure is accompanied by distortions (∼1%) of oxygen octahedrons BO 6 . The magnetoresistance of Ba 2 FeMoO 6 has been measured in a wide range of temperatures and magnetic fields. The field dependence of magnetoresistance is demonstrative for systems with weighty contribution of the intergrain conduction.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Grain boundary diffusion process (GBDP) with low melting-point alloy ribbons, namely Pr 70 Cu 15 Al 15 (PCA), Pr 65 Tb 5 Cu 15 Al 15 (PTCA-5) and Pr 50 Tb 20 Cu 15 Al 15 (PTCA-20, at%), was applied to Nd-Fe-B sintered magnet (52 M) as thick as 6 mm. The coercivities of diffused magnets by PCA, PTCA-5 and PTCA-20 increase significantly to 19.6 kOe, 24.1 kOe and 24.3 kOe, respectively, from original 14.7 kOe. Microstructural investigations indicate that the coercivity enhancement of PCA magnet is mainly attributed to magnetic isolation by continuous Nd-rich grain boundary phases (GBP). However, the coercivity enhancement of PTCA-20 magnet is mainly owing to magnetic hardening by Tb-rich shells (TRS), and that of PTCA-5 magnet results from a combined strengthening of magnetic isolation by GBP and magnetic hardening by TRS. Meanwhile, the coercivity of PTCA-5 magnet is as high as that of PTCA-20 magnet, but the former consumes Tb only 0.60 wt%, lower than 1.23 wt% for the latter.© 2019 Elsevier LtdRF Schottky Barrier Diode (SBD) device can be compatible with deep submicron CMOS process, which is a research edge-cutting technology in the field of microelectronics. An accurate device model is highly required by the relevant circuit simulation work. In this paper, a macro device model of SBD in 22 nm CMOS node is developed based on the actual device structure. To increase its accuracy, a novel iterative algorithm is employed during the model parameter extraction. The simulation results are consistent with experimental data in frequency range from 10 MHz to 10 GHz, indicating that the developed SBD model can accurately reflect the DC and RF characteristics of the 22 nm device. Moreover, the application of the developed RF SBD device model is verified based on RF energy harvesting circuit in terms of the output voltage and efficiency, showing the feasibility of the developed SBD model in RF integrated circuit.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The structural and critical exponent analysis along with the universal behavior of the magnetocaloric effect in nano-crystalline La 0.7 Ca 0.3 Mn 1−x Ni x O 3 (x = 0.0, 0.02, 0.07, 0.10), manganites, exhibiting second order phase transition, are experimentally studied. Structural study using Rietveld refinement of X-ray diffraction patterns shows orthorhombic structure with Pnma space group. The Curie temperature could be tuned over a wide temperature range upon variation in the Ni 2+ content. The nature of the transition was found to be of second order for all Ni 2+ -concentrations. Various techniques such as modified Arrott plots, Kouvel-Fisher method and critical isotherm were used to analyze the magnetic-field dependence of magnetization. Although the critical exponents beta (β), gamma (γ) and delta (δ) were analyzed with various theoretical models such as 3D-Ising model and 3D-Heisenberg model, the estimated critical exponents, obtained for different values of X, seemed to be consistent with those predicted by the mean-field theory. The critical exponents were further confirmed using the single scaling equation M(H,ε) = ε β f ± (H/ε γ+β ). The achieved results indicated that the obtained values of the critical exponents were reliable and reasonably accurate.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A macroscopic single crystal of γ II -Li 2 FeSiO 4 has been grown by means of the high-pressure optical floating-zone technique. Static magnetic susceptibility χ implies that the tetrahedrally-coordinated Fe 2+ ions are in the high-spin, S=2, state. While a sharp decrease in χ implies long-range antiferromagnetic order below T N =17.0(5)K, the presence of a broad maximum at T m =28K suggests quasi-low-dimensional magnetism. Applying magnetic fields along the easy magnetic a-axis yields additional contributions to the susceptibility ∂M/∂B and magnetostriction for B>7T, and an anomaly at B≈14.8T.© 2019 FeGa/Mn film were fabricated on Si (0 0 1) substrates by pulsed laser deposition system at room temperature. The static and dynamic magnetic properties of FeGa/Mn (Fe 80 Ga 20 /Mn) film were examined to tailor their magnetic softness, magnetization, low temperature magnetic characteristic and ferromagnetic resonance properties. The alternate number of FeGa/Mn was kept constant, and the frequency of pulsed laser was increased (with decreasing the number of alternating layers) to assess the role of decreasing interfaces structure change in these magnetic heterostructures. Tuning the deposition frequency of Mn at 3 Hz, the film showed excellent soft magnetic property and the element ratio of Fe, Mn and Ga was close to 2:1:1, which was consistent with the Heusler alloy phase. When the Mn deposition frequency were 1 Hz and 5 Hz, the samples showed obvious FM/AFM mixing at low temperatures. The tenability of these magnetic multilayer films make them good candidates for RF magnetic applications with strong magnetoelastic coupling and shape memory character.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. Typical exchange spring magnets are composed of two phases, a rare-earth hard magnetic material and a metallic soft magnetic material, whose magnetization value is higher than those of hard magnetic phases, such as α-Fe, Fe-B, or Fe-Co. A novel high-electrical-resistance composite magnet was fabricated by consolidating micron-sized ferromagnetic nitride Sm 2 Fe 17 N 3 powder particles coated with a continuous nano-sized soft magnetic ferrite oxide layer, which suppressed intergrain conductivity but sustained the magnetic exchange interactions between grains [21]. A non-magnetic resin or ceramic insulator may suffice for the coated layer but gives rise to high electrical resistance of the magnet with large deterioration of magnetization. The soft magnetic ferrite oxide layer not only suppressed intergrain conductivity, but also only slightly reduced the magnetization of the magnet. At present, the only exchange spring magnet having a combination of a soft magnetic oxide and hard magnetic nitride is the ferrite/Sm 2 Fe 17 N 3 composite magnet. Sm 2 Fe 17 N 3 powder particles with a size of 2 μm were coated with an “iron ferrite” layer with a grain size of about 10 nm by ferrite plating, which is an aqueous process, following which the samples were consolidated by the explosive consolidation (EC) technique. The coercivity and rectangularity of the ferrite/Sm 2 Fe 17 N 3 composite magnet decreased slightly compared to those of a Sm 2 Fe 17 N 3 magnet. The fully dense ferrite/Sm 2 Fe 17 N 3 magnet exhibited a resistivity of about 4000 μΩ cm, which is ten times larger than that of a fully dense Sm 2 Fe 17 N 3 magnet. Thus, the soft magnetic ferrite layer in the composite magnet maintained the magnetic exchange coupling between ferromagnetic Sm 2 Fe 17 N 3 grains and simultaneously suppressed intergrain electrical coupling to increase the resistivity. This decreased the eddy current loss and improved the high-frequency characteristics of the composite magnets. Therefore, ferrite/Sm 2 Fe 17 N 3 composites are promising materials for magnets that are operated at high frequencies in advanced applications, such as electric vehicle magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic hyperthermia for cancer treatment has gained significant attention in recent years, due to its biocompatibility of applied nanoparticles and the possibility for spatially localized heating in deep tissues. Clinical treatments use nanoparticle concentrations of 112 mg Fe/mL, while the concentrations experimental studies have addressed are considerably smaller, usually between 0.1 and 30 mg/mL. Therefore, it is not clear whether such experiments correspond to the magnetic properties found in clinical applications. In this regard, we studied the thermal behavior of superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPION) with the most common particle shapes used in the field, including spherical (core diameters 11 and 19 nm), cubic (15 nm) and ellipsoidal (23 nm with an aspect ratio of 1.45), at concentrations ranging from 5 to 80 mg Fe/mL. Their shape, size, crystallinity, magnetic, and thermal behavior were characterized via transmission electron microscopy, dynamic light scattering, Taylor dispersion analysis, X-ray diffraction, alternating gradient magnetometry, and lock-in thermography. Spherical and cubic nanoparticles displayed linear heating slopes, independent from size, shape and concentration, resulting in unchanged specific absorption rates (SAR). Ellipsoids showed the same behavior until 50 mg/mL, above which a decreasing heating slope trend was found, without evidence as to what causes this behavior. However, the presented results highlight the importance of colloidally stable SPIONs in magnetic hyperthermia to obtain maximum heating power by minimum particle dosage.© 2019 Elsevier Ltd In this study, we have demonstrated 3D fin-structured channel Silicon-On-Insulator (SOI) tunneling field effect transistor (TFET) to enhance transistor on-current (I on ) by reducing leakage current and enhancing gate controllability. By comparing with planar TFET, the subthreshold swing (S.S) value is apparently reduced by ∼20 mV/dec with increased I on using fin-typed TFET. Moreover, we have investigated impact of the interfacial layer (IL) modulation on the electrical characteristics of each planar TFET and fin-typed TFET, where IL modulation was performed by adopting modified chemical oxide as well as interface treatment. The IL modulation is substantial on the fin-typed TFET in terms of off leakage current (I off ) as well as threshold voltage instability (ΔV th ) against electrical stress, indicating 3D channel is more sensitive to interface condition. Our results suggest that alternative 3D structure with an appropriate interface treatment might be beneficial to attain better I on while keeping lower S.S and I off .© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We adopted sodium silicate to prepare composites of La(Fe, Si) 13 hydrides in this work. A homogenous and continuous matrix of sodium silicate was formed at a relatively low solidification temperature. No counter diffusion between the matrix and the grains of La(Fe, Si) 13 hydrides was observed. The magnetocaloric effect of pure La(Fe, Si) 13 hydrides is largely preserved in the composites, showing a high tolerance to sodium silicate. These composites possess high thermal conductivity and decent compressive strength compared with the epoxy resin bonded samples. These results suggest that sodium silicate is a promising binder material for producing bulk La(Fe, Si) 13 hydrides for their application in magnetic refrigeration.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.The magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in multiplayer graphene flakes was for the first time detected at deferent temperatures. When the magnetic field induction varied from 0 to 1.0 T, the MCE was positive. The MCE field dependence has a linear character. At 298 K, the MCE is equal to 0.01 K. Graphene samples prepared in different manner were characterized by different degree of structural imperfection. It was established that the MCE increases as the content of surface defects in graphene increases. Graphene samples obtained by different methods and having different degree of structural imperfection have different heat capacities.© 2019 Elsevier Ltd Artificial Intelligence (AI) applications are developing at a high rate, facing soon a tremendous energy challenge. In this context, the original Axon-Hillock (AH) Artificial Neuron (AN) has been optimized to achieve ultra-low power (ULP) consumption. The membrane capacitance was taken out, and in order to drastically reduce its power consumption, the (feedback) capacitance is lowered to 5 fF, the transistors gate width is reduced to 120 nm and the supply voltage is decreased to as low as 200 mV. Designed and fabricated using 65 nm CMOS Technology, the refined AH neuron features a standby power of 11 pW, and when excited, a power consumption that does not exceed 30 pW for a firing frequency of 15.6 kHz. Its energy efficiency per spike is lower than 2 fJ/spike when the DC power is included (around 1 fJ/spike excluding the DC power), for an area of 31 µm 2 . These performance confer to this ULP AH neuron a high potential for future development of highly energy efficient Spiking Neural Networks, required to design future neuroprocessors embedded in various applications (smart visual sensors for autonomous vehicles, robotics).© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The present study is focused on the influence of Ti and Gd doping at the Ga site on the microstructure, magnetic and mechanical properties of the polycrystalline Ni 50 Mn 25 Ga 20-x Z x (x = 0 or 5, Z = Gd, Ti) magnetic shape memory alloys. Microstructure investigations show that reference Ni 50 Mn 25 Ga 25 and Ti-doped alloys, both in the as-cast and annealed state, are single phase materials, whereas Gd-doped sample reveals dendritic dual-phase structure with substantial distinction between Gd-rich and Gd-poor regions. Thermomagnetic measurements expose reversible martensitic transition in the Ni 50 Mn 25 Ga 25 and Ni 50 Mn 25 Ga 20 Ti 5 alloys, where Ti addition to NiMnGa composition leads to the decrease of phase transformation temperature from T M = 193 K for reference sample to T M = 172.5 K for Ti-doped material. Furthermore, the Ni 50 Mn 25 Ga 20 Gd 5 alloy does not experience fully martensitic transition. Temperatures of magnetic transformation also varies with chemical composition and equals to 379 K, 318 K and 370 K for the annealed Ni 50 Mn 25 Ga 25 , Ni 50 Mn 25 Ga 20 Ti 5 and Ni 50 Mn 25 Ga 20 Gd 5 alloy, respectively. Mechanical properties investigation based on the nanoindentation measurements shows beneficial influence of doping elements on material hardness. In addition, planar distributions of hardness allow to deconvolute mechanical properties of each individual phase of the Ni 50 Mn 25 Ga 20 Gd 5 alloy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We investigate the ferromagnetic resonance and crystallinity properties of CoFeB thin films grown on Si (1 0 0), at substrate temperatures from 20 °C to 800 °C. The X-ray diffraction data show that the CoFeB films are amorphous when deposited at a substrate deposition temperature of less than 500 °C. X-ray diffraction peak analysis matched the crystalline peaks of films grown at 500 °C to a face-centered cubic (1 1 0) Co 7 Fe 3 phase. Increasing the substrate deposition temperatures increased above 600 °C leads to the formation of a face-centered cubic silicide FeCo 2 Si (2 2 0) and oxide Fe 2 CoO 4 (4 0 0). Upon crystallization into different phases at a substrate deposition temperature above 500 °C, the soft ferromagnetic properties of CoFeB are lost. The coercivity of the deposited thin films increases from 20 Oe at room temperature to a maximum of 275 Oe at 700 °C. The peak-to-peak ferromagnetic resonance linewidth at 15 GHz, increases from 80 Oe at room temperature to 790 Oe at 500 °C. The grain size of the as-deposited samples increases with substrate temperature from 20-nm at room temperature to 241-nm at 800 °C as determined by atomic force microscopy.© 2019 The Authors L1 0 -ordered FePd thin films with strong perpendicular magnetic anisotropy and self-organized domain patterns have been prepared using molecular beam epitaxy. We demonstrate reproducible growth methods for controlling the strength of the anisotropy and the lateral domain patterns. Neutron scattering experiments have been used to probe the FePd domain structure and were compared with simulations in the framework of the Distorted Wave Born Approximation.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Employing first-principles calculations we reveal the strong interface termination dependences of the magnetic order and perpendicular magnetic anisotropy (PMA) in FeRh films on MgO(0 0 1). While the magnetic ground state of the Fe-terminated FeRh(0 0 1) is an antiferromagnetic, the Rh-termination favors ferromagnetism within the underlying FeRh layers. This ferromagnetism can persist even at the interface with MgO, which in turn leads to a few times enhancement of PMA compared with the Fe-interface in FeRh/MgO(0 0 1). The underlying mechanism for this large PMA is an interplay between the spin-polarized Rh d xy and d x 2 -y 2 orbital states with large spin-orbit coupling at the interface. These results unveil a crucial role of the interface termination on magnetism of FeRh in antiferromagnet spintronics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Driven nano-magnets have attracted increasing attention due to their potential applications and complex dynamical behavior. Spin valves are possibly the most studied driven nano-magnets because applied magnetic fields and electric currents can control their magnetization. Due to these properties, spin valves are proposed candidates for the new generation of memory units. Based on the Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert-Slonczewski equation, we show that this system exhibits a wide range of magnetization textures, such as patterns, domain walls, and localized structures. Monitoring the Largest Lyapunov exponent, we demonstrate that these textures are chaotic. We numerically characterize the dynamical behavior of this device using the magnetic energy and the magnetoresistance. Finally, we present a phase diagram of the different types of spatial solutions as a function of the applied current and the field.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The present study numerically investigates the effects of a uniform external magnetic field and porous fins on convective heat transfer and pressure drop of magnetite (Fe 3 O 4 /water) nanofluid in a heat sink. Effects of volume fraction, porosity, Reynolds number, and magnetic field strength on the performance of the heat sink are studied. Results indicate that heat transfer increases at high volume fractions, fin porosities and magnetic field intensities and decreases with the Reynolds number. A 13% enhancement of heat transfer is obtained for the heat sink with solid fins by using ferrofluid compared to the pure water flow. This value grows up to 35% by using porous fins and imposing magnetic field to the heat sink. Moreover, using porous fins is shown to decrease the pressure drop while the magnetic field effect is not considerable. Therefore, it is concluded that the proposed methods result in a remarkable heat transfer enhancement while decreasing the pressure drop.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Amorphous Fe–Zr thin films with similar compositions exhibit a considerable change in their magnetic behaviors when they are sputtered at different Ar pressures. The change is well explained by a parameter – the SPM ratio – devised in this study, which is defined as the ratio of the magnetization due to the superparamagnetic behavior to the saturation magnetization. The change in the magnetic behavior of thin films with 40–70 at.% Fe depends on an increase in the SPM ratio, and it is more prominent at higher Fe contents; for example, the SPM ratio of a thin film with ∼60 at.% Fe increases from ∼0 to 0.69 with increasing Ar pressure from 2 to 10 mTorr. Subsequent annealing of the thin film fabricated at the Ar pressure of 10 mTorr at 150 °C leads to a 10-fold decrease in its SPM ratio from that in the as-deposited state. This decreased SPM ratio is, nevertheless, still higher than that of the thin film fabricated at the Ar pressure of 2 mTorr. These results indicate that the magnetic behaviors of amorphous Fe–Zr thin films are highly sensitive to the Ar pressure. Thus, it is crucial to take this parameter into account in the analysis of the magnetic behaviors of amorphous Fe–Zr thin films.© 2018 Elsevier Ltd Amorphous silicon doped zinc tin oxide (a-SZTO) thin film transistors (TFTs) have been fabricated by RF-magnetron sputtering at room temperature. The effect of different channel thickness on the electrical properties and the stability of a-SZTO TFTs have been investigated. Thickness was changed from 30 to 75 nm. As increasing channel thickness, electrical characteristics were improved due to the increase of the carrier concentration, however thick channel over 42 nm was deteriorated due to the increase of carrier scattering associated with increased trap density. Temperature stresses of a-SZTO TFTs were measured in the temperature range from 300 K to 333 K and activation energy (E a ) falling rate was calculated based on the results of temperature stress in order to investigate the defect states in the band gap. The E a falling rate was decreased when increasing of channel thickness. Negative bias temperature stress (NBTS) was measured at 333 K, −20 V for 7200 s to determine the stability of a-SZTO TFTs. After NBTS, the electrical characteristics such as the threshold voltage shift (ΔV TH ) and the subthreshold swing (S.S), were deteriorated mainly due to the increase of total trap density. To confirm the increase of trap density, DOS was extracted through activation energy. These results indicated that good stability condition is observed at thin channel thickness of 30 nm. We suggest that the thickness of a-SZTO should be optimized for the enhancement of electrical property and stability.© 2018In this paper, a one-dimensional spin-1/2 Ising model in a transverse magnetic field (ITF) with added the transverse Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya (DM) interaction is considered. The Hamiltonian is exactly diagonalized using the fermionization approach. The energy spectrum, the magnetization and the chiral order parameter are calculated in the thermodynamic limit of the system. In the absence of the transverse magnetic field, a second order quantum phase transition into the chiral ordered phase is happened. In presence of the transverse magnetic field, the quantum critical point is changed. Based on obtained results, three phases named chiral, Neel and ferromagnetic are distinguished and the ground state phase diagram has been plotted. In addition to the response functions, the entanglement and the quantum discord between nearest and next to nearest pair of spins are also investigated. Regarding the quantum correlations, the existence of different ground state phases has been confirmed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. Measurements of magnetization and Cotton Mouton effect (CM) under external magnetic field (H ex ) combined with specific heat experiments at H ex = 0, were performed on dysprosium iron garnet Dy 3 Fe 5 O 12 (or DyIG) single crystals. The low-temperature dependences of some magnetic, magneto-optical and thermodynamic quantities, such as spontaneous magnetization, both magnetic and CM susceptibilities and the excess specific heat due to the contribution of the Dy 3+ ions only, give rise to the appearance of two types of anomalies. The first one which is related to the ‘low temperature paraprocess’ effect, occurs in the region of the ‘Belov point’ T B predicted at 42 K. Whereas the second one, which is due to the previous first-order spin reorientation phase transition, takes place at T SR = 15 K. The easy axis of magnetization defined by the resultant iron sublattice magnetization vector M Fe , which remains along the 〈1 1 1〉 direction above T SR , changes spontaneously below T SR and becomes aligned along the low symmetry angular 〈u u w〉 phase. The results are analyzed taking into account those reported earlier, such as the negative magnetodielectric property for H ex < 10 kOe and the Schottky effect which are related to the anomalies observed respectively in the temperature dependences of the dielectric constant at T SR and the excess specific heat near T B .© 2019 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, Multi-Objective Optimization (MOO) techniques namely: Weighted Sum Method (WSM), Multi Objective Genetic Algorithm (MOGA) and Niched Pareto Genetic Algorithm (NPGA) are proposed for the design optimization and analysis of magnetic flux distribution for a slotless permanent magnet Brushless DC (BLDC) motor. The sensitivity analysis is carried out to identify the design variables of BLDC motor which influence the objective function. The objective functions are conflicting in nature (maximization of output torque and minimization of total volume and losses), hence, are optimized simultaneously by means of MOO algorithms. The proposed MOOs account for four kinds of design variables namely: rotor radius, stator/ rotor axial length, magnet thickness and winding thickness simultaneously to maximize the output torque and to reduce the total volume and total power loss. The conventional MOO such as WSM gives single pareto optimal solution. However, the proposed MOGA and NPGA algorithms create accurate and well-distributed pareto front set with few function evaluations. The performances of the three MOOs are evaluated and compared using the four performance metrics namely: Hyper Volume (HV), Generational Distance (GD), Inverted Generational Distance (IGD) and Spread. From the comparison, it is observed that NPGA gives better results. Using the design parameter obtained from NPGA, the magnetic flux distribution analysis of the BLDC motor is carried out to analyze variation of flux distribution in the different parts of the motor. The results thus obtained are compared with those obtained through Partial differential equation and single objective GA optimization. The detailed thermal analysis is also carried out to analyze the thermal behavior at different parts of the machine for different working conditions in the continuous operation mode and hence, the results obtained are compared with single objective GA optimization. The advantages of MOOs in the design optimization of slotless permanent magnet BLDC motor are highlighted.© 2018 The effect of deposition rates on the structural and magnetic properties of the ternary FeCrNi martensitic thin films produced via a source material made of the commercial AISI 304 austenitic stainless steel was investigated. The films with 50 nm thickness were deposited on a flexible amorphous polymer substrate by using dc magnetron sputtering. As increasing deposition rate, the Fe and Ni contents of the films increased while the Cr component decreased confirming the same materials in the source. And, all films examined by X-ray diffraction have a body centred tetragonal structure confirming the martensitic state, and the peak intensities changed depending on the film content which was varied by deposition rate. Also, the morphological analysis of the surfaces performed by a scanning electron microscope (SEM) displayed that the smoothest surface were obtained at high deposition rates. Further measurements by an atomic force microscopy disclosed an increase in the film surface smoothness and a decrease in the values of roughness parameters confirming the SEM images. As to magnetic analysis, the increase of total of Fe and Ni contents resulted in an increase in saturation magnetization, M S . The M S values of films, were detected to increase from 991.0 to 1283.1 emu/cm 3 with decreasing coercivity from 131 to 74 Oe as the deposition rate increased from 0.04 to 0.12 nm/s. In this study, the increase of the Fe and Ni components and smoothness in surfaces may give rise to the ternary FeCrNi martensitic thin films gain the softer magnetic properties with increasing deposition rate. A probable explanation to this results may come from the hysteresis loops; the change in the deposition rate produces an increase in the M S and remanent magnetization, M r , and decrease in the coercivities which led to almost unchanged shape of the loops since the M r /M S ratio is between 6.3 and 6.8. The ternary FeCrNi thin films produced by a magnetron sputtering technique have a martensitic phase, which indicates the soft ferromagnetic state without any further treatment. To our knowledge, this has not been expressed in previous relevant studies. It is seen that the magnetic properties of the ternary FeCrNi martensitic thin films can be easily controlled by changing production parameters for potential electric and electronic devices on flexible substrates.© 2019 We study reversible domain wall motion in half-ring Ni 80 Fe 20 nanowires on a nanosecond (ns) timescale in a truly current-induced pump-probe experiment using an energy filtered, aberration-corrected photoemission electron microscope. The X-ray magnetic circular dichroism signal is probed at different time delays before, during and after the current pulse in a stroboscopic mode with circularly polarized synchrotron radiation in the energy range of the Fe L 3 -edge (707 eV). We observe lateral domain wall oscillations with a frequency of ∼0.4 GHz. Comparing the results to a proposed string model, we find that the domain wall oscillations can be described as string-like asymmetric oscillations.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The effects of Gd 3+ ion doping on the lattice structure and magnetism properties of polycrystalline SmFeO 3 were investigated by X-ray diffraction (XRD) and magnetic characterization. Both the magnetic susceptibility and saturation magnetization were significantly enhanced due to the larger spin number of Gd 3+ . The low doping sample of Sm 0.95 Gd 0.05 FeO 3 showed great enhancement of magnetic energy product, which may be attributed to the local exchange of different grains.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The influence of partial Mn and Co content on magnetic properties and martensitic transformation in full Heusler compounds Ni-Co-Mn-Sn with the regular and inverse structure is studied theoretically by first-principles calculations within density functional theory. The optimized lattice parameters, magnetic moments and bulk moduli are calculated. It is shown that the substitution of Sn for Mn atom in the regular structure and of Sn for Ni atom in the inverse structure leads to an appearance of stable martensitic phase. For both considered systems with excess Ni and Mn content, the magnetic reference state of austenite and martensite is found to be the ferrimagnetic one except for Ni 1.75 Co 0.25 Mn 1.75 Sn 0.25 . For the latter, martensitic and austenitic phases are ordered ferri- and ferromagnetically that results in a large change in magnetization.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We report a theoretical study of the impact of the dipolar interaction on the magnetic phases of Fe@Py rectangular cylindrical core-shells. Our results show that the Fe@Py core-shell geometrical parameters may be chosen to allow significant changes in magnetic phases of the isolated Fe core and Py shell. For instance, an 18 nm height rectangular (81 nm × 117 nm) and 21 nm thick Py shell inhibits the formation of the intrinsic magnetic vortex of an isolated 18 nm height (33 nm × 33 nm) square Fe core. We show that the geometric parameters of flat Fe@Py core-shell cylinders can be chosen in such a way to control the nucleation of domain walls in the Py shell. Furthermore, it allows fine-tuning the domain wall position and the domain wall width on the Py shell.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. A series of Ta/FeMn/[NiFe/FeMn] n /Ta films was grown through DC-sputtering. They acted as a new structure of multilayer anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR). Based on the exchange bias (EB) field producing at the NiFe/FeMn interface, the linear range and saturation field along the multilayer's hard axis enlarged when compared with a single NiFe layer. The linear range and saturation field decided the detection range of the AMR. Therefore, by fixing the total thickness of magnetic NiFe layer and selecting different number of n in multilayer, each thickness of NiFe layer was changed to tune EB field. Then, the detection range was modulated by varying exchange bias fields. Adopting this method, the detection range could be easy to control and adjustable from 20.5 Gs to 116 Gs on the basis of AMR responses. The proposed method promotes the application of the AMR effect over a wide magnetic detection area.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The 0.6BiFeO 3 –0.4Bi 0.5 K 0.5 TiO 3 + x mol% MnO 2 ceramics (BFKT–xMn, x = 0, 2.5, 5, 7.5 and 10) have been successfully synthesized via a conventional solid-state reaction method. All the ceramics possess a morphotropic phase boundary formed by rhombohedral and tetragonal phases. A room temperature magnetoelectric (ME) coupling coefficient of 30.12 mV cm −1 Oe −1 is observed for the first time in the undoped BFKT ceramic. The appropriate addition of MnO 2 can optimize the electrical insulation and ferroelectricity of BFKT ceramic due to the decreased densities of impurity and grain boundary, and thus enhance the magnetoelectric coupling effect significantly. The BFKT–2.5Mn ceramic exhibits a high remanent polarization of 36.2 μC/cm 2 at a maximum electric field of 70 kV/cm and a high ME coupling coefficient of 42.56 mV cm −1 Oe −1 as well. Meanwhile, the leakage current density of the BFKT–2.5Mn ceramic maintains at a low value of 1.83 × 10 −8 A/cm 2 (at a maximum electric field of 45 kV/cm). These characteristics indicate the BFKT–2.5Mn ceramic has potential applications in multifunctional devices as lead-free multiferroic materials.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Single phase multiferroics in which ordered magnetism and ferroelectricity coexist, are of great interest for new multifunctional devices, and among them Y-type hexaferrites are good candidates. Transverse susceptibility measurements, which have been proved to be a versatile tool to study singular properties of bulk and nanoparticle magnetic systems, have been carried out with a broadband system on polycrystalline Y type hexaferrites with composition Ba 0.5 Sr 1.5 Co 2 Fe 2 O 22 , optimal to exhibit multiferroic properties. In the temperature range 80–350 K transverse susceptibility measurements with DC fields up to ±5000 Oe reveal different behaviour depending on the sintering temperature. The thermal evolution of the anisotropy field peak exhibits four regions with different slopes: positive in 80–130 K, negative in 130–200 K, constant in 200–280 K and negative in 280–350 K, which can be considered a signature of spin transitions in this compound.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we report that tuning of magnetic properties of cobalt ferrite magnetic nanoparticles (CFMNPs) is possible by combining them with some suitable organic molecules like DNA for hyperthermia therapy. Different batches of CFMNPs were synthesized on DNA scaffold (with varying the DNA concentrations for different batches) by wet chemical co-precipitation method. Final product was characterized by Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR), Scanning electron microscope (SEM) for biological samples, Transmission electron microscope (TEM), Superconducting quantum interference device (SQUID), X-ray diffraction (XRD), Isothermal Titration Calorimetry (ITC) etc. From XRD data it was confirmed that the above mentioned nanoparticles are cobalt ferrite in pure phase and from FT-IR, SEM and TEM analyses, it was observed that cobalt ferrite nanoparticles were properly attached with DNA. Changes in magnetic properties with change of DNA amount for different batches were investigated by SQUID magnetometer. Heating ability under alternating current (AC) magnetic field for different batches of particles was investigated. It was observed that heating property was changing with change in DNA concentration. So it can be concluded that we have synthesized particles where DNA plays a very important role in tuning the magnetic properties which may give us opportunity to customize the particles for hyperthermia therapy.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We investigate magnetic properties of mixed crystals of spinel oxides Zn(Cr 1− x Fe x ) 2 O 4 and Cd(Cr 1− x Fe x ) 2 O 4 to study Cr-site substitution effects on the geometrically-frustrated magnetism of chromite spinels ZnCr 2 O 4 and CdCr 2 O 4 . Zn(Cr 1− x Fe x ) 2 O 4 and Cd(Cr 1− x Fe x ) 2 O 4 with above x ∼ 0.1 exhibit spin-glass-like behavior below ∼10 K which is suppressed by magnetic field H > 1 kOe. Moreover, the Fe concentration x dependence of Weiss temperature Θ W in Zn(Cr 1− x Fe x ) 2 O 4 (Cd(Cr 1− x Fe x ) 2 O 4 ) exhibits the sign change of Θ W from negative below x ∼ 0.4 (x ∼ 0.1) to positive above x ∼ 0.4 (x ∼ 0.1). This suggests that, in Zn(Cr 1− x Fe x ) 2 O 4 and Cd(Cr 1− x Fe x ) 2 O 4 , the competition of antiferromagnetic and ferromagnetic interactions (bond frustration) becomes stronger with increasing the Fe concentration x, while the geometrical frustration becomes weaker with increasing x.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nonlinear effects of spin pumping have been investigated by numerically calculating the temporal evolution of the magnon number affected by three- and four-magnon interactions. We showed that the three-magnon interaction gives rise to the enhancement of spin-pumping spin current. We also found that the four-magnon interaction in combination with the three-magnon interaction can be responsible for the experimentally observed low-frequency oscillation of spin current.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. This study established a facile one-step strategy to anchor MnFe 2 O 4 nanoparticles on the surface of MoS 2 nanosheets in a controlled manner. The as-prepared MnFe 2 O 4 /MoS 2 nanocomposites were investigated by TEM, XRD, XPS, Raman, BET and VSM in detail. The MnFe 2 O 4 nanoparticles with an average particle size of 26 nm were densely and uniformly decorated on MoS 2 nanosheets, and consequently, both the aggregation of MnFe 2 O 4 nanoparticles and restacking of MoS 2 nanosheets were effectively prevented. More importantly, the MnFe 2 O 4 /MoS 2 nanocomposites exhibited high specific surface area, typical superparamagnetic behavior and excellent solution dispersion, showing a great potential for biomedical applications in the fields of magnetic resonance imaging, targeted drug delivery and tumor hyperthermia.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. Anomalous properties both of the dynamic magnetic susceptibility and the spontaneous magnetization of Y 3-x Fe 5+x O 12 garnet films have been experimentally observed. The most significant anomalies are the following: (a) an orientational magnetic transition at room temperature in the range of the applied magnetic field of 300–700 Oe; (b) a spontaneous magnetization vector reversal in the temperature range of 110–275 °C and the corresponding jump of the dynamic susceptibility at zero magnetic field; (c) oscillations of the magnetization in the paramagnetic state of the sample and the corresponding jumps of the dynamic susceptibility at the planar magnetic field H=200 Oe. It has been established that all reported anomalies exhibit an inverse behavior, namely, with decrease of the applied magnetic field (or temperature) a reverse hysteresis of the field (or temperature) dependences both of the dynamic magnetic susceptibility and the spontaneous magnetization is observed. Possible reasons for such a behavior of the measured dependences are also discussed.© 2018 Elsevier LtdControlled process conditions enabled the fabrication of well-defined, high quality, and reproducible waveguides. Multifactor lithographic process conditions have been achieved in order to fabricate 3D single mode waveguide. Preheating and post-baking processes are the most important factors. Sol gel materials form an intermediate bridge between glasses and polymers which allow doping of many metal ions or functional materials to the system to extend its capabilities in high performance and active devices, such as modulation, lasing (amplifying), beam splitters, couplers, deflectors, wavelength filters and switches. It was found that the single mode or multimode waveguide can be fabricated with single step spin coating.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. The influence of nonstoichiometry defects and different-valence ions on the formation of microinhomogeneities was established for ceramic manganites of La-Sr system with paired substitution of (Zn 2+ ,Ge 4+ ), (Mg 2+ ,Ge 4+ ), (Ni 2+ ,Ge 4+ ) for manganese. The role of grain microstructure was also considered. Experiments were performed on polycrystalline ceramic samples exposed to heat treatment at a temperature of 1223 K in oxidizing conditions (at a partial pressure of oxygen in the gas phase of P O2 = 101.3 kPa) and in a reducing atmosphere (P O2 = 10 −8 Pa). Investigations of experimental samples were carried out by scanning tunneling and scanning electron microscopy. The existence of microinhomogeneities having different configurations and conductance is related to the association of different-valence ions, cation and anion vacancies. This effect depends on manganese substituents and is most pronounced in manganites containing Zn 2+ ions (with the highest radius) after annealing in oxygen. In this case, quasi-periodic lamellar formations arise, which represent modulated structures (elastic concentration domains), including secondary modulated ones. Processes of self-organization also take place in the studied manganites, leading to the emergence of regular hexagonal structures. (Ni,Ge)-substituted manganites have the highest density and exhibit the least pronounced formation of structure heterogeneity. However, samples containing (Mg 2+ ,Ge 4+ ) have the highest porosity and the widest temperature interval of “ferromagnetic-paramagnetic” transition. Magnetization of all samples is practically independent of the annealing conditions, and Curie point is slightly higher after annealing in oxygen than in vacuum. The highest magnetic parameters are found in Zn-containing manganites, and the lowest – in Mg-containing ones.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. The effect of Cr on secondary recrystallization behaviors of high permeability grain oriented silicon steel manufactured by low-temperature reheating was studied by transmission electron microscopy (TEM), electron back-scattered diffraction (EBSD) and magnetic properties measurement. The results show that Cr containing silicon nitride (Cr, Si) N precipitates after nitriding with the size below 150 nm and regular shaped. Furthermore, primary grain size becomes smaller and more uniform; In the heating stage of purification annealing, precipitates turn into composite silicon nitride (Cr, Al, Si) N. Due to the number of inhibitors is larger and the size is smaller, the pinning effect is stronger. So the starting temperature of secondary recrystallization increases 20 K, the analysis of Zener factor is in agreement with experiment results. With the addition of 0.145 wt% Cr, final grains become smaller and the iron loss (P 17/50 ) could be significantly reduced by nearly 5.4%.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. Systematic inversion of optical anisotropy with magnetic field sweep (0–5000 Gauss) has been observed at a critical concentration in the monodispersed magnetic fluids using NanoMOKE III. This experimental technique is significantly novel method to investigate the optical anisotropy of magnetic nano-suspensions with the time-varying magnetic field. In this work, we report a detailed experimental investigation on the field dependent magneto-optical behaviour of dilute water dispersed Fe 3 O 4 based magnetic fluid. Magnetic fluid shows tunable magneto-optical properties which primarily depends on parameters such as, particle concentration, composition and carrier medium. We have observed a systematic inversion in optical anisotropy at critical concentration for a Fe 3 O 4 magnetic fluid with strong spatial dependence. The observed tuneable magneto-optical phenomena have been correlated to the net effect of the structuration process, electronic transitions and gravitational force in the presence magnetic field. This phenomenon leads to the development of two particle size distribution, negative optical activity initially and strong spatial dependence respectively. The present results provide a strong correlation with theoretical models presented to expound the dependency of various parameters on magneto-optical inversion behaviour of magnetic fluids.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present three-dimensional (3D) model of periodic meander-shaped ferromagnetic films. Spin wave propagation in such films and vertically coupled structures was studied using micromagnetic modeling and theoretical plane wave method. Spin waves in these structures essentially propagate in film's segments located at right angles with respect to each other. This makes really possible for the wave to propagate in three dimensions. We calculated internal effective magnetic fields and obtained spin wave dispersion in single and vertically coupled structures. Additionally, comparison of surface and volume spin waves propagation in such meander films was provided. Our results can be useful for magnonic logic elements development.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. This work investigates the different magnetic reversal mechanisms of as-grown and oxygen-ion (O + ) implanted Mn x O y /Ni 80 Fe 20 bilayers. A Mn x O y /Ni 80 Fe 20 bilayer was prepared by ion-beam sputter deposition in an Ar + atmosphere using a partially oxidised Mn target. Oxygen implantations were then performed using 8 keV O + ions at fluences of 10 16 , 10 17 and 10 18 ions/cm 2 to modify the exchange bias strength at the Mn x O y /Ni 80 Fe 20 interface. The magnetic, crystallographic and chemical properties of the bilayers before and after O + implantation were studied using transmission electron microscopy, X-ray reflectometry, magnetometry and polarised neutron reflectometry. The results show an overall improved exchange bias and coercivity for the O + implanted bilayers. The 10 17 ions/cm 2 implanted sample shows the greatest improvement in exchange bias and was further studied for its detailed spin-reversal behaviour using polarised neutron reflectometry. Data analysis in the magnetically-trained state reveals a coexistence of coherent rotational and non-coherent magnetic spin reversal in the as-grown sample and a solely coherent spin rotation reversal mechanism for the O + implanted Mn x O y /Ni 80 Fe 20 bilayer.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The nanostructured spinel ferrites with complex stoichiometry are an important family of the materials in a number of applications, especially in electronics through their good electrical and magnetic properties. In the framework of this study, a set of mixed cobalt and nickel ferrites was prepared with the sol–gel self-combustion route. The structural and morphological features of particles were studied with X-ray diffraction (XRD), Scanning Transmission Electron Microscopy (STEM) and Energy Dispersive X-ray analysis (EDX) techniques. The prepared particles show a crystalline nature with a monotonic distribution of the elements and particles size distribution in the range of 17–29 nm. The obtained particles demonstrate good magnetic properties with tunable saturation magnetization and magnetic anisotropy, i.e., coercivity depending on chemical composition.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we exhaustively investigated the motion of a soft ferromagnetic ball driven by two rotating magnets with either same or opposite polarity. The experimental observations exhibit plentiful unexpected phenomena in this system, including the counterintuitive reverse rotation of the ball against the direction of the high-speed-rotating magnetic field. For the case of same polarity, the motion of the ball can be classified into several distinct phases, namely, the first direct rotation phase (1st DRP), the unstable phase (UP), the second direct rotation phase (2nd DRP), and the reverse rotation phase (RRP). At the transitional points between 2nd DRP and RRP, the ball can nearly stop on a random point of the orbit with small vibrations. When the height of the ball raises to a certain value, it will eventually be trapped at the center of the field. For the case of opposite polarity, the classification of the motion is roughly the same except some typical distinctions, for example, the rotating diameter of the ball increases with the height in the mass and there exists an anomalous phase. We drew the phase diagrams of the motions and characterized the trajectories for both cases.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the temperature dependent magnetic properties of arrays of Cobalt nanowires created by sputtering Co on two separate nanoporous anodized alumina (AAO) templates each with pores of diameter 50 nm and 10 nm. We observe differences in the easy axis of magnetization for the two nanowire arrays and a flip in the easy axis at low temperatures. The easy axis of 50 nm nanowire array at room temperature is found to be perpendicular to the nanowire long axis, whereas for 10 nm arrays the easy axis is parallel to the wire axis. With lowering of temperature, however the easy axes of both arrays orient away from that at room temperature. Along with that the saturation magnetic field and coercive field show sudden increase in their values at low temperatures, accompanied by a crossing over seen in the saturation magnetic fields. We propose changes in magneto-crystalline anisotropy of cobalt present in the nanowires as a result of the stress developed in the nanowire array due to the alumina template, with lowering of temperature. We support our experimental results with micro-magnetic simulations done to generate the M(H) curves and study the magnetization reversal processes in the nanowire arrays with varying anisotropies. With lowering of anisotropy which we believe is triggered by stress at low temperature, our simulations show magnetic vortex like instabilities originating in the nanowires. We suggest the possible modes of domain reversals: curling in 50 nm and either coherent rotation or buckling in 10 nm nanowires through our simulations. Our results suggest that temperature can serve as an effective tool to tune magnetic anisotropy in Co nanowires embedded in AAO and generate unusual magnetic textures.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.We investigate if the demagnetization factor for a randomly packed powder of magnetic spheroidal particles depend on the shape of the spheroidal particles and what the internal variation in magnetization is within such a powder. A spheroid is an ellipsoid of revolution, i.e. an ellipsoid with two semi-major axis being equal. The demagnetization factor is calculated as function of particle aspect ratio using two independent numerical models for several different packings, and assuming a relative permeability of 2. The calculated demagnetization factor is shown to depend on particle aspect ratio, not because of direct magnetic interaction but because the particle packing depend on the aspect ratio of the particles. The relative standard deviation of the magnetization across the powder was 3–8%, increasing as the particle shape deviates from spherical, while the relative standard deviation within each particle was relatively constant around 5%.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We evaluate properties of the prototype of a strain gauge capable to discriminate different strain components: tension and torsion. It makes use of magnetoelastic effect in new Fe 48 Co 32 P 14 B 6 metallic glass. As a sensing material, it surpasses characteristics of commercial Iron-Nickel Metglas® alloy: relative differential permeability of as quenched amorphous ribbon is of about 110000, the saturation induction B s = 1.45 T, coercive field as low as 4 A/m, Curie temperature above 700 K, and significantly higher thermal stability. Different deformation components were determined through the analyses of the shape of hysteresis B-H loops. Fe-Co-P-B glass strain gauge can simultaneously detect as small tensile strains as 1.9 × 10 −5 and less than 0.13 deg/cm of torsional distortions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The electronic and thermal transport properties of the Earth's core are crucial for many geophysical models such as the geodynamo model of the Earth's magnetic field. We show by first-principles modeling and methods of statistical physics that the spin disorder, not considered in previous studies, gives an essential contribution to the electrical resistivity at the Earth's core conditions. The origin of this spin-disorder resistivity (SDR) consists in the existence of fluctuating local moments that are stabilized at high temperatures by the magnetic entropy even at pressures at which the ground state of iron is non-magnetic. It turns out that the contributions of various scattering mechanisms (alloy disorder, phonon scattering, spin disorder, and electron-electron correlations) are comparable, but not additive. Here we report results for iron and iron-rich alloys (Fe-O, Fe-Si, Fe-S) that can be present in the Earth's core. Special attention is paid to alloys with two magnetic elements (Fe-Ni).© 2019 Nanosized nickel ferrite (NiFe 2 O 4 ) is successfully synthesized by the sol-gel method using citric acid (C 6 H 8 O 7 ) as fuel. The X-ray diffraction pattern of the as-synthesized sample shows formation of NiFe 2 O 4 nanoparticles (NPs) as the main phase, with mean crystalline size ∼50 nm. While transmission electron microscopy (TEM) reveals nearly spherical morphology with mean particle diameter of 41 ± 5 nm, high-resolution TEM shows inter-planar distance (2.55 Å) corresponding to the (1 1 3) plane of the spinel structure. Additionally, the Raman spectrum exhibits five Raman active modes (two A 1g at 575 cm −1 and 710 cm −1 ; two E g at 345 cm −1 and 670 cm −1 ; and one T 2g at 497 cm −1 ) typical of NiFe 2 O 4 . X-band magnetic resonance (MR) data reveal a single broad resonance line in the whole temperature range (3.8 K ≤ T ≤ 300 K), with g-value decreasing monotonically from 3.10 ± 0.01 at 3.8 K to 2.77 ± 0.01 at 300 K. The temperature dependence of both resonance field and resonance linewidth show a remarkable change in the range of 60–70 K, herein credited to surface spin-glass behavior. The model picture used to explain the MR data assumes NPs with a core-shell structure. Below about 60–70 K the shell's spin system progressively reveals a paramagnetic to spin-glass-like transition upon cooling, with a freezing temperature estimated at 2.1 ± 0.1 K. However, above about 60–70 K spins in the paramagnetic shell align along the NP's core dipolar field, resulting in an effective enlarged nanoparticle size.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Impedance matching is primary for broadband and strong absorption. Here, we optimized the impedance matching condition of the carbonyl iron powders (CIPs) layer by stacking the layered ultra high molecular weight polyethylene (UHMWPE). The double-layer absorber with its absorption more than 90% within the frequency range of 4.4–18 GHz is obtained by simulation and validated by experiment, while the single CIPs layer shows its broadest bandwidth only within 4.8–8.4 GHz. By simulating the angular performance, the double-layer has been confirmed to be omnidirectional and polarization insensitive. Besides, the impedance matching property of the double-layer is highly correlated with the thickness of UHMWPE layer, and the broadband absorption is resulted from the combination of the impedance matching layer and the absorbing layer. The designed absorber, stacked with the impact resistant UHMWPE layer, has great prospects for practical application under the requirement for bulletproof property.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. We report on broadband ferromagnetic resonance spectroscopy studies of permalloy (Py) thin films grown on large area pulse laser deposited MoS 2 . We observe an enhancement of the effective damping constant of the Py layer grown on few-layer MoS 2 . The spin mixing conductance is found to be an order of magnitude larger in the case of 3.5 (average of the 3–4 layer)-layer-MoS 2 /Py compared to the case of 2-layer-MoS 2 /Py. The results are interpreted as a consequence of the extrinsic defect induced spin-orbit coupling at the 3.5-layer-MoS 2 /Py interface evidenced by a higher variation of Raman intensity across the sample as compared to the 2-layer-MoS 2 /Py system.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. Nanoparticles with their specific properties newly have drawn a great deal of attention of researchers (Khezri et al., 2012 [1]; Khezri et al., 2013 [2]; Lu et al., 2007 [3]).Yttrium iron Garnet magnetic nanoparticles (YIG-NPs) are promising materials with novel applications in microwave, spintronics, magnonics, and magneto-optical devices. However, achieving stable and remarkable magnetic YIG-NPs has been remaining as a great challenge. In this paper, synthesized YIG-NPs by modifying co-precipitation (MCP) method is reported. Structural and magnetic properties of final products are compared to those of the materials prepared by citrate–nitrate (CN) method. Smaller crystals and particle size have been found by MCP method comparing to that of synthesized by CN method. Using a relatively low annealing temperatures for both sets of samples (∼700 °C), the final YIG samples prepared by MCP method show more structural purity than those made by CN method. Higher saturation magnetization (M s ) and lower coercivity (H c ) are observed in MCP YIG sample (23.23 emu/g and 30.1 Oe) than the CN prepared YIG sample (16.43 emu/g and 44.95 Oe). The Curie temperature is measured to be 569 °C for the MCP YIG sample determined from set of M s measurement at different temperatures ranging from 80 to 600 K. These findings lead to significant improvement in quality of synthesized (synthetic methods) YIG-NPs.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. A new type of spin-torque-oscillator (STO), all-in-plane STO, is introduced for microwave assisted magnetic recording (MAMR) that consist of a spin-injection-layer (SIL) and a field-generating-layer (FGL) with an effective in-plane easy axis due to the shape anisotropy separated with a metallic spacer. In this device, electrons are injected from SIL to FGL while the magnetization of the SIL and FGL is saturated to the out-of-plane by the external magnetic field of ∼1.0 T. Micromagnetic simulations showed that the magnetization direction of SIL can be switched to the opposite direction to that of the applied external magnetic field by the use of spin-transfer-torque. This results in a larger spin accumulation in FGL and its oscillation with a large cone angle at a low bias current density. We designed SIL to reduce the critical current density, J c , required for the magnetization switching of SIL. Materials with a smaller saturation magnetization in SIL reduce J c . Smaller spin polarization of SIL leads to a larger spin accumulation in SIL with an opposite direction to the magnetization, resulting in a reduction of J c . This enables magnetization switching of SIL in small J c followed by oscillation of FGL with frequency above 20 GHz with a large out-of-plane oscillation cone angle of 45–50°. The validity of this finding was studied experimentally by developing STO with two SIL materials, Co 2 Fe(Al 0.5 Si 0.5 ) Heusler alloy and Fe 67 Co 33 , the former has the B2 crystal structure with a large spin polarization and the latter has the A2 crystal structure with a smaller spin polarization. The magnetization configuration of SIL and FGL in STO with a diameter of ∼60 nm is investigated experimentally based on the field dependent resistance change and the oscillation behavior is discussed based on the micromagnetic simulations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. Novel heterostructures of Ni x Ti 1−x /Ni and Ni x Ti 1−x /Co, with 0.48 < x < 0.51 grown on Si (1 0 0) substrates using DC magnetron co-sputtering were investigated by SQUID magnetometry in the temperature range 10–400 K. The magnetic measurements showed an anomalous enhancement of the total magnetic moment and changes in the coercivity with temperature. These results are attributed to interfacial strain during the structural phase transition of NiTi and evidence the magnetoelastic coupling on these heterostructures. The anomalous enhancement in the magnetic moment is explained in terms on the additional anisotropy in the ferromagnetic layer induced by the interfacial stress. Such heterostructures attached to silicon can be thought of as potential devices for controlling magnetic properties by temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Active thrust magnetic bearings provide an axial force to balance the moving parts of machines. However, most devices produce null or unbalancing passive forces. Furthermore, reported designs usually feature very small axial and radial gaps. This paper presents a thrust actuator for wide axial gaps that produces both passive and active restoring axial forces. It features a long biconical rotor and a stator housing a single winding and two permanent magnets. Simulations are done using finite-element-analysis (FEA) and compared to magnetic circuit analysis and experimental results from a prototype with a diameter of 48 mm and 20 mm axial displacement.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. The structural, mechanical, electronic and magnetic properties of quaternary YFeCrX (X = Al, Ga, In, Si, Ge, Sn, P, As, Sb) Heusler alloys are reported. The structural stability, electronic and magnetic properties of Heusler alloys are studied by implementing spin polarized density functional theory (DFT). All alloys with cubic structure are found stable in ferromagnetic phase. Among the YFeCrX alloys, the YFeCrGa, YFeCrSi and YFeCrSb alloys exhibit high values of bulk moduli. The calculated cubic elastic constants show that all alloys fulfill the mechanical stability criteria. The band structures (BSs) and density of states (DOS) shows half metallic (HM) behavior of alloys. Among the alloys, the YFeCrSi, YFeCrGe, YFeCrSn, YFeCrP and YFeCrSb alloys exhibit indirect band gap in S ↓ channel and show 100% spin-polarization. The YFeCrX (X = Si, Ge, Sn, As, Sb) alloys obey the Slater - Pauling rule, μ Total =Z Total -18 while the YFeCrP alloy found to follow the Slater-Pauling rule, μ Total =24-Z Total . Thus, the alloys which have high magnetic moment are expected to have high Curie temperature T C suitable for applications in spintronic devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present results of studying properties of surface spin waves in vertically coupled antiferromagnetic films with easy-axis anisotropy. The dispersion curves and frequency region of the existence of the surface magnetostatic waves are obtained using theoretical model for different antiferromagnetic materials. This study was carried out by solving the dispersion relation for the surface magnetostatic waves. Behavior of two types of dispersion curves on the value of coupling parameter is investigated. We conclude, that results have potential applications for antiferromagnetic THz spintronics.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The preparation of magnetic nanotubes opens new avenues in nanobiotechnology as a consequence of their multiple properties embedded within the same moiety. Here, we report on synthesis and characterization of titanate nanotubes and their Fe-/Co-doped by means of X-ray diffraction, high-resolution transmission electron microscopy, and magnetic studies. Although the absence of 3d elements in Na 2 Ti 3 O 7 nanotubes, our data for the first time, exhibits room temperature M−H hysteresis. Furthermore, our results show that the magnetization increased with Fe doping, while Co doping enhanced the coercivity. This behaviour was expected from the magnetic character of Fe and the positive magnetocrystalline anisotropy of Co. These results give access to the doping effect on tuning the properties of Na 2 Ti 3 O 7 nanotubes.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. In this article we present the theoretical study of structural and magnetic properties in a series of compositions Fe 1− x Mn x Rh (x = 0.125, 0.25, 0.375). The properties of alloys were studied by first principles calculations. It is shown that the equilibrium lattice parameter change with increasing Mn concentration. For all systems the checkerboard-like antiferromagnetic configuration was found to be more energetically favorable. For Fe 0.875 Mn 0.125 Rh composition the cubic phase is more energetically favorable. For alloys Fe 0.75 Mn 0.25 Rh and Fe 0.625 Mn 0.375 Rh the martensitic phase transformation is observed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. FeCo alloy particles with Co to Fe compositions ranging from molar ratios of 0:1–1:1 in a precursor were synthesized through co-precipitation, flux treatment, and reduction. By adding Co 2+ to Fe ions, particle size was remarkably reduced to 10–50 nm from 50 to 250 nm of Fe particles. The lattice parameter calculated from the (1 1 0) peak of the (bcc) structure decreased from 0.2870 nm in Fe particles to 0.2854 nm in FeCo particles. The coercive force increased with increasing Co/Fe composition ratio, showing a value of approximately 80 kA/m at the Co/Fe composition ratio of 1.0, at which the lattice parameter corresponded to a composition of approximately Fe 62 Co 38 . A maximum saturation magnetization of approximately 160 Am 2 /kg was obtained at a Co/Fe composition ratio of around 0.2–0.5.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.page 449 column 2: row 6 eq. (1.2): [Formula presented] should read: [Formula presented] row 7: “here, H is the energy” should read: “here, [Formula presented] is the energy” row 13: “[Formula presented]” should read: “[Formula presented]” page 456 column 1 row 1 : “M(T)” should read: “[Formula presented]” row 3: “[Formula presented]” should read: “[Formula presented]” “Msat “ should read: “[Formula presented]“ row 4: “[Formula presented]” should read: “[Formula presented]” row 6: [Formula presented] should read: [Formula presented] “[Formula presented]” should read: “[Formula presented]” row 7: “[Formula presented]” should read: “[Formula presented]” “[Formula presented]” should read: “[Formula presented]” “[Formula presented]” should read: “[Formula presented]” row 8: “[Formula presented]” should read: “[Formula presented]” “[Formula presented]” should read: “[Formula presented]” The Publisher regrets that the above font/style errors may have caused inconvenient in reading the article. The Publisher would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. Through coordinate transformation approach, crystal orientation dependences of magnetic properties have been investigated in the three dimensional space for bismuth ferrite (BiFeO 3 ). Permeabilities μ 11 ′ μ 33 ′ piezomagnetic constants q 31 ′ q 33 ′ and magnetoelectric coefficients α 12 ′ α 31 ′ along arbitrary orientations were presented based on magnetic and crystalline asymmetry characteristics of trigonal BiFeO 3 below the Neel temperature. μ 11 ′ is a constant while the max μ 33 ′ = μ 11 ′ = 2.68 lies in [n k 0] axes. q 31 ′ and q 33 ′ show very similar orientation dependences with their absolute maximas (10 −13 m/A) both lying in directions at ϕ = 30° 90° and 150° inside XOY plane. α 12 ′ and α 31 ′ show the contrary orientation dependences with their maximas (120 mV/cm Oe) existing along [0 0 1] and [n k 0] axes, respectively. The results suggest that by adopting optimal directions, the magnetic parameters of BiFeO 3 could be optimally used.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Rare earth free nanocrystalline Zr 16 Co 78-x Nb x Si 3 B 3 (x = 0–3) bulk magnets were fabricated from melt spun ribbons with high density by employing spark plasma sintering (SPS) technique. The effect of SPS temperature on structural and magnetic properties was investigated. The hard magnetic Zr 2 Co 11 phase which was present in the as-spun ribbons retained after SPS, indicating no phase decomposition. The magnetic properties were found to depend on consolidation temperature and Nb concentration. Optimum magnetic properties of coercivity of 3.3 kOe with saturation magnetization of 52 emu/g were obtained for x = 1 magnet consolidated at 600 °C. SPS magnets display a moderate magnetic texture and the coercivity mechanism is governed by combination of both domain wall pinning and nucleation of reverse domains.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. The present study reports the effect of oxygen content on the structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties in the (La 0.7 Pr 0.3 ) 0.8 Sr 0.2 Mn 0.9 Co 0.1 O 3±δ (δ = +0.02, +0.01, −0.03) in the temperature range of 5–723 К. It has been found that the temperatures of structural phase transitions vary significantly depending on the oxygen index value, δ. In oxygen-deficient samples (δ = −0.03), two structural phase transitions are observed: O′ → O and O → R (O′ – Orbitally ordered orthorhombic phase, O – Orbitally disordered orthorhombic phase, R – Rhombohedral phase). In excess oxygen samples (δ = +0.02, +0.01), the O′-phase is not formed. The O → R transition temperature increases with decreasing δ from T O→R = 353 K (δ = +0.02) to T O→R = 623 K (δ = −0.03). Magnetic measurements show that all our compounds exhibit a paramagnetic-ferromagnetic transition at T C ∼ 205 K. The Arrott plots reveal the occurrence of a second order phase transition. It was found that the transition temperature T C depends on the magnitude of the applied magnetic field, which rarely happens for materials with phase transitions of the second order. It has been shown from evaluation of the Temperature averaged Entropy Change (TEC) that a wide temperature range of MCE does not satisfies the requirements of using the compounds studied as an effective magnetocaloric material for magnetic refrigeration. The substitutions in cation sublattices and oxygen non-stoichiometry have negligible effect on T C and magnetocaloric effect (MCE). To investigate the magnetic interactions responsible for the magnetic transitions, the analysis was done by using the modified Arrott plot (MAP) method. The obtained values of the critical exponents matched well with those predicted for the isotropic short range 3D-Heisenberg model.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. We report on the growth of undoped and Zn-doped flower-like microparticles, which are constituted of SnO 2 acicular nanoparticles (NPs) aggregated by one of their ends. NPs were synthesized by the hydrothermal method. The morphology of the NPs progressively changes from truncated rods to sharp needles by the effect of Zn doping. This morphology evolution is attributed to an increase of the surface free energy of the NPs’ facets and to a modification of the growth front direction. Undoped samples exhibit a very low magnetization attributed to single positive charged oxygen vacancies, V O 1+ , while Zn-doped samples exhibit ferromagnetic ordering due to Zn atoms in Sn substitutional positions (Zn Sn ). Thermal treatment under reducing atmosphere leads to the creation of an excess of V O conducting to a reduction of the magnetization, demonstrating that ferromagnetism in Zn-doped SnO 2 NPs is attributed to Zn Sn defects and to the octahedrally coordinated oxygen atoms.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. This paper is an experimental study of the different phases of oxides of manganese, prepared by solution combustion method using mixture of urea and glucose as fuels. To validate the thermal stability of Mn 2 O 3 , the as-synthesized sample was subjected to heat treatment from 350 °C to 1000 °C with 100 °C interval. The change in Mn 2 O 3 to Mn 3 O 4 was identified by powder X-ray diffraction (PXRD) to show the temperature dependent phase transformation that occur during the heat treatment process. The PXRD patterns show that Mn 2 O 3 is stable between temperatures of 350 °C to 850 °C, and a new phase i.e Mn 3 O 4 appears at 1000 °C. The Mn 2 O 3 and Mn 3 O 4 have their distinct surface morphologies viz., spherical and rod shapes. The detailed morphology, elemental compositions and structure investigation were carried out by using Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM-EDAX) and Raman spectroscopy. Sintered sample of Mn 3 O 4 were subjected to magnetic measurements. The Mn 3 O 4 crystallite with diameters of 50 nm shows ferromagnetic behavior with a phase transition from ferromagnetic to paramagnetic phase at 48 K. A large coercivity up to 3000 Oe and a small remanence of 0.1092 emu/g at 10 K, was observed. The temperature dependent magnetization measured in a magnetic field of 100 Oe, increases significantly with decreasing temperature around 45 K, both for the FC and ZFC measurements. The susceptibility measurement of the Mn 3 O 4 crystallites were investigated between 0 and 300 K by applied magnetic fields up to 5 T. A magnetic transition is observed near 48 K which is attributed to the formation of the ferrimagnetic Mn 3 O 4 .© 2018 Elsevier B.V. The isotropic nanoparticles (NPs) and anisotropic bulk samples of MnBi were prepared from Mn NPs by using zero-field and field-assisted reactive sintering, respectively. The MnBi NPs are irregular in shape with size d < 600 nm, which is slightly larger than the precursor Mn NPs. The fraction of MnBi in the zero-field sintered NPs is higher than 68.6 wt%. The large surface area and small size of the Mn NPs enhanced the formation of ferromagnetic phase during sintering and the magnetic performance of the MnBi NPs, which show a coercivity (H c ) up to 0.8 T and a remanent magnetization (M r ) up to 44.5 Am 2 /kg at room temperature. The magnetic fields enhanced the formation of MnBi phase significantly and oriented the c-axis of the MnBi grains grown along the external fields during reactive sintering. A fraction of 63 wt% MnBi was formed in field-sintering within 2 h, whereas only 58.5 wt% MnBi was formed in zero-field-sintering for 48 h. The room-temperature H c and M r of the field-sintered bulk anisotropic MnBi reached up to 0.12–0.17 T and 37 Am 2 /kg, respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. Magnetic glass-ceramics with composition nNa 2 O-9SrO-6Fe 2 O 3 -8B 2 O 3 (n = 1 and 4) were prepared by fast quenching of the molten oxide mixtures and subsequent thermal treatment of the obtained glasses at 450–950 °C. The samples were investigated by differential thermal analysis, x-ray powder diffraction, electron microscopy, and SQIUD magnetometry. Increasing of the sodium oxide content leads to a significant decrease of the glass transition, devitrification, and melting temperatures. Just above the glass transition temperature (525 °C for n = 1 and 430 °C for n = 4) superparamagnetic γ-Fe 2 O 3 nanoparticles precipitate, which, at elevating annealing temperature, are substituted by thin hexaferrite nanoplatelets with coercivities of 2000–4000 Oe; the annealing at higher temperatures results in crystallization of the submicron hexaferrite particles with a coercivity of up to 6000 Oe. Thus the glass-ceramics are highly applicable sources of non-sintered nanoparticles with various morphologies and magnetic properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The dipolar interaction between FINEMET ribbons was investigated using giant magneto-impedance (GMI) measurement. It can be clearly revealed via the GMI response of a probe ribbon surrounding by nanocrystalline ribbons, which exhibited a plateau in the lower field region and double-peak in higher region. The plateau was gradually broadened with increasing the number of the surrounding ribbons or decreasing its length and the peak position shifted to higher field at the meantime. The frequency also affects the shift of the GMI peak field of the probe ribbon at high driving frequency, but has slight influence on the plateau in the measurement frequency range. Furthermore, the dipolar field between one surrounding ribbon and the probe ribbon and the geometric factor of ribbons are calculated using dipolar magnetization model to explicate the variation of dipolar interaction with number and length of ribbons. Thus, the GMI response of a probe ribbon can be employed as a novel tool to investigate the dipolar interaction in FINEMET ribbons.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.Nano-crystalline and micron-crystalline Nd-Fe-B powders were employed to hydrogenation-disproportionation-desorption-recombination (HDDR) process to investigate the structural factors of deformation ability in HDDR powders. It was found that the deformation ability and magnetic properties of the final die-upset magnet were optimized significantly by nano-crystalline powders. Structure investigation shows that the variations in coercivity and deformation ability were attributed to the Nd-rich phase distribution in HDDR powders. Meanwhile, enhancement of remanence and squareness indicated the uniform distribution of Nd-rich phase and the narrow grain size distribution by using nano-sized crystalline powders were in favor of c-axis alignment of 2:14:1 phase.© 2018 The high aspect ratio Ni nanocylinders (nanowires and nanotubes) were fabricated by means of potentiostatic electrochemical deposition in porous anodic alumina templates with pore diameter of 200 nm and a thickness of 60 µm. The growth of nanocylinders was found to depend upon deposition parameters. The structural, morphological and magnetic analysis revealed the face-centred cubic texture, uniformity and magnetic properties of nanowires and nanotubes respectively. The dynamic properties of one-dimensional uniform arrays of Ni nanowires (NWs) and nanotubes (NTs) were studied by ferromagnetic resonance technique at various frequencies ranging from 6 to 25 GHz. In particular, we identify the onset of magnetization reversal from the angular variation studies of resonance fields [H r (θ H )] and FMR linewidths [ΔH r (θ H )]. Parameters such as gyromagnetic ratio (γ), damping constant (α) and effective field (H eff ) were derived from theoretical fits to H r and ΔH r data. We found that H r and ΔH r both depend sensitively on the angle between the magnetization direction and wire-axis. For a NT geometry, the fitting of ΔH r (θ H ) data divulges that the magnetization reversal mechanism dominant by coherent rotation and thereafter beyond transition angle (∼80 ° ) curling mode contributes. In case of nanowires, the curling reversal mode is the dominant magnetization reversal process.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. We show the carrier doping effect on magnetic and transport properties of Ca 5 Ir 3 O 12 , indicating semiconductivity and an antiferromagnetic ordering below Néel temperature T N =7.8 K. The average valence of Ir ions in Ca 5 Ir 3 O 12 is +4.67. Carrier doping for 5d electrons of Ir ions is achieved by substitution of Ca 2+ by Na + ,La 3+ , and Bi 3+ ; Na substitution leads to hole doping, and La or Bi substitution leads to electron doping. The electrical resistivity decreases in both case of the hole doping or the electron doping. For La10% doped samples, T N does not change but Curie–Weiss temperature Θ CW becomes 3.5 times larger than 9.9 K for Ca 5 Ir 3 O 12 . For Bi10% doped samples, T N decreases to 5 K but Θ CW becomes 3 times larger than that of undoped compound. On the other hand, for Na10% doped samples, T N decreases to 4 K and Θ CW decreases to 8.3 K. The frustration index f which is defined by |Θ CW |/T N is enhanced by electron doping. The magnetic frustration becomes stronger with increase of filling of Ir 5d electrons on the triangular lattice.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. The crystal structure of new Lu 14 Co 3 In 3 -type {Gd, Tb, Lu} 14 Ni 3 Al 3 compounds (P4 2 /nmc. N 137, tP80) has been established using powder X-ray diffraction studies with cell parameters a = 0.95765(2) nm, c = 2.30214(5) nm for Gd 14 Ni 3 Al 3 , a = 0.95012(5) nm, c = 2.28190(10) nm for Tb 14 Ni 3 Al 3 and a = 0.92604(2) nm, c = 2.23350(4) nm for Lu 14 Ni 3 Al 3 . Magnetic properties of the polycrystalline Y 14 Co 3 Al 3 , Gd 14 Co 3.2 Al 2.8 and {Tb, Dy} 14 {Co, Ni} 3 Al 3 have been studied by magnetization measurements. Y 14 Co 3 Al 3 is paramagnetic down to 2 K, Gd 14 Co 3.2 Al 2.8 exhibits ferro-antiferromagnetic ordering, while {Tb, Dy} 14 {Co, Ni} 3 Al 3 show field sensitive pure antiferromagnetic ordering with field induced slight ferromagnetism. Heat capacity measurements (in zero applied magnetic field and field of 50 kOe) confirm metamagnetic-like transitions of Tb 14 Ni 3 Al 3 and Dy 14 Ni 3 Al 3 .© 2018 Elsevier B.V. The magnetic properties of Ba 3 TiRu 2 O 9 , whose crystal structure is based on stacked triangular planar lattices of M 2 O 9 dimers and single MO 6 octahedra, are reported. The system is magnetically disturbed by a substantial amount of Ti/Ru chemical disorder. The Weiss temperature and effective magnetic moment were found to be −29.5 K and 1.82 μ B /f.u. respectively, and a bifurcation in the zero field cooled and field cooled magnetic susceptibility is observed below 4.7 K, suggesting that this is a compositionally-disordered spin-glass system. The material is a semiconductor with an activation energy for charge transport of approximately 0.14 eV.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The preparation, sintering and low-temperature physical properties of four kinds of ytterbium sulfides (η-Yb 2 S 3 , ε-Yb 2 S 3 , Yb 3 S 4 and YbS) were systematically investigated. The suitable sintering processes were ensured for each ytterbium sulfide. SEM results suggested the sintered ytterbium sulfides had high dense. The measured susceptibility and magnetization of ytterbium sulfides suggested Yb was mainly trivalent in η-Yb 2 S 3 and ε-Yb 2 S 3 . Moreover, the magnetroresistivity of η-Yb 2 S 3 and YbS shows semiconductor behavior. The resistivity of orthorhombic η-Yb 2 S 3 is consistent with Kondo-like characteristic (logarithmic increase with decreasing temperature), while the ρ(T) behavior of YbS is contrast to the Kondo-like behavior. The contribution of electron, lattice and magnetism to heat capacity of ytterbium sulfides was analyzed. For η-Yb 2 S 3 , Yb 3 S 4 and YbS, the crystal electron field (CEF) ground state is a Kramers doublet while for ε-Yb 2 S 3 it changed to quartet (Γ 8 ). Chemical composition and crystal structure had strong influence on the heat capacity of lanthanide sesquisulfides.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. At the present time there is a requirement to identify new antiferromagnetic alloys or compounds which might be suitable for the production of exchange bias systems. The phenomenon of exchange bias remains crucial for the operation of all read heads in hard disk drives and also has potential for use in magnetic random access memory (MRAM) systems. There is also an increasing interest in the use of antiferromagnets themselves in spintronic devices. Generally for applications the alloy IrMn is used, however given that Iridium is one of the rarest, and therefore most expensive elements on Earth, there is a search for alternative materials. In this paper we report on a study of the compound MnN in terms of its thermal stability. We have produced polycrystalline films of this compound with sub 10 nm grains and examined the thermal stability in layers of thicknesses of up to 30 nm. Using thermal activation studies we have determined a room temperature value of the anisotropy constant of this compound in a tetragonal structure of up to (6.3 ± 0.3) × 10 6 erg/cm 3 . The antiferromagnetic grains can be aligned by thermal annealing at an optimum temperature of 380 K. Above this temperature the magnetic properties deteriorate possibly due to nitrogen desorption.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. In this study, monolayer (ML)- and superlattice (SL)-diluted magnetic GaGdAs semiconductors are fabricated, and their electronic states are analyzed by X-ray absorption spectrum (XAS) and magnetic circular dichroism (MCD) by comparing with the values observed in case of macroscopic magnetization. The Gd magnetic moment per atom that was obtained from MCD exhibited a lower value than that obtained from a superconducting quantum interference device (SQUID) and tended to be larger in the SL structure as compared to the ML structure. We further observed that the Gd magnetic moment was enhanced by more than several tens of μ B because of increasing carrier density by Si doping. The transmission electron microscopy images revealed dark regions with diameters of 2–3 nm, which were indicative of the high concentrations of Gd that further resulted in the formation of zincblend GaGdAs particles.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The La 0.5 Pr 0.5 Cr 1− x Fe x O 3 (x = 0, 0.1, 0.3 and 0.5) ceramics are synthesized by a citric acid sol-gel method. The crystal structure, morphology, chemical composition and magnetic properties are studied. The X-ray diffraction patterns show that the ceramics crystalize in orthorhombic structure with space group Pnma. The Rietveld refinement results indicate that the lattice parameters get larger with the increase of Fe 3+ doping. By means of magnetic measurements, negative magnetization in positive magnetic field is obtained with the decrease of temperature and positive exchange bias effect is observed after field cooling process in La 0.5 Pr 0.5 CrO 3 . When doping with Fe 3+ at the Cr 3+ sites, the negative magnetization disappears and the positive exchange bias effect transforms to negative. Meanwhile, the negative exchange bias field gradually decreases and vanishes when the doping value of x reaches 0.5. Based on the positive exchange bias effect, an abnormal magnetic switching phenomenon is obtained without changing the direction of the external field after field cooling process.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. We measured absorption spectra of transitions 5 I 8 → 5 F 2 , 5 F 3 in Ho 3+ ion in the HoFe 3 (BO 3 ) 4 single crystal at temperature 2 K as a function of magnetic field 0–65 kOe directed along a and c axes. The spectra were decomposed to the Lorentz shape components and magnetic field dependences of their parameters: position, intensity and line width, were obtained. Substantial difference between dependences of the energy and intensity of the transitions on magnetic field was revealed. So, the abrupt changes of the electron transition energies were mainly observed at the reorientation magnetic phase transitions in the crystal. A number of singularities in the magnetic field dependences of the electron transition intensities were revealed both at the reorientation transitions and outside of them. The singularities in the average intensities of transitions into multiplets at the reorientation magnetic transitions are due to the changes of the odd part of the crystal field, responsible for the allowance of f-f transitions, and also are due to the changes of the magnetic state. The singularities in behavior of intensity of each separate transition are due to the local even distortions in the excited states, which mix the electron states.© 2018We study in this paper the phase transition in superlattices formed by alternate magnetic and ferroelectric layers, by the use of Monte Carlo simulation. We study effects of temperature, external magnetic and electric fields, magnetoelectric coupling at the interface on the phase transition. Magnetic layers in this work are modeled as thin films of simple cubic lattice with Heisenberg spins. Electrical polarizations of ±1 are assigned at simple cubic lattice sites in the ferroelectric layers. The transition temperature, the layer magnetizations, the layer polarizations, the susceptibility, the internal energy, the interface magnetization and polarization are calculated. The layer magnetizations and polarizations as functions of temperature are shown for various coupling interactions and field values. Mean-field theory is also presented and compared to MC results.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. Inspired by the experimental discovery, the effects of core-shell distributions of RE on the properties of the dual-main-phase rare earth-iron-boron (RE-Fe-B) magnets are investigated by micromagnetic simulation. In the dual-main-phase (DMP) magnets containing two main phases of hard magnetic Ce-free and Ce-rich RE 2 Fe 14 B, the nucleation tends to occur in the Ce-rich RE 2 Fe 14 B grains due to their low anisotropy field. The coercivity of dual-main-phase magnets without core-shell distributions of RE is much lower than that of the single-main-phase (SMP) magnets with the same nominal composition, though the Ce-rich RE 2 Fe 14 B grains are dipolar coupled by the Ce-free RE 2 Fe 14 B grains. The formation of core-shell distributions of RE main phase in DMP magnets adjusts their magnetic behavior. The appearance of the Nd-rich shells in the Ce-rich RE 2 Fe 14 B phases due to Nd diffusion will retard the nucleation of reversal domain because of the increased anisotropy field of the grain surface. The demagnetizing field of the Nd 2 Fe 14 B phases is also decreased by the shell structure, which further reduces the possibility of the nucleation. On the other hand, the formation of the shells by Ce diffusion in the Nd 2 Fe 14 B phase will promote the nucleation of reversal domain due to the reduced surface anisotropy field. It can increase the demagnetizing field of the Ce-rich RE 2 Fe 14 B phases and therefore increase the possibility of the nucleation. Hence, good magnetic properties can be only obtained in the DMP magnets with more Nd diffusion and less Ce diffusion, which is consistent with the experimental results.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.To study the effect of a pulsed magnetic field on the residual stress of 20Cr2Ni4A steel, the material was treated for 120 s with a 1 T pulsed magnetic field. The microstructure of the materials was studied using residual stress measurement, transmission electron microscopy (TEM) observations, X-ray diffraction analysis, and magnetic domain observations. Experimental results revealed that the residual stress of the 1 T sample was reduced by 14.26% compared with that of the 0 T sample. The results show that the residual stress is effectively reduced by the pulsed magnetic field. The mechanism of magnetic field action involves improving the flexibility of dislocation movement, proliferating and entangling the dislocation structure, and inducing slippage. During the pulsed magnetic treatment, the labyrinth domain with larger stress changes to a lamellar domain with less stress and the residual stress decreases.© 2019 Elsevier B.V. The structure evolution of some soft magnetic metastables alloys are scanned and studied through some room temperature properties changes employing only one sample submitted to successive heat treatments. These are monitored by changes occurring in room temperature magnetic properties (data obtained from hysteresis loop at 50 Hz and relative permeability at 10 kHz), room and high temperature electrical resistance and dilatometric measurements, all taken simultaneously. The method is applied to study and compare the structural evolution steps towards the most desirable soft magnetic properties of three different soft magnetic alloys of our production: an amorphous alloy of composition Fe 81 B 14 Si 5 , and two nanocrystalline, a Finemet™ (Fe 73.5 Si 16.5 B 6 Cu 1 Nb 3 ) and a Nanomet™ (Fe 81 Si 6 P 4 Cu 1 B 8 ) – type alloys. The technique reproduces the results obtained by traditional methods, and has the advantage of using fewer measuring instruments, sample tests, less time and human resources. In addition, all the experimental data present a high level of detail. With the results obtained, a large quantity of magnetic, electrical and dilatometric data is available to discern the possible applications of these three materials.© 2019We systematically compared the local and nonlocal spin Seebeck effect (SSE) in YIG/Pt nano-thick films. Their dependences on heating current, magnetic field and temperature were studied. Both the local and nonlocal SSE are quadratically related to heating current while their dependences on the magnetic field are distinguishing. The local SSE is seldomly affected but the nonlocal one is obviously suppressed by high magnetic field. Besides, local SSE gradually enhances to maximum around 150 K and then quickly decreases. However, nonlocal SSE monotonously grows up from 50 to 300 K. The transport properties of the associated spin current in local and nonlocal SSE are found to be different which is possibly due to that the local signal is directly related to the temperature difference at the interface whereas the nonlocal one is mainly driven by the spin chemical potential.© 2019 Elsevier B.V.For a triangular graphene quantum dot with up to two electrons filled in the degenerate shell, we calculate the eigenstates as functions of an electric field, using the tight-binding method, the Hartree-Fock method and the exact-diagonalization method. When the electric field is weaker, the eigenstates of the degenerate shell mix with each other. As the electric field becomes stronger, the eigenstates of the degenerate shell tend to be stable. We focus on the evolution of both the ground levels and the total spins in the electric field. Based on analyzing the chemical potentials, we present the control scheme of the shell filling and the total spin by the electric field. The results support the possibility to use the system as a spin memory device or an electron-transport switch.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. The investigations carried out in this paper show the influence of cutoff dipole interaction radius and dilution on the basic thermodynamic characteristics of the kagome artificial spin ice with free boundary conditions. The phase transition disappearance at the dipole interaction radius limitation was shown in our previous study by Shevchenko et al. (2017). This work continues this study and answers the question of the coordination spheres numbers that must be taken into account, in order not to lose the basic collective phenomena. The answer is at least three coordination spheres with 14 nearest neighbors must be taken into account for kagome artificial spin ice. Restriction to a smaller cutoff radius leads to significant changes in the thermodynamic behavior of the main characteristics of the system. An increase of the interaction radius shifts the phase transition temperature to the low-temperature area. The effects of dilution on kagome artificial spin ice were also investigated. It is shown that the phase transition occurs up to p c ≈0.35 dilution concentrations, that well coincides with the Sykes and Essam theory. Further dilution leads to the phase transition disappearance.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. We report a detailed density functional theory investigation for ACr 2 As 2 (A = Sr, Ba), which are isostructural to their iron counterparts AFe 2 As 2 , parent compounds of iron-based superconductors. The calculated results for these two compounds are quite similar, indicating that the A site ions have only a relatively small impact on the magnetic and electronic structures. It is found that both ACr 2 As 2 favor an itinerant antiferromagnetic ground state with G-type spin arrangement, and possess a sizable magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy with the easy axis directed along the c axis perpendicular to the CrAs plane. Furthermore, the optimized lattice constants and internal atomic parameter of ACr 2 As 2 are found to be sensitive to magnetic ordering, which implies the presence of a magnetostructural coupling effect.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe light-illumination stability of amorphous InGaZnO Thin Film Transistors (a-IGZO TFTs) in oxygen and moisture ambience was in-depth characterized by both current-voltage (I-V) and capacitance-voltage (C-V) measurements. With the illuminated light wavelength decreasing, both I-V and C-V curves shifted negatively. When the ambient oxygen content or moisture level increased, the a-IGZO TFTs exhibited more stable properties under light illumination. A qualitative model was proposed to explain the related physical mechanism. The higher oxygen content or moisture level benefited the light-illumination-induced oxygen adsorption at back channels of a-IGZO TFTs and prevented the formation of oxygen vacancies (VO) in channel layers; the VO variation with the light illumination became more difficult and hence led to better light-illumination stability of the corresponding TFT devices.© 2018 Elsevier LtdTo achieve high pattern recognition accuracy by using an analog input voltage scheme, we have confirmed that the conductance linearity (CL), conductance uniformity (CU) and multi-levels conductance (MLC) characteristics are the key factors for synapse devices. We analyze the CL, CU and MLC characteristics of WOx-based resistive device (RD) for hardware neural network applications. Our findings show that excellent CL of RD is achieved by engineering the WOx composition and Schottky barrier height. Further, by adjusting top electrode materials, the RD exhibits improved CU due to the uniform W-WOx contact leading to discrete MLC states of RD with varying the device area. Finally, we have successfully demonstrated the potential of WOx-based RD for synapse application of hardware inference system through neural network simulation and the hardware implementation.© 2018 Elsevier LtdOrganic Light-Emitting Diodes (OLEDs) with graphene oxide (GO) as hole injection layer (HIL) have been demonstrated. The OLED devices possess structures of ITO/GO(x nm)/NPB(40 nm)/Alq3(70 nm)/LiF(0.5 nm)/Al(100 nm), it is found that as the thickness of GO-HIL is a 3.6 nm an optimal current efficiency of 4.4 cd/A and a brightness of 15,770 cd/m2 were achieved, respectively, which are higher than that of reference device without GO-HIL layer (1 cd/A and 4735 cd/m2). We reason that the improvement of electroluminescent (EL) intensity would be ascribed to the smoothed ITO surface and the reduced hole-injection barrier due to the high work function of GO layer. In terms of the impendence spectroscopy analysis of hole-only devices (HODs), for electrical character of device is mainly depends on the bulk resistance of the HODs. As a result, the optimized EL device offers fallen bulk resistances, finally, the improvement in EL performance was obviously realized.© 2018 The AuthorsWe report on the electrical properties of the AlN/4H-SiC interface using capacitance- and conductance-voltage (CV and GV) analysis of AlN/SiC MIS capacitors. The crystalline AlN layers are made by hot wall MOCVD. CV analysis at room temperature reveals an order of magnitude lower density of interface traps at the AlN/SiC interface than at nitrided SiO2/SiC interfaces. Electron trapping in bulk traps within the AlN is significant when the MIS capacitors are biased into accumulation resulting in a large flatband voltage shift towards higher gate voltage. This process is reversible and the electrons are fully released from the AlN layer if depletion bias is applied at elevated temperatures. Current-voltage (IV) analysis reveals that the breakdown electric field intensity across the AlN dielectric is 3–4 MV/cm and is limited by trap assisted leakage. By depositing an additional SiO2 layer on top of the AlN layer, it is possible to increase the breakdown voltage of the MIS capacitors significantly without having much impact on the quality of the AlN/SiC interface.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this study, the surface modification process involving the embedding of Au or Pd monometallic and Au–Pd bimetallic alloy nanoparticles within porous silicon-based gas sensor was investigated. Porous silicon layer (P-si) was prepared by photo electrochemical etching (PECE) by using 635 nm diode laser of 25 mW/cm2 intensity. AuNPs/P-si, PdNPs/P-si and Au–PdNPs/P-si hetero structures were prepared by ion reduction process. This was materialized dipping fresh P-si in a salt solution containing HAuCl4 and PdCl2; mixed at ratio 1:1 for about (1.2, 5 and 2 min), respectively. The heterostructures were investigated by utilizing scanning electron microscopy (SEM), FTIR analysis, X-ray diffraction (XRD) and energy dispersive X-ray analysis (EDS). Efficient gas sensing process was recorded for modified porous silicon (P-si) gas sensor with smallest bimetallic Au–Pd nanoparticles size. Considerable improvements were noticed in sensitivity and temporal response after incorporating the bimetallic Au–Pd nanoparticles into the silicon matrix as compared to bare P-si and monometallic nanoparticles gas sensors due to the high specific surface area and the higher value of the barrier height of Au–PdNPs/P-si hetero structures.© 2018The electrical characteristics of top select gate transistor (TSG) has been investigated in vertical channel three dimensional NAND flash memory. TSG shows wider initial Vth distribution as compared with memory cells, and even worse after erase. By experimental analysis and TCAD simulation, a physical model based on grain boundary (GB) interface traps is proposed to explain the mechanism. Grain boundary traps in offset region between bit line contact and TSG can induce a higher local potential barrier in channel, which results in higher TSG initial Vth. Besides, random GB position within offset region, leads to worse variation of TSG initial Vth. Furthermore, the local potential barrier in offset region of TSG cannot be reduced by erase operation, leading to worse Vth distribution after erase. According to proposed model, two methods with optimization of offset doping energy and poly-Si GB trap passivation condition are proposed to achieve tight distribution and improved erase uniformity.© 2018 Elsevier LtdCompact modeling of the 4H-SiC IGBT switching characteristics in circuits is investigated, with a focus on reproducing the temperature-dependent switching performance. For this purpose the HiSIM-IGBT compact model for circuit simulation, previously developed for Si as well as SiC IGBTs, is extended by replacing the physical Si material parameters with those of SiC. Using this extended model, good reproduction of measured 4H-SiC IGBT switching waveforms at room temperature has been confirmed. However, substantial deviations are observed between measured and simulated switching characteristics at higher temperatures. The main reason is identified in the reported analysis as the temperature dependence of the carrier trapping, which strongly influences the characteristics of the MOSFET part in the IGBT. This carrier trap effect is phenomenologically modeled by a threshold voltage shift as well as a charge modification induced at the gate oxide. An important further effect is induced by the temperature dependence of the carrier lifetime in the base region, which mainly affects the bipolar IGBT part and increases the switching-tail current at higher temperatures. It is demonstrated that the newly developed compact model can accurately reproduce the measured SiC IGBT switching performances for a wide range of temperature variations, which enables a reliable and accurate design of SiC-IGBT circuits.© 2018We demonstrate how the configuration and magnitude of a magnetic field, applied during magnetron sputtering of a NiFe/IrMn bilayer, influence the magnetic properties of the structure, such as hysteresis loop shape, coercivity, and exchange bias. Furthermore, we illustrate that it is possible to create a stepwise hysteresis loop in the sample's region with the highest field gradient. The found features can be used for future sensor applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Interfacing topological insulators (TI) with ferromagnetic (FM) layers is a promising route towards the next generation of ultra-low power spintronic devices based on charge-to-spin current conversion. Here, we present the Fe/Sb2Te3 interface structure, its chemical composition and magnetic properties. Thin films (30 nm) of the topological insulator Sb2Te3 were synthesized by Metal Organic Chemical Vapor Deposition (MOCVD) at room temperature on Si/SiO2 substrates, then capped with a 54Fe(10 nm)/57Fe(1 nm) bilayer by Pulsed Laser Deposition (PLD) to allow interface-sensitive Conversion Electron Mössbauer Spectroscopy (CEMS). X-ray diffraction (XRD) showed the polycrystalline nature of both the Fe and Sb2Te3 layers. X-ray reflectivity (XRR) identified a non-trivial layered structure with the presence of an intermixed layer at the Fe/Sb2Te3 interface. Time-of-Flight Secondary Ion Mass Spectrometry (ToF-SIMS) confirmed the partial elemental interdiffusion between the Fe and Sb2Te3 layers. Interface-sensitive CEMS evidenced that about a half of the 1-nm-thick 57Fe layer in contact with Sb2Te3 coordinates ferromagnetically, whereas the remaining paramagnetic fraction preferentially bonds with Te. The Fe/Sb2Te3 system was shown to have a far from sharp interface, exhibiting a marked chemical reactivity already at room temperature. The tendency of Fe to preferentially bond with the chalcogenide element of topological insulators has been previously observed for the interface with Bi2Se3 and Bi2Te3, thus suggesting a possible universal behavior at the interface between Fe and chalcogenide-based TI.© 2018 Elsevier LtdOrganic solar cells (OSCs) made from PTB7:PC70BM, with different thicknesses of a conjugated electrolyte PFN (0, 5, 7, 10, and 15 nm) used as the cathode buffer layers, were fabricated partially in air. OSCs with 10 nm of PFN were the most efficient in experimental tests, at 7.41%. Numerical simulations of the cells were also performed using the physics-based Silvaco/ATLAS CAD simulator, which describe the OSCs using the metal-insulator-metal (MIM) model. Simulations were used to determine the optimum values of PFN thickness for achieving high overall performance, which lies in the region from 5 to 10 nm.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ultra-rapidly annealed (heating rate >104 K/s, annealing time <1 s) Fe-rich nanocrystalline soft magnetic materials with a nominal composition of Fe100−xBx and Fe87−yB13My where x = 12, 13, 14, y = 1, 2 and M = Cu, Ni (HiB-Nanoperm) have recently been demonstrated with a saturation magnetic polarization (Js) up to 1.92 T and a low coercivity (Hc) of less than 8 A/m. In this study the AC core loss (Pcm) is estimated for HiB-Nanoperm at 50, 400 and 1000 Hz and is compared with existing amorphous, nanocrystalline and conventionally crystalline (Fe-Si) materials. The Pcm of HiB-Nanoperm at 1.5 T, 50 Hz is demonstrated to be 5–15% that of Fe-3 wt% Si. In specific, Fe86B13Cu1 displays losses that are 30% that of Fe-6.5 wt% Si steel while also possessing a 5% larger Js. For maximum magnetic polarization (Jm) values greater than 1.5 T this same composition also exhibits some of the lowest core losses seen from all Fe-based nanocrystalline alloys across the frequencies tested in this study. Core loss separation and an estimation of the anomaly factor (η) for selected HiB-Nanoperm alloys is also undertaken and compared with a Fe-based amorphous alloy. The η of HiB-Nanoperm is seen to be lower than that of Fe-based amorphous alloy and is also observed to be positively correlated with saturation magnetostriction. The low core loss of HiB-Nanoperm is attributed to a reduced anomalous loss which may be brought about by the moderate magnetostriction of this alloy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A multistep procedure, employing akaganeite FeO(OH,Cl) as a precursor, was developed for the preparation of rod-like maghemite particles for medical applications. At first, akaganeite rods with length of several hundred nm and width of ≈85 nm were prepared under hydrothermal conditions and were subsequently coated with mesoporous silica. Such coating enabled to maintain the shape of rods during the following steps that involved structural transformation of akaganeite to maghemite, i. e. γ-Fe2O3. Then the original protective coating was removed by alkaline leaching, bare maghemite rods were isolated, and their structure and ferrimagnetic order were characterized by X-ray diffraction, TEM inspection, Mössbauer spectroscopy and SQUID magnetometry. The magnetization of the bare maghemite rods, that were formed by elongated clusters of ≈10–20 nm crystallites, made 47.0 and 41.7 Am2/kg in magnetic field of 3 T at 5 K and 300 K, respectively. The hysteresis loops of both the bare and coated products at 300 K and ZFC/FC studies showed that the maghemite particles were largely blocked at room temperature in spite of the small size of crystallites. Finally, the particles were equipped with standard silica coating for biological studies. An evaluation of cytotoxicity of this silica-coated product was performed on two cell lines, namely A549 and MCF-7. The viability of cells incubated with particles at the concentration of 0.10, 0.21 and 0.42 mmol(Fe)/L was determined after 24 h and 48 h of incubation, and the values normalized to the viability of negative control were generally higher than 95%. Moreover, the real-time monitoring of cell adhesion, proliferation, and cytotoxicity by an xCELLigence system during 72 h of the incubation with particles revealed only some decrease of the cell index for the MCF-7 cells at the high concentration.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the influence of the Mn atomic concentration (at.%) on the nanostructures formation and magnetic properties of GaAs:Mn layers grown by Molecular Beam Epitaxy at a relatively high substrate temperature of 530 °C varying the nominal Mn at.% content from 0.01 to 0.2. It is shown that by modifying the Mn at.% different kind of nanostructures, ranging from 2D (such as islands and surface corrugation) to 3D microleave- and nanowire-like arrays, form on the surface layer. Samples produced with Mn contents ranging from 0.02 to 0.20 at.% show a significant room temperature ferromagnetic response that is attributed to the formation of MnAs nanocrystals as confirmed from X-ray diffraction analysis and magnetization measurements. The influence of MnAs clusters on the formation of the nanostructures observed is discussed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Al-substituted nickel ferrite NiAlxFe2−xO4, where x = (0.00, 0.05, 0.10 and 0.15) synthesized through chemical co-precipitation method were investigated for their structural, morphological, optical and magnetic characterization. Al3+ substitution plays a significant role in the properties of the ferrite nanoparticles. The TGA showed three mass losses, whereas DTA resulted in three endothermic peaks. Rietveld refined XRD revealed the development of single phase cubic spinel with crystallite sizes around 28–36 nm for aluminum substituted samples. TEM and SEM analysis showed the monodispersion and cubic-like nanostructure. The room temperature infra-red spectra showed the features of higher and lower energy bands detected at ν1 ∼589–595 cm−1 and ν2 ∼405–409 cm−1, respectively corresponded to octahedral vibration (O-band) and tetrahedral (T-band) complexes that also verify the creation of spinels ferrites. The Raman spectra showed five Raman active modes (A1g + Eg + 3T2g) which are estimated in the spinel structure. The optical study showed that the compounds have an optical band gap between 1.60 and 1.89 eV. Mössbauer spectra elucidate the nature of the phases and cation distribution. From the hysteresis loop, it is clear that the synthesized samples can be control, for the NiAlxFe2-xO4 nanoferrites. The photocatalytic activity of Al-substituted nickel ferrite were studied based on the degradation of methyl orange as a model compound, where the results showed that NiAl0.15Fe 1.85O4 a good photocatalytic activity.© 2018 Perovskite ErCr 1− x Fe x O 3 polycrystalline samples at nanoscale were synthesized using sol-gel auto-combustion process. The structural studies confirmed that except for x = 1.0, all the other samples, exhibited single-phase orthorhombic symmetry. The impedance data was collected in the frequency range of 1 Hz–1 MHz, and in the temperature range of 27–600 °C. Room temperature magnetic measurements were performed under maximum applied field of upto 10 kOe. All the samples, except for x = 1.0 exhibited giant dielectric behaviour (>10 3 ) in the low frequency region at room temperature due to the grain boundary effects (Maxwell-Wogner polarization). Impendence measurements for all the samples indicated the existence of negative temperature coefficient of resistance and non-Debye behaviour. Magnetic hysteresis studies demonstrated a weak ferromagnetic nature for all the samples, except for x = 1.0 and for x = 1.0, anti-ferromagnetic behaviour was noticed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The perovskite Pr2FeMnO6 has been synthesized by citrate-gel combustion method. The material has an orthorhombic crystal structure with Pbnm space group. The presence of Fe3+ and Mn3+ cations in the material are confirmed by XPS analysis. A magnetization sign reversal is observed for the material at low-temperatures in low applied magnetic fields. When the applied field or temperature is increased, the negative magnetization got diminished. Such a sign reversal of magnetization is observed for the material as a result of the interaction between components of paramagnetic Pr3+ and Mn3+ moments opposite to the component of the ferromagnetic Fe3+ moment or the anti-aligned Fe-rich regions to that of Mn-rich regions containing with Pr3+. Negative exchange bias is also exhibited by Pr2FeMnO6 below 200 K which can be ascribed to the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction and magnetic exchange anisotropy. A high-temperature magnetic transition at TC = 576 K is identified for the material from the thermomagnetic data. From the detailed analysis of the thermomagnetic data, the presence of ferromagnetic short-range correlations is observed far above the TC, which suggests a Griffiths-like phase with Griffiths temperature at TG = 681 K.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Using density functional theory, the ground state properties, magnetocrystalline energy, and tetragonal magnetostriction λ001 for Fe-Ga alloys with A2, D03 and L12 structures were calculated. It was found that the equilibrium lattice parameters for every structure increase with increasing Ga content. The magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy (MAE) was projected into the tetragonal distortion – Ga concentration diagram, according to which the MAE reveals an alternating character. For Fe78.125Ga21.875, the largest value of tetragonal magnetostriction λ001 was found.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the transverse magneto-optic Kerr effect (TMOKE) of magnetoplasmonic crystals grown on top of commercial optical disks. From full angle-resolved scans we can identify Wood's anomalies related to the excitation of plasmons of different orders. From these maps we also detect a wide range of wavelengths and angles of incidence for which the TMOKE signal is increased due to the interaction of light with surface propagating plasmons. Remarkably, conditions are established for unexpectedly large responses at quasi-normal incidence, where, by fundamental symmetry reasons, the intrinsic TMOKE should be vanishingly small. The key towards this unexpected outcome is to engineer the geometry of magnetoplasmonic crystals, so that first-order plasmon dispersion lines run up towards quasi-normal angles of incidence. These results provide general rules for magneto-optic enhancement and, in particular, show the potential of standard commercial disks as platforms for enhanced magneto-optic devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate a classical analogue of electromagnetically induced transparency (EIT) metamaterial that consisting of anomalous split resonance ring and cross-shaped wire with simulations and experiments. The transmission spectrum is tunable with the incident angles varies from 0° to 60° in different modes. Under normal incident wave, the metamaterial leads to polarization insensitive EIT-like effect. The distributions of surface current at peaks and dips of transmission have been analyzed. Furthermore, the group index presents maximum at the transparency peak, which verifies the slow light effect. The proposed metamaterial could provide an avenue for various applications, such as refractive index sensor and microwave switch.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We utilize variable-temperature, variable-frequency magneto-optical transverse magnetic susceptibility technique to study the static and dynamical magnetic properties of a thin-film CoO/Permalloy bilayer. Our measurements demonstrate that in the studied system, the directional asymmetry of the hysteresis loop is associated mainly with the difference in the reversal mechanisms between the two reversed states of magnetization stabilized by the exchange-induced uniaxial anisotropy. The latter is found to be much larger than the exchange-induced unidirectional anisotropy of the ferromagnet. We also observe an abrupt variation of the frequency-dependent imaginary part of ac susceptibility near the exchange bias blocking temperature, consistent with the magnetic freezing transition inferred from the previous time-domain studies of magnetic aging in similar systems. The developed measurement approach enables precise characterization of the dynamical and static characteristics of thin-film magnetic heterostructures that can find applications in reconfigurable magnonic and neuromorphic circuits.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of the interface anisotropy on the demagnetization progress and magnetic properties in Nd2Fe14B/α-Fe exchange-coupled multilayers with parallel crystalline anisotropy has been investigated within a micromagnetic framework. A set of equations satisfied by the angle between the magnetization and the applied field, as well as the formula for the nucleation field, have been derived analytically. The nucleation field goes up linearly with the interface anisotropy constants varying from −1 erg/cm2 to 1 erg/cm2 in a wide thickness range, with an amplitude up to 13%. The microscopic hysteresis loops, the evolution of the domain walls, the macroscopic demagnetization curves and the energy products are given by numerical calculations. The results indicate that the interface anisotropy affects not only the nucleation field and the maximal magnetic energy product, but also the pinning field or the coercivity. Positive interface anisotropy evidently enhances the pinning field or the coercivity, however, negative interface anisotropy obviously deteriorates the maximal energy product. These results suggest that a positive interface anisotropy should be preferred experimentally.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The LaFe11.2Si1.8/Ta composite materials with Ta contents of 4, 8 and 12 wt% were fabricated. The crystal structure, component, magnetocaloric property and thermal conductivity of the composite materials were detected. It is found that the addition of Ta does not change the Curie temperature and magnetic phase transition feature of LaFe11.2Si1.8/Ta composite materials. The maximal magnetic entropy change (−ΔSM max) are 11.17, 10.71 and 10.56 J/kg·K for Ta contents of 4, 8 and 12 wt% under a magnetic field change of 0–7 T, respectively. Correspondingly, the values of relative cooling power (RCP) are 394.55, 402.91 and 408.20 J/kg. The thermal conductivity (λ) improves remarkably with increasing Ta content, and the values of λ are evaluated to be 4.49(6), 5.56(3) and 7.10(2) W/m·K for LaFe11.2Si1.8/Ta with Ta contents of 4, 8 and 12 wt% at their own Curie temperatures, respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have studied the magnetism of crystalline Cd1-xZnxCr2Se4 spinels with (0.35 ≤ x ≤ 0.55) under magnetic field up to 15 T. The total magnetic moment, Curie temperature, lattice parameter and exchange integrals were found to decrease with Zn substitution. Ab-initio calculations carried out using full potential augmented plane wave (FP-LAPW) method were performed to study the magnetic, and electronic structure using generalized gradient approximation (GGA) and the modified Becke-Johnson (mBJ) to correct the gap's energy. The obtained results were in good agreement with the experimental ones. It is shown that there is a competition between ferromagnetic (FM) and antiferromagnetic (AFM) interactions: the super-exchange mechanism slightly increases the AFM contribution and keeps the FM the dominant mechanism in this range of substitution. From the density of states, we demonstrate that the system keeps the half-metallic state for the composition range 0.125 ≤ x ≤ 0.55 with 100% spin polarization. Our results highlight that it is possible to obtain a half-metallic semiconductor with tunable magnetic state which is promising for applications in spintronics.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Theoretical and experimental studies present that metal halogens in MX3 forms can show very interesting electronic and magnetic properties in their bulk and monolayer phases. Many MX3 materials have layered structures in their bulk phases, while RuBr3 and RuI3 have one-dimensional chains in plane. In this paper, we show that these metal halogens can also form two-dimensional layered structures in the bulk phase similar to other metal halogens, and cleavage energy values confirm that the monolayers of RuX3 can be possible to be synthesized. We also find that monolayers of RuX3 prefer ferromagnetic spin orientation in the plane for Ru atoms. Their ferromagnetic ground state, however, changes to antiferromagnetic zigzag state after U is included. Calculations using PBE + U with SOC predict indirect band gap of 0.70 eV and 0.32 eV for the optimized structure of RuBr3 and RuI3, respectively. Calculation based on the Monte Carlo simulations reveal interesting magnetic properties of RuBr3, such as large Curie temperature against RuI3, both in bulk and monolayer cases. Moreover, as a result of varying exchange couplings between neighboring magnetic moments, magnetic properties of RuBr3 and RuI3 can undergo drastic changes from bulk to monolayer. We hope our findings can be useful to attempt to fabricate the bulk and monolayer of RuBr3 and RuI3.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the Ce-Fe-B and (La, Ce)-Fe-B strips were prepared by strip-casting technique and the multi-phases RE-Fe-B (RE = La, Ce, Pr and Nd) magnets were fabricated by dual-alloy method with (Pr, Nd)-Fe-B alloy. The effects of La substitution for Ce on the microstructure of Ce-Fe-B strip-casting alloy were investigated, especially for the formability of 2:14:1 phase. The results showed that the proportion of RE2Fe14B phase significantly increased from 0.0% to 48.0% and the CeFe2 phase drastically decreased from 67.1% to 38.1% with La substitution for 35 wt% Ce in Ce-Fe-B strip-casting alloy. It could be attributed to the enlarged temperature gap between the formation of 2:14:1 phase and Ce2Fe17 phase, which was beneficial for the formability of 2:14:1 phase. Owing to the rise of the proportion of the 2:14:1 phase, the remanence (Br) and maximum energy product ((BH)max) of dual-alloy magnets increased from 11.49 kGs, 28.68 MGOe to 12.38 kGs, 34.76 MGOe with respect to 32.0 wt% Ce or La-Ce substitution content for Pr-Nd, respectively. Meanwhile, the coercivity (Hcj) slightly decreased from 6.49 kOe to 6.16 kOe, which was caused by the decrease of HA (54.09 kOe → 42.37 kOe) and the deterioration of microstructure of the magnet. This work indicated that the cost-effective La-contained RE-Fe-B permanent magnets could be prepared by dual-alloy method.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ce-Fe-B spark plasma sintered (SPSed) magnets prepared with different ratio of alloys of Ce-Fe-B and Pr-Nd-Fe-B by dual alloy method are investigated in this paper. As expected, the remanent magnetization Jr, coercivity Hci and maximum energy product (BH)max of SPSed magnets increase obviously with increasing weight percentage of Pr-Nd-Fe-B alloy. The magnetic properties of Jr = 0.71 T, Hci = 915 kA/m, (BH)max = 72 kJ/m3 are obtained for the SPSed magnets with 80 wt% Pr-Nd-Fe-B alloy. There are three Curie temperatures in this type magnet, which implies the coexistence of three hard magnetic phases. The second Curie temperature depends on the Pr-Nd-Fe-B content. With increasing Pr-Nd-Fe-B alloy content, the volume fraction and width of coarse grain zone decrease. It is shown by the microstructure analysis that the rare earth elements diffuse during sintering process resulting in the formation of Pr-Nd-Ce-Fe-B hard magnetic phase. The intergranular exchange coupling strength is enhanced with increasing Pr-Nd-Fe-B content. The present research may be a potential reference for further research and development of this type Ce-containing nanocrystalline permanent magnetic materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the impact of Sr-doping on physical properties of the nanocrystalline Ba1-xSrxCo0.9Mn0.1O3-δ (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.5) samples synthesized by using sol–gel method under different annealing temperature. The X-ray diffraction patterns of the nanocrystalline samples annealed at 900 °C show 2H-type hexagonal stacking sequence which consist of one-dimensional chain of face sharing octahedra. With increase in annealing temperature, samples crystallize in mixed 2H + 12H-hexagonal polytypes, exhibiting additional terminal sharing tetrahedra. The magneto-structural properties influenced by annealing temperature under different Sr-doping level have been elaborated using spin model projection and superparamagnetic cluster contribution. The inclusion of 12H-phase showed higher magnetic moment contribution compared with single 2H-phase. The studied nanocrystalline samples show semiconducting-like electrical transport properties. The phase dependent electrical transport properties of the nanocrystalline samples have been studied using variable range hopping and small polaron hopping conduction mechanism. The synthesized samples exhibit moderate negative magnetoresistance for a field change of 5 T in the vicinity of the magnetic ordering. The numerical value of magnetoresistance suppresses with increase in Sr-doping and it shows the 2H-type hexagonal phase dominance. The relation between magnetization and electrical resistivity around the magnetic ordering temperature is well explained using magnetoresistance data and magnetization isotherms.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of HoCo12B6 ferrimagnetic compound are investigated versus the magnetic field, temperature and pressure. The magnetic phase diagram exhibits three remarkable temperatures: the ordering temperature TC, the spin reorientation temperature TSR and the compensation temperature TCOMP at 147 K, 76 K and 47 K respectively. In HoCo12B6 intermetallic system the spontaneous magnetization resulting from the antiparallel coupling of the magnetic moments of Ho and Co sublattices is pressure insensitive at lowest temperatures whereas it decreases with pressure at temperature range above TSR. The mean Co magnetic moment is small (<0.5 µB) in the studied compound and exhibits a weak pressure dependence. In addition, significant pressure effects have been observed on both the spin reorientation transition and the Curie temperatures. A value of dTC/dp = −3.5 ± 0.4 K GPa−1 is dominated by the Co sublattice contribution. The spin reorientation transition temperature is also found to decrease versus pressure dTSR/dp = −4.2 ± 0.4 K GPa−1. The compensation temperature where the Ho and Co sublattices have the same magnitude but opposite direction does not vary significantly with applied pressure in the investigated pressure range (up to 1 GPa). The results of pressure dependence of the magnetic properties are compared to earlier results on other R-Co-B borides. HoCo12B6 compound confirmed the remarkably high volume stability of the magnetic properties of the RCo12B6 compounds with the itinerant character of magnetism and low values of both the TC and magnetization.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report here on the temperature- and field- dependence of resistivity measurements of Nd1−xCdxMnO3 (x = 0 and 0.1) polycrystals and compare them with the magnetization measurements on the same set of samples reported earlier. A transition from an anti-ferromagnetic insulator to a ferromagnetic insulator is observed for x = 0.1. Magnetic entropy change of both the samples around semiconducting to insulating transitions have been estimated using magnetization and resistivity measurements for the first time. The values for x = 0 and 0.1 samples are 45 J·kg−1·K−1 and 63 J·kg−1·K−1 respectively for a magnetic field difference of 5 T indicating an enhancement as increases from x = 0 to 0.1. The activation energy (Ea) and density of states at the Fermi level [N(EF)] are estimated for both the samples using small polaron hopping and two dimensional variable range hopping models respectively. By Cd doping, Ea is reduced from 238.6 meV (for x = 0) to 224.04 meV (for x = 0.1) and N(EF) is increased from 1.47 × 1020 eV−1·cm−3 (for x = 0) to 1.89 × 1020 eV−1·cm−3 (for x = 0.1) thus confirming the enhancement of ferromagnetic and magneto caloric effect features. Such high magnetic entropy change values make these materials useful for magnetic refrigeration.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Mn2Sb is a well-known ferrimagnetic material, which has been investigated thoroughly to understand the effect of doping on its magnetic properties. Present work reports the synthesis of Bi doped Mn2Sb employing arc-melting and melt spinning followed by characterization with a view to establish a correlation in the structure and magnetic properties. Bi doping in Mn2Sb lattice produces a significant change in the latter's magnetic properties, giving rise to a saturation magnetization of 27.2 emu/g (27.2 Am2/Kg) and a high coercivity value of 3.4 kOe (279.2 kA/m), in comparison to Mn2Sb, which has a coercivity of 0.1 kOe (7.96 kA/m). Theoretical studies were carried out to understand the changes in magnetic properties. Ab-initio electronic and atomic structure calculations show that Bi atom occupies equally the MnI and MnII sites and this leads to ferromagnetic ordering, which results in enhancement of the saturation magnetisation. The coercivity mechanism has also been studied in detail; the large coercivity is attributed to the nucleation mechanism achieved via the inclusion of diamagnetic Bi particles in Mn2Sb.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report a systematic study on the magneto-structural transition in Mn-rich Fe-doped Mn-Fe-Ni-Sn(Sb/In) Heusler alloys by keeping the total valence electron concentration (e/a ratio) fixed. The martensitic transition (MT) temperature is found to shift by following a proportional relationship with the e/a ratio of the magnetic elements alone. The magnetic entropy change (ΔSM) across MT for a selected sample (Mn49FeNi40Sn9In) has been estimated from three different measurement methods (isofield magnetization (M) vs temperature (T), isothermal M vs field (H) and heat capacity (HC) vs T). We observed that though the peak value of ΔSM changes with the measurement methods, the broadened shape of the ΔSM–T curves and the corresponding cooling power (∼140 Jkg−1) remains invariant. The equivalent adiabatic temperature change (ΔT) ∼−2.6 K has been obtained from indirect measurements of ΔT. Moreover, an exchange bias field ∼783 Oe at 5 K and a magnetoresistance of −30% are also obtained in one of these materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Al film, which was coated in sintered Nd-Fe-B magnets prepared by magnetron sputtering, was employed for grain boundary diffusion source. Effects of the grain boundary diffusion processes (GBDP) on the microstructure evolution and properties were investigated in detail. Through grain boundary diffusion processes, the highest coercivity of 1184 kA/m and maximum energy product of 238 kJ/m3 could be obtained, increasing by 21.8% and 3.9%, respectively, compared with the initial magnet. Meanwhile, our results showed that fine, uniform and continuous intergranular phase induced by Al diffusion, was the main reason for properties improvement, while a weak ferromagnetic phase and the vague interface between main phase and RE-rich phase should be responsible to the deterioration of coercivity when the diffused temperature exceed 600 °C. Besides, the corrosion resistance of Al-diffused magnets was also greatly improved, owing to the fact that the Al element could promote the electrochemical potential of RE-rich phase and the more thin, continuous intergranular phase would also narrow the corrosion channel.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Fe/(NiZn)Fe2O4 soft magnetic composites (SMCs) were prepared by the co-precipitation method using pure atomised iron powder and chloride as raw materials. The morphology and element content of coated powders were analysed using scanning electron microscopy and energy dispersive spectroscopy. Moreover, we used electron probe micro-analyser, X-ray diffraction and Raman spectrum to systematically investigate the effect of heat treatment temperature in argon on the microstructure of SMCs, including O element distribution, phase formation and internal stress. The results show that by increasing heated temperature, the oxygen content at the boundary of the SMCs increased and the internal stress release of SMCs was more complete. Moreover, non-magnetic FeO would be generated in SMCs when the heat treatment temperature reached 550 °C. We also discussed the relationship of heat treatment temperature and atmosphere with AC magnetic properties of the samples, including permeability, core loss and coercivity. The results indicate that the SMCs annealed at 450 °C in argon had the optimum magnetic performance (µ = 55.8, Pcv = 12.2 kw/m3, Hc = 22.6 A/m). At the heat treatment temperature of 500 °C, the argon-annealed samples presented better magnetic properties and higher frequency stability than air-annealed samples.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The band structure of Fe-N film is studied by angle resolved photoemission spectroscopy. It is found that the 3d band of Fe-N film disappears due to the hybridization of Fe 3d states and N 2p states. The result can account for the less ferromagnetism and conductivity of Fe-N film when compared with those of Fe film. This finding indicates that the high content of nitrogen can significantly change the band structure of iron nitrides, which exceeds the conventional theoretical prediction. The present work may evoke the re-recognization to the effect of coupling of Fe and N, and promote the further research of band structure of iron nitrides.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The diffusion efficiency of DyF3 is significantly enhanced by using a novel stack procedure. In the stack procedure, the magnets place one on top of the other to ensure the contact surface does not expose outside directly. During the diffusion process, DyF3 firstly convertes to NdF3, then NdF3 reacts with trace oxygen in the cavity to form NdOF that makes more F atoms diffuse into magnet, which is detrimental to the enhancement of coercivity. But through the stack diffusion technology, the tight contact between the upper and bottom surface of magnets suppresses the oxidation of NdF3 as much as possible to prevent the formation of NdOF. Thus, less F diffusion into magnets, better Dy distribution and higher coercivity increment are obtained. After 10 h diffusion, the coercivity of magnet under stack diffusion increases from 15.45 kOe to 17.47 kOe with 0.28 wt% Dy consumption and the increment is almost twice that of magnet treated in traditional diffusion.© 2018X-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS) and magnetization of hybrid pyrochlore Eu2-xFexTi2O7 (EFTO) were investigated, where the rare earth Eu (4f) was replaced with transition metal Fe (3d) to introduce competing 4f-3d interactions. It is confirmed that the valence states of Eu and Fe ions are formally trivalent while that of Ti ions are tetravalent (3d0). The analysis yielded that the tetravalent Ti ions occupy octahedral sites with distorted Oh symmetry which is triggered by the presence of vacant 8a anionic site adjacent to TiO6 octahedra. Further study with Fe doping revealed that it essentially reduces the octahedral distortion by introducing anionic disorder (migration of 48f oxygen ions to 8a site). Analysis of O K edge XAS spectra further confirmed the Fe substitution causing the systematic change in the ligand (O2−) coordination of the Ti4+ cations. Interestingly, a new field induced transition at low temperature T* (4 K < T* < 8 K) associated with unusually slow spin relaxation was observed. The transition shifted towards higher temperatures both with increasing applied field and Fe concentration. However, the single ion spin freezing (Tf ∼ 35 K) appears to be largely suppressed with Fe substitution. Moreover, dc magnetization data showed rise of ferromagnetic contribution below 100 K.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ruthenium-doped copper ferriteRu-CuFe2O4nanoparticles (NPs) have been synthesized using a simple and cost-effective wet chemical co-precipitation deposition method. The crystallographic scanning electron microscopy images confirm cubic crystal structure and agglomerated-type surface appearance. The crystallite sizes are 6–24 nm in the range. Dielectric measurement analysis estimates the dielectric constant and loss of Ru-CuFe2O4 NPs. In this connection, dielectric constant and loss are reduced virtue of air annealing for various temperatures. Also, the dielectric loss confirms the relaxation peak. From magnetic measurement results, the coercivity decreases whereas saturation and remanence magnetization are increased. These features have approved the soft magnetic nature in the Ru-CuFe2O4 NPs.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThis paper investigates the gas sensing characteristics of the MOSFET-type sensor having an inkjet-printed WS2 sensing layer. The drain current of the gas sensor increases when NO2 gas is injected into the test chamber since NO2 gas is an oxidizing gas that extracts electrons from the sensing layer. On the contrary, the drain current decreases when H2S gas is injected into the test chamber since H2S gas is a reducing gas that donates electrons to the sensing layer. In both cases, the change of the drain current increases as the gas concentration increases. However, for other gases (NH3 and CO2), the gas sensor has a small change of the drain current. The responses of the gas sensor to 10 ppm NO2, H2S, NH3, and CO2 gases are 15.20%, 7.18%, 1.66%, and 3.02%, respectively. Therefore, the WS2 sensor has a high selectivity for NO2 gas among the four target gases.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Mechanical residual stress induced by manufacturing influences the magnetic behavior of non-grain oriented electrical steels, which are used for producing rotors and stators of electrical machines. The impairment occurs mainly along the cutting line of stator and rotor laminations. A locally resolved assessment of the magnetic material behavior of punched electrical steels is possible by using the neutron grating interferometry. In addition to this in situ measurement method, additional ex-situ measurements allow correlating local domain wall mobility and global magnetic polarization. Four different non-grain oriented electrical steels are investigated in this paper. This includes two sheet thicknesses of 0.35 mm and 0.65 mm both available having silicon contents of 2.30 wt-% as well as 2.74 wt-%. The specimens are produced by wire cutting and by punching using different process parameters, i.e., two relative cutting clearances of 5% and 10% plus a sharp and worn cutting edge wear state. The cutting method's influence on the four different electrical steel's magnetic behavior is discussed with respect to the local polarization distributions at varying magnetic field strengths next to the cutting lines. This novel approach for the first time allows an in situ investigation of altered magnetic properties with respect to the punching induced residual stress along the cutting line. Not only the maximum deterioration of the polarization next to the cutting line but also the extent of the magnetic property deterioration is pointed out. The effect of punching parameter variations is further verified using global magnetic measurements. The knowledge about the local polarization distribution next to the cutting line is critical for an improved development and design of electrical machines.© 2018 Elsevier LtdChitosan, a natural polysaccharide, is nontoxic, lightweight and biodegradable, which exhibits a great potential for the emerging flexible and “green” electronic applications. Here, lightweight flexible aluminum-zinc-oxide (AZO) thin-film transistors (TFTs) are fabricated using chitosan biopolymer as self-supporting layer. This kind of biopolymer electrolyte can provide a strong electric-double-layer effect, which leads to a large capacitance with lower energy consumption. With the low-cost indium-free AZO deposited onto the chitosan film as the coplanar gate and source/channel/drain electrodes, the transistor shows a moderate on/off ratio of ∼104, a relatively ideal field-effect mobility of 0.3 cm2/Vs and a moderate sub-threshold swing of 0.65 V/dec. Moreover, logic “AND” function is realized in the flexible device with two coplanar gates as the input terminals. Such chitosan-gated flexible TFT devices can provide promising candidates for the next generation wearable and “green” electronics.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA systematic analysis of the bias-stress effects in solution-processed organic field-effect transistors is reported. Difluoro 5,11-bis(triethylsilylethynyl) anthradithiophene, a high-performance molecular semiconductor, forms a charge-transport channel and is coupled with injection contacts made of Au, Ag, or Cu. The electrode metal is found to not only greatly affect the switching performances but also drive the response of transistors to the extended applications of gate voltage. The observations are put into the framework of contact-limited transistor model, which holistically assesses the material, geometry, and stress-related contributions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Based on first principles calculations, this study reveals that magnetism in otherwise non-magnetic materials can originate from the partial occupation of antibonding states. Since the antibonding wavefunctions are spatially antisymmetric, the spin wavefunctions should be symmteric according to the exchange antisymmetric principle of quantum mechanics. We demonstrate that this phenomenon can be observed in a graphitic carbon nitride material, g-C4N3, which can be experimentally synthesized and seen as a honeycomb structure with a vacancy. Three dangling bonds of N atoms pointing to the vacancy site interact with each other to form one bonding and two antibonding states. As the two antibonding states are near the Fermi level, and electrons should partially occupy the antibonding states in spin polarization, this leads to 1μB magnetic moment.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe experimental investigation for the drain-induced-barrier-lowering (DIBL) in nanometer scale hysteresis-free 100 nm-long ferroelectric-gated FinFET (which employs the voltage-amplifying attribute of Pb(Zr0.52Ti0.48)O3-based ferroelectric capacitor) is done to verify the DIBL improvement. The DIBL of the ferroelectric-gated FinFET (which is evaluated at 10−7 A/μm of drain current) is improved from ∼48 mV/V to ∼32 mV/V. When the DIBL is evaluated at 10−6 A/μm, it is reduced from 22.89 mV/V to ∼0 mV/V. The physical origin of the DIBL enhancement can be understood due to negative DIBL. The negative DIBL effect [a.k.a., drain-induced-barrier-rising (DIBAR)] is originated from a decrease of internal gate voltage, which takes place due to a gate charge reduction with increased drain voltage.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We prepared La1.85Sr0.15CuO4/La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 nanowire network hybrid systems by means of electrospinning. From observation by scanning electron microscopy, the average diameter of the nanowires is around 220 nm and the average length can reach over 50 μm. The randomly aligned La1.85Sr0.15CuO4 and La0.7Sr0.3MnO3 nanowires exhibit numerous interconnects among each other and form a complicated, non woven hybrid network system. The nanowires are polycrystalline with a grain size at around 30 nm as confirmed by transmission electron microscopy. According to four-probe electrical transportation and magnetization measurements, superconductivity of the sample is suppressed and a positive magnetoresistance effect is observed. Measurements of M(T) and M(H) were carried out as well, revealing the soft magnetic character of the hybrid nanowire network samples.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This research presents the study on the structural-phase states and magnetoresistive properties of thin nanogranular film alloys based on Cu and Co with a total concentration of Co in the range of 15 ≤ x ≤ 71 at%. The analyses for the unannealed and annealed thin films with a thickness d = 20 nm, have been performed. The films have been annealed in the temperature range from 300 to 800 K for 20 min. It found that the heat treatment within the range from 600 to 800 K led to an increase in the magnetoresistance and coercive force due to the growth of Co granules size under heat treatment and partial decomposition of the fcc-Cu(Co) solid solution. The highest magnitudes of the magnetoresistance were found in the as-deposited film alloys featured by the total concentration of Co x = 21 at%, which consist of Cu(Co) solid solution made of fcc-Cu and superparamagnetic Co granules (size L = 2 ÷ 5 nm). Interestingly, the thin film alloys with an increased concentration of Co x ≥ 50 at% exhibited anisotropic magnetoresistance.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we have studied the influence of Mn substitution at the Co site of (La0.85Ag0.15)CoO3 on magnetic and electrical transport properties. Single phase samples of (La0.85Ag0.15)(Co1−yMny)O3 for y = 0, 0.05, 0.10, 0.15, 0.20, 0.30 and 0.40 have been prepared by solid state route. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns recorded at room temperature show that these samples for y = 0–0.3 crystalize in rhombohedral structure with R3¯c space group, while for y = 0.4, it transforms into orthorhombic structure with Pbnm space group. The lattice parameters increase systematically with Mn concentration due to the substitution of larger Mn3+ ions at Co3+ site. Temperature variation of magnetization data and their analyses show that all samples exhibit ferromagnetic transition with a large increase in transition temperature (TC) upon Mn substitution, i.e. from 3.4 K for y = 0–211.0 K for y = 0.4. Such increase in TC is explained in terms of improved double exchange interactions across Co3+-O2−-Co4+, Co3+-O2−-Mn3+ and Mn3+-O2−-Mn4+ networks. The presence of considerable irreversibility between zero field cooled and field cooled magnetization data and the lack of saturation of magnetization data even at 10 T field is explained in terms of domain-wall pinning effect and the presence of competing antiferromagnetic interaction. Eventhough the electrical resistivity falls several orders of magnitude upon Mn substitution, no metal-insulator transition is observed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The first order paramagnetic (PM)-ferromagnetic (FM) transition in CoS1.84Se0.16 is studied using in-field heat capacity measurement. From the low temperature CP data at zero field, the coefficient of electronic contribution to heat capacity (γ) and Debye temperature (θD) are found to be 25 mJ/mol-K2 and 490 K, respectively. Heat capacity shows a sharp, symmetric peak at the magnetic transition ≈ 67 K in the absence of applied magnetic field and peak position shifts towards high temperature with magnetic field. The entropy of the transition is found to be ≈ 0.68 J/mol-K which is dominated by electronic contribution. In-field heat capacity measurement allowed us to estimate all the magnetocaloric (MCE) parameters relevant for magnetic refrigeration i.e. isothermal change in entropy (-ΔSth), adiabatic change in temperature (ΔTad), relative cooling power (RCP), cooling capacity (q) etc. Temperature dependence of both -ΔSth and ΔTad show a table-top like behaviour with almost field independent maxima above 4 Tesla.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Dye-tracing and concentration-measuring experiments are carried out to investigate the magnetophoresis of magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) in the presence of an external cylindrical permanent magnet. The magnetophoresis of MNP, inducing an obvious forced-convective flowing of the carrier fluid, which can be observed by visualizing flowing of carrier fluid, results in a temporal and spatial variation of particle concentration. Moreover, in order to get insight into the physical mechanisms of magnetophoresis of MNP, a coupled particle-fluid analysis, in which the non-linear drift-diffusion differential equation is incorporated into the Navier-Stokes equation, is adopted to discuss the influence of particle-fluid interaction on the variation of particle concentration and the kinetics of carrier fluid. It is worth noting that the equivalent current source (ECS) method is adopted to obtain a closed-form field analysis, which provides exactly prediction of the Kelvin force and enables magnetophoretic analysis more efficient. In dye-tracing experiments, an obvious vortex can be observed as the methylene blue moves with the convection of carrier fluid. Furthermore, this phenomenon is also predicted by using the coupled particle-fluid model. A comparison between the experimental and numerical results shows that the hydrodynamic interactions between MNP and carrier fluid plays an important role in inducing forced-convective flowing of carrier fluid and enhancing the magnetophoresis of MNP. Furthermore, these results also denote that the coupled particle-fluid model provides a more efficient and accurate method in investigating the magnetophoresis of MNP.© 2018Non-collinear antiferromagnetic (AFM) spin structure is imposed in Bi2Fe4O9 to study the electronic and magnetic properties of magnetically ordered Bi2Fe4O9 using first principles. Electronic properties carried out for both ferromagnetic (FM) and antiferromagnetic (AFM) orderings in Bi2Fe4O9 suggest that FM Bi2Fe4O9 is a semiconductor with an indirect optical bandgap of 1.732 eV, whereas, AFM Bi2Fe4O9 is a multiband semiconductor. The influence of different magnetic orderings on the electronic properties of Bi2Fe4O9 are studied in detail. The linear optical response of FM Bi2Fe4O9 is also investigated.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWe present a reliable technique to model the influence of DC current-crowding in bipolar transistors on the variation of emitter width (WE,ef) as a function of collector current density (JC) in silicon-germanium-carbon heterojunction bipolar transistors (SiGe:C HBTs). This method avoids using geometrical assumptions that may be invalid for highly scaled devices. We point out that according to the scientific literature consulted, this is the first time that the evolution of WE,ef with JC extracted from measurements of S-parameters, high frequency noise and small-signal electric modelling is reported for a bipolar transistor technology (homojunction or heterojunction). The investigated SiGe:C HBTs have eight different base layer configurations, varying in base doping level and Ge content. The results show that WE,ef decreases with JC for all devices. This behaviour is directly linked to the current-crowding effect. The procedure was used to identify the base configuration layer from the batch of eight SiGe:C HBTs that minimized current-crowding. This method could be applied to state-of-the-art SiGe:C HBTs to determine the base layer technological configuration that mitigates current-crowding and improves the reliability of SiGe:C HBTs. Finally, knowledge of the effective emitter width as a function of bias opens the road to thoroughly analyse the self-heating impact on ultra-fast SiGe:C HBTs.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Interlayer magnetic coupling in an Au/Co/Mo/Co/Au system fabricated by molecular beam epitaxy was studied as a function of the thicknesses of the cobalt and molybdenum spacer layers (denoted as dCo and dMo, respectively). Magnetization processes and magnetic domain structures were investigated using magneto-optical techniques. In the investigated thickness ranges, various magnetization configurations of the Co layers were observed: (A) both perpendicular, (B) perpendicular and in-plane, and (C) both in-plane. The interlayer exchange coupling field HIEC was determined as a function of dMo. With increasing dMo, this coupling changed from antiferromagnetic with a huge coupling field of ≈0.27 T to ferromagnetic and again to antiferromagnetic. A coupling oscillation period of around 1.4 nm was deduced by comparing the experimental data with the Ruderman–Kittel–Kasuya–Yosida model. For configurations (B) and (C), oscillations of the saturation magnetic field HSAT(dMo) perpendicular to the sample plane were found. Simplified and precise analytical expressions for HSAT were proposed by considering HIEC as well as the uniaxial magnetic anisotropy of one and both magnetic layers, respectively. Magnetic ordering was numerically modeled taking into account the dependences of layer anisotropy and exchange coupling on dCo and dMo, respectively. This modeling well described the remanent magnetization map (dCo, dMo) determined using the polar Kerr effect. It is also shown that HIEC(dMo) induced magnetization reorientation from in-plane to out-of-plane or from out-of-plane to in-plane magnetization configurations and canted magnetization of the Co layers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Static and dynamic magnetic properties of a ferrimagnetic Fe(35Å)/Gd(50Å)12 superlattice were investigated in a wide 4–300 K temperature range using magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) and ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) techniques. The multilayer structure was sputtered on a transparent glass substrate which made it possible to perform MOKE measurements on both Fe and Gd terminated sides of the superlattice. These experiments allowed us to detect a transition between field-aligned and canted magnetic states on both sides of the film and to distinguish between the bulk and surface twisted phases of the superlattice. As a result, the experimental H-T magnetic phase diagram of the system was obtained. FMR studies at frequencies 7–36 GHz demonstrated a complex evolution of absorption spectra as temperature decreased from room down to 4 K. Two spectral branches were detected in the sample. Theoretical simulations show that the observed spectral branches correspond to different types of inhomogeneous resonance modes in the multilayer with non-uniform magnetization precession inside Gd layers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A numerical method to simulate the ferrofluid particle distribution evolution is presented. Also, the optical transmission of the distributions obtained is calculated by two numerical methods. The first one consists on a numerical propagation of an electromagnetic wave through the sample. The second one analyzes the aggregates’ mean length to obtain the optical transmission through a mixture law. As an illustration of the possibilities of the method developed, it is applied to analyze how ferrofluid optical transmission changes after magnetic field application depend on intrinsic properties of the colloid such as its nanoparticle concentration and surfactant repulsion represented by means of the final distances between consecutive particles forming chains. Changes in the attenuation factor of these samples show the trends expected from the Literature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We successfully fabricated perpendicularly magnetized cobalt-ferrite CoxFe3-xO4+δ (0 0 1) films on nonmagnetic metal TiN (0 0 1) films. We found that the in-plane lattice constant of the CoxFe3-xO4+δ (0 0 1) films was larger than the out-of-plane lattice constant. This lattice strain induced perpendicular magnetic anisotropy, and square hysteresis curves were observed in out-of-plane magnetic fields for the CoxFe3-xO4+δ (x = 0.4 ∼ 0.6) films. With the decrease of the Co composition from x = 1 to x = 0, the CoxFe3-xO4+δ films approached not to conductive Fe3O4 but to insulating γ-Fe2O3 accompanying cation vacancies in the cubic spinel structure. The good tunneling conductivity character was observed for the CoxFe3-xO4+δ tunnel junctions. The results open up a possibility that insulating CoxFe3-xO4+δ films can be applied to elements of perpendicularly magnetized spintronics devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work we explore the relationship between two ideas recently introduced in the literature. The first one deals with a quantity related to the informational contents of solutions of spatially localized structures, and the second consists of obtaining analytical solutions to describe skyrmion-like structures in magnetic materials. In particular, we use the topological charge density to extract information on the configurational entropy of the magnetic structure.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanodots are of high technological importance in diverse storage and spintronics applications, especially in bit patterned media. Magnetization reversal in such nanodots typically occurs either by coherent rotation of the magnetization or along a vortex state. Other mechanisms of magnetization reversal are scarcely described in the literature. Understanding and predicting the magnetization reversal processes, however, is of utmost importance due to the varying stray fields in the different states under evolution, influencing neighboring nanodots in an array or matrix-like structure. Besides, the stability of vortex states against magnetic field changes – which corresponds to typically broad field ranges with reversible modifications of the magnetic state – influences the robustness of magnetically stored information as well as the necessary external fields for writing new information. Here we report on micromagnetic simulations on nanodots with 10 different, representative diameters and 10 dot thicknesses, respectively, giving rise to 8 possible magnetization reversal processes and suggesting the preconditions for the nucleation and propagation of one or two vortices in cylindrical iron disks. We show the impact of the dimensions and aspect ratios on all phases of magnetization reversal. This study results in a phase diagram of the different magnetization reversal processes.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this work, we explore the electrical properties and data retention of Te-based conductive-bridge random-access memory (CBRAM) of ZrxTe1−x/Al2O3/Pt cells. The virgin resistance and forming voltage are decreased with increasing Zr composition (0.5 ≦ x ≦ 0.7) and decreasing electrolyte thickness. The resistance of the conductive filament (CF) formed in the Te-CBRAM shows semiconducting behavior that is decreased with increasing temperature, whereas a Cu-based CBRAM shows metallic behavior. Furthermore, the conductance change of Te-based CBRAM, during the filament dissolution step, occurs with lower conductance units than those of Cu/Ag-based CBRAM. The most differentiable characteristics of both devices are the data retention. Te-based CBRAM shows better data stability at high temperature (150 °C) than Cu-based device. Accelerated tests (250, 270, and 300 °C) were performed to understand the data retention of the Te-CBRAM, yielding excellent retention characteristics (10 years at 177 °C) despite its relatively low activation energy (Ea, 1.07 eV) than Cu/Ag- based devices. We believe that the excellent retention properties of Te-based devices are more influenced by the wide effective CF size than by Ea.© 2018Polycrystalline NiCrGa half Heusler alloy, which is predicted to be a half-metallic ferromagnet from first principles calculations, has been synthesized by arc meting technique and its structural, magnetic as well as the electronic properties have been studied. The measured x-ray diffraction (XRD) pattern shows the signature of a disordered structure. Magnetization and magnetoresistance measurements indicate a competition between ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic correlations in the sample, with no evidence of long range magnetic order down to the lowest temperature (2 K) and highest magnetic field (70 kOe) studied. The experimentally observed structural and magnetic properties are found to be significantly different from the theoretically predicted properties of the ordered cubic C1b structure. To probe into the possibility of the presence of atomic disorder in the system, we have performed theoretical calculations using the spin-polarized-relativistic Korringa-Kohn-Rostoker method (SPR-KKR). By comparing the experimental data from XRD, magnetization, photoelectron spectroscopy measurements and theoretical calculations, we conclude that NiCrGa has significant amount of atomic disorder. Although, the ordered structure is energetically more stable than the disordered structures, we find that after synthesis, the system tends to stabilize in a disordered structure. The nature of the disorder has been ascertained from experiments and the corresponding electronic structure and magnetic properties have been obtained. With this atomic disorder present in the sample, the ferromagnetic ordering is disturbed and the spin polarization is consequently reduced.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Co2FeAl (CFA) nanoparticles (NPs) of different sizes were synthesized by chemical route. The effect of the size of NPs upon the structure and magnetization compared to its bulk counterpart was investigated. The structure and composition were determined from X-ray diffraction (XRD) and electron microscopy. XRD analysis shows that the samples are having single (A2-type) disordered phase. Magnetization measurements suggest that the samples are soft ferromagnetic in nature with very low coercivity. Enhanced magnetic properties like saturation magnetization, coercive force, retentivity, and Curie-temperature are observed with a decrease in particle size. The effect of particle size on hysteresis losses is also discussed. The smallest particles of size 16 nm exhibited the highest saturation magnetization and transition temperature of 180.73 emu/g and 1261 K, respectively. The origin of enhancement in magnetization of Co2FeAl nano-alloy is attributed to the strong Co-Co exchange interaction due to disorder present in the systems.© 2018In this study, Fe83Ga17 thin films are deposited on Si(1 0 0) and Si(1 1 1) substrates with a Ti layer by using DC magnetron sputtering. The addition of Ti layer does not significantly change the magnetic and magnetostrictive properties of the Fe-Ga film, however it can effectively prevent the abscission of film during heat treatment. The Fe83Ga17 films deposited on Si(1 0 0) and Ti/Si(1 0 0) have relatively small coercive forces, low saturation magnetic fields, and the magnetostriction curves are easily saturated in a low field. The magnetostriction of Fe83Ga17 on Ti/Si(1 0 0) can reach 105 ppm. The Fe83Ga17 thin films on Si(1 1 1) and Ti/Si(1 1 1) have large saturation magnetic fields (about 61Oe) and the magnetostriction curve shows linearity, which can be used in magnetic field detection, micro actuators and magnetoelectric (ME) devices. Dendritic domains and stripe domains are observed in these samples due to the influence of different internal stresses. After a vacuum heat treatment, the internal stress was released. At the same time, the structure of both the dendritic domains and stripe domains turns into a dot domain. The EBSD results show that annealed Fe-Ga films sputtered on a Ti layer have a very weak texture.© 2018The metastable tetragonal τ-phase MnAl has been doped interstitially with B through a drop synthesis method creating the (Mn0.55Al0.45)B0.02 compound. The as-casted samples were annealed, quenched and thereafter ball-milled and relaxed in order to decrease grain size and reduce the number of crystallographic defects. The Curie temperature of the quenched sample was estimated to 655 K. The magnetization, coercivity and anisotropy were analyzed with respect to flash-milling time, relaxation time and temperature. The results show that (Mn0.55Al0.45)B0.02 could be directly obtained from drop synthesis. The highest measured saturation magnetization of 393 kA/m (measured at ±1440 kA/m) was achieved with a relaxation process after 1.5 h milling, giving a theoretical maximum energy product of 48 kJ/m3. The highest value of the coercivity was 355 kA/m achieved by flash-milling for 10 h. However, the high coercivity was achieved at an expense of low saturation magnetization.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThe complementary metal-oxide-semiconductor (CMOS) active pixel sensors (APSs) can easily be susceptible to heavy-ion radiation in space applications. In this paper, the single event effects (SEEs) of pinned photodiode (PPD) active pixel sensor array exposed to heavy ion (Tantalum, Xenon, Krypton) with linear energy transfer (LET) (37, 50.34 and 81.35 MeV·cm2/mg) have been studied. During the heavy ion exposure, all devices were fully functional and integration time was changed, no single event latch-up (SEL) and single event functional interrupt (SEFI) happened. However, dark background with pixel clusters in a frame, which indicates the single event transient (SET) effect were observed. The number of the pixel clusters, total collected charge and cluster size were analyzed in detail. Finally, SRIM simulations were conducted on a PPD in order to predict the number of the electron-hole pairs generated by a heavy ion.© 2018 Elsevier LtdAfter an impressive improvement observed in organic field effect transistors (OFETs) technology, there is a need to have a comprehensive model, which can predict output characteristics of OFETs to facilitate device-to-system integration in an efficient manner. In this paper, a global technique is developed to extract parameters of various OFETs models by evaluating their output characteristics. By involving respective model's expression, a simulator has been developed wherein the model variables have been extracted by using particle swarm optimization technique. Relative performance of a model is determined by assessing root mean square errors between the experimental and the modeled characteristics. Swarm optimization showed that the accuracy of a model is dependent upon the device dimensions. Thus, by employing the developed swarm optimization technique on devices of various dimensions, a preferred model is identified, which can be employed by the device modeling software. Swarm optimization showed that models, which are more physics based have a wider applicability than those which involved relatively higher number of fitting variables.© 2018 Elsevier LtdSeveral issues concerning the applicability of the temperature coefficient of the resistivity (TCR) method to scaled interconnect lines are discussed. The central approximation of the TCR method, i.e. the substitution of the interconnect wire TCR by the bulk TCR becomes doubtful when the resistivity of the conductor metal is strongly increased by finite size effects. Semiclassical calculations for thin films show that the TCR deviates from bulk values when the surface roughness scattering contribution to the total resistivity becomes significant with respect to grain boundary scattering, an effect that might become even more important in nanowires due to their larger surface-to-volume ration. In addition, the TCR method is redeveloped to account for line width roughness. It is shown that for rough wires, the TCR method yields the harmonic average of the cross-sectional area as well as, to first order, the accurate value of the resistivity at the extracted area. Finally, the effect of a conductive barrier or liner layer on the TCR method is discussed. It is shown that the liner or barrier parallel conductance can only be neglected when it is lower than about 5–10% of the total conductance. It is furthermore shown that neglecting the liner/barrier parallel conductance leads mainly to an overestimation of the cross-sectional area of the center conductor whereas its resistivity is less affected.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, high temperature Phosphorus ion implantation is applied to p-type Si (1 0 0) substrates and n-type bulk Si fin field-effect-transistors. Phosphorus profiles and sheet resistance on p-type Si (1 0 0) substrates are analyzed. High temperature ion implantation shows less Phosphorus diffusion after rapid thermal annealing compared to room temperature ion implantation. In n-type bulk Si fin field-effect-transistors with wide spacers and ion implanted source and drain, the high temperature extension ion implantation shows better electrical characteristics in terms of drain-induced-barrier-lowering, on-state resistance, on-state current, and off-state current. In n-type bulk Si fin field-effect-transistors with narrow spacers and Phosphorus in-situ doped Si epi source and drain, drain-induced-barrier-lowering and off-state current characteristics are improved by high temperature extension ion implantation, compared to room temperature extension ion implantation. Phosphorus distribution in fin field-effect-transistors is analyzed by scanning spreading resistance microscopy. Suppression of Phosphorus diffusion into the channel area is confirmed.© 2018 Elsevier LtdProcess variability has been a challenge for advanced transistor technology nodes for logic applications. With the advent of multi-gate architecture, Metal Gate granularity (MGG) has become a significant source of variability. Traditional ways of variability estimation using TCAD simulations are computationally expensive which calls for a compact model. In this paper, a compact form to estimate MGG induced threshold voltage variability in NWFET is proposed. First, a detailed Fourier analysis is used to calculate the electrostatics which resulted in the expression for the barrier height. Second, the statistical moments of the barrier heights are calculated in a closed form expression. A detailed description of the methodology and the derivation is conveyed through this paper along with the justifications for the simplifications and approximations considered. The standard deviations in threshold voltage for various grain sizes are in good agreement with stochastic TCAD simulations. Unlike the conventional TCAD stochastic simulation, the proposed compact form is computationally efficient and also independent of the number of samples (NWFET devices) in finding the variability for a given set of parameters.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic Particle Spectroscopy (MPS) records the non-linear response of magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) to large ac magnetic fields. It captures a harmonic spectrum for the characterization of MNP samples, especially in the context of Magnetic Particle Imaging (MPI). MPS is sensitive to minute variations in magnetization response, thus different particle types or batches are easily distinguished. Also, since the dynamic magnetization of the particles is driven by both the Néel and the Brownian relaxation mechanisms, the harmonic spectra in MPS scale with ambient parameters, such as temperature, viscosity or binding state of the particles. Previous studies mostly observed low-frequency harmonic ratios (e.g. 5f0/3f0) to distinguish particles or to obtain ambient parameters. Here, we propose a multi-spectral analysis technique, using the full available spectrum, to decompose the collective response of different particles from an integral measurement on an MNP sample. This work focuses on the description of the multi-spectral method and its application to quantify binary and ternary mixtures of different particles.© 2018Magnetic phases of holmium films are associated with the intensity of the magnetic neutron scattering. It is shown that each magnetic phase of the system (fan, helifan, spin-slip, helix and ferromagnetic) exhibits a characteristic profile of scattering which can be used as a fingerprint to identify it. In this paper, we present theoretical results obtained for holmium films 24 monolayers thick at a fixed temperature and in the presence of a dc magnetic field applied along the basal plane. A self-consistent local field algorithm was used to obtain the equilibrium configurations of the magnetic moments of the film and, with these results, the spin-spin correlation functions which determine the shape of the neutron scattering intensity were calculated.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the effect of the substitution of the Mn ions by Fe ions on the structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric behaviors of La0.5Sm0.2Sr0.3Mn1-xFexO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.15) perovskites. The nanocrystalline powders have been synthesized by self-combustion process. Rietveld refinement of fitted and observed X-ray diffractions patterns shows the formation of single-phase compositions with an orthorhombic crystal system (Pnma space group). The variation of magnetization (M) vs. temperature (T) under the field-cooled (FC) and zero-field-cooled (ZFC) modes reveals a ferromagnetic-paramagnetic transition at the Curie temperature (TC). The (TC) decreases linearly with increasing x and changes from 278 K for x = 0 to 94 K for x = 0.15. Arrott plot analyses and a universal curve method were applied for studying the order of the magnetic transition in this system, found to be of second order. Besides, the magnetic entropy change and the related Relative Cooling Power (RCP) values, sensitive to Fe doping, were estimated. In the vicinity of TC, |-ΔSM| reached a maximum value of 3.06 J kg−1 K−1, 2.93 J kg−1 K−1, 2.22 J kg−1 K−1 and 0.77 J kg−1 K−1, whereas the RCP was found to be 268 J Kg−1, 280 J Kg−1, 285 J Kg−1 and 226 J Kg−1 for x = 0.00, 0.05, 0.10 and 0.15, respectively in a magnetic applied field of 5 T. Through these results, La0.5Sm0.2Sr0.3Mn1-xFexO3 materials are strongly suggested for use as active refrigerants for magnetic refrigeration technology near room temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetization switching by injected spin-polarized current or applied field pulses is considered for perpendicular magnetic nanosystems with uniaxial symmetry and subject to thermal fluctuations. Such systems can model both perpendicular spin-transfer-torque magnetic random access memories and magnetic grains for state-of-the-art perpendicular recording. It is shown that, in the limit of high energy barriers and large current/field amplitudes, the probability and cumulative distribution functions of switching times can be analytically computed as function of material, geometrical parameters and thermal noise level. The theoretical predictions are confirmed by macrospin and full micromagnetic simulations. By using the derived formulas, it is shown that analysis of Write-Error Rates (WERs) at typical levels of reliability required by magnetic recording technology can be easily performed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Hydrothermal synthesis was employed to prepare three samples of Mn-Zn ferrite nanoparticles with the mean size of crystallites of 12–14 nm, whose compositions were accurately determined by X-ray fluorescence spectroscopy to Mn0.82Zn0.21Fe1.97O, Mn0.70Zn0.31Fe1.99O4, and Mn0.62Zn0.41Fe1.97O4. The X-ray diffraction and SQUID magnetometry were used to determine the spinel structure and ferrimagnetic properties of the samples. AC field heating experiments were performed on particles dispersed in glycerol to evaluate the specific absorption rate. Based on the superparamagnetic behaviour and magnetic hyperthermia data, the Mn0.62Zn0.41Fe1.97O4 phase was selected for further studies, including a more detailed characterization of the crystal and magnetic structure by neutron diffraction and Mössbauer spectroscopy, encapsulation into mesoporous silica, determination of the specific absorption rate of coated particles, and analysis of the porosity of the shell. Shortly, the Mn0.62Zn0.41Fe1.97O4 nanoparticles were found to possess high magnetization of M(10kOe) = 48.4 emu/g at room temperature and superparamagnetic behaviour at body temperature on the timescale of magnetic measurements. The coated product was formed by clusters of ferrite crystallites with overall mean size of 52 nm encapsulated into 22 nm thick mesoporous shell and showed heating efficiency of 57 W/g(Mn + Fe) in AC field of 970 kHz and amplitude of 8 mT. The mesoporous shell provided specific surface area of 670 m2/g, and its pores of an average diameter 3 nm occupied specific volume of 0.45 cm3/g. In a a preliminary study, the silica pores were loaded with rhodamine B as a model of a hydrophilic drug and subsequently enclosed by lauric acid that served as a temperature sensitive gatekeeper. The release of the model compound to aqueous medium was determined at room temperature and 60 °C by spectrophotometric analysis. Results have shown that amount of rhodamine B in pores achieved 15 mg per gram of silica-coated ferrite cores and its release was controlled by temperature.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this work, avalanche ruggedness and failure mechanism of SiC MOSFET in single-pulse Unclamped Inductive Switching (UIS) test are investigated and compared with Si IGBT. The experimental results show that SiC MOSFET can handle ∼20% higher avalanche energy at the same current density, and ∼50% higher current density at the same amount of energy. As SiC device has 5× smaller chip size, the advantage will disappear when comparison is performed with avalanche current. To improve the avalanche current capability of SiC MOSFET, failure mechanisms are analyzed. At first, the junction temperature is calculated with V-T model and thermal model, from which a linear dependence of temperature on avalanche current is revealed. Then, the probability of parasitic BJT turn-on is modeled analytically with the base-to-emitter resistance/voltage, which is found to be highly dependent on the p+ ohmic contact resistance (ρc) and base doping concentration (NB) designs of the device. Based on the modeling results, at the peak junction temperature 650 K in UIS test, the BJT turn-on can already be triggered for SiC MOSFET. The failure trigger temperature can be raised with a higher NB and lower ρc design, thus the avalanche current capability can be increased accordingly. On the other hand, with a much deeper p+ body structure design, the Si IGBT can prevent the BJT latch-up failure. Based on the failure analysis, a trench source structure of SiC MOSFET is proposed to further improve the avalanche capability for smaller chip size design.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The analysis of a magnetostrictive cantilever for energy harvesting purposes is addressed. The focus of the work is on outlining, by a thorough experimental study, the basic phenomena affecting the behavior of such systems and, in particular, how the geometry of the physical structure can affect the overall performance of the harvester. Several harvester prototypes have been realized by bonding together one or more magnetostrictive laminations to Al sheets. Further, the influence of the magnetic bias is investigated by exploiting permanent magnets in different positions of the cantilever. The results are discussed in detail and a converted power up to 40 mW is observed at 4 g impressed acceleration of the sample.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We study the propagation and interaction of magnetic solitons in a ferromagnetic thin film with the interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction. The governing Landau-Lifshitz-Gilbert equation can be transformed into an integrable nonlinear Shrödinger-type equation in the long wave limit. With the use of the Hirota bilinear method, the analytical expressions of one-, two-, and three-soliton solutions are constructed. We find that the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction can change the velocities of magnetic solitons and affect the colliding position of the two solitons. In particular, a reverse effect of the propagation direction of the magnetic soliton is observed. Our results have potential applications in storage and communication technologies.© 2018 The AuthorsInteractions between magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) and their surrounding matrix were investigated during temperature-controlled magnetic particle spectroscopy (MPS). MNPs are used as tracers in emerging biomedical imaging technologies, including magnetic particle imaging (MPI), which employ spatially inhomogeneous time-varying magnetic fields to generate imaging signals. For safe and reliable imaging procedures, it is important to understand the thermal and mechanical interactions between MNPs and the surrounding biological matrix. We performed in-vitro investigations using magnetic field hyperthermia (MFH) and temperature-controlled MPS to elucidate the excitation-field dependent MNP-matrix interaction. MFH measurements of ferucarbotran (FCT) MNPs were conducted using a low-frequency, high-amplitude, set-up designed to emulate the typical field conditions employed in MPI. First, it was tested whether concentrated FCT samples produce measurable heating in MFH characterization. A strong bulk heating effect (ΔT = 40 K) was observed, showing that the individual MNPs dissipate a significant quantity of heat. However, no measurable bulk temperature increase occurred during MFH of dilute FCT preparations in liquid or gelatin suspensions. Then, temperature-controlled MPS measurements were performed on dilute FCT immobilized in gelatin. The melting transition of the dilute gelatin preparation produced a clear change in the temperature-dependent MPS spectra. The melting transition was reproducible between measurements using the same field excitation, with a standard deviation of σ = 0.2 K. The melting transition temperature was found to depend upon the amplitude of the MPS excitation field. A reduction in the melting transition onset temperature of 2.3 K was observed when the excitation amplitude was increased from 6 mT to 25 mT. This shift is attributed to increasing mechanical and thermal particle-matrix interactions at higher excitation fields. The results show that within the studied system, individual MNPs interact with their local environment in a non-negligible way during MPS measurement, even when bulk heating of the sample is not detected. Our findings hold significance for the potential impact of MPI and related technologies on living tissues, a subject deserving of further study.© 2018 Elsevier LtdSensing properties of various high-k sensing membrane, such as SnO2, HfO2, ZrO2, and Ta2O5, in dual gate extended-gate field-effect transistor (EGFET) were investigated. By adapting the dual-gate structure, high sensitivity exceeding the conventional Nernstian limit on sensitivity (59.15 mV/pH at 25 °C) was realized due to capacitive coupling effect. As a results, it was confirmed that dual-gate EGFET with Ta2O5 sensing membrane which has high permittivity shows the highest sensitivity of 478.0 mV/pH as well as excellent hysteresis voltage and drift rate characteristics.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetophoretic force acting on a rigid spherical cluster of single-domain nanoparticles in a constant-gradient weak magnetic field is investigated numerically using the Langevin dynamics simulation method. Nanoparticles are randomly and uniformly distributed within the cluster volume. They interact with each other via long-range dipole-dipole interactions. Simulations reveal that if the total amount of particles in the cluster is kept constant, the force decreases with increasing nanoparticle concentration due to the demagnetizing field arising inside the cluster. Numerically obtained force values with great accuracy can be described by the modified mean-field theory, which was previously successfully used for the description of various dipolar media. Within this theory, a new expression is derived, which relates the magnetophoretic mobility of the cluster with the concentration of nanoparticles and their dipolar coupling parameter. The expression shows that if the number of particles in the cluster is fixed, the mobility is a nonmonotonic function of the concentration. The optimal concentration values that maximize the mobility for a given amount of magnetic phase and a given dipolar coupling parameter are determined.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Motor made of electrical steel sheet is sometimes used in extreme environments, for example, submersible motors are operated at temperatures and pressures coupling environment. However, most related reports only consider the effect of single environmental factor (temperature or stress) on the magnetic properties of electrical steel sheets. Therefore, in order to accurately design a motor that can operate at temperatures and pressures coupling environment, the magnetic properties of electrical steel sheets used in the motor should be clarified firstly. In the paper, two kinds of specimens (ring specimen and rolled specimen) are used to measure the magnetic properties under temperature and pressure coupling environment. It not only reveals the influence of temperature and pressure coupling environment on the magnetic properties, but also analyzes the difference between the measurement results obtained by two kinds of measurement samples. The measurement results show that the effect of pressure on magnetic properties decreases with increasing temperature under the conditions of temperature and pressure coupling. According to the domain theory, a reasonable explanation for the influence of temperature and pressure coupling environment on electrical steel sheet is given. Meanwhile, combining the shape and size of the two measurement samples, the possible causes of the differences in the measurement results of the two measurement samples were analyzed in detail.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We explore the potential of ferrofluids for heat transfer augmentation, via numerical simulations using water-based ferrofluids flowing between parallel plates (laminar flows; Reynolds number (Re) 〈1 0 0), exposed to external magnetic fields, produced by single and multiple magnetic line dipoles. Two water-based ferrofluids having different magnetic and thermo-physical properties owing to their different solid volume fractions of magnetic nanoparticles are considered. It is shown that the presence of the non-uniform magnetic field produced by the dipoles induces an attractive magnetic body force on ferrofluids, which disturbs the flow locally, thus augmenting local Nusselt number. While flow strongly gets affected by the magnetic field at Re = 25, magnetic field does not affect the flow significantly beyond Re ≥ 75 which shows the dominance of inertial forces over magnetic forces, at a given external magnetic field strength. A detailed parametric study is performed to investigate the effect of single and multiple dipole placements, the solid volume fraction of magnetic nanoparticles and Reynolds number on heat transfer enhancement. It is concluded that forced convective heat transfer can be enhanced by applying external magnetic field compared to no magnetic field case, only under certain boundary conditions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.An efficient method for the calculation of ferromagnetic resonant modes of magnetic structures is presented. Finite-element discretization allows flexible geometries and location dependent material parameters. The resonant modes can be used for a semi-analytical calculation of the power spectral density of the thermal white-noise, which is relevant for many sensor applications. The proposed method is validated by comparing the noise spectrum of a nano-disk with time-domain simulations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A method, based on the molecular field theory of ferrimagnetism, and standard relations for the electronic and lattice heat capacities and entropies, is used to calculate the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) in Er2Fe17. This compound has a Curie temperature in the vicinity of room temperature and could be, therefore, of practical interest. The magnetization, magnetic, lattice, electronic and total entropies and specific heats, for different magnetic fields, have been calculated as function of temperature up to and beyond Tc. The magnetocaloric effect i.e. the isothermal magnetic entropy change ΔSM and the adiabatic temperature change, ΔTad for different magnetic fields, have been studied in the temperature range 0-400K. As an example of our results, the maximum isothermal magnetic entropy change ΔSM in Er2Fe17 is in the range 5-6J/kgK, for a magnetic field change of 80kOe. The adiabatic temperature change, ΔTad has a maximum value in the range 1.5-2.1K for ΔH=80kOe. For the purpose of comparison, a giant magnetocaloric bench-mark material, with first-order phase transition e.g. Gd5Si2Ge2 has a maximum ΔSm and ΔTad (for a field change of 50 kOe) in the range 20–36 J/kg. K and 11–17 K respectively. Our results are in fair agreement with available results of other studies on this compound, in which more involved Hamiltonian was used e.g. taking crystal electric field into account.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Structural and magnetic behaviors were studied and correlated with each other for Zn1−xTbxO nanorods synthesized by hydrothermal method varying x values from 0.01 to 0.05 with 0.01 step increment. The structural properties of Zn1−xTbxO nanorods were determined by X-ray diffraction tool. All nanorods were found as a single phase with ZnO wurtzite hexagonal structure. The concentration-dependent of lattice parameters, cell volumes, microstrain, stress, dislocation density, the locality of the atoms and their displacements, and bond length in Zn1−xTbxO (where x = 0.0, 0.01, 0.02, 0.03, 0.04, and 0.05) structures were detailed. The particles with varying magnifications were observed as random agglomeration using Scanning Electron Microscope measurement tool. ESR spectra of Zn1−xTbxO were collected at room temperature on a Bruker EMX model X-band spectrometer operating at a frequency of 9.71 GHz. ESR measurements have been performed and analyzed through concentration dependence of the g-factor and the line-widths of pike to pike (ΔHPP) of ESR spectra. Experimental and fitting X-band ESR spectra of Tb doped ZnO nanorods with a different doping concentration of Tb recorded at room temperature were presented.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report measurements of the magnetoresistance (MR) of platinum in Pt/NiO bilayers made with well textured NiO polycrystalline films over a wide temperature range. We show that the MR arises from two sources, the spin Hall magnetoresistance (SMR) and the anisotropic magnetoresistance (AMR). The latter results from the magnetic proximity effect of Pt in atomic contact with one of the antiferromagnetic NiO sublattices. The SMR is produced by the charge current generated in the Pt layer by the spin current back reflected from the antiferromagnetic insulating (AFI) NiO film through the inverse spin Hall effect (ISHE). As previously observed in Pt with NiO in the form of bulk crystals or epitaxial films, here the SMR exhibits oscillations in the field angle variation shifted by 90° relative to that observed in the insulating ferrimagnet yttrium iron garnet (YIG). Measurements in the temperature range 10–300 K show that the SMR increases with temperature while the AMR remains constant. The total magnetoresistance of Pt/NiO measured at room temperature with well textured NiO polycrystalline films is substantially larger than the values reported for crystalline or epitaxial NiO.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This work studies the relationship between the structural characteristics and the final magnetic properties of two different iron-based materials: one basic Soft Magnetic Material (SMM) and a Soft Magnetic Composite (SMC). The micrometric size of the starting powder, the pure iron composition of the core and the presence of a phosphate isolating shell in the composite sample were revealed by powder X-ray diffraction, Laser Diffraction and Fourier Transformed Infrared Spectroscopy respectively. Moreover, Scanning Electron Microscopy confirms the range of sizes of the powder samples and their non-perfect spherical shape. Magnetic and Impedance Spectroscopy measurements evidence the effects that the isolating shell has on the effective magnetic permeability and the relaxation frequency at which magnetic losses appear. Results obtained are of great interest from a technological point of view because the frequency range at which each material can effectively operate is measured. Furthermore, different structural aspects (such as particle size or the presence of an isolating shell) are related with the final functional properties. Besides, these results can help in the design of new soft magnets with lower magnetic losses over a wide range of frequencies.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Electron band structure calculations and analysis of critical points parameters in the electron density distribution in Bi2Te3, Bi2Se3, Bi2S3, α-Bi2O3, Sb2Te3, Sb2Se3 and Sb2S3 at ambient and high pressures were performed to determine interrelations between the crystal structure, unusual physical (including magnetic and superconducting) properties and peculiarities in the electron density distribution. The programming code WIEN2k was used for band structure calculations. The previously found correlation between the superconducting transition temperature Tc and the electron density Laplacian value in the bond critical point with the highest electron density was confirmed by the calculations made for crystal structures under high pressure. The revealed parameters of bond critical points indicate the significant role of charge density fluctuations in the compounds studied. The 121, 123Sb NQR spin echo envelopes assigned to the ν1 transition (Δm = 1/2–3/2) were measured for the two crystallographic positions of Sb atoms in the Sb2S3 structure. Unexpectedly deep oscillations of NQR spin echo envelopes were observed in very small (1–3 Oe) external magnetic fields, evidencing for the existence of local magnetic fields in Sb2S3 similar to those earlier observed in bismuth oxide compounds.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic materials are of great interest due to their widespread applications in various technologies. Precise control of different aspects of the morphology and magnetic properties is a key aspect in establishing their relationship with material shapes and sizes. In this work, the density functional theory (DFT) is applied to investigate the surface structure and magnetic properties of low-index (1 1 0), (1 0 1), (1 0 0), (0 0 1), (1 1 1), (0 1 2) surfaces of ATiO3 (A = Mn, Fe, Ni) multiferroic materials. In particular, a theoretical approach, based on the Wulff construction and magnetization density (M) index, is applied to infer the relationship between the morphology and surface magnetism. The results indicate that the magnetic properties of ATiO3 materials can be controlled by the presence of exposed surfaces. In particular, the (0 0 1) and (1 1 1) surfaces are found to be adequate to enhance the superficial magnetism. The underlying reasons behind such mechanism are discussed from the perspective of uncompensated spins and charge-transfer processes along the exposed surfaces. This investigation suggests that the morphology-oriented ATiO3 materials are good candidates for superior multiferroic applications.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA triple self-aligned 2-bit/cell split-gate flash cell with a common select-gate (SG) for 2-bit is produced at 90-nm technology node. In this paper, scaling considerations of this novel split-gate flash are discussed. Firstly, SG-channel length scaling was discussed by evaluating the DIBL effect. It is revealed that aggressive scaling of SG-transistor is acceptable for sub-90-nm 2-bit/cell memory cell, because of the fully isolated SG-channel. Then, floating-gate (FG) coupling ratios are discussed. It is shown that coupling-gate (CG) to FG ratio is comparable to bit-line (BL) to FG ratio. Thirdly, source-side injection has been fully studied to obtain an efficient cell programming with a smaller constant IDP. And an efficient cell programming condition is proposed for scaled 2-bit/cell memory with a constant IDP of 1 μA/bit. Finally, impact of channel, LDD, and halo implants on IR10 and IR01 are discussed. The reliability characteristics are also presented. It was indicated that the scaled cells are very robust.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWe investigated how the zero-voltage duration (0Vd) affects the tendency of degradation during pulsed gate bias stress in a-InGaZnO thin film transistors (TFTs). DC or pulsed negative bias illumination stress (NBIS) or positive bias stress (PBS) was applied to the TFTs for effective stress time of 4,000 s. While pulsed bias stress was being applied, stress-voltage duration (SVd) was set as either 10 s or 1 s per cycle, and 0Vd was varied from 100% to 1% of the SVd. During NBIS, degradation in both threshold voltage and sub-threshold slope became increasingly severe as 0Vd was shortened. However, during pulsed PBS, these trends were almost absent. These different tendencies may occur because the cause of each stress-induced degradation is fundamentally dissimilar; NBIS involves ionization of oxygen vacancies, whereas PBS involves electron trapping. The proposed mechanism was supported by additional bias stress tests on TFTs that had been immersed in H2O, where hydrogen became dominant factor causing the degradation.© 2018 The AuthorsA novel probe for laparoscopic in vivo detection of superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs) has been developed. The main application for in vivo detection of SPIONs our research group aims at is sentinel node biopsy. This is a method to determine if a tumor has spread through the body, which helps to improve cancer patient care. The method we use to selectively detect SPIONs is Differential Magnetometry (DiffMag). DiffMag makes use of small magnetic field strengths in the mT range. For DiffMag, a handheld probe is used that contains excitation and detection coils. However, depth sensitivity of a handheld probe is restricted by the diameter of the coils. Therefore, excitation and detection coils are separated in our novel probe. As a result, excitation coils can be made large and placed underneath a patient to generate a sufficiently large volume for the excitation field. Detection coils are made small enough to be used in laparoscopic surgery. The main challenge of this setup is movement of detection coils with respect to excitation coils. Consequently, the detector signal is obscured by the excitation field, making it impossible to measure the tiny magnetic signature from SPIONs. To measure SPIONs, active compensation is used, which is a way to cancel the excitation field seen by the detection coils. SPIONs were measured in various amounts and at various distances from the excitation coils. Furthermore, SPIONs were measured in proximity to a surgical steel retractor, and 3 L water. It is shown that small amounts of SPIONs (down to 25 μg Fe) can be measured, and SPIONs can be measured up to 20 cm from the top of the excitation coil. Also, surgical steel, and diamagnetism of water – and thus of tissue – have minor influence on DiffMag measurements. In conclusion, these results make this novel probe geometry combined with DiffMag promising for laparoscopic sentinel node biopsy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Multifunctional photocatalyst system of meso-tetra(4-carboxyphenyl)porphyrin (TCPP) with different metal centers [Mn(II), Fe(III), Cu(II), Zn(II) and metal-free] adsorbed on titania-silica-iron oxide magnetic photocatalyst nanocomposites (TSI) that united superparamagnetic behavior and high photoactive activity under visible light irradiation have been prepared. The superparamagnetic nanocomposites have been characterized and analyzed using UV-visible absorption spectroscopy, X-ray diffractometry (XRD), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR), and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS). The results showed that copper(II)tetra(4-carboxyphenyl)porphyrin -sensitized titania-silica-iron oxide nanocomposites (CuTCPP-TSI) can effectively degrade methylene blue (MB) and kill Escherichia coli (E. coli) under irradiation with an incandescent lamp. The magnetic photocatalysts could be used at least four times without regeneration. Therefore, the CuTCPP-TSI nanocomposites can be applied in catalytic photodegradation and used for magnetically-guided antibacterial applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A spin-reorientation transition from a weakly ferromagnetic (WF) to an antiferromagnetic (AF) spin ordering in hematite (α-Fe2O3) during cooling occurs at Morin temperature (TM∼264 K for bulk). The transition is strongly size dependent and TM generally decreases with the decreasing volume of the particles. For particles smaller than approximately ∼20 nm, the Morin transition may be even suppressed and disappears entirely as near-surface spins deviate strongly from the antiferromagnetic easy axis. We report an investigation on nanoparticles prepared by hydrothermal method and sol–gel technique (in silica) of pure α-Fe2O3 phase as confirmed by XRD (space group R-3c, lattice parameters a = 5.038(2) Å c = 13.772(12) Å) differing in the median size derived by TEM: 5.6 nm, 26 nm, 42 nm and 103 nm. By means of Mössbauer spectra acquired between 4.2 and 300 K, we determined the relative concentrations of magnetic phases (WF and AF) within the 57Fe enriched sample and searched for the best finite-scaling theoretical model (mean-field, 3D Heisenberg, Ising) describing the derived size dependence of Morin temperature of the nanoparticles with a log-normal size distribution. The comparison of relevant parameters derived from the fit of experimental data by theoretical model is consistent with the 3D Heisenberg model with scaling parameter λ = 1.4, Morin temperature of bulk material TM(∞) = 265(1) K and correlation length ξ0 = 8.1(2) nm or Ising model with λ = 1.6, TM(∞) = 265(1) K and ξ0 = 9.4(2) nm.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Peroxy-functionalized magnetic mesoporous silica (MMS-PA) composites containing magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) and peroxy acids were synthesized to be used as an easily reusable heterogeneous oxidant for the epoxidation of alkenes. The presence of peroxy acid functional groups on the composites was confirmed by Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR). Transmission electron microscope (TEM) of the MMS-PA composites revealed the irregular structure of porous silica attached with the MNPs. The surface area of the MMS-PA was calculated to be 1089 m2 g−1, which is significantly lower than that of the starting mesoporous silica. As measured using vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), MMS-PA exhibited saturation magnetization of 0.12 emu/g, indicating that the heterogeneous oxidant could respond to an external magnet. The oxidizing activity of the synthesized MMS-PA composites was investigated using vinyl acetate as a model substrate; the yields of the corresponding epoxide products were measured using nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) spectroscopy. At room temperature, the freshly prepared MMS-PA gave 52% yield of the product, and the yield decreased only slightly to 47% for the recycled MMS-PA obtained by reactivating the recovered MMS-PA with concentrated H2O2 in acidic medium.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and neutron powder diffraction measurements have been carried out on Tb0.9Er0.1Ni5 intermetallic compound. The intermetallide crystallizes in the hexagonal CaCu5-type structure and possesses a long-range magnetic order at temperatures below 22 K. A fan-like magnetic structure is described by two propagation vectors: k1 = 0 and k2 = 2π/c(0, 0, 0.036), at 20 K. The total Tb-ion magnetic moment has the ferromagnetic and modulated components. The latter is a transverse spin wave. When the sample is cooled at a temperature below 8 K, the module of the k2 vector does not change and is equal to k2 = 2π/c(0, 0, 0.027). An “incommensurate – lock-in” magnetic transition takes place at 8 K. The k2 vector exhibits a temperature hysteresis of about (5–6) K, whereas the intensities of Bragg reflections and satellites do not show up appreciable changes. When an external magnetic field is applied to the sample, the satellites and the module of the k2 vector decrease, while the Bragg intensities increase. The sample becomes a ferromagnetic at a field of ∼2 kOe, and the Tb-ion magnetic moment is equal to 8.3 μB. A general notion of the Tb0.9Er0.1Ni5 magnetic state evolution with an external field is given using the field dependence of the background intensity in diffraction patterns. First principle calculations for TbNi5 and Tb0.9Er0.1Ni5 are performed including the 4f states into the orbital basis and accounting for strong electronic correlations and spin-orbital coupling. This allowed obtaining both spin and orbital moments of the effective Tb-ion moment and estimating also the value of Tb-Tb exchange interaction.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A systematic study, using first-principles methods, is performed to understand the nature and origin of electronic gap and magnetism in the double perovskite antiferromagnetic insulator Ba2CaIrO6. By virtue of its perfectly aligned IrO6, motifs the system may be anticipated as an ideal spin-orbit driven Jeff system. However, different from the Ir+4 and Ir+5 iridates, our calculations reveal that the electronic gap in Ba2CaIrO6 is implicitly associated with an unconventional antiferromagnetic ordering of Ir spins, thereby classifying this Ir+6 iridate as a Slater-type antiferromagnetic insulator. On the other hand, spin-orbit coupling enhances the Ir 5d-O2p orbital hybridization, due to which both the magnitude of the electronic gap and the local Ir magnetic moment decreases in comparison to the scalar relativistic calculations. Our results not only affirm the validity of local approximations to the exchange-correlation potential in the scalar relativistic Kohn-Sham Hamiltonian, but also strongly convey that the insulating nature of iridates may be intimately linked with magnetism.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.(Nd1-xDyx)2(Fe,Co)14B magnetic nanoparticles, in a range of Dy content from 0 to 0.6, were synthesized by a mechanochemical process. The influence of Dy substitution on the crystal structure and magnetic properties were studied. With increasing Dy content, the coercivity of (Nd1-xDyx)2(Fe,Co)14B particles first doubled from 8.8 kOe (x = 0) to a high value of 17.8 kOe (x = 0.5), further increase of Dy content led to a slightly lower coercivity of 17.5 kOe (x = 0.6). (Nd0.8Dy0.2)2(Fe,Co)14B particles exhibited good thermal stability, with a thermal coefficient of remanence (α) of -0.053% and thermal coefficient of coercivity (β) of -0.348%. Reduced spin-reorientation temperatures (TSR) of 105 K – 115 K were observed for (Nd1-xDyx)2(Fe,Co)14B, for x in the range of 0 to 0.2, making these compositions more attractive for cryogenic applications. Detailed analysis of the temperature dependent magnetic properties revealed that coercivity was controlled by nucleation of reversed magnetic domains.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Any existing method of visualization of magnetic nanoparticles in biological objects provides for imposing of an external magnetic field on the object under study. The field can considerably change the space distribution and properties of the nanomagnetic ensemble under study. In our work a SQUID-based magnetoencephalography device was used for the measurement of a magnetic noise generated by superparamagnetic nanoparticles based ferrofluid in the stationary standing vial without imposing of an external magnetic field. It was demonstrated that the ferrofluid generates spontaneous magnetic fields sufficient for its localization inside the experimental setup. Besides it was revealed that the spontaneous magnetic fields at certain frequencies have a strong spatial anisotropy. The detected effect can essentially increase the spatial resolution of the proposed method of visualization of magnetic nanoparticles in biological objects without using the external magnetic field.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The investigation of magnetic nanoparticles for medical and biological applications is relatively recent and steadily growing. When properly functionalized, magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) can target cancer cells and deliver a drug or heat to these cells. MNPs are being investigated in several applications in medicine such as hyperthermia, magnetic particle imaging, cell separation and magnetofection, in vitro and in vivo alternating current biosusceptibility, T1 and T2 magnetic resonance contrast agents, and magnetorelaxometry. In each of these applications, a specific physical property is measured. Magnetorelaxometry relies on the fact that when MNPs are magnetized they can relax by the Brownian and Néel mechanisms. Both mechanisms depend on the MNP size and for certain conditions can have a faster relaxation through the Brownian, compared to the Néel, mechanism. This can be exploited to target cells. For certain sizes, when an MNP is free to rotate in the biological fluids, they will relax faster than when attached to a cell. This can provide a high contrast for detection of magnetically-labelled cancer cells, making it possible to differentiate normal from cancer tissue. Until very recently SQUIDs were the main detectors employed to measure MNPs, but Optically Pumped Magnetometers (OPM) are now an attractive alternative. OPMs are smaller, do not need liquid helium, and are simpler to operate than SQUIDs. Here, we present the initial steps of the development of an OPM-based instrument to measure relaxation of MNP in vitro.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the microstructure, phase transformation and magnetic properties of MnAl permanent magnetic alloys prepared by the melt-spinning technique were systematically investigated by tuning the cooling rate. It was shown that the MnAl microstructure, phase transformation and magnetic properties can be tailored by the copper roller speed. With increasing of the roller speed, the phase transformation from the γ2, β phases to the ε phase was observed. In addition, the variation of magnetic properties was attributed to the phase content and microstructure of the ferromagnetic τ phase in the MnAl alloys, being controlled by the cooling rate. As a result, the high-purity τ phase MnAl was obtained at a copper roller speed of 5 m/s, which exhibited a high magnetization of 118.2 emu/g. Therefore, this work can provide a method for the direct fabrication of the high-purity ferromagnetic τ phase MnAl alloy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanowire arrays grown in anodized alumina templates offer a fertile ground to investigate the interplay among the exchange interaction, dipolar interaction, and magnetocrystalline anisotropy. In this study, we have successfully fabricated Co nanowire arrays with gradient diameter while maintaining the nanowire separation. Consequently, we are able to obtain nanowire arrays with dominant exchange interaction at one end with small nanowire dimeter and dominant dipolar interaction at the other with large nanowire diameter. These samples show very different magnetic properties from those observed in magnetic nanowire arrays with uniformly diameter. The easy magnetization axis, coercivity, saturation field, and reversal processes are all controlled collectively by both ends of the nanowires, which cannot be viewed as the combination of magnetic nanowire arrays with thin and thick diameters.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of slight changes of the chemical composition on Magneto-caloric properties of manganite was investigated on a series of ceramic nano-particles of La0.6-xGdxSr0.4MnO3 (x = 0, 0.0125, 0.05, 0.10) where they synthesized using the Sol-gel method. The X-ray powder diffraction data and the Rietveld refinement analysis indicated that the gradual replacement of La with Gd reduced the cell volume acting in a comparable manner to applying external pressure. Similarly, the magnetization measurements as a function of temperature on all La0.6-xGdxSr0.4MnO3 samples showed a ferromagnetic transition, in which the transition temperature reduced as x increased. The calculated magnetic entropies of all samples of La0.6-xGdxSr0.4MnO3 as a function of temperature suggest a magneto-caloric effect similar to that of pure Gd. These results provide evidence that La0.6-xGdxSr0.4MnO3 compounds have a potential for magnetic refrigeration application.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ferrofluids based on magnesium substituted magnetite nanoparticles MgxFe3−xO4 (x = 0.1; 0.2; 0.4) were synthesised by a chemical co-precipitation method. Their physical properties have been compared with those of the magnetite based ferrofluid obtained by the same synthesis route. Both XRD and TEM studies showed particle size decrease with the increased Mg content while DLS experiments pointed to the more prominent aggregation of Mg-containing nanoparticles. Magnetic properties investigation conducted on the powder (i.e. dried) specimens showed decrease of magnetization values with increased Mg content except for the lowest concentration of x = 0.1 where substantial saturation magnetization rise of about 40% was recorded at room temperature. Heating abilities of the studied ferrofluids under the applied AC fields (SAR values) also showed decreasing trend with the increased Mg content even for x = 0.1 sample despite its elevated magnetization value. This trend has been understood as a consequence of the changed intrinsic nanoparticle properties such as size and magnetic anisotropy, as well as contribution of a collective behaviour due to an increased nanoparticle aggregation in Mg-doped systems.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A simple method is introduced to obtain recycled Nd-Fe-B powders from waste bonded Nd-Fe-B bulk magnets. The main difficulty of the recovery of waste MQ bonded Nd-Fe-B magnets is how to remove the epoxy resins between the magnetic particles and the oxide impurities on the surfaces of the waste magnetic powders. Mixed solvents of acetone, Dimethyl Formamide and N-butyl alcohol were used to dissolve the epoxy resins. Oxide impurities were removed using 0.5% acetic acid/acetone solutions. After these treatments, the carbon and oxygen contents were reduced from 21,200 ppm to 9700 ppm, and from 11,007 ppm to 8177 ppm, respectively. Under optimum processing conditions, the recycled magnetic powders possess improved magnetic properties with Ms of 151.5 emu/g, Mr of 98.0 emu/g, Hcj of 7.1 kOe, and (BH)max of 13.7 MGOe. These values, compared to the waste magnetic powders, represent increases of 21.2%, 18%, 0 and 34.3%, respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Early detection is prerequisite for a successful cancer treatment. Recent advances in nanoscience and imaging technology allow the application of nanomaterials for early cancer diagnosis. Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) has become one of the most extensively used and powerful tool for noninvasive clinical diagnosis. This work reports the synthesis and characterization of iron oxide nanoparticles coated with natural rubber latex (NRL), as well as their incorporation in a gelatin matrix to be used as an MRI contrast agent. Nanoparticles physical properties were characterized using X-ray diffraction (XRD), transmission electronic microscope (TEM), dynamic light scattering (DLS), magnetometry and MRI. XRD profiles indicated that magnetic nanoparticles (Fe3O4) with spinel structure were formed. TEM images showed the formation of iron oxide nanoparticles with average size about 9–14 nm, depending on the NRL concentration. Magnetization curves demonstrated iron oxide nanoparticles having superparamagnetic characteristics with increased magnetization as a function of NRL concentration. The zero-field cooling (ZFC) and field cooling (FC) curves show decreased blocking temperature upon coating magnetic nanoparticles with NRL. MRI results showed proton nuclear relaxivity ratios (r2/r1) of prepared MNPs significantly decreased by increasing the amount of NRL in the synthesis. Therefore, it can be concluded that NRL coated MNPs can be considered as an effective contrast agent for MRI applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Field-induced magnetization changes and magnetovolumetric strain in bulk ferromagnetic materials with cubic crystalline structure are investigated. Semi-phenomenological approach is developed using a minimal parametrization of the magnetic moment changes obtained from the first-principle calculations based on density functional theory (DFT) for dependence of the magnetization with the volume strain in bulk Fe and Ni crystals. Field-induced stress contributions that can be useful for the case of epitaxial ultra-thin films under a tetragonal distortion are also investigated by taking into account a distinct field-dependent contributions coming from strain in-plane and along the out-of-plane direction. Our present approach is useful for measurements of the magnetization and the magnetostriction of ferromagnetic materials.© 2018In order to verify the effects of polycrystalline Si (poly-Si) body thickness scale-down on read operation in 3D NAND flash memory which has tube type thin body, TCAD simulations and the measurements of fabricated devices are performed. ID-VG characteristics and transient drain current behaviors are investigated in 3D NAND devices with various body thicknesses and grain sizes. It has been known that drain current undershoot/overshoot is observed in poly-Si channel devices by falling/rising step gate bias. These phenomena are strongly related with transient of potential barrier height due to slow capture/emission rate of poly-Si grain boundary traps. As the body thickness decreases with the same grain size, the transient current instability, on-state current, and subthreshold-swing are improved. When the grain size is increased with the same body thickness, the transient current instability, on-state current, and subthreshold-swing are improved.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanosized La0.7Ca0.3Mn1-xNixO3 (x = 0, 0.02) manganites were synthesized via the auto-combustion method. The critical behavior of these samples was then carefully investigated by analyzing the results of static magnetic measurements near their critical temperatures. The samples exhibited second-order phase transition, and the effect of Ni doping was to lower the critical temperature. The analysis of the experimental data was carried out by means of various techniques, such as modified Arrott plots, the Kouvel-Fisher method, and critical isotherm analysis, which revealed that the values of the critical exponents β γ and δ are close to those theoretically predicted by mean-field theory. By using the Widom scaling relation and the universal scaling hypothesis, the dependability of the obtained values of the critical exponents was confirmed. Moreover, the temperature dependence of the spontaneous magnetization was estimated from the analysis of the variation of the magnetic entropy change with the magnetization within the framework of mean-field theory. Interestingly, the spontaneous magnetization determined from the entropy change and that obtained from classical extrapolation of the Arrott curves displayed high concordance. These results strongly suggested that the interactions among spins in the investigated compound are long-range.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we study the phase transitions in superlattice with two order parameters by the use of Monte Carlo simulation. We have studied the effects of temperature, external magnetic field, magnetoelectric coupling and interface effects on the multiferroic superlattice. Our multiferroic superlattice is formed by interleaved ferromagnetic and ferroelectric layers. Ferromagnetic layers are modelled as simple cubic lattice with Heisenberg spins. Electrical polarization of (0, ±1) was randomly assigned at each simple cubic lattice site in the ferroelectric layers in the direction perpendicular to the plane of layers. The effect of magnetoelectric coupling between ferroelectric and ferromagnetic layers of the system on the critical temperature, the order parameters, the susceptibility, the internal energy, the surface magnetization of the system have been considered in detail. The layer magnetizations as functions of temperature are shown for various interaction and field parameters.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The twofold goals of this work are (i) to reduce the lack of experimental data in literature concerning the effects of temperature and mechanical strain on magnetic properties of the Ni-Fe alloy Cryophy, and (ii) to validate its use as magnetic shield material for last-generation cryomodule prototypes of crab cavities used in particle accelerators for transverse deflection. The relative magnetic permeability was measured at room and cryogenic temperature, and its lowest value at 4 K fits the minimum design criteria of 100,000 for the crab cavities experiment at CERN. Permeability after uniaxial plastic deformation between 0% and 3% was also measured by means of an Epstein frame. Results show that deformation induces a significant decrease in the magnetic performances, underlining that particular care must be taken during all stages of handling and operation. Finally, the attenuation inside the magnetic shields was tested for the prototype Super Proton Synchrotron at CERN. Results highlight that at 150 mm from the opening, the magnetic field is shielded as required.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We study magnetocapacitance (MC) effect and magnetoelectric (ME) coupling in spin-flop driven antiferromagnet Co4Ta2O9. Powder neutron diffraction data reveal that the magnetic structure corresponds to a non-collinear arrangement along with a non-centrosymmetric crystal structure below Néel Temperature. Electric polarization is achieved below Néel temperature only when the sample is cooled in the presence of external magnetic field. The magnetocapacitance data at high magnetic fields are analyzed by phenomenological Ginzburg-landau theory of ferro-electromagnets and it is found that change in dielectric constant is proportional to the square of magnetization. The saturation polarization and magnetoelectric coupling are estimated to be 52 µC/m2 and γ = 1.4 × 10−3 (emu/g)−2 respectively at 6 Tesla. Strong magnetoelectric coupling and ferroelectric phase in the anti-ferromagnetic Co4Ta2O9 are correlated to magnetic structure as derived from neutron diffraction data.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate the modulation of spin-orbit torque (SOT) fields in synthetic antiferromagnetic (SAF) structures sandwiched between two heavy metals of opposite spin Hall angles. The SOTs fields that are measured by using harmonic Hall voltage technique, increase with net areal magnetization of the Pt/SAF/Ta structures. The result suggests an antiparallel orientation of the SOT fields in the two ferromagnetic layers. The antiparallel alignment of the SOT fields switches the magnetization of SAF structures with a current density as low as 2.3 × 1011 A/m2.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Coercivity mechanism has been studied intensively and debated for many years in magnetic materials, particularly in permanent magnets where defects play important roles in adjusting the coercivity. Such a role can be manifested in hard/soft multilayers, where the soft layer can be taken as an enlarged soft defect, which normally exists in so-called single-phased permanent magnets. In this paper, hysteresis loops and spin distributions have been obtained based on both three-dimensional (3D) and one-dimensional (1D) micromagnetic methods for SmCo/Fe to reveal the in-depth coercivity mechanism. Two different geometric models have been constructed to mimic the experimental trilayers, in one of which a transition layer between hard and soft layers is adopted, where calculated nucleation fields and coercivity match very well with the experimental data. As the soft layer thickness increases, both nucleation and coercive fields reduce whilst the coercivity mechanism changes from nucleation to pinning. Such a pinning is inherently related to nucleation and has both attributes of traditional nucleation and pinning, called as a hybrid coercivity mechanism here. The thickness-dependent coercivity mechanism obtained in this work agrees perfectly with the experimental data, which is general for all hard/soft composites and can be extended to single-phased permanent magnets where defects are inevitable.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The present work has been made to improve the micro-hardness, wear resistance, low coefficient of friction and surface roughness of Cu-Ni-P-W-TiO2 hybrid composite coated Al6063 substrate which was made by electro-deposition process. Cu-Ni-P-W-TiO2 hybrid composite was electrodeposited from the modified Nickel-Watts bath solution. Coated substrates were heat-treated at various temperatures for 1 h and then the effect of heat treatment on the coating concert was studied. The inter-metallic structure was identified by Scanning Electron Microscopy (SEM) and Energy Dispersive X-ray (EDX) Spectroscopy analysis. The micromechanical behavior of the coated substrates were investigated by various mechanical tests like wear, vicker's-microhardness, surface roughness and friction. Hence the results shows that when the addition of phosphorous (P) and tungsten (W), the grain size refined gradually and the micro-hardness improved apparently. Also it is found that during the heat treatment of Cu-Ni-P-W-TiO2 coated Al6063 substrates at 300 °C, wear resistance is improved, coefficient of friction and surface roughness were reduced. This hybrid composite coating shows significantly that improves the micro-mechanical properties comparing with other composite coatings. From this VSM results, it was found that all the coated samples shows magnetic nature of the materials with lesser magnetization and coercivity values.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This work focused on the introduction of electrochemical moieties (electroactive molecules) onto the surface of magnetic nanoparticles (NPs) based on carbodiimide coupling chemistry and the influence of magnetic attraction at the working electrode surface on their electrochemical behaviour. The magnetic NPs were first functionalized with polyamidoamine (PAMAM) dendrimer generation 0 and then with ferrocenecarboxylic acid (Fc) as electroactive molecule. Colorimetric titration, zeta potential measurements and infrared spectroscopy proved the effective conjugation of PAMAM and Fc onto NPs. The conjugation of Fc onto the NPs was also evidenced by voltammetry as it resulted in a half-peak potential shift from 0.328 V for free Fc to 0.590 V after coupling. A transition from a reversible to an irreversible behaviour was also observed. Finally, an external magnetic field was applied on Fc-conjugated NPs to attract them onto the working electrode of a microchip electrochemical device, and the resulting modifications of the electrochemical behaviour were studied. Compared to Fc dispersed in solution, the current peak height of Fc-conjugated NPs was 2-fold higher under magnetic attraction. The mechanism of electrochemical reaction was investigated and was found to be irreversible. Surprisingly, the reaction was diffusion-controlled upon attraction.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the analysis of the magnetic response detected on the cuprate superconductor Nd1.85Ce0.15CuO4. In particular the magnetic behavior of the sample has been studied by means of DC magnetization measurements as a function of the temperature (T) and DC magnetic field (H). The superconducting critical temperature Tc has been obtained by analyzing the m(T) curve performed in Zero Field Cooling-Field Cooling conditions. Moreover, the m(T) curve shows the presence of a magnetic background for temperatures above Tc. By considering the superconducting m(H) hysteresis loop at different temperatures, it can be noted that the width of the curves appears narrow corresponding to a weak superconductivity. This is confirmed by the field dependence of the critical current densities Jc extracted from the superconducting hysteresis loops m(H) at different temperatures within the Bean critical state model. In fact, at the lowest measurement temperature, Jc is close to zero already at low magnetic fields. Nevertheless, by means of the temperature dependence of Jc, the sample shows a strong pinning behavior that can open perspectives for future improvement in the fabrication of this material.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The 57Fe enriched almost single-phase perovskites Pb(Fe0.5Nb0.5)O3 (PFN) and Ba(Fe0.5Nb0.5)O3 (BFN), prepared by a ceramic method (solid-state synthesis), were studied by Mössbauer spectroscopy, nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR), conventional and synchrotron X-ray powder diffraction (XRD). The temperature dependences of hyperfine and structural parameters of PFN, BFN from 4.2 K to temperatures above ferroelectric ordering of PFN (TS ∼ 375 K), with attention to the values of magnetic and structural transitions, were obtained. The antiferromagnetic magnetic ordering transitions were found under the Néel temperatures TN ∼ 167(3) K and 32(2) K for BFN and PFN, respectively. The spin-glass transition was at TG ∼ 10(3) K and 20(5) K for BFN and PFN, respectively. In PFN sample a small change of structural parameters around TN and structural change from trigonal to cubic structure at T ∼ 400 K was observed by XRD. The temperature dependence of XRD shows stable cubic structure in the temperature range from 4.2 K to 530 K for BFN. From Mössbauer and NMR spectroscopies it is found that both structures have perturbed environments for Nb and Fe. However, in case of PFN the low values of transferred hyperfine fields disfavour random Fe/Nb arrangement and allow proposing a picture of Fe/Nb arrangement.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the La0.8Ca0.2MnO3 nanoparticles of ∼30 nm were prepared by a sol-gel method, and their magnetic properties were investigated. The sample shows a paramagnetic-to-ferromagnetic phase transition at about 214 K. The Griffiths phase, which is identified by the downturn of the inverse susceptibility versus temperature plot from the Curie-Weiss law, is suppressed with the increase of the applied magnetic field strength such as 10 kOe. From the study of magnetic properties in terms of Arrot plots, the nature of magnetic transitions is found to be of second order. The critical behavior of La0.8Ca0.2MnO3 nanoparticles was studied around its Curie temperature. The estimated critical exponents were close to those expected for mean-field model. These critical exponents fulfill the Widom scaling relation, implying the reliability of our values.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The aim of this study was to test the suitability of poly-L-lysine coated magnetic nanoparticles for combined magnetic hyperthermia and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) to unify the therapeutic and diagnostic approach. For this purpose, we have synthetized magnetic iron oxide (Fe3O4) nanoparticles of core diameter ∼10 nm and modified with Poly-L-lysine (PLL) to stabilize the particles and improve their biocompatibility. These modified nanoparticles (MFPLL) were tested for magnetic hyperthermia suitability by calorimetric measurements. Based on the estimated heating rates the specific absorption rates (SAR) for MFPLL particles were calculated. The SAR values of MFPLL particles were about 14–15 Wg−1 at frequency 190 kHz and applied field ∼8 kAm−1. In the MRI parametric mapping measurements we demonstrated the significant effect of MFPLL on transversal relaxation time T2 with the relaxivity r2 equal to 487.94 mM−1 s−1. The combination of the heating properties with the cytotoxic activities of MFPLL and MRI parameters holds great promise for the future development of targeted synergistic cancer treatment. Furthermore, as our previous results confirmed the cytotoxic activities of MFPLL in a cell type-dependent manner and the binding to cells expressing carbonic anhydrase (CA IX) when conjugated with the CA IX-specific antibody we have studied the antibody conjugated MFPLL nanoparticles in 3D spheroidal culture.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The SnO2 film deposited at room temperature (RT) on the substrate of Pt/Ti/SiO2/Si is nano-crystallized, which exhibits room temperature ferromagnetism (FM) due to the oxygen vacancies of SnO2 film. The bipolar and multilevel resistive switching (RS) can be observed in the Ta/SnO2/Pt devices, where SnO2 film was deposited at RT. The Ta/SnO2/Pt device has a large ON/OFF ratio (27000) and multilevel RS, which is of great significance for high-density data storage applications. The saturation magnetization of Ta/SnO2/Pt/Ti/SiO2/Si (Ta/SnO2/Pt device) is almost the same as SnO2/Pt/Ti/SiO2/Si, which implies that the influence of Ta top electrodes on the saturation magnetization of Ta/SnO2/Pt/Ti/SiO2/Si is much less. The Ta/SnO2/Pt device shows the non-volatile and reversible saturation magnetization modulation between low resistance state (LRS) and high resistance state (HRS), which results from the formation/rupture of oxygen vacancy filaments. The saturation magnetization at LRS is higher than that at HRS. In addition, the saturation magnetization also enhances with an increase the magnitude of positive DC sweeping voltage. Without DC loop current, the saturation magnetization of Ta/SnO2/Pt increases with an application of positive electric field and drops again with an application of certain negative electric field. The saturation magnetization of Ta/SnO2/Pt can be reversibly modulated in non-volatile by only electric voltage without DC loop current. Such modulation of Ms by only electric voltage without loop DC current is connected with the change in Vo+ density in a certain range of SnO2 films.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Quantification and imaging of magnetic nanoparticles is of vital importance for various novel biomedical applications, like cell tracking, drug targeting or hyperthermia treatments. In this work we studied the performance of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and magnetic particle imaging (MPI) for quantitative imaging of magnetic nanoparticles (MNP). This was done by measurements of serial dilutions of MNP (Ferucarbotran) in two different media (water and CuSO4 solution). The concentration range in which quantification was possible was determined for each technique, and the influence of the environment was analyzed and discussed. This revealed a significantly stronger influence of the surrounding medium on MRI performance as compared to MPI. All results were validated by measurements using their respective zero-dimensional (spectroscopic) techniques nuclear magnetic resonance and magnetic particle spectroscopy, showing similar behavior compared to the imaging modalities. Physical explanations of all observed effects are given, and a concentration range is determined in which the advantages of both imaging techniques can be utilized.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticles of MnxZn1-xFe2O4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 1.0) compositions were synthesized via sol-gel process. The structure, thermal stability and magnetic properties of as-prepared and annealed samples have been investigated. Although, as-prepared and 1200 °C air annealed samples exhibit cubic spinel ferrite phase, they decompose into α-Fe2O3, or/and α-Mn2O3 phases along with the poor quality of ferrite phase on annealing at 600 °C in air. Present investigations show that the stability of spinel ferrite phase is sensitive to (i) Mn concentration (ii) the annealing temperature and (iii) environments (air, Oxygen and Argon atmosphere) in which annealing experiments were carried out. A comparative study of structural and magnetic properties of Argon and air annealed samples suggest that differential oxygen partial pressure plays a significant role in stability as well as magnetic properties. Therefore, we suggest the deterioration of magnetic properties in Mn-Zn ferrite nanoparticles is due to depletion of Fe3+ ions from spinel structure that affects the cation distribution. It is also shown that magnetic properties can be tuned by controlling the process conditions. From these studies we propose a phenomenological model which explains the observation of present study.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this article, effects of magnetic fields induced by a finite length solenoid on the forced-convection heat transfer in a pipe partially filled with porous medium have been investigated. In this regard, two-dimensional steady-state fluid flow in the pipe was considered and the Darcy–Brinkman equation of motion was applied to model the fluid flow in the porous medium, as well as the thermal equilibrium was assumed between the solid phase and the magnetic nanofluid. Effects of electric current passing through the solenoid and the solenoid dimensions (i.e.; diameter and length) on the forced-convection heat transfer were studied carefully. The combined effects of the magnetic field and the porous medium lead to a higher mixing intensity and disruption of the thermal boundary layer which in turn result in the enhancement of the local Nusselt number value at the expense of low-pressure drop increase due to partially filling the pipe. In the simulation study, variations of the magnetic field in different media were taken into account and the assumption of the linear function of magnetization with respect to the applied magnetic field intensity was relaxed. The obtained simulation results indicate that under the influence of the magnetic field induced by a solenoid with a current intensity of 10 A, the average Nusselt number value increases up to 30%.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of gas flow on Sr2FeMoO6 thin films during pulsed laser deposition was investigated by characterizing their structural and magnetic properties. Crystallographic results reveal a great amount of structural distortion in films fabricated with high Ar or Ar + 5%H2 flow rate. The films with structural distortion have also larger coercive field, demonstrating domain pinning. The same films show also higher Curie temperature and saturation magnetization. Our results indicate that, in addition to other optimal deposition parameters, adjusting gas flow can be used for fine adjustment of Sr2FeMoO6 films for spintronic applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles are widely used in various fields of biomedicine. They can combine both therapy and diagnostics modalities thus opening many opportunities for their application. In our work, we have evaluated their ability to work as contrast agents for magnetic resonance imagining and drug delivery systems for photosensitizers. We have shown that after formation of human serum albumin retains ability to bind photosensitizers and they do not lose their optical properties. To obtain stable water solution suitable for long term storage we have additionally modified human serum albumin with polyethylene glycol. It was shown that such modification allows to increase overall stability over time.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A ferromagnetic insulating behavior is necessary to realize quantum anomalous Hall effect. Here we study, using first-principles calculations and a Monte Carlo simulation, the electronic structure and magnetism of AlN2 monolayer. Our results show that the AlN2 monolayer has a ferromagnetic insulating behavior. By using the crystal field analysis, we find that the axes of the neighboring N2 dimers are perpendicular, and the superexchange between them accounts for the ferromagnetic (FM) order in the AlN2 monolayer. We also carried out a Monte Carlo simulation, which shows that the AlN2 monolayer remains FM with Curie temperature (Tc) ∼ 22 K. Moreover, the tensile strain would make a stronger overlap between the neighboring N2 dimers, and steadily enhances the FM stability. As a result, the Tc can be increased with the tensile strain.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.FeNi films with different phase structures were prepared by electrodeposition method, and the phase structure of the film was controlled by the composition of the film. The results indicated that the well-defined stripe domain patterns and good magnetic properties of the films were fond of the bcc and bcc + fcc phase structures of the FeNi films. The results of permeability spectra indicated that the acoustic and optical modes of the film could be changed by the direction of the microwave field and stripe domain. FeNi stripe domain films exhibited the different frequency under the two modes, and the acoustic and optical modes of film showed obvious spectra in the bcc and bcc + fcc phases of FeNi films. The results are helpful to the development of the stripe domain optical mode microwave devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, manganese ferrite (MnFe2O4) nanoparticles (NPs) were successfully synthesized via the hydrothermal method, and the dispersibility and the biocompatibility of the product were improved by the polyethylene glycol (PEG) polymer as a coating onto the surface of the synthesized NPs. The potential of the use of the synthesized PEG-coated NPs as contrast agents in the magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) was also investigated. The XRD results showed that the monophase MnFe2O4 NPs were synthesized at the pH of 11, the temperature of 200 °C for 12 h (optimal conditions) via the hydrothermal method. The FE-SEM and TEM investigations showed that the hydrothermally synthesized NPs had a quite homogeneous size distribution with the average size of about 50 nm. The water-based dispersions of PEG-coated Mn-ferrite NPs showed the higher stability at pH 7 in comparison with the uncoated ones. The PEG-coated Mn-ferrite NPs showed a high saturation magnetization value (60 emu/g). An enhanced MRI contrast effect by the PEG-coated NPs was confirmed via the in vitro MRI study. Moreover, the cytotoxicity activity of the PEG-coated NPs on the HeLa cells demonstrated a high cell viability even at a 0.2 mg/ml of NPs after 48 h of incubation. Also, the in vitro hemocompatibility studies of the synthesized NPs showed that the PEG-coated NPs had no effect on the blood coagulation factors, and the red blood cell (RBC) count measured by complete blood count (CBC) tests in all the investigated concentration range. It can be concluded that, therefore, the hydrothermally synthesized PEG-coated Mn-ferrite NPs in this study can be good candidates as MRI contrast agents.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Fe81− xGaxB15Nb3Cu1 (x = 0, 3, 6, 9, 12 at%) ribbons were fabricated by using melt-spun method and their crystallization kinetics, magnetic properties and microstructure were investigated. We found that the small quenched-in Fe–Ga clusters were formed in the as-spun ribbons with Ga addition. Besides, proper Ga addition could suppress the precipitation of Fe2B phase. During annealing, addition of Ga could provide Fe–Ga clusters to be nucleation sites for the α-Fe(Ga) phase, and could inhibit the initial grain growth. With the increase of annealing temperature above 475 °C, the crystallization was controlled by both Fe–Ga and Cu clusters, which effectively refined the grain size by facilitating the nucleation and increased the crystallization volume fraction. Consequently, in the ribbon with 6 at% Ga, the grains turned out to be the minimum in the mean size of 8 nm, and the optimal soft magnetic properties with coercivity at 6.8 A/m and saturation magnetization at 167 emu/g were obtained at annealing temperature of 490 °C for 3 min.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The spin filtering ability of lead/poly-BIPO/lead model junction is investigated. A polaron excitation is considered at the center of polymer. Four polaron types are assumed as the spin and charge density distributions. The Su-Schrieffer-Heeger (SSH) Hamiltonian is modified by Hubbard and Heisenberg Hamiltonians to include the spin and charge interactions. The spin-oriented currents and spin-polarization ability of the model, in the presence/absence of polaron excitations are examined. We find that the complete spin-polarization for both of the excited and non-excited systems is possible and for a given voltage range it is a 100% plato. Our results predict that in the presence of polaron excitations the spin-oriented current is enhanced.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.MgxZn1−xFe2O4 nanoparticles (x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.5, 0.6, 0.8 and 1.0) were synthesized by auto combustion method. Structural refinement of the samples using Rietveld method revealed cubic spinel structure and showed migration of Fe3+ ions from octahedral to tetrahedral site with increase in magnesium concentration. TEM analysis showed that Mg doping has no significant influence on average particle size of the samples. The FTIR confirmed spinel structure and shift of ʋ1 and ʋ2 bands with magnesium concentration corroborated cation migration obtained from Rietveld analysis. The simultaneous presence of doublet and collapsed sextet in the Mossbauer spectra is attributed to superparamagnetic or paramagnetic and ferromagnetic particles respectively. The strength of the collapsed sextet increased with the magnesium concentration owing to the enhancement of A-B superexchange interaction. Saturation magnetization is found to be varied with magnesium concentration in accordance with Yafet-Kittel model. The superparamagnetic, ferromagnetic and paramagnetic phases in each sample were resolved by curve fitting the experimental M−H curves which confirm findings of our Mossbauer results. Also the contribution of these phases to saturation magnetization was estimated and the coexistence of different magnetic phases is attributed to distribution of particle size.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Mössbauer spectroscopy method was used to study the Brownian motion of magnetic nanoparticles in viscous media of glycerol solution, simulating cell cytoplasm. We used samples of two types of ferrofluids based on the magnetite nanoparticles with average hydrodynamic sizes 140 and 40 nm. The nanoparticles were enriched by 57Fe isotope to compensate the decrease of the Mössbauer effect probability in the liquid media. In order to maximize the viscosity coefficient we dissolved both samples in glycerol to receive more than 90% glycerol solution. We carried out two experimental series at different temperatures on ferrofluids dissolved in glycerol and ferrofluids dried to the powder-state to exclude the influence of the temperature dependent Neel relaxation. The analysis of the spectra allowed us to reveal the Brownian movement of the particles and to evaluate intrinsic dynamical parameters of the model viscous medium.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We map an interacting helical liquid system, coupled to an external magnetic field and s-wave superconductor, to an XYZ spin system, and it undergoes Majorana-Ising transition by tuning of parameters. In the Majorana state lowest excitation gap decays exponentially with system size, and the system has degenerate ground state in the thermodynamic limit. On the contrary, the gap opens in the Ising phase even in the thermodynamic limit. We study various criteria to characterize the transition, such as edge spin correlation with its neighbor C(r=1), local susceptibility χi, superconducting order parameter of edge spin P(r=1), and longitudinal structure factor S(k). All these criteria lead to the same critical value of parameters for Majorana-Ising phase transition in the thermodynamic limit. We study the entanglement spectrum of the reduced density matrix of the helical liquid system. The system shows finite Schmidt gap and non-degeneracy of the entanglement spectrum in the Ising limit. The Schmidt gap closes in the Majorana state, and all the eigenvalues are either doubly or multiply degenerate.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Bismuth iron oxide sols are synthesized using microwave radiations with variation in microwave power in the range of 180 W–1000 W. Magnetic analysis of bismuth iron oxide sols indicate ferromagnetic behavior at microwave powers of 540–720 W. Paramagnetic behavior is observed at microwave powers of 180 W and 270 W. Mixed ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic behavior of sols is obtained at microwave power of 360 W, 450 W and 810 W–1000 W. Sols synthesized using microwaves are spin coated onto copper substrates and annealed at 300 °C, in the presence of magnetic field, to obtain bismuth iron oxide thin films. X-ray diffraction patterns of thin films indicate amorphous behavior at low microwave power of 180 W and 270 W. Mixed BiFeO3 and Bi25FeO40 phases are obtained at microwave powers of 360 W and 450 W. Transition to phase pure BiFeO3 takes place at microwave power of 540–720 W. Mixed BiFeO3 and Bi2Fe4O9 phases are obtained at high microwave powers of 810 W–1000 W. Energy dispersive X-ray spectrum also confirms formation of BiFeO3 phase with 66.21%, 17.63% and 15.20% for Bi, Fe and O, respectively. Strong ferromagnetic behavior with low magnetocrystalline anisotropy is observed for films prepared using microwave power of 540–720 W. High saturation magnetization of 26.38 emu/cm3 is obtained at microwave power of 720 W. Field cooled and zero-field cooled magnetization curves show spin orientation transition at ∼80 K. Low temperature Raman analysis indicates presence of electromagnons with anomaly observed at 80 K.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report changes on the magnetic behavior of the Heavy-Fermion ferromagnetic YbNi2 alloy when reducing the size of the particles to the nanometer scale by high-energy ball milling. The milling process induces a reduction on the particle size of the bulk alloy down to 10 (2) nm and a lattice strain of 1.8 (2)%, for 30 h of milling time, as calculated from the X-ray diffraction data. The ferromagnetic transition at TC=10.5 K in the bulk alloy tends to disappear whereas other magnetic transitions arise at lower temperatures with the milling process. The AC magnetic susceptibility of the 30 h milled sample shows a frequency independent peak at 3 K, in a wide range of frequencies, consistent neither with superparamagnetic nor simple freezing of the magnetic moments, and as expected for a ferromagnetic behavior. However, from the specific heat measurements in the 30 h milled sample, a peak at 3.6 K is shifted respect to that observed in the AC magnetic susceptibility, as found in spin glasses. Additionally, the specific heat on nanometric samples show reduced magnetic contributions respect to the bulk alloy with Δcmax around 0.45 J/molK. The results are explained by the influence of magnetic inhomogeneities and disorder of the alloys enhanced by the milling process in the ensemble of nanoparticles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of steels are sensitive to temperature and currently the only way to determine them is by experimental measurement. In this work a cylindrical shaped ceramic cored EM sensor has been used to measure the low magnetic field inductance of pure iron and C-Mn steels with ferrite + pearlite microstructures during heat treatment up to 800 °C in a furnace. The low field relative permeability values have been determined by fitting the sensor readings to a finite element sensor model generated in COMSOL, where the model has been validated for room temperature measurements using samples of known low field relative permeability. The low field relative permeability values with temperature follow the expected trend of increasing values with temperature, particularly close to the Curie temperature. The measured low field relative permeability values for the mixed ferrite + pearlite microstructures have been compared to predicted values from an FE microstructure-permeability model using the single phase (ferrite or pearlite) low field relative permeability values as input. The model predictions agree well with the experimentally measured values allowing any two-phase ferrite + pearlite microstructure low field relative permeability with temperature relationship to be determined. The model has also been used to determine the low field relative permeability of ferrite + austenite microstructures with temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on in-plane magnetic anisotropy in Au/Co/Fe(1 1 0) trilayers epitaxially grown on W(1 1 0). We observe single and double in-plane spin reorientation transitions that can be explained by the strongly non-monotonic dependence of magnetic anisotropy on the Co sublayer thickness. We point out the significant flexibility of the Au/Co/Fe(1 1 0) system for switching the in-plane easy axis of the magnetic anisotropy between the [11¯0] and [0 0 1] directions of the bcc(1 1 0) plane.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The electron paramagnetic resonance(EPR) parameters (g factors gi and hyperfine structure constants Ai, where i = x, z) for Cu2+ ions embedded in beryllium oxide (BeO) crystal at Be2+ sites with C3v local symmetry have been calculated by the complete diagonalization method (CDM) and high-order perturbation theory method (PTM). The calculated results from the two methods are in reasonable agreement with the observed data available. The defect structural data of the trigonal Cu2+ center in beryllium oxide are determined from the calculations and analyses. The calculated results show that the Be2+ ions are replaced by Cu2+ ions in BeO crystal and the ligands undergo outward movement.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Full potential linearized augmented plane wave (FP-LAPW) method based on the density functional theory (DFT) is used to investigate the structural, electronic and magnetic properties of Fe and Ni (3d transition metal) substituted Rock-salt wide band gap insulator Mg1-xMxO (M = Fe, Ni). We have performed spin polarized calculations throughout this work with generalized gradient approximation (GGA) type exchange correlation functional. Additionally, the electronic structures and density of states are computed using modified Becke-Johnson (mBJ) potential based approximation with the inclusion of coulomb energy (U = 7 eV). Based on the Vegard's law and structural optimization, the lattice parameter and bulk modulus are found to be in good agreement with experimental values. Moreover, the analysis of electronic band structures reveals an insulating character for Ni substituted MgO while semiconducting and half-metallic character for Fe substituted case. It has been found that the p-d super-exchange interaction provides a ferromagnetic character due to the 3d transition metal impurities and oxygen atom. The observed p-d hybridization at the top of the valence band edge in this investigations could be useful for magneto-optic and spintronic applications. PACS: 61.66.Dk; 71.15.Mb; 71.15.Nc; 71.20.Nr; 71.22.+ i.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Detailed theoretical and experimental investigations on the electronic and magnetic properties of the Mn2Co1−xVxAl Heusler compounds are presented. The magnetization vs. temperature measurements on the Mn2Co1−xVxAl Heusler compounds show a decrease of the Curie temperature with V content, between 745 K (x = 0) and 671 K (x = 0.5). Ferrimagnetic near fully compensated behaviour with the saturation magnetization of 0.29 μB/f.u. has been obtained experimentally for Mn2Co0.5V0.5Al alloy, in slight disagreement with Slater-Pauling rule. The electronic band structure calculations performed using the Korringa-Kohn-Rostoker (KKR) Green's function method for the Mn2Co0.5V0.5Al alloy show half-metallic almost compensated ferrimagnetic behaviour with total spin moment of 0.02 μB/f.u. Accounting for the preferential site occupation determined by total energy calculations results an increase of the calculated spin moment, in agreement with the magnetic measurements. The fully compensated ferrimagnetic behaviour is predicted theoretically for the compounds derived from Mn2Co0.5V0.5Al by slight variation on composition. The half-metallic character deduced from density of states (DOS) calculations is expected to be preserved for the stoichiometric and off-stoichiometric alloys.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The electrolysis modes affect on the quantitative and phase composition of the ternary Fe-Co-W and Fe-Co-Mo coatings is studied. It was established that the distribution of refractory components over the thickness of the coating varies in the opposite way with increasing duration of electrolysis – the molybdenum content increases and the tungsten one decreases. Amorphous-crystalline structure of alloys has been visualized by X-ray spectroscopy, including inter-metallic phases Co7W6, Fe7W6, Fe7Mo, Fe7Co, FeCo along with α-Fe and Fe3C. The size of coherent-scattering region of the amorphous part is of 6–8 nm. The formation of metallic tungsten and molybdenum additional phases has been detected for alloys deposited at pulse current which contributes microhardness Hμ increase up to 700 compared with direct current mode. Magnetic characteristics of Fe-Co-W(Mo) films were measured depending of deposition time. It was concluded that the content of magnetic phases in upper layers of Fe-Co-W deposits is higher than in the bottom ones and superior Fe-Co-Mo coatings. It qualitatively corresponds to W(Mo) content changes over the thickness.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.M-type barium hexaferrite (BaM) of composition BaZn0.6Sn0.6Fe10.8O19 was successfully synthesized through a ceramic process. Sintering aids Bi2O3·B2O3·SiO2·ZnO (BBSZ) were added to lower the sintering temperature. The formation of pure M phase for samples sintered at 900 °C with sufficient BBSZ was confirmed from XRD patterns analysis. Large saturation magnetization (69.02 emu/g) and relatively low magnetic anisotropy field (7.4 kOe) were obtained simultaneously when sample was synthesized with 2.5 wt% BBSZ dosage. These properties make the material suitable for applications in LTCC process. The ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) linewidth (ΔH) decreased efficiently by 719 Oe owing to the sintering aids. This M-type hexaferrite is also potential candidate for the design of microwave devices such as circulators and isolators operated at low frequencies. Meanwhile, the influences of sintering aids upon the microstructure, complex permeability and magnetic properties of M-type hexaferrite BaZn0.6Sn0.6Fe10.8O19 were investigated.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Griffiths phase in fine grain manganite La0.75Ca0.25MnO3 is studied by the complementary structural methods, DC magnetic susceptibility and ESR spectroscopy. The Griffiths like phase is detected above Curie temperature between 232 and 280 K and sustains up to high magnetic field of 3000 Oe. The magnetic susceptibility of Griffiths phase is a decreasing function of temperature. The magnetic field dependence of Griffiths phase susceptibility reveals its remarkable contribution to measured total susceptibility. The additional anomalous ESR signal supperimpossed on the paramagnetic one is ascribed to the locally inhomogeneous Griffiths like phase in agreement with the core – shell model.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We performed neutron imaging of ferromagnetic transitions in Ni3Al and HgCr2Se4 crystals. These neutron depolarization measurements revealed bulk magnetic inhomogeneities in the ferromagnetic transition temperature with spatial resolution of about 100 μm. To obtain such spatial resolution, we employed a novel neutron microscope equipped with Wolter mirrors as a neutron image-forming lens and a focusing neutron guide as a neutron condenser lens. The images of Ni3Al show that the sample does not homogeneously go through the ferromagnetic transition; the improved resolution allowed us to identify a distribution of small grains with slightly off-stoichiometric composition. Additionally, neutron depolarization imaging experiments on the chrome spinel, HgCr2Se4, under pressures up to 15 kbar highlight the advantages of the new technique especially for small samples or sample environments with restricted sample space. The improved spatial resolution enables one to observe domain formation in the sample while decreasing the acquisition time despite having a bulky pressure cell in the beam.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this article we investigate the induction of a surface anisotropy due to the displacement of the vortex core in a cylindrical nanostructure. In fact, the effect of the displacement of the vortex core in the dipolar energy can be modeled simply as a surface anisotropy of the form Es=Ks∫Sm dS(n̂·m̂)2/2. Moreover, the surface anisotropy constant Ks is proportional to the cylinder in-plane demagnetizing factor in the direction of the core deviation, Ny(L/R), i.e., Ks=μ0M0 2RNy(L/R), where R and L are the radius and the thickness of the cylinder, respectively. Our results show that the term of the nontrivial dipolar energy caused by the charges in the cylinder mantle can be replaced by a simple integral Es that increases the efficiency of the numerical calculations in the analytical study of the displacement of the vortex core in magnetic vortices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) can be used as magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) contrast agent with dynamic susceptibility contrast (DSC) MRI, which is an important in vivo method to assess organ perfusion with multiple clinical applications. Since variations in particle size and PEGylation of MNPs may potentially influence particle-tissue interactions in the microcirculation, we evaluate their effects on rat kidneys with DSC MRI. Anesthetized Sprague Dawley rats were cannulated for intravenous injection of dextran-coated MNPs (50 nm and 250 nm; 5 mg/kg) with or without PEGylation during acquirement of DSC MRI images. The results demonstrate that both particle size and PEGylation may alter perfusion parameters. Relative mean transit time (rMTT) of 50 nm particles is 1.8 fold of that of 250 nm particles with or without PEGylation. In MNPs of 50 nm, PEGylation is associated with 38% and 25% shorter time-to-peak (TTP) and time from onset to 50% drop from peak (T50), respectively; however, PEGylation exerts no effect on these parameters of 250 nm particles. Nevertheless, particle size or PEGylation exert no influence on the prediction of relative blood flow or relative blood volume of the kidney. In conclusion, DSC MRI is a feasible method to evaluate renal perfusion and properties of MNPs in circulation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The electronic structure and magnetism of individual Dy atom adsorbed on the graphene/Ir(1 1 1) surface is investigated using the combination of the density functional theory with the Hubbard-I approximation to the Anderson impurity model (DFT + HIA). The divalent Dy2+ adatom is found, with the magnetic moment of 9.4–9.6 μB, depending on the placement of the graphene on the Ir(1 1 1) surface, in an external magnetic field. The spin and orbital magnetic moments are evaluated, and compared with the X-ray magnetic circular dichroism (XMCD) data. The positive magnetic anisotropy energy determines the out-of-plane orientation of the Dy adatom magnetic moment. Without an external magnetic field, the ground state is a doublet |J=8,Jz=±7.9〉, symmetry protected from quantum tunnelling of the magnetization. Calculations show that insertion of the graphene layer promotes reduction of the hybridization between Dy-4f-states and the Ir(1 1 1) substrate, and leads to increase of the magnetic moment relaxation time for the Dy adatom.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ultrathin CoO films can be grown onto Fe(001) by exploiting Co buffer layers with nanometer thickness, with the result of avoiding the formation of Fe oxides at the interface. Such a system is characterized by a magnetic anisotropy that influences the magnetization reversal behavior, making the Fe easy magnetization axes inequivalent. Here, we exploit Magnetic Second Harmonic Generation to show that such an anisotropy is related to the buried interface and that it is not related to the magnetic properties of the antiferromagnetic CoO layer. In fact, CoO is magnetically ordered already at room temperature, even for low thicknesses and independently on the presence of Fe oxides. The magnetic domains configuration of CoO mimics those of both Fe and Co in all cases, as testified by magnetic PhotoElectron Emission Microscopy measurements.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We synthesized ZnxFe3− xO4 (x = 0.0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, 1.0) nano-hollow spheres (NHSs), a promising functional magnetic material for bio-medical applications. Detailed temperature dependent magnetic studies indicate an increase in saturation magnetization (MS) with Zn doping, attaining a maximum at x = 0.2 (MS = 92.52 emu/g at room temperature), due to the replacement of antiferromagnetically coupled FeA 3+ ion on the A site by Zn2+ and transformation of FeB 2+ to FeB 3+ on B site for maintaining the charge neutrality. The dynamic magnetic properties of the powdered ZnxFe3− xO4 samples were investigated using frequency dependent real and imaginary parts of ac susceptibility. The data obtained by fitting Vogel Fulcher law indicates reduced dipolar interaction in our systems due to Zn doping. Applications of Fe3O4 nanostructures can be improved by doping Zn and making hollow spheres.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have studied magneto- and electro-caloric effects in multiferroic YMn0.5Cr0.5O3 compound, which has a ferrimagnetic transition at TN ∼73 K. Two peaks in the temperature dependence of isothermal magnetic entropy change ΔSM can be observed at TN and lower T0, respectively. While the first maximum of ΔSM corresponds to the ferrimagnetic transition as expected, the second one might be related to a metamagnetic transition. Using the Maxwell's relation, an electric field driven entropy change (−ΔSE) has also been obtained at temperatures around TN, revealing the multicaloric effect in the YMCO sample. Temperature dependence of the specific-heat confirms the second-order feature for the ferrimagnetic transition in YMCO. By fitting the specific-heat and magnetization data at low temperatures according to the spin-wave excitation model, the nearest neighboring exchange integral J12 has been estimated to be around 10−4 eV, which is in agreement with the value gained from the molecular field theory.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, electromagnetic (EM) wave absorbing properties of polypyrrole/silicone rubber (PP-SI) filled nano-carbon and carbonyl iron (CI) nanocomposites have been investigated in the X-band. The PP-SR matrix was provided by the incorporation of polypyrrole and liquid silicone rubber in the ratio of 10:90. The PP-SR serves not only as a matrix but also promotes the flexibility and EM wave absorption of the nanocomposite sheets. In the present research, the chemical, morphology, thermal, wetting, absorption, and mechanical properties of the EM wave absorber sheets are investigated. The EM wave absorber sheet with 3 wt% nano-carbon and 37 wt% CI and a thickness of 1 mm, exhibits a minimum reflection loss around −13 dB at 10.27 GHz. The absorber sheet with an elongation of 520% could be qualified as a superior elastic sheet. The specimen represents higher thermal stability compared with pure SR, and the contact angle of the sheet proved that their surface should be hydrophobic.© 2018This work reports a new approach of synthesis of FePt nanoparticles in aqueous medium using cetyl trimethylammonium bromide (CTAB) surfactant as a capping agent and the influence of change of its concentration on the size of the particles. Tuning of magnetic properties has also been done by changing the CTAB concentrations. Here at higher CTAB concentration, particles formed are of smaller size compared to the size prepared in lower micellar concentration. The ordering parameter of the particles after annealing at 550 °C with the variation of particle size is also studied. The magnetic properties of these particles are studied and the effect of particle phase and size on magnetic property is also investigated. The particles are prepared in aqueous medium because water soluble particles are useful for hyperthermia therapy. Heating abilities of the particles under AC magnetic field are also checked with change in their size. The studies on interaction of particles with cancer cell line was also performed with probing the cell by fluorescence imaging technique after bio-functionalization of the particles by sodium oleate and fluorescent dye rhodamine-B-isothiocyanate (RITC). All these preliminary studies indicate a promising applicability of the particles for localized cancer treatment by magnetic field induced hyperthermia therapy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) of Fe80P13C7 melt-spun amorphous ribbon and bulk glassy rod has been investigated and so the effect of the preparation cooling rate on the MCE of the present Fe-based amorphous alloy is studied. The value of peak of isothermal magnetic entropy change (|ΔSM peak|) and refrigerant capacity (RC) for the Fe80P13C7 amorphous ribbon is larger than those of the glassy rod under varies applied field. Hence, we consider that the demagnetization field effect may have a significant influence on the MCE measurement results of the Fe80P13C7 glassy rod. After the demagnetization field correction, the values of |ΔSM peak| and RCAREA for the Fe80P13C7 glassy rod are close or even superior to those of the amorphous ribbon. Further, it is indicated from the |ΔSM peak|∝Hn relationship that the glassy rod has more homogeneous internal atomic structure compared with the amorphous ribbon. It has been proposed that more homogeneous structure could lead to greater magnetocaloric properties, and therefore we suggest that the intrinsic MCE performance of the Fe80P13C7 glassy rod prepared at a lower cooling rate should be better than that of the amorphous ribbon.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic Barkhausen noise (MBN) plays significant roles to describe the dynamic of domain walls (DWs), but an in-depth understanding of the correlation between Barkhausen effect and magnetostrictive effect during magnetization process is still limited. In this study, we investigated MBN signals and the frequency spectra in a high-magnetostrictive Fe30Co70 alloy wire (λs = 102 ppm) by evaluating the stress effects on MBN profiles at the stress range of 0–150 MPa using tensile test machine. The results from MBN profiles revealed that MBN in the high magnetic field region was responsible for the localized changes of magnetic flux density, dB/dt induced by magnetic distortion related to non-180° DWs or the magnetization rotation. In MBN spectra, the peak shift towards lower frequencies with the increase of stress indicates that the rough pulse-like MBN outbreaks increase, and it results mainly from the increase of DW jumping length which is caused by the pinning effect at grain boundaries where DW energy is relatively high. In addition, stress dependence of the root mean square (RMS) value of MBN showed a good sensitivity (0.038 mV/MPa). Overall, these findings indicate that new MBN measurement system utilizing magnetostrictive materials can be helpful for a wide range of applications such as mechanical stress sensors and energy harvester systems.© 2018We present a Monte Carlo study of the magnetic properties of thin cylindrical nanowires composed of a ferromagnetic core and an antiferromagnetic shell implementing a classical spin Hamiltonian. We address systematically the impact of interface exchange coupling on the loop characteristics and the magnetization reversal mechanism. We study the effect of shell polycrystallinity on the characteristic fields of the isothermal hysteresis loop (coercivity, exchange-bias). We demonstrate that coupling to a polycrystalline antiferromagnetic shell increases the critical core diameter for transition from transverse to vortex domain walls.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The self-assembly of magnetic core-shell nanoparticles in the presence of a magnetic template, which consists of an array of soft-magnetic elements embedded in non-magnetic substrate, is analyzed by using discrete element method. An external bias magnetic field is used to magnetize the soft-magnetic elements to saturate state. The high-gradient field produced by elements combined with biased uniform magnetic field provides a flexible way to control the behavior of particles. An equivalent source method is adopted to obtain the closed-form magnetic field analysis, which not only improves the calculation efficiency but also enables accurate prediction of the Kelvin force. In the presence of magnetic field, the behavior of the magnetic nanoparticles is dependent on the magnetic and hydrodynamic forces. Therefore, the assembled structures of magnetic nanoparticles are firstly investigated without considering the magnetic dipole interaction force, in which an unordered nanostructure is formed. As a contrast, the self-assembly of particles is also simulated by taking all forces into account. In this case, the magnetic nanoparticles assemble into an ordered 3D structure, which presents a hexagonal close packed structure. A comparison between the results of the mentioned two cases denotes that the magnetic dipole interaction force plays an important role in controlling the self-assembly of magnetic nanoparticles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We provide a theoretical description of frustrated multiferroic MnI2 with a spiral magnetic ordering in magnetic field h. We demonstrate that subtle interplay of exchange coupling, dipolar forces, hexagonal anisotropy, and the Zeeman energy account for the main experimental findings observed recently in this material (Kurumaji et al., Phys. Rev. Lett. 106 (2011) 167206). We describe qualitatively the non-trivial evolution of electric polarization P upon h rotation, changing P direction upon h increasing, and disappearance of ferroelectricity at h>hc, where hc is smaller than the saturation field.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we investigate the effect of magnetic field annealing on the magnetostriction and deflection properties of polycrystalline CoFe2O4 thin films grown on Si(1 0 0) substrates by pulsed laser deposition. Prior to the field-annealing process, both structural and magnetic properties of the CoFe2O4 films were optimized through controlling the oxygen pressures from 7 to 13.3 Pa. A good combination of saturation magnetization (195 emu/cm3) and coercivity (690 Oe) was obtained for the CoFe2O4 films grown at 9.0 Pa. These films when subjected to field-annealing demonstrated improved magnetostriction (91 micro-strain) and deflection (730 nm) properties, as compared to the conventionally annealed counterparts. The observed enhancement in the magnetostriction and deflection in the CoFe2O4 films is hypothesized to both domain wall rotation and movement facilitated by the field-annealing process.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic domain wall memory technology, wherein the information is stored in magnetic domains of multiple magnetic nanowires, is a potential concept proposed to store the large amount of digital data in the near future, which is generated due to the widespread use of social media and computing devices. However, one of the technological challenges which remains to be solved in domain wall memory is the controllable pinning of the domain walls at the nanometer scale. Here, we demonstrate the possibility to stabilize domain walls with nanoscale modification of magnetic properties by using thermal diffusion of elements from crossbar configuration. We have inspected and evaluated the magnetic properties of the nanowires using Kerr microscopy. The pinning field induced by Cr diffusion of our Ni80Fe20 nanowire was estimated to be about 8 kA/m as determined from minor loop (magnetoresistance vs. magnetic field) measurements. The proposed concept can potentially be used in future domain wall memory applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nano-sized CoFe2O4 (CFO), BiFeO3 (BFO) and their core-shell composites BFO@CFO and CFO@BFO were synthesized by chemical co-precipitation method. X-ray diffraction pattern confirmed the crystallinity and phase formation of bare CFO, BFO and their core-shell composites. Morphology and core-shell nature of these nanoparticles is justified by field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM) and high resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM). Magnetization curve showed the weak ferromagnetic behaviour of BFO. Typical ferrimagnetic behaviour is shown by bare CFO and core-shell nanocomposites. The value of maximum magnetization, remanence magnetization and coercivity of CFO@ BFO were found to be greater than the BFO@ CFO. Also, CFO@ BFO showed the highest value of dielectric constant in the frequency range of 104–106 Hz. Dielectric constant versus temperature curve of BFO and core-shell composites exhibit incongruity close to the antiferromagnetic transition temperature (370 °C) of BFO indicating presence of magnetoelectric (ME) coupling.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Recent in vitro and small-animal studies have demonstrated that anti-cancer efficiency of the emerging nanomedical technology of local magnetic hyperthermia can be essentially enhanced by concurrent chemotherapy. So far, this encouraging result has been obtained in magnetic field conditions inapplicable to human body. In this article we report on magnetic hyperthermia system that proved capability of effective treatment of tumors in small-animals by the means of chemotherapy enhanced thermal ablation with the use of magnetic fields applicable to any part of human body. It is based on the rejection of traditional superparamagnetic nanoparticles in favor of hard magnetic particles, optimized taking into account the identified physiological and physical limitations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.NiZnCe ferrite, Ni0.4Zn0.6− xCexFe2O4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.20), were prepared by the sol-gel self-spreading process combing with the solid reaction process. The crystal structure and physical properties of NiZnCe ferrite with different amount of Ce substitution have been studied. The lattice parameter and density rise and the grain size is decreasing with Ce substitution increasing because the ionic radius of Ce3+ ion is much bigger than that of Zn2+ ions, and the atomic weight of Ce3+ ions is heavier than Zn2+ ions. Ms initially increases with increasing amount of Ce substitution because of the increase of density and reduction of porosity, then it decreases when Ce substitution excesses 0.15 which contributes to the increase of the net magnetic moment in tetrahedral site and porosity and the apparence of CeO2 phase. Hc monotonously decreases with Ce substitution increasing due to the mono-domain structure of grains. The initial permeability initially increases at room temperature with the Ce substitution content increasing and has the maximum when the replacement content is 0.15. But it sharply drops when the amount of Ce replacement is 0.20 because the porosity increasing and impurity phase appearance. The Curie temperature has been greatly improved with Ce substitution due to the enhancements of A-B superexchange interactions. The dc resistivity gradually decreases at room temperature due to the fact that Ce substitution reduces the activation energy, and it obeys an exponential decay with the temperature increasing.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Microstructural and magnetic properties of the Fe2MnSi Heusler alloys in the bulk and ribbon form have been investigated from a viewpoint of technology of their production. The bulk alloys were prepared by arc and induction melting while for the ribbon-type samples the planar flow casting technology was used. X-ray diffraction has confirmed a presence of the L21 cubic phase in both polished 500 µm thick discs cut from a button and cylinder type ingots of the same chemical composition and in the 20 μm thick and 2 mm wide ribbon. Values of lattice parameters (0.560–0.571 nm) obtained for discs and both ribbon sides were almost independent on technology, which, on the other hand, has markedly influenced the microstructure yielding the large size of grains and grain boundaries in the disc samples in comparison to about two orders of magnitude smaller grains in the ribbon sample. From the magnetic viewpoint all alloys were paramagnetic at a room temperature contrary to their magnetic behaviour at low temperatures. The slight excess of Mn at the expense of Fe in the chemical composition of the ribbon sample detected by the energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy has contributed to a marked positive shift of the Curie temperature (Tc ≈ 270 K and 215–230 K for ribbon and bulk samples, respectively). The second magnetic transition of a magnetic moment re-orientation observed at about 69 K was similar for all kinds of samples.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic targeting is a non-invasive strategy to improve treatment efficacy for graft intimal hyperplasia (the leading cause of the arterial bypass graft failure). The present study aims are to investigate the possibility of MPs retention in the bypass graft anastomosis region where IH are developed after surgical intervention and quantify the particles accumulation function of the position of the external magnetic field. In this study iron (Fe) particles with 10 μm in size were used to model the magnetic carrier mixed in the glycerol-water solutions. The 10 μm diameter iron particle was used only to model the magnetic carrier in experimental investigation (not intended for clinical use), to demonstrate the feasibility of the particle targeting. Magnetic fields are generated by NdFeB external magnet. Positioning permanent magnet near to the diseased area resulted in a deviation of the injected ferromagnetic particles within the blood flux and their capture onto the wall of the bypass graft test section. To increase the accumulation of the particles in the targeted region, it is critical to understand the effect of the flow structure on particle deposition, namely interaction between the instabilities formed in the primary vortex of the anastomosis region. The results presented in this paper, put in evidence the blood constituents migrations to the artery wall for the specific flow pattern (through used iron particles), and demonstrate the feasibility of the magnetic drug targeting as a potential alternative method for effective treatment of the bypass graft intimal hyperplasia.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The coercivity of sintered Nd-Fe-B with Dy infiltration is improved remarkably and without any marked decrease in remanence. On the basis of this, corrosion resistance, surface roughness, friction factor and plating adhesion strength were analyzed. According to the experimental results, the corrosion potential of the Dy-treated magnet is increased and corrosion current density is lower than that of the as-machined magnet. Ra of sintered Nd-Fe-B with Dy infiltration is similar to that of the as-machined magnet. The friction factor of sintered Nd-Fe-B with Dy infiltration is lower than that of the as-machined magnet. The plating adhesion strength of sintered Nd-Fe-B with Dy infiltration is improved.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.High permeability and high saturation magnetization are two key attributes to strong microwave absorption for magnetic loss composites, which depend on the chemical composition, particle size, surface profile, fabrication method, etc. However, it is still a challenge to understand the influences of these properties on micro magnetic behaviors to manipulate microwave absorption performances. In this study, magnetic absorbers with spherical and flaky shapes were adapted to investigate the influences of morphology on magnetic properties via off-axis electron holography. Stray magnetic flux lines were visualized to validate the difference in the forms of magnetic incorporation among spherical and flaked-shaped metallic particles, which then results in reflection loss (RL) up to −53 dB for the flakes and absorption (>99%) bandwidth up to 3 GHz for the spherical types. The micro-field detection using the powerful technique of off-axis electron holography sheds new light on the understanding about intrinsic magnetic micro behaviors for metallic composites.© 2018 Elsevier LtdAlGaN/GaN heterostructures were successfully grown with the AlIn(Ga)N back barrier at 900 °C. However, the atomic composition of the AlIn(Ga)N layer was strongly dependent on the growth pressure, which resulted in a different lattice constant of the layer. The AlIn(Ga)N back barrier grown at 400 torr was almost lattice-matched to GaN layer. The AlGaN/GaN heterostructures with 10 and 15 nm-thick AlIn(Ga)N back barrier exhibited improved 2-DEG properties, compared to those of the conventional AlGaN/GaN heterostructure without the back barrier. The high electron mobility transistors (HEMTs) fabricated on the AlGaN/GaN heterostructure with a 15 nm-thick AlIn(Ga)N back barrier exhibited a very low off-state leakage current of ∼2 × 10−7 A/mm which is about 1 order lower in magnitude than the value of the device without the back barrier. The AlIn(Ga)N back barrier is a promising candidate as an alternative to conventional AlGaN and InGaN back barrier.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, a novel island diodes triggering silicon-controlled rectifier with waffle layout (IDTWSCR) is fabricated in a 0.5-µm BCDMOS process. Such device structure obtains strong ESD robustness by using island diodes trigger without increasing device area. The primary cause of why it improves the multi-finger high-voltage (HV) SCR's ESD robustness is detected by theoretical analysis, Atlas 3-D device simulation and transmission line pulse (TLP) system. Compared to SCR with waffle layout (WSCR), the triggering voltage (Vt1) of IDTWSCR remarkably decreases from 18.05 V to 14.75 V and the failure current (It2) effectively increases from 8.13 A to 15.45 A.© 2018In this article, we report on the temperature-dependent GaN HEMT behavior. To evaluate the potentialities of this kind of active solid-state electronic device at its best, the experiments are performed at extreme operating conditions. As a case study, we consider a large 0.25-μm GaN HEMT with a gate periphery of 1.5 mm, providing a high dissipated power of 5.1 W. The tested semiconductor device is characterized by measuring scattering parameters at high frequencies up to 65 GHz and at high ambient temperature up to 200 °C. To assess the impact of the thermal effects on high-frequency GaN HEMT performance, an equivalent circuit is analytically extracted and then used to determine the main RF figures of merit. The achieved experimental results show evidence that the increase of the temperature causes a significant degradation in device performance.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present the results of a detailed investigation of magnetism in spinel chromite NiCr2O4 magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs). Compared to the bulk NiCr2O4, the finite crystallite size of about 10 nm lowers the Jahn-Teller distortion and greatly enhances the collinearity of the spin structure in MNPs with considerably reduced “frustration index” = |θCW|/Tc. This leads to (longitudinal) ferrimagnetic ordering at much higher temperature, Tc≈100 K and suppression of (transverse) antiferromagnetic ordering in MNPs (cf. Tc ≃ 65 K and Ts ≃ 30 K in the bulk); a transition to the cluster spin glass state occurs at Tg = 19.0 K. Moreover, the M-H hysteresis loops show anomalous “hour-glass” behavior at fields near Hc in the vicinity of Tg; this non-monotonous Hc (T) variation can not be accounted from the celebrated Stoner-Wohlfarth model. The present study interprets the anomalous Hc (T) behavior in the framework of magnetically interacting core-shell structure with large surface anisotropy, and points out the importance of surface effects in nanochromites compared to their counterpart ferrites.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA unified explanation is proposed to consistently explain the two-step degradation of amorphous InGaZnO (a-IGZO) thin film transistors (TFTs) under DC positive bias temperature instability (PBTI) stress without or with different drain stress voltages (Vds). For PBTI stress without stress Vds, this initial negative Vth shift is believed to be induced by donor-like defect states corresponding to H2O molecule and intrinsic defects, while for PBTI stress with stress Vds, the negative shift is believed to be induced by donor-like defect states corresponding to oxygen vacancies. The gate-bias-induced electron trapping mechanism is responsible for positive Vth shift. These transitions from negative to positive Vth shift are resulted from the competition between the donor-like states creation and electron trapping.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetoelectric coupling in multiferroics gives rise to various properties such as metamagnetoelectric effect since external fields act. In this study, a general thermodynamic framework is developed to investigate metamagnetoelectric effects in multiferroic materials. The model used is a quasi-two dimensional frustrated spin chain controlled by a static electric field in y-direction and magnetic field in z-direction. The effects of metamagnetoelectric transitions on entropy, heat capacity and on the linear magnetoelectric coupling factor are assessed using Fermi-Dirac statistics of quantum gases and the Landau theory. The entropy behavior is shown to be similar to that of the magnetic susceptibility. In fact, while the magnetic susceptibility characterizes the variations of magnetization and accordingly emphasizes the ferroic transition points of this order, the intrinsic physics of these transition points highlights a muddle occurring due to a rearrangement of magnetic moments in the system, and this is accurately described in terms of entropy. The transition effects due to this rearrangement described in terms of entropy at the corresponding critical points show different loop to that of the heat capacity. The opposite loop showed by the heat capacity compared to the entropy is its weakening at the exact transition point in spite of its strengthening during the transition process. It is also recorded only a few ranges of the electric field which allows the effect provided. The temperature dependence of the magnetoelectric coupling highlights how it is continuously weakened by the increase of temperature, leading to a second order transition from the metamagnetoelectric state.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline ruthenium-doped lithium-copper-ferrite (Ru-LiCuFe2O4)nanoparticles (NPs) are synthesized using a simple and cost-effective chemical co-precipitation method and annealed at different temperatures for increasing the crystallinity. The transmission and scanning electron microscopy images have confirmed the presence of soft agglomerations and cuboids for the samples annealed at 1100 °C. X-ray photoelectron results along with Raman spectra have collectively demonstrated the presence of Ru in the structure of Ru-LiCuFe2O4 NPs. The dielectric properties of as-synthesized Ru-LiCuFe2O4 NPs are investigated using LCR meter where the smaller NPs demonstrates a higher dielectric constant. Also, the results of magnetic measurements of annealed Ru-LiCuFe2O4 NPs have corroborated a soft magnetic nature due to the pinning sites that endow lower coercivity, remanence and saturation magnetization than that of the pristine one. The variation of permittivity and electrical resistivity with respect to frequency under humidity conditions suggested that this material has a potential to use as capacitive and resistive humidity sensor. The results of this study open the doors for utilization of metal-doped magnetic ferrites for humidity sensing applications.© 2018 Elsevier LtdDue to the two-terminal structure, non-destructive read and high integrable density, resistive switching random access memory (RRAM) has attracted much attention for its potential applications in semiconductor industry. Unfortunately, the unexpected failure behaviour is an obstacle for further applications. In our previous work, the CdS inter-layer was used to successfully suppress the failure behaviour in Cu2O based memory cell. However, the switching voltages are still too high and need to be significantly reduced for further applications. In this work, the CdS/ZnO heterostructure is exploited to effectively reduce the switching voltages. Compared to the CdS/Cu2O based device, the switching voltages in Pt/CdS/ZnO/FTO cell are effectively reduced. The Pt/CdS/ZnO/FTO cell also exhibits remarkable resistive switching and stable data retention characteristics. This work proposes a feasible way to effectively optimize the RRAM devices for future applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The results of investigation of specific heat, and magnetocaloric effect for La0.7−xPrxSr0.3MnO3 (x = 0, 0.1, 0.2, 0.3, 0.4, 0.5, 0.6, 0.7) manganites in the temperature range of 100–425 K at H = 0 and 18 kOe are presented. The magnetocaloric properties have been investigated by direct and indirect measurement techniques. The value of ΔT ranges from 1.09 K to 1.75 K and ΔS from 1.84 J/kg K to 4.21 J/kg K in a magnetic field of 18 kOe. In a wide range of changes in the concentration of Pr, the value of the MCE varies little, and with increasing Pr concentration, TC decreases.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A coupled nonlinear system is investigated, which describes the nonlinear short-wave propagation in nanoscale saturated ferromagnetic materials. A series of analytic solutions is constructed via Riccati equation mapping method. Furthermore, two types of novel periodically oscillating solitons are observed by choosing the arbitrary function in the soliton solution as trigonometric function and Jacobian elliptic function, respectively. The parameters can be used to control the compression, stretch, oscillating amplitude and frequency of the solitons.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic structures of Fe3BO5 and Co3BO5 ludwigites have been studied experimentally by magnetic measurements and theoretically by the combination of the group theoretical analysis and semi empiric calculations of the superexchange interactions. The different collinear spin configurations in the triads 3-1-3 and 4-2-4 including ferromagnetic, antiferromagnetic and dimer have been considered. For Fe3BO5 the antiferromagnetic state with zero magnetic moment per unit cell, showing the lowest energy, results to be the most probable magnetic ground state. The unusual magnetic structure comprising two virtually independent orthogonal subsystems is formed to avoid heavy frustrations of superexchange interactions between the 3-1-3 and 4-2-4 spin ladders. In Co3BO5 the magnetic frustrations present for the Co3+ high-spin state are quenched for a Co3+ low spin state resulting in the ferrimagnetic long-range order. The obtained results are discussed in comparison with experimental magnetic data.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Modelling hysteresis behaviour is an essential task in transient analysis of electrical machines. A curve fitting approach based on isoparametric elements is proposed in this work. A hysteresis loop is split into sub-curves and each sub-curve has been modelled in terms of a second degree polynomial using three data points. Thus the model requires few data points to model a complete loop. The model equations can be easily derived using predefined shape functions of an isoparametric element without using any curve fitting algorithms. The proposed approach has been applied to model hysteresis data of two different materials, namely, grain-oriented (GO) laminations and soft magnetic composites (SMC). Symmetrical minor loops of GO materials with magnetization along any arbitrary direction are modelled for the first time. The calculated results are in close agreement with measured values. Compared to existing methods, the proposed technique in this paper is simple to understand and computationally efficient.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The antiferromagnetic (AFM) CuMnAs alloy with tetragonal structure is a promising material for the AFM spintronics. The resistivity measurements indicate the presence of defects. We confirmed vacancies on Mn or Cu sublattices and MnCu and CuMn antisites as most probable defects in CuMnAs by our new ab initio total energy calculations. We have estimated resistivities of possible defect types as well as resistivities of samples for which the X-ray structural analysis is available. In the latter case we have found that samples with Cu- and Mn-vacancies with low formation energies have also resistivities which agree well with the experiment. Finally, we have also calculated exchange interactions and estimated the Néel temperatures by using the Monte Carlo approach. A good agreement with experiment was obtained.© 2018Nickel and silver are metals with interesting properties of technological relevance: nickel is a well known ferromagnet and silver has antibacterial properties. Both exist in the face centered cubic phase but are immiscible. In the context of alloys at the nanoscale, one can play with the size to fine tune a desired property, or to achieve new properties and functionalities that do not exist at the macroscopic regime. In this work, we explore how the subtle interaction between Ni and Ag triggers the chemical order, the electronic structure, and the magnetic properties of a AgNi nanoalloy of 55 atoms, a size that can accommodate core/shell configurations with sizable parts. Calculations are conducted within the density functional theory at the generalized gradient approximation for exchange and correlation. We determine, in the whole composition range, the chemical order, absolute and relative stabilities by means of binding energy, excess energy and second energy difference, as well as total and part-projected spin-polarized electronic densities of states and local charge and spin magnetic moments distribution. Ni-core/Ag-shell structures are particularly stable, but contrary to what one would expect by simply extrapolating the properties of the pure Ag and Ni clusters or of pure fcc bulks, we find unexpected behaviors along the composition range, such as quenched magnetic moments in Ni, total magnetic moments essentially contributed in some cases by Ag, or electronic charge transfer that changes its sign depending on the stoichiometry. These behaviors l to magnetic transitions as a function of the composition, and differ, in some cases, from those of the smaller 13-atoms AgNi nanoalloys of the same symmetry with which we compare, a further demonstration of the complex nature of nanostructures. The above trends are robust against ionization and electron capture.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the physical properties of the compounds La0.8Na0.2Mn0.97Bi0.03O3 prepared by solid-state (S1) and Sol-Gel (S2) methods are compared. Both compounds were found to crystallize in the rhombohedra structure with R-3c space group. They also exhibited a Ferromagnetic (FM)-Paramagnetic (PM) phase transition around the Curie temperature (TC). Curie temperature TC and magnetization decreased with the decrease of the crystallite size. The maximum of the magnetic entropy change ΔSM at 5 T, were about 4.73 J·K−1·kg−1 and 5.88 J·K−1·kg−1 for S1 and S2, respectively. We proved the second order character via the normalization curves and through the Banerjee criteria. Moreover, we determined the critical exponents values of β γ and δ with the extrapolation of Arrott plots, the Kouvel fisher technique and the critical isotherm, respectively. The validity of the exponents values was confirmed with the scaling hypothesis; the M (T, ε) curves collapsed onto two independent universal branches below and above Tc.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The perovskite oxide of the formula LaBaFe0.5Zn0.5MnO6−δ has been prepared by sol-gel process and has been investigated by X-ray powder diffraction, Electron diffraction, High-angle annular dark field scanning transmission electron microscopy images (HAADF-STEM), annular bright-field scanning transmission electron microscopy (ABF-STEM) and Mössbauer spectroscopy. The Rietveld refinement of the X-ray diffraction data show that this compound crystallizes in the cubic system with Pm-3m space group. Moreover, the electron diffraction along the [1 0 0] and [1 1 0] directions confirm the cubic structure in Pm-3m space group with cell parameter a = 3.93 Å. Iron, zinc and manganese are totally located in octahedral environments. The Mössbauer measurement carried out at room temperature and 77 K showed a paramagnetic behavior with iron in Fe3+ high-spin state as extracted from the values of the isomer shift.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The need for new numerical methods that can reduce the time computation for non-linear instantaneous field problems is increasing as for example applications for HTS materials become more and more important. This work proposes a novel numerical approach suitable for the simulation of non-linear materials with lower computational times in the simulation of instantaneous field problems in the presence of high temperature superconductors (HTS). The proposed method is based on a partitioned finite element method (FEM) using an E-H electromagnetic scheme formulation (FEM-EHS). The novelty of this method resides in the separation of the matrix formulation due to the discretization of Ampèrés and Faradaýs laws, leaving outside the matrix equations of the non-linear magnetic and electric material properties. Therefore, for a time-dependent simulation, the transformation matrices related to the Ampèrés and Faradaýs laws remain unchanged for the entire time domain, not dependent on the non-linear local Ohḿs law E(J) of the HTS model. Therefore, those matrices can be computed and inverted a priori leading to a fast computation. The method was validated by comparing results with a commercial FEA tool, for the simulation of an HTS bulk magnetization process. With the proposed method, results were obtained in less than 1/3 of the computational time of the commercial tool.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The kinetic arrest observed in the parent Gd5Ge4 gradually vanishes when a small fraction (x = 0.025, 0.05 and 0.10) of Gd is replaced by Sc in (Gd1−xScx)5Ge4, and the magnetic ground state changes from antiferromagnetic (AFM) to ferromagnetic (FM). A first order phase transition coupled with the FM-AFM transition occurs at TC = 41 K for x = 0.05 and at TC = 53 K for x = 0.10 during heating in applied magnetic field of 1 kOe, and the thermal hysteresis is near 10 K. The first-order magnetic transition is coupled with the structural Sm5Ge4-type to Gd5Si4-type transformation. The magnetization measured as a function of applied magnetic field shows sharp metamagnetic-like behavior. At the same time, the AFM to paramagnetic transition in (Gd1− xScx)5Ge4 with x = 0.10, is uncharacteristically broad indicating development of strong short-range AFM correlations above the Néel temperature. Comparison of the magnetization data of bulk, powdered, and metal-varnish composite samples of (Gd0.95Sc0.05)5Ge4 shows that mechanical grinding and fabrication of a composite have little effect on the temperature of the first-order transformation, but short-range ordering and AFM/FM ratio below TC are surprisingly strongly affected.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Entropy generation analysis for peristalsis of nanofluid with temperature dependent viscosity has been carried out. Mathematical formulation is executed using “long wavelength” approximation. Hall effects and Ohmic heating are also included. Arising non-linear equations are solved using Homotopy Perturbation Method. Analytical solutions for temperature, axial velocity, Bejan number and entropy generation are obtained and examined through graphs. Results show that for enhanced values of nanoparticles volume fraction both velocity and temperature decreases. Increasing values of viscosity parameter decreases the temperature. Moreover, entropy generation and Bejan numbers show decreasing behaviors for increase in nanoparticles volume fraction.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Current research on magnetocaloric materials (MCM) aims at developing low cost, environmentally friendly materials which can be manufactured by simple processes. We report the effect of high energy ball milling on the structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of low cost Fe2.1Cr0.9Al alloys. The degree of structural order in the Fe-Cr sublattice was found to vary with milling time in a cyclic fashion at a milling speed of 600 rpm. This phenomenon was analyzed by a reaction rate model based on the stored energy during high energy milling. The sample possessed a B2 crystal structure before milling. Milling for 15 min. at 600 rpm induced structural changes to produce a L21 structure. Interestingly, the 15 min. milled sample exhibited ∼50% higher saturation magnetization (MS) compared to the value before milling. The relative cooling power (RCP) also increased to 300 Jkg−1 at 5 T, compared to a value of 244 Jkg−1 before milling. Extended X-ray absorption fine structure (EXAFS) studies revealed the emergence of short range order in the milled samples.© 2018 The AuthorsWe investigate how a temperature reduction in z-direction influences the switching probability and the noise in heat-assisted magnetic recording (HAMR) for a bit in bit-patterned media with dimensions d=5 nm and h=10 nm. Pure hard magnetic bits are considered and simulations with a continuous laser pulse are performed using the atomistic simulation tool VAMPIRE. The results display that the switching behavior shows a thermally induced exchange spring effect. Simultaneously, both the AC and the DC noise increase. Additionally, we illustrate how an artificial Curie temperature gradient within the material can compensate the HAMR performance loss due to the temperature gradient. Further, due to the graded Curie temperature, DC noise can be reduced compared to a structure where no temperature gradient is considered.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigate theoretically the combined effect of phonons and magnons caused by finite temperatures on the electrical resistivity of nonstoichiometric half-Heusler NiMnSb alloy. The coherent potential approximation within the alloy analogy model is employed for an efficient treatment of chemical impurities, atomic displacements, and magnetic disorder. Spin fluctuations of local Mn moments are described by two models: (i) uncompensated disordered local moment approach and (ii) tilting of the moments. The calculated resistivity agrees with experimental data, the agreement is good up to 600 K. We show that a strong magnetic disorder leads to a violation of the Matthiessen's rule for the resistivity. We also discuss the spin polarization of the electrical current which exceeds 90% at room temperature but it is dramatically reduced by the magnetic disorder for higher temperatures approaching the Curie point (TC=730 K).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present a procedure for the comprehensive evaluation of parameters of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs), such as saturation magnetization, core-size distribution, anisotropy energy constant, and characteristic time for Néel relaxation for use in biomedical applications and fundamental MNPs research. The static magnetization curve of suspended and immobilized MNP samples and the AC susceptibility of immobilized samples were used for the evaluation of these parameters. The magnetic properties reconstructed from the obtained parameters agreed with the experimental results, indicating the accuracy of the estimation procedure. Using the procedure, the parameters of the commercial Resovist MNP sample were evaluated. Then, the Resovist sample was magnetically fractionated into two MNP samples with large and small core sizes, and the parameters of the two fractionated samples were evaluated. It was demonstrated that the parameters of the Resovist sample are given by the volume-weighted average for those of the fractionated samples.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nd-Fe-B films with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy are important for various applications. Most common process to prepare Nd-Fe-B thin films with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy is the heteroepitaxy process. Here, Nd-Fe-B thin films with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy were prepared by a two-step process. Amorphous and magnetically soft thin films were first deposited. Crystallized, magnetic hard thin films were obtained by rapid thermal annealing of the as-deposited films. A clear correlation between perpendicular magnetic anisotropy of annealed state and the domain configuration in the as-deposited state was noticed. Films prepared without substrate heating, with additions of Tb show perpendicular coercivity which is larger than 24 kOe.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic vortices are characterized by the sense of in-plane magnetization chirality and by the polarity of the vortex core. Searching for efficient ways to control the vortex polarity and chirality is of highly fundamental and practical significance towards high speed and high density non-volatile memory applications. Here we report a novel vortex core (VC) switching process in a notched disk, driven by a pulse field. Micromagnetic simulations demonstrate that the dynamics of edge solitons around the notch play a critical role in the switching process, that leads to a sub-nanosecond VC fast switching. The switching diagram as a function of the field strength and duration was presented to indicate the operational range. Further studies on the VC switching under an out-of-plane bias field demonstrate that such switching is deterministic and robust against magnetic environment. Finally, by applying a resonant alternative field, a periodic VC switching is observed with much reduced switching field. The presented results indicate the potential of notched disks for VC based memory applications.© 2018Neutron resonant spin echo spectroscopy has been applied to measure the splitting of the magnon bands due to the magnetic dipole interaction in the two dimensional antiferromagnet MnPS3. The splittings measured are more than two orders of magnitude smaller than energies of the magnons. Simulation of the magnon energies involving the calculation of the magnetic dipole interaction in MnPS3 predict splittings a little higher than those measured. The comparison confirms that the magnetic dipole interaction provides most of the anisotropy which stabilises the antiferromagnetic order in MnPS3. We present the first evidence for the splitting of magnon bands due to the magnetic dipole interaction in a two dimensional antiferromagnet.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic Particle Spectroscopy (MPS) is a characterization method for investigating the nonlinear properties of magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) using magnetic field strengths in the order of a few tens of millitesla. Its exploitation for particle characterization is of high significance for biomedical applications such as Magnetic Particle Imaging (MPI) and magnetic hyperthermia. Since the dynamic characteristics of MNP are influenced by both the Néel and the Brownian relaxation mechanism, harmonic spectra in MPS measurements are directly linked to ambient influences like temperature or viscosity of the surrounding medium. Experimental data of multiparametric measurements helps one to evaluate and validate mathematical models of dynamic particle magnetization. This contribution deals with the investigation of temperature-dependent harmonic spectra of different commercially available single-core and multi-core particle systems. It is shown, that dominating relaxation mechanisms can be determined from temperature-dependent MPS measurements.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Herein, amorphous FeSiCr phosphating powders were prepared using two phosphating methods and were further formed into soft magnetic composites (SMCs). The effects of phosphating treatment on the morphology and composition of phosphate layers of amorphous FeSiCr particles and mechanisms of the phosphating process were investigated via scanning electron microscopy, X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectra, and X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy. The magnetic properties of amorphous FeSiCr phosphating powders were determined via the Quantum Design vibrating sample magnetometer. The effects of heat and phosphating treatments on AC magnetic properties of SMCs were investigated using a B-H curve analyzer. Results showed that both phosphating treatments significantly increase the resistivity of amorphous FeSiCr and do not deteriorate its magnetic properties. However, owing to the thick phosphating layer of amorphous FeSiCr phosphate on the zinc phosphate solution, its compressibility deteriorated. The magnetic permeability of the SMC was very stable in the frequency range of 10–500 kHz. Following heat treatment at 500 °C in an argon atmosphere, the magnetic permeability of the SMC significantly increased, whereas the magnetic loss significantly reduced.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Skyrmions are nanoscale and topologically protected objects, which are promising candidates for information carriers of magnetic storage devices. To this end, the rapid creation and manipulation of a single skyrmion is required. In this work, a spin-valve device with a single-skyrmion reference layer is considered. Using micromagnetic simulations, we find that a skyrmion is likely to nucleate in the free layer as a picosecond current pulse is applied. In addition, we also demonstrate that the skyrmion in the free layer can be reversed by injecting an alternating current. It is promising that such a study can benefit the development of skyrmion-based storage devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Recently, there has been a great interest in the application of multimodal hyperthermia. Hyperthermia, a controlled increase of temperature in tissues up to 42–45 °C, is a very promising anti-cancer medical treatment. Hyperthermia can be induced by means of ultrasound wave, alternating magnetic field, radiowave, laser light, etc. In our research, we combine magnetic hyperthermia with ultrasound thermal treatment to facilitate a more efficient, innovative sonomagnetic therapy. The experiments are performed using ultrasound phantoms doped with magnetic nanoparticles. These nanoparticles act like sonosensitizers and become the source of supplementary ultrasound attenuation which consequently leads to the increase of temperature. Because of their sensitivity to magnetic field they are also the source of heat in magnetic hyperthermia. In order to investigate the thermal effect of multimodal hyperthermia, phantoms are simultaneously irradiated with a focused ultrasound beam and exposed to the AC magnetic field. We demonstrate that this double thermal stimulation of phantoms doped with nanoparticles provides better heating efficiency which enables more precise control over the heating process. Magneto-ultrasonic heating creates more effective hyperthermia and has a big application potential in treating cancer at a lower magnetic particle concentration. The coupling of magnetic and ultrasonic hyperthermia gives the possibility for developing the new, innovative sonomagnetic thermal therapy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Colloidal solutions of magnetic nanoparticles are usually employed when the fluidity and magnetic properties are required at the same time, either in technical or biomedical applications. However, when the magnetic size of the nanoparticles is large enough (>12–15 nm) the colloid may form an equilibrium structure with or without the external magnetic field, which can significantly influence its rheology. Using multi-particle collision dynamics we study the internal structure and viscosity of the magnetic colloids at varying magnitudes of the externally applied field. We show a generalized structural behavior across all studied regimes and an appreciable increase of flow resistance with magnetic field.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The nanoparticles of Cobalt-ferrite (CoFe2O4), CoZnFe2O4 and CoCdFe2O4 have been synthesized by Auto-combustion method. In this method, nitrates of Co, Fe, Zn and Cd were used as the starting materials, while citric acid has been used as a fuel for the preparation of the samples of CoFe2O4, Co0.9Zn0.1Fe2O4 and Co0.9Cd0.1Fe2O4. Further, the effect of Zn2+ and Cd2+ doping on the structural, thermal and magnetic properties of Cobalt-Ferrite (CoFe2O4) were also investigated as a useful data. Thermal decomposition is confirmed by fast weight loss nearly up to 580.0 °C due to removal of hydroxyl group and after that weight loss has been observed almost negligible up to 1000 °C from the analysis of the TGA plot. In powder XRD results, pure cubic spinel structure of all the composition has been found. With the help of W-H method using XRD data, the crystallite size has been found to be lying in the range from 46.20 nm to 53.30 nm and strain values are obtained from −0.0003 to 0.0008. The FTIR spectra confirmed the presence of M–O bond and ferrite in our prepared samples. It may be mentioned on the basis of analysis of results for particle size by two XRD and TEM methods which indicate about the formation of nano materials and doping of cobalt ferrites. Moreover, TEM results have also indicated the presence of nano-sized spherical shape of prepared particles with agglomeration. From analysis of VSM results, the obtained values of coercivity (Hc) have been found for these ferrites between 263.45 Oe and 1408.93 Oe. By the substitution of cobalt magnetic ions with Zn2+ and Cd2+, it is possible to tune the magnetic properties of cobalt ferrite as a promising material for various technological applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We extend the well known phenomenon of magnetoresistance (extra resistivity of materials in transverse magnetic field) to a regime where in addition to a transverse magnetic field, a transverse microwave field of resonant frequency is also applied. In a magnetic field, electron spin levels are Zeeman split. In a resonant microwave field, we uncover a new channel of momentum relaxation in which electrons in upper Zeeman level can deexcite to lower Zeeman level by generating spin fluctuation excitation in the lattice (similar to what happens in Electron Spin Resonance (ESR) spectroscopy). An additional resistivity due to this mechanism is predicted in which momentum randomization of Zeeman split electrons happen via bosonic excitations (spin fluctuations). An order of magnitude of this additional resistivity is calculated. The whole work is based upon an extension of Einstein's derivation of equilibrium Planckian formula to near equilibrium systems.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Correlation between Fe content and z value on the structural and magnetic properties of the Sm(CobalFexCu0.06Zr0.025)z magnets (x = 0.20, 0.25, 0.28, and z = 7, 9.5) has been investigated. It is found that the cellular phases in the magnets grow up with increasing Fe content, so the cell boundary phases could hardly form well without enough Sm atoms, resulting in coercivity decreasing. After supplement of Sm content by decreasing z value, cell boundary phases formed continuously, and coercivity was strongly enhanced due to the remarkable concentration gradient of Cu between the 1:5H cell boundary phase and 2:17R cellular phase. It is thus suggested that as the Fe content increases, the z value of magnets need reducing simultaneously in order to keep high coercivity of the magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A (2 + 1)-dimensional equation is investigated, which describes a Heisenberg ferromagnetic spin chain system in ferrite material. Through using Hirota bilinear method and choosing proper polynomial functions in bilinear forms, the one-order rogue waves solution and its existence condition are obtained. Based on this existence condition, the two-order rouge waves solution is also obtained. Furthermore, some interesting characteristics of the rogue waves are observed by visualization method. For the one-order rogue waves, there exist three types of single-, two- and three-petal states. For the two-order rogue waves, there are six types in term of the arrangement of bright peaks. The impacts of system parameters on the rogue waves are also discussed. These results are new for the Heisenberg ferromagnetic spin chain system.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Experimental data are discussed showing that in contrast to the paramagnetic phase, in the magnetically ordered state the action of the crystal electric field on the spin dynamics is quantized. In the Curie-Weiss regime of the paramagnetic susceptibility the spin dynamics is determined by local exchange interactions between individual pairs of spins and by single particle anisotropies (crystal field interaction). As we know from Renormalization Group (RG) theory, these local interactions are of no importance on the spin dynamics in the long range ordered state. On the other hand, a sufficiently strong crystal electric field is known to decrease the saturation magnetic moment for T → 0. In the critical paramagnetic range and for all lower temperatures the spin dynamics is controlled by a field of delocalized bosons instead by exchange interactions between spins. As we could show, the bosons are essentially magnetic dipole radiation emitted by the precessing spins. It is observed that the spontaneous generation of magnetic dipole radiation involves all N = 2S + 1 spin states, and is different in magnets with an integer and a half-integer spin. The dynamics of the boson field therefore is quantized and can be characterized by a limited number of universality classes. The effect of a relevant crystal field interaction is to reduce the number of thermodynamically relevant spin states per magnetic atom by ΔN = 1 or multiples thereof. This happens as discrete crossover events and reduces the saturation magnetic moment for T → 0 in discrete steps. The dynamics remains quantized. Each reduction by ΔN = 1 changes the universality class. Since a crossover is a threshold induced event, we have to distinguish between a relevant and a non-relevant crystal field interaction. Only a sufficiently strong crystal field interaction can become relevant. The crossover from S to Seff = S − 1/2 can occur in the critical paramagnetic range, and manifests as a functional change in the temperature dependence of either the longitudinal or the transverse susceptibility. A very particular observation is that in the insulating magnets a relevant crystal field interaction lets the magnetic heat capacity collapse to its absolute minimum. The magnetic entropy saturates at the lowest possible value of R·ln(2), irrespective of the value of Seff (R = gas constant). This does not mean that a crossover to atomistic Ising behavior has occurred. For the metallic magnets the action of a relevant crystal electric field is also to reduce the number of relevant spin states for T → 0 but the magnetic entropy saturates only gradually below the expected value of R·ln(2S + 1). Indications are discussed that each reduction of the spin by ΔS = 1/2 generates an additional energy band in the magnon excitation spectrum. In the metals the gap energy of the lowest magnon band is lower than in the insulators. Due to the lower excitation gap, spin dynamics and magnetic heat capacity are less suppressed in the metals compared to the insulators.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The new mechanism is proposed ensuring the sustainability of spin sublattices system to the effect of mutual switching of the spins of different sublattices.Such switching destroys the ferromagnetic order in the sublattices—the effect of exchange intermixing of the sublattices—that should increase the entropy of the antiferromagnetic state.The total destruction of the ferromagnetic order in sublattices determined from the principle of maximum entropy cannot occur being accompanied by a rather rapid increase in energy.At present, the model of the suppression of entropic destruction of sublattices by the growth of the exchange energy is generally accepted.This model was independently proposed by Anderson and Ziman.The mechanism proposed in this paper for suppressing the exchange mixing by increasing the magnetic anisotropy energy turned out to be more effective than the growth of the exchange energy in the Anderson-Ziman model.Surprising here is that this result was obtained under the condition that the magnetic interactions VA determining the energy of the magnetic anisotropy are small enough compared with the Coulomb exchange interaction Vex.It turned out that the reason for such an anomalously strong influence of VA is related to the symmetry difference between the operators Vex and VA.The Vex operator is spatially isotropic, therefore it determines only the mutual orientation of the interacting spins and doesn't affect their orientation relative to the crystal axes.The VA operator removes this degeneracy.The removal of degeneracy shifts weakly the levels of the exchange energy due to VA≪Vex condition, but it strongly changes the forms of the wave functions.It is established that such a change in the wave functions can ensure the formation of spin sublattices, which are absent in the degenerate state.This mechanism of sublattice formation was justified mathematically for the model operators Vex mod and VA mod.Such choice of the Vex mod and VA mod operators ensured the possibility of obtaining the exact solutions of the equationsVex modΦ0 mod=E0 modΦ0 mod and (Vex mod+VA mod)Φmod=EmodΦmod. This excludes the dependence of the obtained results with any approximations used to simplify calculations. Using the properties of the Φ0 mod and Φmod functions allowed us to generalize the obtained result for the spins bound by the exchange interaction in the approximation of the nearest neighbors. The stability conditions of this solution are yet to be studied.© 2018In order to alleviate the negative impacts of high temperature (850 °C) annealing on high electron mobility transistor (HEMT) technology, a process required only low temperature annealing (less than 600 °C) was introduced to form ohmic contact to HEMT. By the process, the electrode was in contact with the AlGaN/GaN interface. The value of specific contact resistivity (ρc) of the ohmic contact was 6.29 × 10−5 Ω cm2. An improved HEMT power device was presented. For comparison, a conventional device with Ti/Al/Ni/Au ohmic contact annealed at 850 °C was prepared. It was found that after annealing at 600 °C, the sheet resistance (Rsh) of the improved device decreased to 313 Ω/□ (74.5% of that of the conventional device), and the advantage of our process on device performance was greater as the distance between ohmic contacts increased. The saturation current of the improved device was increased by approximately 23% when the distance between source and drain was 40 μm.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Discontinuous metal-insulator multilayers (DMIMs) are a special type of nanostructures with a layered arrangement of metallic particles sandwiched between continuous insulating layers. DMIMs exhibit moderate tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) ratio but enhanced low-field sensitivity, which makes them promising candidates for magnetic field sensors. Recently we have grown epitaxial Fe/MgO DMIMs on MgO (0 0 1) single crystal substrates at different deposition conditions. Here, based on the analysis of magnetic isotherms in a broad temperature range, the effect of deposition temperature (TS) on microstructure of DMIMs is being studied and compared with the results of Transmission Electron Microscopy. It is shown that metallic layers consist of flat nanoparticles whose average size decreases, and their crystallinity improves with the increase of TS.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.By means of the first-principles calculations we investigate the magnetic properties of four low-index surfaces in the bulk nonmagnetic Ni3Ge intermetallic compound with the L12 structure. We predict that the (1 1 1) surface of Ni3Ge is magnetically ordered, with all magnetic moments located at the Ni sites. Magnetic order is also found at the Ni-terminated (0 0 1), (1 1 0) and (2 1 0) surfaces, however, the nonmagnetic NiGe-terminated surfaces are more stable similarly as in other L12 compounds. It turns out that the magnetic order in the bulk Ni3Ge is destroyed completely by the hybridization of Ge-p and Ni-d states and it is recovered at some surfaces due to the reduced coordinate number of Ni atoms. We also report on a particular distribution of magnetization at the Ni3Ge(1 1 1) surface where the ferromagnetic and anti-ferromagnetic-like states are degenerated because there are magnetically dead layers between the two magnetic surfaces and there is no interference between them. The calculated results obtained for Ni3Ge are compared with those for Ni3Al; the differences between these two compounds are discussed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Current-perpendicular-to-plane, CPP, giant magnetoresistance, GMR junctions attract interests for application of sensor devices, such as read head element of hard disk drives. Temperature dependence of the CPP-GMR effects was investigated, in this study, for junctions consisting of the half-metallic Heusler alloy, Co2(Fe-Mn)Si, electrodes and an L12-type Ag3Mg spacer with the ultra-thin interface layers, Fe or Mg. For the Fe insert junctions, MR ratio exhibited local maximum at a temperature ranging from 50 K to 250 K which depends on the insertion thickness. The reason is unclear for the anomalous temperature dependence of the Fe junctions, however, a possibility is reduction of the Curie temperature for the Fe insert at the ultra-thin regime. On the other hand, MR ratios monotonically increased with decreasing the temperature for the Mg insert junctions, for which MR ratio of about 100% was observed at 10 K. Ratios of MR at 300 K to the low temperature are almost independent of the insertion thickness. Considering a fact that the shapes of MR curves nearly unchanged by the temperature change, it is suggested that the Mg insert works as a diffusion barrier at the Co2(Fe-Mn)Si/Ag3Mg interfaces.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic sensing materials with enhanced performance and low dimensions are significant for various technological and industrial applications. The temperature stability of their properties is one of the main priorities. Co-rich glass coated amorphous microwires are known to demonstrate very large and sensitive magnetoimpedance (MI) effect. However, the impedance value may change up to hundreds of percent within the industrial temperature range (−20 to 100 °C) caused by structural relaxation and temperature-dependent internal stress. Current annealing inducing a well-defined circular anisotropy was proposed to realize high temperature stability without substantial loss in the MI sensitivity. The wires of composition Co66.94Fe3.83Ni1.44Mo1.69B11.51Si14.59 after optimal annealing with a dc current of 25 mA, which corresponds to a temperature of about 190 °C, demonstrated the room-temperature MI sensitivity of 59%/Oe (as compared with 62.5%/Oe for as-prepared wires) and a temperature variation of 0.1%/Oe °C. We also investigated the effect of glass removal on the magnetic structure, MI and their temperature stability. The disappearance of large internal stress due to glass-metal interface in combination with the induced anisotropy by current annealing makes it possible to achieve the temperature-stable MI with the sensitivity of more than 193%/Oe and a temperature variation of 0.04%/Oe °C. Consequently, the investigated wires after current annealing can be employed as MI field sensors with high sensitivity and temperature stability.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Several applications of nanoparticles rely on the internalization and accumulation of nanocarriers in specific cell compartments and tissues. However, the methods currently employed for characterizing such processes, although well described, are time consuming and do not provide in vivo information, which is a crucial barrier towards translational applications. Here, we hypothesize that the AC Biosusceptometry technique can be employed to assess cell internalization of magnetic nanoparticles, with possible applications in screening assays to track specific biomarkers and cell types. We tested a simpler and easier alternative to study cell internalization and tissue accumulation after perfusion. We utilized citrate coated, manganese ferrite nanoparticles and evaluated the internalization process in mouse macrophages cells (J774.A1) and in an embryonic neural stem cell culture (E14.5) after differentiation in astrocytes and neurons, to assess internalization specificity. Respecting the particles toxicity limits, we tested different concentration of particles, in different incubation times. Sequentially, we imaged the cell cultures to confirm internalization and nanoparticles localization, labeling nucleus and cell body to assure that the particles were inside the cells. Our results showed a linear behavior on internalization for different doses and an optimum incubation time of 2 h.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The combination of liposomes and magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) is a promising approach for cancer therapy due to its capability for magnetic field-directed targeted drug delivery at the diseased area. Contemporaneously, bubble-generating liposomes are of great interest in the field of cancer therapy, due to its triggered drug release properties and its ability to rupture cancer cells through cavitation induction. Therefore, the objective of the current study is to develop a bubble-generating magnetic liposomal (BMLs) drug delivery system with triggered drug release properties for targeted delivery of doxorubicin (DOX) in cancer therapy. Citric acid-coated iron oxide MNPs was co-entrapped with ammonium bicarbonate to produce BMLs by lipid film hydration method. BMLs were further modified by coating hyaluronic acid-polyethylene glycol (HA-PEG) on liposome surface to produce HA-PEG-BMLs for ligand-mediated active targeting of tumor cells. The resultant liposomes were found to be spherical in shape with an average particle size ranging from 100 to 170 nm. The physico-chemical properties and bubble-generating properties of liposomes were studied. In vitro drug release studies showed enhanced drug release under hyperthermia condition (43 °C) from BMLs/DOX and HA-PEG-BMLs/DOX due to more intense CO2 bubbles generation with faster decomposition rates of co-entrapped ammonium bicarbonate. In vitro cell culture studies using human glioblastoma cells (U87) were performed to evaluate the targeting efficiencies and anti-tumor efficacy of DOX-loaded liposomes. Magnetic targeted delivery of DOX was also demonstrated from LIVE/DEAD cell viability assays. The confocal microscopy and flow cytometry analysis confirmed enhanced intracellular uptake of HA-PEG-BMLs by U87 though binding of HA to overexpressed CD44 receptors on cell surface, which facilitated internalization of HA-PEG-BMLs/DOX through endocytosis and resulted in elevated DOX concentration in cancer cells. The combination of elevated intracellular DOX concentration and triggered DOX release at 43 °C led to enhanced cytotoxicity toward U87 cells in vitro. Thus, HA-PEG-BMLs will be useful for hyperthermia-induced targeted delivery of DOX for cancer therapy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper Hf doped (Nd0.8Ce0.2)13Fe82−xB5Hfx (x = 0, 0.5, 1.0, 2.0, 3.0) ribbons were fabricated by melt-spinning technique, and their microstructure, magnetic properties and coercivity mechanism have been investigated methodically. It is found that the coercivity of (Nd0.8Ce0.2)13Fe82− xB5Hfx ribbons is enhanced for 0 ≤ x ≤ 2.0 at.% while the remanence decreases slightly. The optimal comprehensive magnetic properties Jr = 7.5 kG, Hcj = 12.7 kOe, and (BH)max = 12.3 MGOe, are obtained at x = 1.0 at.%. The grain size decreased with the addition of Hf and more uniform microstructure evolved. The coercivity mechanism of the (Nd0.8Ce0.2)13Fe82− xB5Hfx (x = 0–3.0) ribbons is found to be the pinning mechanism based on the systematic investigations and analysis. The synchronization of the grain refinement and the pinning effect lead to the improvement of magnetic properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Due to its potential application in magnetic memory, the vortex magnetization configuration has drawn much attention, which had been found in many magnetic nanostructure. In this paper, static and dynamic characteristics of magnetism in permalloy oval nanoring are investigated with varying thickness and arm width via micromagnetic simulation. Two magnetization configuration (vortex and onion states) were found in oval nanoring and the vortex state is a stable state. Although onion is a metastable state, it become more stable with the decrease of thickness. The magnetic hysteresis loop along long axis of oval nanoring is simulated and coercive forces are investigated as function of arm width and thickness. Coercive force increases firstly and then decrease with the increase of thickness. In meanwhile, the dynamic magnetic susceptibility of vortex state in oval nanoring is simulated for varying arm width and thickness. Uniform resonance mode and edge resonance mode can be found when thickness is above 25 nm. However, there is a single uniform resonance mode in oval nanoring with thickness less 20 nm. The resonance frequency can be significantly modulated in the region of 8.2–13.7 GHz when thickness changes from 4 to 100 nm.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structural, magnetic and electron-transport properties of Fe2Ti0.5Co0.5Si are investigated. It is demonstrated that rapidly quenched Fe2Ti0.5Co0.5Si ribbons crystallize in the L21 structure, indicating a full Heusler compound, and exhibit ferromagnetism with a high Curie temperature of about 790 K. Moreover, Fe2Ti0.5Co0.5Si exhibits semiconducting behavior with a negative temperature coefficient of resistivity, a room-temperature resistivity of about 6.5 mΩ cm and a residual resistivity ρ0 of about 6.75 mΩ cm. The carrier concentration n is 1.15 × 1020 cm−3 at 5 K. The magnetic semiconducting behavior with a high Curie temperature makes this material promising for room-temperature spintronic and magnetic applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The iron oxide nanoparticles were synthesized by the co-precipitation method and consequently stabilized by a chitosan coating. The characterization of the chitosan modified nanoparticles was performed by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), Scanning electron microscopy (SEM), dynamic light scattering (DLS), SQUID magnetometer and MRI analysis. The particle size and ζ-potential measurement, the measured hydrodynamic diameter of chitosan modified magnetic nanoparticles was equal to 136.1 nm, while the ζ-potential is +48 mV. The superparamagnetic behaviour of both unmodified and chitosan modified Fe3O4 nanoparticles at room temperature was confirmed using a SQUID magnetometer. Finally, the relaxation times (T1 and T2) were measured by MRI. From the result of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) analysis, the relaxation rate (R) and relaxivity (r) have been calculated: r1 = 0.713 mM−1 s−1, r2 = 238.16 mM−1 s−1 and r2 ∗ = 276.1 mM−1 s−1. An acquired high r2/r1 ratio (3 3 4) indicates that the prepared nanoparticles have a significant prevailing effect on the transversal relaxation time (T2) in comparison to the longitudinal relaxation time (T1). These results demonstrate the potential usefulness of chitosan-stabilized iron oxide nanoparticles as a contrast agent for MRI.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Biodegradation of nanoparticles includes the destruction of a stabilizing coating and the accompanying change in interparticle interaction, as well as the direct destruction of the inorganic nuclei of particles. These processes lead to characteristic changes in the shape of the Mössbauer spectra of iron oxide nanoparticles. In this work, we investigated the in vitro biodegradation of 57Fe-based magnetic nanoparticles with the aid of Mössbauer spectroscopy. For this purpose, two types of magnetic nanoparticles enriched with the 57Fe isotope were synthesized. Copolymer Pluronic F-127 and citric acid were used to stabilize nanoparticles in aqueous medium. Moreover, synthesized nanoparticles were analyzed by physicochemical methods and investigated for cytotoxicity. The study of magnetic nanoparticles biodegradation was performed on 4 T1 cell culture (breast cancer). We measured Mössbauer spectra of nanoparticles incubated with 4 T1 cells and spectra of control nanoparticle samples at different conditions. The analysis of spectra was carried out in the many-state relaxation model formalism. The study revealed that after 120-hours incubation of nanoparticles in cells, they did not undergo measurable changes typical of biodegradation processes. Nevertheless, we noted intense intracellular oxidation of ferrous iron of synthesized nanoparticles to the ferric phase. The results obtained indicate the possibility of using the obtained nanoparticles in Mössbauer in vitro studies.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Effects of a dc current annealing, in terms of magnitude and inflow time, on magnetic hysteresis properties, magnetoimpedance (MI) and stress-magnetoimpedance (S-MI) in glass-coated amorphous Co71Fe5B11Si10Cr3 microwires with a small positive magnetostriction were investigated in this work. The annealing process combining Joule-heating and circular magnetic field leads to the creation of a specific magnetic anisotropy of a helical or circular type, and consequently, is helpful to control the MI and S-MI behaviours making them more suitable for particular sensing applications. After annealing, the magnetoimpedance plots transformed from a bell-shaped typical of an axial easy anisotropy to the shape with two symmetrical peaks, the magnitude and position of which are controlled with the annealing current parameters. Applying a tensile stress on the annealed wires changes the easy anisotropy direction which leads to the potential for highly sensitive S-MI without use of dc bias fields. A stress sensitivity of more than 260% at σex= 250 MPa at zero magnetic field is achieved.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Effect of the biocompatible surfactants; tartaric acid, ascorbic acid and a mixture of them on the properties of the superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs) were investigated, separately. The SPIONs were functionalized via hydrothermal process. It was observed from X-ray diffraction (XRD) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM) analysis that the nanoparticles were iron oxide and their shapes were about spherical. And, the particle sizes of all samples were calculated to be less than 8 nm from the TEM images and XRD patterns. Fourier transform infrared spectra and thermogravimetric analysis (TGA) results displayed that all nanoparticles were effectively coated with the surfactants. According to the TGA curves, tartaric acid and ascorbic acid coatings percentages for the corresponding samples are 6.1 and 15.4% at the temperature range of 30–600 °C, respectively. For consequent magnetic analysis, vibrating sample magnetometer showed that all samples were superparamagnetic and saturation magnetizations, Ms were 71.1 and 69.5 emu/g for the nanoparticles coated with tartaric acid and ascorbic acid, respectively. Furthermore, for the first time, the SPIONs were coated with a mixture of tartaric and ascorbic acid. For that, the TGA showed 26.4% mass loss at the same temperature range and the Ms value was found to be 65.2 emu/g with a smaller particle size. In this study, it can be said that considerably high Ms values were obtained. The use of the surfactants during the hydrothermal process provides a good coating of the surface of nanoparticles and the process also increases the Ms with the sizes within superparamagnetic limit and therefore can have the potential to use in biomedical applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic zinc ferrite nanoparticles with high magnetization were successfully synthesized by hydrothermal method at 110 ° C under different reaction times from 2 to 24 h. Elemental analysis of the nanoparticles determined by inductively coupled plasma atomic emission spectroscopy and energy dispersive X-ray spectrometer results proved that the samples are zinc ferrite. X-ray diffraction (XRD) and Fourier transmission infrared spectroscopy analysis displayed that zinc ferrite nanoparticles were single phase of cubic ferrite. The particles size, dXRD of the nanoparticles calculated from XRD patterns increased as the reaction time increased. From the images of transmission electron microscopy (TEM), the particle sizes, dTEM were also calculated and increased from 6.8 ± 2.5 to 10.6 ± 5.1 nm as the reaction time increased, which were consistent with the dXRD. Magnetic measurements revealed that the magnetization curves of the synthesized nanoparticles show superparamagnetic behavior with zero coercivity and remanence. And, the magnetization values also increased to a maximum value of 30.8 emu/g (measured at 20 kOe) as the particle size increased to ∼10 nm with the increase of reaction time. At this particle size limit, this is a considerable high value compared to the superparamagnetic zinc ferrite nanoparticles studies. Magnetization values were also extrapolated. It is seen that to a certain degree, the average particle sizes of the products and hence high maximum magnetization can be tuned by simply adjusting the parameter, reaction time by hydrothermal process.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This study reports the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) and piezoresponse of integrated ferroelectric-ferromagnetic heterostructures of PbZr0.52Ti0.48O3 (PZT) (5 nm)/Bi-Sr-Ca-Cu2-OX (BSCCO) (5 nm)/La0.67Sr0.33MnO3 (LSMO) (40 nm)/MgO (0 0 1). Magnetic and pizoresponse behavior of the heterostructures are found to be governed by magneto-electric coupling and induced lattice strains. In addition, a maximum MCE is studied using Maxwell equations from both Field Cooled (FC) and Zero Field Cooled (ZFC) magnetization data. Maximum MCE entropy change (|ΔS|) of 42.6 mJkg−1K−1 (at 258 K) and 41.7 mJkg−1K−1 (at 269 K) are found corresponding to FC and ZFC data, respectively. The variation in maximum entropy change and corresponding temperatures for FC and ZFC data revealed that the application of a magnetic field can significantly contribute towards tuning of the MCE. Interestingly, these multilayered structures are found to sustain MCE over a broad temperature range, which makes them attractive for improved solid-state energy conversion devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structure of magnetic nanoparticles affects the signal intensity and resolution of magnetic particle imaging, which is derived from the harmonics caused by the nonlinear response of magnetization. To understand the key effects of particle structures on the magnetization harmonics, the dependence of the harmonics on the size and anisotropy of different structures was investigated. We measured the harmonic signals with respect to different magnetic nanoparticle structures by applying an AC field with a gradient field for magnetic particle imaging, which was compared with the numerically simulated magnetization properties. In addition, the dynamics of the easy axis of magnetic nanoparticles in the liquid state were evaluated. The difference between the harmonics in the solid and liquid states indicates the effective core size and anisotropy due to particle structures such as single-core, chainlike, and multicore particles. In the case of the chainlike structure, the difference between the harmonics in the solid and liquid states was larger than other structures. In the numerical simulations, core diameters and anisotropy constants were considered as the effective values, such as the increase in anisotropy in the chainlike structure due to dipole interaction. The multicore particles showed high harmonics owing to their large effective core diameters. The superparamagnetic regime in the multicore structure despite the large effective core diameter was derived from the small effective anisotropy. The effective core size and the effective anisotropy of each particle structure and their impacts on the harmonic signals were revealed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Natural antioxidants, such as epigallocatechin-3-gallate and related phenolic compounds from tea, enhance particle cell-interactions and cellular uptake. In this study, surface of superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles prepared by co-precipitation of Fe chlorides was modified with silica, polyethylenimine, poly(ethylene glycol), and poly(L-lysine) to protect the iron oxide core from redox-reactions with phenols, enhance uptake by the cells, prevent the particle aggregation, or enable conjugation with several phenol-based antioxidants. To reveal the relation between the particle uptake and chemical structure of the phenolic antioxidants, five of them were selected, namely phenol, phloroglucinol, chlorogenic, gallic, and tannic acid. After incubation of the phenol-modified nanoparticles with U87MG human glioma cells, intracellular levels of the reactive oxygen species were reduced in a similar manner, as measured by flow cytometry. Colorimetric iron assay revealed a comparable level of cell-associated particles, which was mostly independent on the applied external magnetic field. The results suggest that the poly(L-lysine)-based coating is responsible for the antioxidant effects of the particles; the phenol- and poly(L-lysine)-coatings enable effective colloidal stability in aqueous media and enhance cellular internalization of the nanoparticles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.One-dimensional nickel (Ni) microwires were synthesized by the magnetic-field-induced (MFI) microemulsion-hydrothermal method using Ni nanospheres as seeds. The influence of the chemical conditions and magnetic field on the morphology and magnetic properties of Ni microwires were investigated by X-Ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM). The strength of magnetic field greatly affected the morphology and magnetic properties of Ni microwires. The growth and morphology of Ni microwires depended on the competition between Brownian motion and magnetic dipole moments from magnetic field. The larger nanoparticles with the higher magnetic moments preferred to form one-dimensional Ni microwires and their length increased up to several millimeters with the increasing magnetic field strength, while the average diameter of Ni microwires decreased. Furthermore, the easy magnetization direction of Ni microwires was parallel to the direction of magnetic field and the Ni microwires axis.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Martensitic transformation and magnetic properties in directionally solidified Ni45− xCoxCu5Mn39Sn11 (x = 0, 1, 2) alloys were studied. The martensitic transformation temperature decreases with increasing Co concentration, whereas the Curie temperature of austenite increases, what then alters the magnetic state of austenite at the onset of martensitic phase transformation. Concomitantly the effective magnetic moment of austenite increases by 0.7 μB/f.u. with Co substitution. Under an applied magnetic field of 5 T the peak values of the magnetic entropy changes reach 11.4 J/kgK (x = 1) and 4.5 J/kgK (x = 2). The variations in magnetic entropy are discussed in relation to a stronger ferromagnetic contribution promoted by Co in the martensite phase.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Investigation of hall current as well as joule heating effects on the flow and heat transfer characteristics of Ferro-nanofluid flow through a curved tube studied in this work. This work meets a lot of engineering applications such as heat exchangers at low velocity conditions, collectors of solar energy, cooling devices of electronic and micro-electronic equipments and geophysical transport in electrically conducting. The modeling based on the momentum equations by incorporating the hall current effect as well as the energy equation by incorporating the joule heating and thermal radiative effects. Similarity transformation technique has been used to obtain non-linear ordinary differential system which solved analytically as a series solution using Differential Transformation Method (DTM) with associated of Padé approximation technique. The validation of the obtained results has been examined against a previous published works. The results confirm that the hall current has a direct and strong effect on the flow behavior, such that the presence of hall current reduces the flow pressure within the tube as well as increase the heat flux from the inner surface of the tube. Moreover a third component of velocity generates as well as a normal force called Lorentz force due to the presence of the hall current.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the dynamic magnetization model of multiferroic elliptical nanomagnets with different tilt angles is established. Simulation of dynamic magnetization is performed through micromagnetic method. The results show that the clock sensitivities are different for nanomagnets with different tilt angles. For tilt angles below 9°, the larger the tilt angle is, the smaller the stress required for the nanomagnet to flip to the “Null” state is. Encouragingly, 180° switching of tilted nanomagnet can be achieved by applying a bias magnetic field together with stress, even if the nanomagnet is at a high aspect ratio (2:1). However, nanomagnet with excessively large tilt angle (>10°) tends to yield a vortex process during switching. As a consequence, stress duration will be longer, and larger bias magnetic field will be required for 180° switching. Therefore, nanomagnets inclined more than 10° should be avoided in magnetic design. These findings can provide important guidance for the design of multiferroic nanomagnetic logic as well as memory storage.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The thermodynamic Bethe ansatz equations of the Coqblin-Schrieffer model have been solved numerically. The full N = 6 (J = 5/2) degeneracy of the Hund's rule ionic ground state of Ce is taken into account. Results for the temperature dependent magnetic susceptibility parallel and perpendicular to the crystal axis are presented. The deviations, due to the Kondo effect, to the non-interacting ion results are pointed out.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic, magnetocaloric and electrical transport properties of polycrystalline R0.15Ca0.85MnO3 (R = Y, Gd and Dy) manganites (Orthorhombic, Pnma) have been studied. Magnetization measured in 5 kOe field reveals antiferromagnetic transition at 111 K, 119 K and 112 K (TN) respectively in R0.15Ca0.85MnO3 (R = Y, Gd and Dy). Magnetization in the ordered state undergoes field-induced transition and at 2 K, in 140 kOe field, the magnetic moment values are 1.5 μB/f.u., 2.8 μB/f.u. and 2.7 μB/f.u. respectively for R0.15Ca0.85MnO3 (R = Y, Gd and Dy) samples. While the electrical resistivity above TN shows non-adiabatic, small polaron hopping behavior, the resistivity value increases rapidly below TN. Hysteresis is observed around TN between field cooled cooling (FCC) and field cooled warming (FCW) magnetization data in 100 Oe and also between the cooling and warming data of zero-field electrical resistivity. Electrical resistivity exhibits a metal to insulator-like transition at TN in applied magnetic fields of 50 kOe and above. Colossal, negative magnetoresistance of ∼82%, 85% and 76% is observed at 50 K in 50 kOe field in R0.15Ca0.85MnO3 (R = Y, Gd and Dy) manganites. Magnetocaloric effect (MCE) is estimated in terms of isothermal magnetic entropy change (ΔSm) and inverse MCE (+ΔSm) is observed in the antiferromagnetically ordered state. The ΔSm changes sign for field changes greater than the metamagnetic critical magnetic field (Hc). Sign changing MCE signifies the evolution of underlying mixed magnetic interactions in these systems with variations in magnetic field and temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic drug targeting has been studied numerically under the effect of an externally applied permanent magnetic field in aneurysm vessel at Reynolds number of 200. Magnets are located below the lower aneurysm wall, and this wall was considered as target tissue. It was assumed that drug was coated on Fe3O4 nanoparticles. Mass fraction of blood based nanofluid is 0.33 mg/cc. The continuity, ferrohydrodynamics based momentum and mass transfer equations were discretized using finite volume method. It was found that three mechanisms could play an important role in the duration of the drug's presence on the target tissue: formation of a droplet of drug and vortex, respectively, on the upstream and in the aneurysm region, and creeping flow in entrance regions of aneurysm vessel. Furthermore, the results showed that maximum time of retention was related to the nanoparticles with a diameter of 10 nm.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic drug targeting envisions the use of external magnets to manipulate magnetic particles inside the human body, to direct them to disease targets such as tumors, infections, and ear and eye targets. A key question is how good are the particles? How well do they move in media under the action of applied magnetic gradients? To address this question, we designed and implemented a simple on-chip testing and image tracking system to quantitatively assess the motion of magnetic particles in response to an applied magnetic gradient. In this system, the magnetic particles are placed in on-chip wells and then a calibrated magnetic gradient is applied to the particles. The resulting motion of the particles is monitored and quantified by a microscope, camera, and by imaging software. The system measures both particle speed and chaining. We assessed the motion of seven different commercial magnetic particle ranging in size from 10 nm to 100 μm in diameter. All seven particles displayed consistent trends: larger particles moved faster (according to a power law), particles at higher concentrations created longer chains or needle-like aggregates and moved faster, and both speed and chain or needle length increased with time yielding a final speed proportional to the square of particle diameter. The most striking finding was the consistency of all seven particles within these trends. There were no outliers. No particles performed above the trend lines (no high-performance outliers), nor were there any particles that performed below the trend line (no poor performance outliers). We hope the data collected can be used to better understand particle motion, including the physics of chaining and how it impacts the speed of particle transport in media, and will enable improved design of next-generation magnetic drug delivery systems.© 2018The perovskite LaFe0.5Mn0.5O3 synthesized in bulk form shows dielectric relaxation at two distinct temperature zones, whereas both the relaxations follow Arrhenius law. A sufficient coupling between the magnetic and dielectric order parameters in the presence of a magnetic field offers a large positive and negative magnetodielectric effect for LaFe0.5Mn0.5O3. A very large magnetodielectric coupling of +45% at 122 K, −18% at 147 K and −6.8% near room temperature is observed for the material in a comparatively low magnetic field of 5 kOe due to the influence of magnetoresistance on Maxwell-Wagner-Sillars polarization. Magnetoresistance of −5.6% is observed at 100 K for the material under 90 kOe.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This study aims to investigate the thermal conductivity of the Fe3O4-water magnetic nanofluid under the influence of external magnetic field. The Fe3O4-water magnetic nanofluid sample with 4.8% vol. concentration was purchased. Then, it is diluted to four different vol. concentrations of 1, 2, 3, 4%. The external magnetic field in the range of 0–400 G was applied in parallel and perpendicular directions to the temperature gradient generated by the thermal conductivity measurement probe. Before thermal conductivity measurements, the external magnetic field generated in the air gap between permanent magnets has been analyzed both numerically and experimentally. Then a non-uniformity parameter was defined to relate magnetic field in measurement region to chain aggregation of the nanoparticles. Thermal conductivity measurements were conducted with 3ω method. The results showed that the thermal conductivity enhances with the increasing of the magnetic field strength up to a specific point, then the enhancement decreases. It is also observed that this specific point varies according to the particle concentration. Unlike the most of available study in the literature, in this study the lower thermal conductivity enhancements were obtained. The maximum enhancements with the highest concentration were 10% and 5.6% in parallel and perpendicular orientations, respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Co1−xMnx (9.1 ≤ x ≤ 15.2) alloy nanowires with uniform size and high density have been prepared by AC electrodeposition method into the anodized aluminum oxide AAO templates by using the different AC potential from 9 V to 13 V. A systematic study has been done about the voltage dependent physical, dielectric and magnetic properties of CoMn nanowires. The diameter and length of nanowires is found to be 95 nm and 15 μm respectively by getting the image from Secondary Electron Microscope. The Energy Dispersive X-ray Spectroscopy gave the information which shows that the composition of Mn and Co increases and decreases respectively with the increase of deposition voltage. It was observed from X-ray Diffraction data of all samples that CoMn alloy nanowires have the cubic structure and crystallite size vary from ∼39.6 nm to ∼48.9 nm. The Fourier Transform Infrared Spectroscopy pattern shows the presence of other materials such as CoO, MnO, and Al2O3 at different wavenumber range. The dielectric constant, dielectric loss, tangent loss and AC conductivity have been measured from LCR meter data at room temperature. The aforementioned dielectric properties decrease with the increase of deposition voltage due to incorporation of Mn ions and deduction of Co ions. The descending trend of AC conductivity against the increasing voltage is also due to the increase of grain boundary volume. The M-H loops of CoMn nanowires have been measured by using the Vibrating Sample Magnetometer and show the anisotropic and ferromagnetic behavior. From hysteresis loops, it is also found that magnetization reversal has nucleation mode and squareness decreases with increase of angle. The effective anisotropy is found to be along the nanowires. This study is useful to modify the physical, structural, dielectric and magnetic properties of the metallic materials according to desire devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A magneto-optical indicator film with perpendicular anisotropy (PMOIF) is used for time-resolved domain imaging on grain-oriented transformer steel at technical frequency field excitation. The high sensitivity of the PMOIF allows for single-shot imaging, even in the presence of insulation coatings. Differences between quasistatic and dynamic processes are elaborated, revealing the mechanisms of domain refinement and showing the role of grain boundaries and mechanical stress on domain formation and flux propagation. It is shown that the PMOIF technique opens a promising window for studying the domain dynamics of transformer steels under practical conditions, which goes beyond established characterization tools like Kerr microscopy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.MnBi alloys with high content of low temperature phase (LTP) MnBi and excellent magnetic properties were prepared by surfactant assistant ball milling (SABM), using annealed ribbons as precursors. Effects of the SABM processes on the phase constituent, microstructure, and magnetic properties were investigated in detail. It is found that the reduction of saturation magnetization is mainly attribute to the decomposition of LTP MnBi into Mn phase, Bi phase and MnO phase, with increasing the ball milling time. Meanwhile, due to the fine grain size and increased magnetic isolation effects between LTP MnBi grains, the coercivity increases monotonously with prolonging the ball milling time to 10 h for Mn55Bi45 powders. Through compression molding under the magnetic field, based on the SABM powders, the optimum anisotropic bonded magnet displays the maximum energy product (BH)max of 9.06 MGOe at room temperature, and a value of 7.05 MGOe at 380 K can be still achieved. In addition, the magnetic hardening mechanism of bonded magnets can be well explained by the strong pinning model. Strongly favorable magnetic properties make bonded MnBi magnets an attractive candidate material for small permanent magnets used for temperature applications up to 380 K.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Hot deformation (HD) technology via spark plasma sintering effectively realized the magnetic hardening in L10-Mn1.8Ga alloy. During the HD process, recrystallization and grain size refinements were observed without changing the crystal structure, which led to the magnetic hardening and improvement of the magnetic properties. By optimizing the HD parameters, maximum height reduction of up to 92% can be achieved where full recrystallization with few defects were observed from EBSD and TEM measurements. The highest remanence of 2.92 kG and a coercivity of 4.73 kOe were achieved for the deformed L10-Mn1.8Ga magnet sintered at 873 K with a height reduction of 92% and a homogeneous average grain size of about 1.4 µm.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) study of quasiperiodic Au/Co Fibonacci multilayers revealed that uniform resonance modes related to the bulk Co and interface Au/Co regions of Co layers were excited in all multilayers. Paramagnetic and spin-wave resonance (SWR) modes also were observed into multilayers associated to higher order Fibonacci sequence. The FMR results show that there is no direct correlation between the number of absorption modes and the number of magnetic layers or the Fibonacci generation sequence of the quasiperiodic structure. Analysis of SWR modes revealed an interlayer effective coupling constant higher than that known for conventional Au/Co multilayers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The peculiarities of transmission and angular non-reciprocity in magneto-photonic crystals (MPC) are investigated. The problem of light transmission through magneto-photonic crystal is solved by Ambartsumian's modified layer addition method. It is shown that the system under consideration can work as a wide band ideal optical diode for orthogonal circular polarizations and as a narrow band ideal optical diode for orthogonal linear polarizations. The influence of the magnitude of external static magnetic field, its direction, and the angle of incidence on the diode properties are investigated.© 2018Al0.26Ga0.74N/GaN on SiC lateral Schottky diodes were fabricated with variable anode-to-cathode spacing and were analyzed for blocking and on-state device performance. On-chip normally-on High Electron Mobility Transistor (HEMT) structures were also fabricated for a comparison of blocking characteristics. The Schottky diode displayed an ideality factor of 1.59 with a Ni/AlGaN zero bias barrier height of 1.18 eV and a flat band barrier height of 1.59 eV. For anode-to-cathode spacings between 10 and 100 μm, an increase in median breakdown voltages from 529 V to 8519 V and median specific on-resistance (Ron-sp) from 1.5 to 60.7 mΩ cm2 was observed with an increase in spacing. The highest performing diode had a lateral figure of merit of 1.37 GW/cm2 corresponding to a breakdown voltage upwards of 9 kV and a Ron-sp of 59 mΩ cm2. This corresponds to the highest Schottky diode breakdown voltage reported thus far with an Al0.26Ga0.74N/GaN lateral structure.© 2018The ferromagnetic resonance frequencies are obtained for a thin ferromagnetic film with surface anisotropy for the cases when the external magnetic field is applied perpendicularly or parallel to the film surface, and for various combinations of boundary conditions on the film surface. It is shown that in the presence of surface anisotropy the ferromagnetic resonance frequency essentially depends both on the film thickness and on the value of the surface anisotropy constant. The results obtained provide a basis for the correct interpretation of experimental data obtained by means of broadband ferromagnetic resonance in thin film structures.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ferromagnetic MPB in the TbxDy1−xCo2 system was confirmed via both experimental and theoretical research, which demonstrates the simultaneous structural change with ferromagnetic phase transition. According to the ferromagnetic MPB theory, a phenomenological thermodynamic model of TbxDy1−xCo2 at Dy-rich side was constructed. The thermodynamic model predicts the behavior of DyCo2, which is consistent with the experimental value. The phenomenological thermodynamic model based on ferromagnetic MPB could be employed to make a quantitative analysis of magnetostrictive or magnetocaloric materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This paper highlights the experimental study of Ce3+ ions doped M-type hexaferrite Sr1− xCexFe12O19 (0.00 ≤ x ≤ 0.30) prepared by adopting the conventional ceramic process. The M-type hexagonal structure is confirmed in the X-ray diffraction measurements. There were two phases recognized for the magnetic powders with varying Ce content, one in-between x = 0.00 to 0.20 as a single magneto plumbite segment and the other at x ≥ 0.20 as a second phase or the so called α-Fe2O3 phase. The micrographs of the sintered magnets depicted hexagonal crystal shapes. For magnetic properties a systematic study was done on the room temperature B–H hysteresis measurements. The estimated remanence value first increases with x in the range of x = 0.00 to 0.15 and then showed a decrease at x ≥ 0.15. Besides, the intrinsic coercivity (Hcj) and magnetic induction coercivity (Hcb) show decreasing-increasing character while maximum energy product (BHmax) and ratio Hk/Hcj demonstrate increasing-decreasing character in the Ce doping range x of x ≤ 0.15 and x > 0.15 respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The aim of this study was to investigate the effect of nickel and cobalt cations on magnetic properties of manganese-zinc ferrite (MZF) nanoparticles. The nanoparticles were produced through sol-gel combustion process with citric acid as the fuel. Then the obtained nanoparticles were calcinated for 30 min at 500 °C. In order to characterize the compounds, four methods were employed, including X-ray diffraction (XRD), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM), field-emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM), and transmission electron microscopy (TEM). Spinel formation was confirmed by XRD and it was shown that the crystallite size in all samples was less than 12 nm (nm). In addition, FESEM images revealed that the nanoparticle size was less than 70 nm after calcination. Saturation magnetization (MS) and coercivity (HC) of the MZF nanoparticles are increased by adding Ni and Co cations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study Co-Ni co-doped nanocrystalline manganese ferrites were fabricated via co-precipitation method. The annealing of as prepared nanoferrites was done at 950 °C for 7 h. The powder X-ray diffraction (XRD) confirmed that all samples possessed cubic spinel structure. The crystallite size was determined by Scherrer's equation that lies in the range of 27–35 nm. The spectral analysis confirmed bending and stretching of bonds at octahedral (B) and tetrahedral (A) sites. The spectral bands were shifted towards the longer wavelength side and these indicate the incorporation of dopants cations (Co-Ni). The magnetic parameters were measured from the M-H loops of nanoferrites. With the increase of Co-Ni contents, the saturation magnetization (Ms) increased up to x = 0.15 and then it decreased. The dielectric properties of all compositions were studied in 1 MHz–3 GHz range and were discussed in the light of Debye-type reduction phenomenon by following the Koop's theory. The dielectric and magnetic behavior evaluation suggested that synthesized ferrites are suitable for microwave devices fabrication.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on the results theoretical investigation of electric field control of spin-wave propagation in ultrathin magnetic stripe for the Damon-Eshbach geometry. It is shown, that is possible to control nonreciprocity of a spin wave propagation along the ferromagnet stripe by external electric field. This effect is determined by the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction that is enforced in the system by an externally applied electrical field effect on spin orbital interaction between ions. Our findings open a new possibility for spin wave manipulation in magnonic devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The recent work is focused on the development of suitable amorphous ferromagnetic microwires (CoFe-based) for use in giant magneto-impedance (GMI) magnetic sensing cores. Rapid solidification route is used for the preparation of microwires via in-rotating water quenching technique. The potential of the CoFeSiBCr soft magnetic microwires for GMI based sensing core is investigated by using the driving frequency of MHz range. The GMI characteristics of the developed materials are carried out via impedance-mode. The performance of the magnetic sensor is studied based on its maximum GMI ratio, magnetic field sensitivity and noise spectrum. The experimental results reveal that the maximum GMI ratio, GMImax of about 650% and field sensitivity of around 802 V/T is achieved at ac driving frequency of 5 MHz with 3 mA driving current when annealed at 750 K for 5 min. The noise level of the optimized microwire can be obtained under 10 nT/√Hz@1 Hz while driven at 5 MHz. By means of its high operating frequency regime, high sensitivity, low noise level and simple methodology for sensing, the GMI microwires working in impedance-mode can be a potential candidate for commercial sensing applications such as microfluxgate sensors.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We calculate the energy of the magnetostatic interaction between two ferromagnetic films with uniform magnetization and correlated interfaces (the “orange-peel” effect). The “orange-peel” coupling is anisotropic: the interaction is ferromagnetic when the films are magnetized in-plane; and it is antiferromagnetic when magnetization is out-of-plane. The interaction anisotropy can be used to distinguish the “orange-peel” effect from the interlayer exchange coupling.© 2018 Elsevier LtdWide bandgap (WBG) semiconductor devices represent an attractive developing technology for power applications that is recently gaining commercial ground. GaN has advantages as one of the top contenders with high bandgap, high mobility, high saturation velocity, and high breakdown voltage. GaN enhancement-mode devices are favored over depletion-mode devices for power electronics applications and are only recently becoming commercially available. The enhancement-mode device investigated in this work is a GaN-gate injection transistor (GIT) in which the normally-off operation is achieved with an additional p-doped gate. This paper presents current-voltage (I-V) characteristics of GaN-GIT device using a physics based compact model as well as TCAD (Technology Computer-Aided Design) numerical simulation to predict and model the device behavior of the GIT. This paper presents a comparison of the TCAD simulation results with a compact model intended for low frequency applications in power electronics in the KHz to MHz range.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The core-shell structured FeSiBCCr@TiO2 amorphous magnetic powder cores (AMPCs) with excellent comprehensive magnetic properties were successfully prepared using spherical amorphous powders with high quality insulating layer. Scanning electron microscopy, Energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy analysis, X-ray diffraction, and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy revealed that the surface of the Fe-based amorphous powders was covered by a continuous amorphous TiO2 insulation layer. The performances of the AMPCs can be well tuned by changing the thickness of the insulation coating layer, which can be adjusted by controlling the concentration of tetrabutyl titanate (TBOT) in the hydrolysis and condensation reaction system. After annealing at 480 °C for 1 h, the AMPCs with TBOT concentrations of 0.15 ml/g exhibited excellent comprehensive soft magnetic properties, including the highest quality factor of 104.5 at 560 kHz and lowest core loss of 265 mW/cm3 at f = 100 kHz and Bm = 0.05 T. It also maintained a relatively high permeability of 67 up to 5 MHz and superior DC-bias permeability of 68% at a bias field of 100 Oe. This study demonstrated a modified method to develop a novel insulation coating layer to reduce the core loss and improve the magnetic properties of AMPCs.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.To lower the operation frequency of the giant magnetoimpedance (GMI) sensor, the nanocrystalline soft magnetic alloy (i.e., FeCuNbSiB) with embedded coil laminate is investigated, specifically the enhanced inductance variations vs dc magnetic field are studied to evaluate the magnetic field detection performance. It consists of multiple repeated sandwich structure (i.e., soft magnetic alloy/planar coil/soft magnetic alloy, abbreviated as MCM). Both the coils’ self-inductance and electromagnetic coupling among different coils are significantly increased by covered soft magnetic ribbons, and this improves magnetic field sensitivity at low frequency. By considering the demagnetizing field's effect on the permeability, the performances of laminates with different MCM layers are theoretically investigated. Meanwhile various samples are fabricated and studied with experiments. It is found that (i) the maximum inductance ratio (i.e.,Ind_Ra=(LH-L(Hmax))/L(Hmax)) vs dc magnetic field is larger when the current directions of neighboring coils in the multilayer are opposite compared to that with the same direction. (ii) When the MCM layers are increased, the inductance ratio first increases and reaches the maximum value at the MCMCM structure due to the enhanced inductance contributed by multiple magnetic layers, and then gradually decreases with further increased MCM layers due to the increased demagnetizing field by neighboring magnetic layers. Additionally, by connecting a capacitor with the laminate, the inductance variation of laminate vs external dc magnetic field is changed into the resonant frequency variation. The investigated multilayer magnetic sensor can provide the sensitivity between 2.66 kHz/Oe and 3.56 kHz/Oe depending on the number of MCM layers, which is higher than most magnetic sensors using frequency tuning methods. This study plays an exploratory role at the design of ferromagnetic multilayer for magnetic sensor at low frequency.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on magnetocapacitance, spin dynamics through AC succeptability measurements and dielectric anomalies in 0.3NiFe2O4 – 0.7BiFeO3 nanocomposite. Structural studies (purity and phase) and surface morphology of the 0.3NiFe2O4 – 0.7BiFeO3 nanocomposite were examined by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Raman Spectra, transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and scanning electron microscopy (SEM). TEM and SEM images indicate the uniform distribution of nanoparticles in parent pahase as well as in the composite. Energy dispersive X-ray (EDX) analysis indicates the presence of Ni, Fe, O and Bi elements in 0.3NiFe2O4 – 0.7BiFeO3 nanocomposite. Magnetization measurements were performed at 300 K, 50 K and at 2 K and the Field Cooled (FC) and Zero Field Cooled (ZFC) measurements were carried out from 350 K to 2 K. ZFC and FC magnetization curves exhibit a hump around 30 K indicating the existence of competing magnetic interactions and possible spin galss behaviour. AC succeptibility measurements at various frequencies confirm the spin glass freezing behaviour of 0.3NiFe2O4 – 0.7BiFeO3 nanocomposite around 25 K with the relaxation time and activation energy in the order of 10−7 s and 0.938 meV respectively. The dielectric constant and dielectric loss at various frequencies and temperatures indicate the dielectric relaxation behaviour of 0.3NiFe2O4 – 0.7BiFeO3 nanocomposite. A rapid increase in the dielectric constant near the antiferromagnetic transition temperature (TN ∼ 643 K) of BiFeO3 indicates the existence of magneto-electric coupling in this composite. Magnetocapacitance (MC) of 0.3NiFe2O4 – 0.7BiFeO3 composite was measured at room temperature and the MC values of 13.5% and 7.8% (at 5000 Oe) are observed when the pellet is perpendicular and parallel to the magneticfield direction respectively. The presented magnetic and dielectric studies reveal the existence of magnetoelectric coupling and spin glass frezing of 0.3NiFe2O4 – 0.7BiFeO3 nanocomposite.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Distortions of hydroxide octahedral complexes in the CoII nAlIII layered double hydroxides (LDHs) (n = CoII/AlIII = 2 and 3) were studied as a function of the ratio of divalent-to-trivalent cations and temperature. A method for calculation the magnetic susceptibility of polycrystalline samples taking into account the statistical distribution of divalent and trivalent cations, and their effect on the distortions of the original structure is proposed. It is shown that the presence of a local maximum on the magnetic susceptibility curve of ConAl LDHs compounds near T ∼ 160 K is due to freezing of the lattice parameters and, as a consequence, freezing of the tilting fluctuations of the O–H bonds.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We studied the effect of pressure on the structural, elastic, electronic, magnetic, and optical properties of Mo-doped ZnSe alloy based on spin-polarized first-principles calculations using the generalized gradient approximation (GGA) + U and Heyd-Scuseria-Ernzerhof hybrid functional (HSE06) methods. The band gaps for pristine ZnSe compound were 1.152, 1.495, and 2.268 eV using the GGA, GGA + U and HSE06 methods, respectively. The Zn1−xMoxSe (x = 0.03125, 0.0625, and 0.125) alloys were half-metallic (HM) using the GGA + U method which could be used in spintronic devices. The Zn1−xMoxSe (x = 0.50, 0.75, and 1.00) alloys were metallic, and the Zn0.75Mo0.25Se alloy was HM using the GGA + U method. The Zn1−xMoxSe (x = 0.25 and 0.50) alloys were HM, and the Zn1−xMoxSe (x = 0.75 and 1.00) alloys were metallic using the HSE06 method. The spin-down band gap Eg and HM band gap Eg HM increased with increasing pressure using both the GGA + U and HSE06 methods. For both the GGA + U and HSE06 methods, the peaks of half-occupied t2g and occupied eg states of Mo atoms shifted to the lower energy region with increasing pressure. The four 4d electrons of Mo2 + ion preponderantly induced the total magnetic moment of 4μB/cell. The spin exchange splitting energy Δx(d) decreased, but the absolute value of exchange splitting energy Δx(pd) increased with increasing pressure. The blue shift characteristic of peaks of dielectric constants ε1(ω) and ε2(ω), refractive index n(ω), extinction coefficient k(ω), and absorption coefficient α(ω) with increasing pressure was observed using both the GGA + U and HSE06 methods.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Topological spin textures, such as magnetic skyrmions observed in certain chiral magnets, are one of the most interesting ordered phases in condensed matter. A skyrmion is a swirling spin structure carrying a topological quantum number. Skyrmions were first observed in MnSi, in 2009, and later observed in Cu2OSeO3, a chiral antiferromagnet with TN=58K that can be synthesized by reacting CuO and SeO2 at 600°C. Using a transport agent (typically ammonium chloride) in a chemical vapour transport reaction, single crystals can be grown. As skyrmion lattices may find use in nanotechnological devices, such as data storage systems and in other applications, the magnetic properties of nano-sized compounds deserve to be investigated. The following work presents the synthesis and magnetic studies of the nanocrystalline form of Cu2OSeO3 obtained by an alternative route, thermal decomposition of CuSeO3·2 H2O. This procedure afforded nanostructured samples of reasonable purity (>95%). Structural, morphological and magnetic characterization of these samples are reported, aiming to study the effect of nanostructuring on the magnetic phases, in particular the presence and stability of the skyrmionic lattice.© 2018Asymmetric magnetization reversal in perpendicularly exchange biased Pt/Co/Pt/IrMn multilayers was studied in nanometer scale by non-contact magnetic force microscopy with variable highly localized bipolar magnetic fields of the MFM tip. The hysteresis process of domain nucleation and pinned domain wall motion has been triggered and mapped simultaneously through MFM. Unstable magnetization reversal of submicron domains has been directly observed as well as exchange bias induced asymmetry in the depinning fields for domain wall motion. The current results demonstrated a possible way to locally mapping and manipulating novel magnetic nano-structures such as vortices and Skyrmions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, solid solution strengthening and dislocation strengthening is employed to fabricate high-strength electrical steels with low iron loss at a high frequency. Cast ingots with silicon content up to 4.5 wt% exhibit much lower Vickers hardness than 6.5 wt% Si steel and are feasible for forging and rolling. The cold-rolled thin sheets demonstrate good surface quality without edge cracks. The yield strength and magnetic properties can be tailored using heat treatment. Compared with data from state-of-the-art high-strength silicon steel 15HST780Y, the iron loss P1.0T/400Hz is 20% lower at the same yield strength.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Based on the detailed analysis of magnetic interference fields, mathematical model of compensation coefficients is constructed and nonlinear compensation method is proposed for magnetic tensor gradiometer in this paper. Firstly, a mathematical model containing compensation coefficients of magnetic tensor gradiometer is deduced by extending the Leliak method from the magnetic interference vector field compensation model. Secondly, four different types of constraint conditions, which are independent of the attitude of the magnetic tensor gradiometer and invariant with maneuvers, and a class of vector constraints are used to establish proper vector and tensor constraint equations. Then the compensation coefficients are solved using the nonlinear least square algorithm. Effectiveness and convergence of the proposed method are proved by simulation experiment, and the magnetic interference signals of aircraft effects are decreased remarkably.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Paramagnetic constituents of a cell have strong effect on the cell's volume magnetic susceptibility even at low volume fraction because of their high susceptibility relative to that of the diamagnetic cell constituents. The effect can be measured at a single cell level by measuring cell terminal velocity in viscous media using a microscope equipped with a well-defined field and gradient magnet configuration (referred to as magnetophoretic analysis by cell tracking velocimetry, CTV). The sensitivity of such a microscopic-scale magnetometry was compared to that of a reference method of superconducting quantum interference-magnetic properties measurement system (SQUID-MPMS) using a red blood cell (RBC) suspension model. The RBC hemoglobin oxygen saturation determines the hemoglobin molecular magnetic susceptibility (diamagnetic when fully oxygenated, paramagnetic when fully deoxygenated or converted to methemoglobin). The SQUID-MPMS measurements were performed on an average of 5000 RBCs in 20 µL physiological phosphate buffer at room temperature, those by CTV on a single cell track in a mean magnetic field of 1.6 T and mean gradient of 240 T/m, repeated for an average of 1000 tracks per sample. This suggests 5000× higher sensitivity of cell susceptometry by magnetophoretic analysis than by SQUID-MPMS. The magnetophoretic mean RBC magnetic susceptibilities were in the range determined by SQUID-MPMS (lower limit) and theory (upper limit). The ability of magnetophoretic analysis to resolve susceptibility peaks in a mixed cell populations was confirmed for an oxy RBC and met RBC mixture. Magnetophoretic analysis by CTV provides new tool for studies of emergence of paramagnetic reaction products in the cell.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, a new series of multielement multiphase alloys were designed by combining Nd2Fe14B with spinodal decomposition type of Alnico alloy. The Nd11.4Fe81.2−xB5.7+xAl0.5Ni0.4Co0.7Cu0.1 (x = 0, 2, 4) ribbons were prepared by melt-spinning at a wheel speed of 40 m/s, and the effect of B content on the structure and magnetic properties of ribbons was investigated. The results show that three ribbons all formed a multielement, multiphase and fully enclosed microstructure with soft magnetic, weak magnetic and amorphous phases surrounding the hard magnetic phase. Phase contents and grain size changed with an increase in B content. Although the content of hard magnetic Nd2(Fe,M)14B phase was only about 56.1% in x = 2 ribbons, their magnetic properties reached Hc = 10.8 ± 0.2 kOe, Mr = 60.6 ± 0.9 emu/g and M2T = 90.4 ± 2.8 emu/g. Finally, the novel microstructure model was established and its magnetic performance was analyzed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In order to develop a fast and low-cost method for preparing γ′-Fe4N thin films for spintronic applications, the iron nitride (Fe–N) thin films were deposited through reactive sputtering in pure nitrogen, followed by high vacuum magnetic annealing process. The X-ray diffraction pattern (XRD) results revealed that the N content of the Fe–N thin films were decreasing continuously with the increase of annealing temperatures and times, so as to affect their crystal phase compositions, thus a single phase of γ″-FeN, ξ-Fe2N and γ′-Fe4N can be controllable prepared through annealing process. The phase transition characteristics for Fe–N to γ′-Fe4N were studied carefully. It was found that the sample (Fe1.8N) with a mixed crystal phase of γ″-FeN and ξ-Fe2N can be totally changed into a single phase of γ′-Fe4N by annealing it at 430 °C for 3 h, and the annealing temperatures can also be as low as 375 °C but for a prolonged time to 24 h. The stoichiometric matter of the as-prepared Fe–N thin films was confirmed by the XPS analysis. The vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) results indicated that the magnetic properties of the Fe–N thin films are mainly depending on their crystal phase compositions. The saturation magnetization (Ms) of γ′-Fe4N films depends on various factors, and it was to about 1080 emu/cm3 for the γ′-Fe4N/MgO/Si.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The untethered actuation of milli- and microdevices is of great interest for a variety of medical applications. A millimeter sized swimmer is shown, which is 3D-printed and coated with magnetic nanoparticles. The coating has to fulfill two requirements: First, it must have a high magnetic moment in order to show a strong reaction to a magnetic field for good actuation performance. Second, it has to be suitable for magnetic particle imaging (MPI). MPI is an emerging medical imaging technique, based on the nonlinear response of superparamagnetic nanoparticles to oscillating magnetic fields. It is aimed at dual use of an MPI scanner: for both actuation and visualization. When applying rotating homogeneous magnetic fields, the swimmer performs an axial movement due to its shape and the viscosity of the surrounding medium. These fields can be generated with an MPI scanner. The swimmer dynamics have been observed and a maximum swimming velocity of 6 mm/s at a rotation frequency of the magnetic field of 10 Hz was found. The experiments are performed with a commercially available preclinical MPI scanner. It is shown, that the swimmer is suitable to be imaged with MPI. Furthermore, sequentially acquired images of a moving swimmer are shown. For this, the MPI scanner was alternately driven in imaging and actuation mode.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The inverse Faraday effect was initially discovered with dielectric paramagnets and recently extended to metallic ferromagnets, and it has been considered as one of the key mechanisms for the optical manipulation of the magnetization. Two different experimental observations were attributed to the inverse Faraday effect: induced magnetic moment and torque on the magnetization. In this work, we measure the induced orbital moment and field-like torque driven by the inverse Faraday effect in metallic ferromagnets of Co and show a relationship between them. We investigate the thickness and wavelength dependence of the induced orbital moment and field-like torque and compare them with theories.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We study the magnon-charged impurity interaction effects on the magnonic heat capacity (MHC) and the Pauli magnetic susceptibility (PMS) of spin-1/2 and spin-3/2 Lieb lattice within the J1-J2 Heisenberg model in the presence of the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction (DMI) and the Zeeman magnetic field. In so doing, we use the Green's function technique and the full self-consistent Born approximation. We found that in the case of J1 Heisenberg model, the MHC and PMS increase (decrease) with impurity concentration for spin-1/2 (spin-3/2), while oscillate (decrease) when coupling constants next-nearest-neighbor (NNN), DMI, and the Zeeman field are taken into account. We have also investigated perturbed MHC and PMS by ascertained impurity for different coupling strengths, resulting in the oscillating (decreasing) behavior with NNN for spin-1/2 (spin-3/2) and a decreasing behavior with DMI and Zeeman magnetic field for both spin-1/2 and spin-3/2. Moreover, magnetic phase transitions in the case of spin-3/2 are established when tuning coupling constants on the non-zero, whilst no magnetic phase transition is observed for spin-1/2 Lieb lattice. Our findings are useful to tune the physical properties of optical lattices subjected to the electric field, magnetic field, and charged impurity.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Using the Landauer-Bütikker formalism, we study the graphene magneto-transport in the presence of Rashba spin-orbit interaction (RSOI). we show that the angle resolved transmission probability in the proposed structures can be tuned by the RSOI strength. The transmission spectrum show Klein tunneling in the parallel (P) magnetization configuration which can be blocked by the RSOI. This effect is also observable for the anti-parallel (AP) magnetization configuration in different incident angle. The numerical results shows that the spin-polarized conductance strongly depends on the strength of the RSOI and can be generated by tuning the magnetic exchange field and RSOI strength. This spin-polarized conductance is a sensitive oscillatory function of the thickness of the RSO region. Because of the spin-flip effect, the junction shows a spin-valve effect with large and negative magnetoresistance (MR) and spin-magnetoresistance (SMR) in the presence of RSOI. When the RSOI is on, the frequency and amplitude of shot-noise and Fano factor's oscillations are also increased. These results can provide a way to extending the application of graphene-based junctions in spintronics.© 2018Structural parameters of nanomagnet arrays have been systematically adjusted in order to study and to maximize the magnetocaloric effect. Optimum technological parameters were experimentally established and arrays of nanomagnets based on Ni3Pt nanoparticles with a different structure period (1, 2, 3 μm) and two different heights (1.2 and 1.9 μm) were fabricated using electron-beam lithography followed by electrodeposition. The obtained arrays have a phase composition of fcc-Ni3Pt, which remains unchanged after annealing. It was shown that a change in the period of the nanomagnet arrays leads to a change in the magnitude of the magnetocaloric effect and the operating temperature range. Also, changes in the height of nanomagnets from 1.2 to 1.9 μm lead to an increase in the magnetocaloric response by more than 30%.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of CsCo2Se2, possessing a ThCr2Si2-structure, are systematically studied by using specific heat, resistivity, and torque measurements. Our results reveal that CsCo2Se2 undergoes a paramagnetic state to antiferromagnetic order at TN≈80 K at zero magnetic field. The TN is nearly independent of the external magnetic field for H‖c-axis, and can be suppressed for H‖ab-plane below 4 T, above which spin-flop phase transition sets in. At 2 K, the magnetoresistance has a small value of 2.3% for H‖c-axis while goes up to 60% for H‖ab-plane at 9 T. A hump-like behavior in resistivity was discovered, which was ascribed to a field-induced spin-flop phase transition. The magnetoresistance results suggest that a crossover of spin-flop phase transition occurs at low temperatures in the field range of 2–4 T for H‖ab-plane. Furthermore, the magnetic torque results reveal a novel ordered Co spin structure at low temperatures under 6 T for H‖ab-plane. Finally, we summarize the magnetic phase diagram of CsCo2Se2 based on resistivity and torque results.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have investigated the room temperature perpendicular exchange bias (PEB) at the ferromagnetic CoNi/antiferromagnetic (Co,Ni)O interfaces. CoNi/(Co,Ni)O multilayers with sharp interfaces have been sputter-deposited on glass substrates. It is found such multilayers show strong PMA and room temperature PEB. The PMA is considered originate from the interfacial anisotropy due to the facts that the CoNi layers are of poor crystallinity and it is difficult to obtain strain-induced anisotropy. The room temperature PEB indicates the well-balanced Néel temperature and anisotropy energy of the antiferromagnetic (Co,Ni)O mixed oxide layer.© 2018 Elsevier LtdGraphene is one of good candidates for application to multifunctional sensors due to its unique material properties, extremely high surface-to-volume ratio and ability to be effectively co-integrated on various substrates. However, the electrical properties of graphene are sensitive to most typical environment signals such as temperature, light, humidity, and gas. Therefore, to develop graphene-based multifunctional sensors, it is essential to identify multiple environment information values from the output characteristics of a single graphene sensor. In this study, we developed a temperature–illuminance multifunctional graphene sensor that can identify both temperature and illuminance values. We also propose a decoupling technique to enable the precise identification of temperature and illuminance values from the output characteristics of a sensor that has cross-sensitivity to the both inputs. This decoupling technique is developed based on the different gate-voltage dependence of the temperature- and illumination-induced modulations of the graphene conductivity. The results show that graphene can be used as a material for multifunctional sensors when combined with an appropriate decoupling technique for identifying various types of environment signals.© 2018In the past 20 years, several studies have been performed on the detection of biomarkers by the stripe-shaped spin valve sensors, whose sensitivity is limited by their small sensing area and large sensor resistance. In this paper, large-area spin valve sensors with lower aspect ratio are introduced. A reverse nucleation mechanism is proposed to demonstrate the different switching processes in large-area sensors. The simulation results further prove the involvement of reverse nucleation sites during the magnetization reversal. Large-area sensors also exhibit a linear response to the concentration of magnetic nanoparticles with a sensor signal more than 20 times larger than the stripe sensors.© 2018It is desirable to be able to non-destructively evaluate the microstructural features and/or mechanical properties of steel strip. An electromagnetic sensor – sample FE model, developed in COMSOL multi-physics software, has been developed to determine the relationship between the low magnetic field relative permeability and microstructure (phase balance and grain size), and hence tensile strength, for commercial dual phase (DP) steel sheets of any thickness. The model for the effect of thickness on the sensor signal has been validated using DP steel sheets of 1 to 4 mm. It was found that the relative permeability is strongly dependent on the phase balance (fraction of ferrite and martensite) in the DP steels with an increasing relative permeability being seen for a higher fraction of ferrite. In addition, changes in the ferrite grain size also affect the relative permeability (increase in grain size increases relative permeability) and hence EM sensor signal, this being more significant for the higher ferrite content DP grades. Both these microstructural features affect the tensile strength (which decreases with an increase in ferrite fraction and increase in grain size), which results in a good correlation between the relative permeability and tensile strength. The results from the relative permeability – microstructure – tensile strength investigation and FE model to account for strip thickness have been combined to allow the prediction of tensile strength from EM sensor measurements on as-received commercial DP steel sheets of varying thickness and the approach has been tested.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we present a detailed investigation of low frequency noise (LFN) for different n-MOSFET devices dedicated for memory applications. We investigate the impact of the gate oxide thickness (GOX) on LFN. We analyzed how the position, the existence and the composition of Lightly Doped Dopant (LDD) implant in the source/drain region affect the LFN performance of the device. The results demonstrates that the thinner gate oxide and the device without LDD improved the noise performance compared the devices with thick GOX and with LDD implants. On the other hand, the absence of LDD implant on one side of the MOSFET didn't reveal a global trend for all measured devices. Finally, the different LDD implant composition resulted in different LFN performance which is gate area dependent. These results can be used from both process and design engineers to improve the LFN of n-MOSFET.© 2018 Elsevier LtdBy gathering statistical data from floating-gate cells in a state-of-the-art 3-Dimensional (3-D) NAND Flash memory array, in this paper we explore the temperature dependence of random telegraph noise (RTN) fluctuations in nanoscale polysilicon-channel metal-oxide-semiconductor field-effect transistors. Experimental results highlight some major differences in the RTN temperature behavior with respect to monocrystalline silicon devices. In particular, not only the time constants but also the amplitude of RTN fluctuations appear to significantly change with temperature, with the latter displaying an average increase when temperature is reduced. The change of the fluctuation amplitude with temperature is correlated neither with the fluctuation time constants nor with their activation energy. Results are explained in terms of a more relevant role played by polysilicon grain boundaries when temperature is reduced, leading to a more percolative conduction in the transistor channel and to a stronger impact on the source-to-drain current of RTN traps placed close to the grain boundaries. These results should be carefully considered when attempting spectroscopic investigations based on the assumption, valid for monocrystalline devices, that only the time constants and not the amplitude of RTN fluctuations change with temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of Ge buffer layer thickness on the formation of epitaxial Mn5Ge3 films and their magnetic properties has been investigated. Epitaxial ferromagnetic Mn5Ge3 thin films were deposited on Ge/Si (1 1 1) substrates using solid phase epitaxy. The crystalline quality, chemical composition and magnetic properties of the films were investigated by x-ray diffraction, transmission electron microscopy, x-ray photoelectron spectroscopy, electron spin resonance. Increasing the thickness of the Ge layer significantly enhanced the crystallinity and magnetic homogeneity of Mn5Ge3 films. Both structural and magnetic investigations show substantial diffusion of Mn atoms through Ge buffer layer which results in the formation of Mn5Si3 and a delay in Mn5Ge3 formation until the thickness of the Ge layer reaches to 70 nm. The observed magnetic behavior for the films grown on different Ge thicknesses is interpreted in terms of changes in the magnetic phases and surface properties. These results show that Mn5Ge3 can be epitaxially grown on Si substrate with Ge buffer layer thicknesses of above 140 nm, despite ∼8% lattice mismatch between Mn5Ge3 and Si (1 1 1).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The present work reports the preparation and magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) microscopy study of gadolinium iron garnet Gd3Fe5O12 (GdIG) polycrystalline thin film. The GdIG thin film is grown on Si(0 0 1) by Pulsed laser deposition technique (PLD). Grazing angle X-ray diffraction confirms the formation of GdIG after ex-situ annealing at 750°C under ambient conditions. MOKE measurement done in both longitudinal and polar geometries shows oblique magnetic anisotropy axis at room temperature rather than either completely in-plane or out of plane anisotropy axis. Signatures of magnetic compensation are seen from the increase of coercive field obtained from temperature dependent MOKE measurements. The observation of magnetic compensation is also manifested by the inversion of MOKE loops. The magnetic domain structure shows the formation of bubble or maze-like domains with a considerable dependence on temperature. The observed domain size variation as a function of temperature is fitted considering the model for thermally activated behavior of domain size variation in rare-earth garnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Room temperature diluted magnetic semiconductor nanomaterials play an important role in the preparation of novel micro-nano semiconductor devices. Herein, magnetic cobalt vanadate nanowire array is fabricated via a simple one-step cation-exchange method, which is confirmed to be a new kind of one-dimensional room temperature ferromagnetic semiconductors. Anisotropic magnetic with an easy direction of magnetization either perpendicular or parallel to the nanowire axis are found in the samples. Structural reorganization during calcination is beneficial to enhance the magnetic properties of the materials (Ms = 0.081 emu g−1 after calcination at 500 °C). Our investigation indicates that the room temperature anisotropic ferromagnetic of the samples is derived from the uniformly distributed cobalt element in the samples. The cation-exchange method in this work is easily applicable to synthesis similar room temperature ferromagnetic vanadate nanomaterials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Effect of zinc substitution on magnetic properties and AC heating characteristics of Ni1− xZnxFe2O4 (x = 0–1) nanoparticles has been studied. Magnetic parameters, such as saturation magnetization, Curie temperature, specific loss power, have been determined for the samples. It is shown that the samples with a higher zinc concentration (x > 0.5) display reduced values of spontaneous magnetization and Curie temperature as compared to those with x < 0.5. A good agreement between the values of Curie temperature and maximal heating temperature under AC magnetic field is found for the samples with x = 0.75. It is concluded that heavily Zn-substituted Ni1− xZnxFe2O4 nanoparticles are promising materials for self-controlled magnetic hyperthermia applications.© 2018Multiple wall carbon nanotubes (MWCNT) present advantages for optoelectronic applications such as the large effective photo-collector surface as well as the possibility to tune their band gap and absorbance through the growth parameters. We demonstrate a hybrid MWCNT/Si3N4/n-Si photodetector based on ordered MWCNTs and evaluate its performance in the UV, visual and near IR spectrum (200–1000 nm). The basic device and some meaningful variations including additional layers are electrically and optically tested and compared. The overall results suggest that all devices had a satisfactory performance in the visual part of the spectrum and that the basic structure had the better performance as a UV detector (EQE 90% @ 275 nm@ 7 V). The aim of this work is to demonstrate that the growth of dense ordered MWCNTs can be successfully combined with other semiconductor clean room processes in order to fabricate photodetectors, provided that the side effects are taken into account and the process flow is selected appropriately.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The crystal structure, dynamics, magnetic structure and property of orthochromites solid solution Ho1−xYxCrO3 (x = 0, 0.2,…,1.0) were systematically investigated by X-ray diffraction, Raman scattering, magnetometry and neutron powder diffraction. With increasing non-magnetic Y3+-substitution for Ho3+ throughout the whole range, the crystallographic parameters remain almost unchanged, so is Néel temperature (TN ≈ 141 K), which is closely related to the structure in these orthochromites. However, the Raman spectra demonstrates the lattice dynamics is influenced due to the mass difference between Ho3+ and Y3+. Moreover, the spin reorientation property is also strongly affected by Y-substitution revealed by neutron powder diffraction. For the composition of x ≤ 0.6, the magnetism of Cr3+ sublattice adopts Γ2 spin configuration in terms of Bertaut notation from low temperature (10 K) up to Néel temperature. With the doping concentration further increases to x = 0.7 and 0.8, the system exhibits a mixed structure of (Γ2 + Γ4) within a certain temperature range. Beyond and underneath of which, a single spin configuration is identified as Γ4 (GxAyFz) and Γ2 (FxCyGz), respectively. After x = 0.8, only Γ4 (GxAyFz) are observed below TN. These phenomena are attributed to the weakened Ho3+-Cr3+ interaction with Y-substitution, which causes a competition between Γ2 and Γ4 spin configurations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The lanthanum (La3+) doped M-type barium hexaferrite (Ba1−xLaxFe12O19) with x = 0.0, 0.05, 0.10, 0.15, and 0.20 have been prepared by the sol-gel technique. The Rietveld refinement of X-ray diffraction (XRD) patterns reveals the crystallization of all the samples to hexagonal crystal symmetry with P63/mmc space group. Investigation of Raman spectra strongly supports the XRD pattern analysis. The average grain (particle) size is found to be above 300 nm. Both the saturation magnetization and magnetocrystalline anisotropy have been estimated by employing the “Law of Approach (LA) to Saturation magnetization”. Both the above parameters are found to be maximum for 10% La doped BaFe12O19. It could be due to the lattice strain mediated magnetism in barium hexaferrite. However, these magnetic parameters decrease with the increase in La doping beyond 10% (>x = 0.10) in barium hexaferrite. The dielectric permittivity gradually increases with the La concentration in the BHF. A correlation between dielectric constant with the lattice strain has been reported in La3+ doped barium hexaferrite.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We experimentally determine that a Pt layer insertion between the Co/Ta interface can effectively negate the field-like spin-orbit torque (SOT) in perpendicularly magnetized Pt/Co/Pt(t)/Ta structures, as the Rashba effects at the Pt/Co and Co/Pt interfaces counteract each other. The damping-like term can be tuned by varying the thickness of the Pt insertion layer to change both the sign and magnitude of the SOT effective fields. An asymmetric SOT contribution from the Pt/Co and Co/Pt interfaces was found, leading to zero damping-like SOT being obtained at different inserted Pt and bottom Pt layer thickness. The ability to change the sign of damping-like SOT allows control over the magnetic switching direction in SOT devices.© 2018A new method of obtaining accurate approximants for inverse Brillouin functions is proposed. It is based on a partial relaxation of one of the conditions recently imposed by Kröger to such approximants. The particular case of the approximant worked out in detail in this paper is with at least one order of magnitude more accurate than the approximants currently used.© 2018 Elsevier LtdIn this paper, we modeled the scattering-limited effective mobility (μeff) of an In0.7Ga0.3As quantum-well (QW) metal-oxidesemiconductor field-effect-transistor (MOSFET). We fabricated In0.7Ga0.3As/In0.52Al0.48As QW MOSFETs with Al2O3 = 2 nm by ALD, and the devices exhibited a μeff value close to 7000 cm2/V s at 300 K and good electrostatic integrity. Detailed analysis on μeff of the In0.7Ga0.3As/In0.52Al0.48As QW MOSFETs was performed to investigate various sources of the scattering mechanism, such as surface-roughness scattering (SRS), phonon scattering (PHS) and Coulombic scattering (CS). In doing so, we attempted to separately model the three different scattering mechanisms from their dependency upon the vertical electric field intensity (Eeff). We demonstrated that μeff of the InGaAs QW MOSFET was governed by a combination of three scattering components according to Mathiessen's rule, yielding excellent agreement with experimental data.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The thermal dependence of the magnetization of a nanoparticles powder heated from very low temperatures 1–400 K for both cases of cooling in the absence (zfc) and in presence (fc) of a constant magnetic field was studied. In the presence of the magnetic field, the uniaxial anisotropy generates asymmetric double well energy landscapes. The changes with temperature and time of the particles distribution between the two energy minima was examined, and calculations based on particles distribution were developed. At low temperatures, the relaxation time is very long, the transitions between the two energy minima are extremely rare and the particle distribution on the minima does not change. Close to the blocking temperature TB, the relaxation time becomes much shorter and a significant increase in the transition number takes place, the particle distribution changes and so does the magnetization. Above this temperature, the relaxation time decreases faster, the transitions in both directions come to balance and the particle distribution becomes stable: the magnetization values will correspond to successive thermodynamic equilibrium states, verified by the zfc, fc and td curves superposition. The theoretical results are in good agreement with the experimental data reported by many authors.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The dipole-dipole interaction effect on the magnetic hysteresis of nanoparticles randomly dispersed within a plane is studied by micromagnetic simulation. The dependence of the coercive field with the concentration of nanoparticles varies from nonlinear and monotonic to non-monotonic dependence with a maximum at a certain concentration. It happens when the ratio of the magnetic anisotropy constant to the maximal dipole energy changes from value much larger than 1 to the value much less than unity.© 2018 The AuthorsSpecific loss power has been measured on γ-Fe2O3 nanoparticles dispersed in water by means of several techniques, i.e. heat flow in a calorimeter, hyperthermia, and static and dynamic hysteresis loops. Static hysteresis loops as a function of the maximum applied field underestimate the power losses as dynamic effects are not exploited, but turned out to be a valuable tool to prove the consistency of specific loss power measurements obtained by the other techniques over a wide range of applied magnetic field intensities. A temperature-dependence of the specific loss power has been taken into account in hyperthermia measurements performed with a fully modelled non adiabatic experimental setup. Simple mean-field theoretical models (interacting superparamagnetic, modified Stoner-Wohlfarth) have been exploited to reproduce the static energy losses of the particles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Here we consider the Ising-Heisenberg model in the expanded Kagomé lattice, also known as triangle-dodecagon (3–12) or star lattice. This model can still be understood as a decorated honeycomb lattice. Assuming that the Heisenberg spins are at the vertices of the triangle while other spins are of the Ising type. Thus, this model is equivalent to an effective Kagomé Ising lattice, through the decoration transformation technique. Thus this means that the model is exactly solvable so we can study the most relevant properties of this model. Like the phase diagram at zero temperature, exhibiting a frustrated phase, a ferromagnetic phase, a classical ferrimagnetic phase and a quantum ferrimagnetic phase. We observed that Heisenberg spin exchange interaction influences the frustrated phase, but we rigorously verify that the magnitude and origin of the frustration emerge in a similar way to antiferromagnetic Ising Kagomé lattice. Likewise, the thermodynamic properties of the model can also be obtained, such as the critical temperature as a dependence of the Hamiltonian parameters and the spontaneous magnetization of the model. Besides, we investigated the entropy of the model, identifying its residual entropy in the frustrated region. Even we analyze the specific heat behavior as a temperature dependence, to deal with the phase transition.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We studied the magnetodynamics of ferromagnetic films coupling across a topological insulator (TI) Bi2Se3 layer using ferromagnetic resonance (FMR). TIs have attracted much attention across the physics community as they hold the potential for dissipationless carrier transport, extremely high spin-orbit torques, and are host to novel quantum effects. To investigate the coupling between the ferromagnetic (FM) layers, vector network analyzer (VNA)-FMR measurements of the resonance linewidth were performed as a function of bias field angle. By bringing the resonances of the two FM layers into close proximity, it was possible to observe antidamping torques that lead to a narrowing of linewidth, a characteristic of spin pumping. The element- and hence layer-specific technique of X-ray detected ferromagnetic resonance (XFMR) was used to circumvent the difficulty of obtaining accurate fits to the two overlapping resonances in close proximity. Our results confirm that the interaction across the TI is a dynamic exchange mediated by spin pumping, as opposed to a self-coupling of the surface state or similar, more unconventional mechanisms.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The M-type hexagonal ferrites having the chemical formula Sr1−xCexFe12−yMnyO19 (x = 0.000, 0.025, 0.050, 0.075, and y = 0.00, 0.25, 0.50, 0.75) are fabricated via sol-gel auto combustion technique. We observed the effect of substitution of rare earth elements on structural and magnetic properties of M-type hexagonal ferrites. Scanning electron microscope (SEM), X-ray diffraction (XRD) strategies were applied for the systematical investigation of micrographs and structures of the samples respectively. Magnetic properties of all the samples were investigated through vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). It is observed that the values of saturation magnetization (Ms) and remanence (Mr) decline with increasing the rare earth ions substitution. This decrease may follow the spin canting and magnetic dilution which results in dislocation of super exchange interactions. Synthesized samples having the value of coercivity of few hundred Oersteds show soft magnetic behavior. The synthesized samples may be applied for magnetic recording media and microwave absorbing materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of Ni50Mn33In17 were investigated by means of synchrotron X-ray diffraction and magnetization measurements. In contrast to well established critical concentration of x≤16.0 for Ni50Mn50−xInx alloys to undergo structural transformation, we have found Ni50Mn33In17 to undergo austenite to martensite structural transition around 170 K. At room temperature, the Rietveld refinement of X-ray diffraction measurements revealed a L21 Heusler cubic structure belonging to Fm3m space group while the low temperature martensite structure belongs to a monoclinic space group P2/m. Temperature dependent magnetization measurements confirmed a near room temperature paramagnetic to ferromagnetic magnetic transition as well as a magnetostructural transition at ∼170 K while magnetic field induced reverse martensite transformation was also confirmed. An inverse magnetocaloric effected associated with the magnetostructural transition is also observed with magnetic entropy change ΔSM reaching ∼13.0 J/kg-K around 175 K under field change of 0–6 T. The inverse magnetocaloric effect occurs in a wide temperature range of 125–200 K with a relatively high refrigerant capacity of about 200 J/kg. This makes Ni50Mn33In17 a promising magnetic refrigerant in the mentioned range of temperature as well as for further studies of effect of excess Mn on magnetic and structural properties of Ni50Mn50−xInx alloys.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A novel soft magnetic composite (SMC) containing magnetic flakes with in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy was successfully fabricated. The magnetic flakes of amorphous FeCoBSi phase were compacted in an insulating matrix to fabricate the SMC. The fabricated SMC was annealed under a magnetic field, and in-plane uniaxial magnetic anisotropy was observed in the flattened planes of the magnetic flakes after annealing. The coercivity of the SMC in the easy axis direction was approximately half of that in the hard axis direction after annealing. The minimum coercivity in the easy axis direction was 0.1 Oe, and much smaller than those of conventional SMCs, SMC developed in the other work, and electrical steel sheet. An extremely small core loss of 16 kW/m3 can be expected at 1 T and 400 Hz, reflecting the small coercivity value (0.1 Oe).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Transverse magnetoresistance in p-type conductivity Si <B, Ni> whiskers with different impurity concentration that correspond to the dielectric side of metal-insulator transition were studied in magnetic fields 0–8 T at low temperatures 1.6 to 50 K. The presence of negative magnetoresistance in Si <B, Ni> whiskers with concentration 2 × 1018 cm−3 was observed and associated with weak localization. The obtained parameters of phase coherence length lφ and spin-orbit coherence length lso comprise approximately 45 nm and 750 nm, respectively, at 4.2 K. The parameters obtained for Si <B, Ni> whisker indicate the presence of hopping conductivity, orders of magnitude stronger than the parameters obtained for Si <B> whisker with variable-range conductance, which indicates substantial impact of Ni impurities on the whisker magnetoresistance.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic modification of four different electrospun nanofibrous textiles, based on polyamide, polyvinyl alcohol, polycaprolactone and polyurethane, is reported. The simple spray modification procedure employing two types of magnetic fluids was used. Magnetic modification led to the deposition of magnetic iron oxide nanoparticles on the surface of textile nanofibers. Magnetic nanotextile exhibited response to external magnetic field and was stable for a long time. Magnetic modification has not substantially changed the structure of the modified nanotextile. Magnetically modified nanotextile exhibited peroxidase-like activity and thus it represents a promising composite material applicable in various biochemical, biomedical and biotechnology applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on the static and dynamic magnetic properties of W/CoFeB/Ta/CoFeB/MgO stacks, where the CoFeB layer is split in two by a 0.3 nm-thick Ta “dusting” layer. A total CoFeB thickness between 1.2 and 2.4 nm is studied. Perpendicular magnetic anisotropy is obtained for thickness below 1.8 nm even at the as-deposited stacks, and it is enhanced after annealing. Saturation magnetization is 1520 (1440) kA/m before (after) annealing, increased compared to non-split CoFeB layers. Ferromagnetic resonance measurements show that high magnetic anisotropy energy may be achieved (effective anisotropy field 0.571 ± 0.003 T), combined to a moderate Gilbert damping (0.030 ± 0.001). We argue that the above characteristics make the split-CoFeB system advantageous for spintronics applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This paper aims to provide a detailed analysis of the electronic, magnetic and spin-dependent transport properties of Cu-adsorbed zigzag silicene nanoribbons within the density functional theory framework. The possibility of diffusion between different stable positions is studied by Nudge Elastic Band (NEB) method. As to zigzag graphene nanoribbons, the center of nearest hexagonal to the edge is the most favorable site for adsorbing Cu atom. Total energy analysis for spin-polarized calculations indicates that the antiferromagnetic (AFM) state is the magnetic ground state of zigzag silicene nanoribbons whereas adding the Cu adatom on the near edge yields ferromagnetic (FM) state with the total magnetization about 0.98μB. As a consequence of charge transfer from Si atoms to Cu, the spin distribution symmetry of the edges is broken and the spin magnetic moment is considerably localized on the edge with no adsorption. Further verification of the electronic properties may be obtained through investigating the conductivity behavior of the device using the current-voltage (I-V) characteristics based on density functional theory with non-equilibrium Green's function included. Although the spin-up current increases with the bias monotonically, a spin negative different resistance phenomenon is observed for spin-down electrons. Additionally, spin-up transmission shows higher values in comparison with that for spin-down in bias window which leads to the higher current. The results hold promising applications for future nano-electronics and spintronic devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on a theoretical study of thermomagnetic and magnetocaloric properties of TmFe2. The magnetization, total heat capacity, total entropy and magnetocaloric effect, namely isothermal entropy change ΔSm and adiabatic temperature change ΔTad, are calculated for magnetic fields up to 8 T and for temperatures up to 700 K. Mean- field analysis, within the two sublattice model, showed that TmFe2 is a ferrimagnetic compound exhibiting a compensation point at Tcomp = 200 K and a Curie temperature at TC = 550 K. Direct and inverse MCEs are shown to take place in this ferrimagnetic compound. We have calculated direct MCE with maximum |ΔSm| of 0.50 J/ mole K at Tc, and an inverse MCE with maximum |ΔSm| of 0.57 J/mole. K, for an applied field change of 8 T. |ΔTad| has its maximum value of 5.57 K in an applied field change of 8 T. i.e. a temperature drop of 0.70 K/T has been achieved. The calculated Arrott plots and the relation between |ΔSm| and M2 demonstrated that the magnetic phase transition in this compound is of the second order. The mean-field model proves its suitability for calculating the properties of the compound under study.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We conducted magnetization measurements on an S=3/2 “breathing” pyrochlore antiferromagnet LiInCr4O8 in magnetic fields of up to 130 T using a coaxial-type magnetization pickup coil in a horizontal single-turn coil megagauss generator. The magnetization process exhibits a phase transition to a 1/2-magnetization plateau phase accompanied by a sudden increase in the magnetization with a discernible hysteresis at approximately 100 T. In addition, we also observed a shoulder-like behavior in the magnetization process prior to the 1/2-plateau phase, implicating the existence of a novel magnetic phase, peculiar to the “breathing” pyrochlore antiferromagnet.© 2018 Elsevier LtdThin film bulk acoustic resonator (FBAR) plays a very important role in radio frequency (RF) filters used in cell phone and other wireless systems. Although FBAR is commercialized, the design/process interactions on the frequency response variation in FBAR device are still lacking. Design and fabrication are two crucial aspects affecting FBAR device performance. In this report, various solidly mounted resonators (SMR) were designed, fabricated and analyzed to study wafer-level site-to-site RF variation on design and fabrication process. As a key process step for SMR FBAR, the optimization process of Mg-doped ZnO piezoelectric thin film deposition was studied by varying thin film sputtering conditions using various sputtering targets and by post annealing treatment after the deposition. The quality of this crucial layer was verified by XRD on its (0 0 2) crystallization and wafer-level FBAR RF characterization. FBAR devices with high quality were fabricated with an excellent resonant behavior near 2 GHz and a maximum return loss of −15 to 25 dB. Quality factor Q ranges from 400 to 800, with a coupling coefficient keff2 of 1.5–3%. Wafer-level and wafer-to-wafer variation of central frequency are within 1.8–2.1 GHz. Computer simulation verified that this frequency variation correlates to the piezoelectric film variation of 1.6–1.9 μm. Process control on this piezoelectric thin film is essential to maintaining the resonator frequency-controlled value when building duplexer RF circuits. The dependency of RF performance on FBAR size, density and orientation is not obvious, compared to that of the wafer-level FBAR device variation on fabrication process. Regarding to the Mg-doping effect in MgxZn1-xO piezoelectric film, the amount of Mg in MgxZn1-xO film during the sputtering process must be properly controlled within 30% to keep the piezoelectric quality. The average acoustic speed of the Mg-doped ZnO film is 6870 m/s with the estimated range of 5760–7980 m/s, which is better than that of pure ZnO film (6330 m/s).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The complete martensitic transformation sequence and magnetic properties of the non-stoichiometric Ni2Mn1.2Ga0.8 alloy have been revealed by the first-principles calculations. The calculated martensitic transformation sequence of the Ni2Mn1.2Ga0.8 alloy during cooling is Paramagnetic Austenite (PA) → Ferromagnetic Austenite (FA) → 7M → NM, which is consistent with the experimental observations. When the cubic FA phase transforms to a 7M or NM martensitic phase, a significant reduction of the down-spin total density of states occurred at the Fermi level. This makes the martensitic phase more stable than the FA phase at low temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Spin-reorientation-transition cell boundary phases are used to improve the temperature stability of coercivity in 2:17 type SmCo magnets. A magnet with both low temperature coefficients of remanence (α) and coercivity (β) is developed. In comparison with traditional 2:17 type SmCo magnets with low temperature coefficient of remanence, this magnet exhibits comparable (BH)max and α meanwhile the β(20–100 °C) is improved by more than two orders of magnitude. The comparative study of reversible magnetization/irreversible magnetizations indicates that the flux losses of this magnet are barely affected by temperature, which is an remarkable improvement in developing temperature-stable magnet.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The interlayer exchange coupling properties of perpendicular synthetic antiferromagnetic (p-SAF) structure were investigated in this work by varying the Ru spacer thickness (tRu). We observed an oscillatory decay of interlayer exchange coupling field (Hex) and coupling strength (Jex) with a period of about 0.6 nm. The greatest values of Hex and Jex are 13.2 kOe and 1.77 erg/cm2 at the 1st peak, respectively. The Hex decreases significantly to about 6.2 kOe with the increase of tRu from 0.44 nm at the 1st peak to 1.03 nm at the 2nd peak. The effect of post-annealing temperature on the Hex was also investigated. The Hex decreases with the increase of annealing temperature. Furthermore, after annealing at 380 °C, the Jex value remains as high as 0.94 erg/cm2 at the 1st peak. Our results represent a candidate for spin-transfer torque magnetic random-access memory (STT-MRAM).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A method for realizing voltage-controlled conductance switching using single layer graphene is proposed and numerically studied and presented. The ultrahigh conductance On/Off ratio (GOn/GOff) is achieved through the “closing/opening” of an energy bandgap in single layer graphene. The GOn/GOff reaches as high as ∼152 when the bandgap is of only ∼12 meV (B = 3) for the simulated device configuration. Furthermore, the GOn/GOff ratio increases parabolically with the increasing of the product of U and d (i.e. U∗d) and increases exponentially with the increasing of the product of B and b (i.e. B∗b). In addition, the GOn/GOff ratio increases with the increasing of the unit cell number N of the device. These features of merit provide ways for the optimization of the performance and properties of the switch.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Recently antiferromagnetic materials become very attractive due to their new applications in spintronic devices. High-quality single crystal epitaxial ZnxCo1−xO (1 1 1) thin films were grown by co-evaporating Zn and Co and simultaneously oxidizing in oxygen plasma. It is found that the exchange bias fields of Co/as-prepared ZnxCo1−xO bilayers decrease with increasing Zn composition. When as-prepared ZnxCo1−xO layer was annealed in oxygen plasma to remove oxygen vacancies, the exchange bias field of Co/oxygen-plasma-annealed ZnxCo1−xO bilayers can be further enhanced. Moreover, a weak ferromagnetism was observed at 300 K in the as-prepared antiferromagnetic ZnxCo1−xO film with oxygen vacancies, but it did not exist in oxygen-plasma-annealed ZnxCo1−xO film. This indicates that oxygen vacancies can simultaneously weaken the antiferromagnetism but enhance the ferromagnetism of ZnxCo1−xO layer. Therefore, we offer a method of manipulating the antiferromagnetism of ZnxCo1−xO films by changing Zn composition and oxygen vacancies, which is useful for designing antiferromagnetic spintronic devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Conventional ferrofluids are not satisfactory in special fields, especially in corrosive and extreme temperature conditions. In this study, perfluoropolyether based ferrofluid with outstanding performance was synthesized by high energy ball milling. The results of XRD, TEM and particle size analyzer show that the modified Fe3O4 is well crystallized, globular shaped and monodisperse. Magnetic particles in a narrow size distribution ranging from 8 nm to 15 nm and the average is approximately 10 nm. Characteristic peaks in FT-IR and XPS spectrum confirm that Fe3O4 MNPs are successfully decorated by perfluoropolyether carboxylic acid surfactant. Perfluoropolyether based ferrofluid exhibits superparamagnetism, and magnetization is 22.83 emu/g at 10 kOe. Surface tension of perfluoropolyether based ferrofluid is 25.18 mN/m at 25 °C; Viscosity decreases with temperature increasing, which can be fitted as Î·=ea+bT+cT2 . In heating progress from −20 °C to 25 °C, perfluoropolyether based ferrofluid is a non-Newtonian fluid, while from 25 °C to 100 °C, it is a Newtonian fluid with almost constant viscosity. Viscosity of perfluoropolyether based ferrofluid increases to 1825.7 mPa·s at −20 °C and is still flowing at −40 °C. Yield point occurs when deformation reaches to 10%, and increases along with electromagnetic field in magnetic rheological behavior.© 2018An edge termination technique, referred to as simple multistep etched junction termination extension (SME-JTE), is presented for 4H-silicon carbide gate turn-off thyristors (4H-SiC GTO). The proposed termination technique can form over ten steps in the termination region with only requiring a few of etching steps. Numerical simulations show that a high termination efficiency over 95% with broad process window for etching depth is obtained for the SME-JTE technique. In addition, a high breakdown voltage of 7500 V has been experimentally demonstrated for the 4H-SiC GTO with 8-step JTE, and which is about 91% of the ideal breakdown voltage for the 50 μm drift layer. The high termination efficiency and simple process of SME-JTE makes it applicable for fabrication of various high-voltage power devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Bulk and nanocrystalline Nd-lacunar Nd0.67Sr0.33MnO3 manganites were synthesized, and the structural, magnetic and electrical properties have been systematically studied. The Rietveld refinement confirms perovskite structure with orthorhombic crystal symmetry (Pbnm space group). The bulk compound shows a sharp second order transition at 275 K while the nanocrystalline compound exhibit a broadened transition with a TC of 242 K. Temperature dependence of electrical resistivity of both the compounds witness double peaks; a sharp peak near TC and a broad peak below TC which is more prominent in the nanocrystalline compound whereas former peak is more prominent in the bulk compound. The combined effect of Kondo-like spin-dependent scattering and electron-electron interactions dominates the transport properties at low temperature in the nanocrystalline compound and results in upturn enhancement in resistivity, while the high-temperature insulating behavior of both compounds can be explained by the adiabatic small polaron hopping mechanism. The effective Mn ion valence of bulk and nanocrystalline compounds are found to be 3.56 and 3.25 and the observed crystal field splitting energy is slightly higher for the nanocrystalline compound. X-ray absorption spectra result quantitatively demonstrates that the broken symmetry at the surface of nanocrystalline compound aid to stabilize more Mn3+ ions that lead to interesting magnetic and electrical transport behavior.© 2018 Elsevier LtdA strategy of reducing the power consumption to cure gate dielectric damage by electrothermal annealing (ETA) is proposed. A tri-gate FinFET was fabricated to demonstrate the damage curing by the ETA. Localized Joule heat induced by high current flowing through dual gate electrodes successfully annealed the damaged gate dielectric. Furthermore, a design methodology to save power consumption during the ETA was explored. Electrical measurements and simulations were performed considering scaling-down and material engineering points of view. This work contributes to improving the reliability of the FinFET by developing the ETA approach with reduced power consumption.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We study pressure control of transport properties in graphene-based FM/B/FM junction where FMs are ferromagnetic graphene regions and B is graphene/MoS2 heterostructure barrier. In graphene/MoS2 heterostructure region, the Fermi energy has been found to be linearly pressure-dependent. Therefore, it is possible to control the currents by pressure in the presented structure. In non-magnetic junction, it was found that, the charge current depends almost linearly on pressure near the Dirac point. We find that the Dirac point can be shifted by varying back gate potential. The correlation between current and pressure in the junction may lead to applications for pressure sensors and pressure transistors. In magnetic junction, we predicted that the switching of spin polarization may occur at a specific pressure and spin current may be linearly controlled by pressure near the Dirac point. The results reveal the potentials of graphene/MoS2 heterostructure for applications in pressure-controlled charge current and spin current devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The influence of surface magnetic anisotropy on ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) in submicron wires is investigated both theoretically and experimentally. An analytical formula for resonance fields of radial spin waves in a long axially magnetized circular cylinder is obtained. Three types of surface anisotropy with the easy direction along one of the cylindrical coordinates are considered. For sufficiently strong surface anisotropy with hard direction parallel to the cylinder axis the surface spin wave mode is observed. The theoretical results are verified by FMR measurements at six microwave frequencies from 9 to 69 GHz on glass-covered amorphous FeCrSiB wires with diameters from 541 to 1032 nm. From the bulk spin wave resonances the exchange stiffness constant about 6.5 10−7 erg/cm is obtained. The frequency dependence of the surface mode resonance field indicates that a perpendicular surface anisotropy with anisotropy constant Ks = 6.2 erg/cm2 is present at the metal/glass interface.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We study magnetic short-range order in Fe and Ni above the Curie temperature using the nonlocal dynamic spin-fluctuation theory with self-consistent calculation of the self-energy. We calculate the spatial correlation function of Fe and Ni at nearest neighbours, next-nearest neighbours, etc., in a wide range of temperatures. Our results are in agreement with neutron scattering experiments but give a larger short-range order compared to classical spin models. We show that the spatial spin correlator decreases ten times at distances of about 6 Å in Fe and 8 Å in Ni at T/TC=1.1 and short-range order remains well above the Curie point.© 2018Base on the Monte Carlo simulation and fast Fourier transformation micromagnetism (FFTM) method, the magnetic dynamic properties of defective Cobalt (Co) nanorings are studied. The simulated results indicate that the hysteresis loops of Co nanorings with small defect are similar to those of the symmetric nanorings. However, when the area of defect increases, the magnetization process of the defective Co nanorings is different from that of symmetric Co nanorings. It is found that the remanence (Mr) of the system increases at first and then decreases with the increase of defect location. Nevertheless, there is a relative stable region in which Mr almost do not change with the defect location varying when the defect is small. The simulated results are well analyzed through the evolution of spin-configurations (SCs) of the defective Co nanorings. The investigation about magnetic dynamic properties of the defective Co nanorings may provide reference for their application in high-density data storage.© 2018The effect of partial (1–3%) rare-earth Gadolinium doping in D022 Mn3Ga hard magnet has been investigated in this work. The Mn3Ga undergoes magnetic transition at Tc ∼ 745 K, which decreases down to Tc∼715 K upon 1% Gd-doping with introduction of mixed Mn valence states, as revealed from XPS study. The hard magnetic behavior of Mn3Ga has been observed in a wide temperature range (up to Tc). More importantly, the partial Gd-doping significantly enhances the room temperature hard magnetic properties i.e. squareness ratio (mr/ms), coercivity (Hc) and energy product (BHmax) from 0.43, 2.73 kOe and 0.39 MGOe (Mn3Ga) to 0.57, 4.25 kOe and 0.5 MGOe (Mn2.97Gd0.03Ga), respectively. The modified Stoner-Wohlfarth model and low-field minor loop analysis reveal the nucleation hardening mechanism for the magnetization reversal. The study proposes the partial rare-earth doping as a new approach to enhance the hard magnetic properties of rare-earth free hard magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.La-Na co-substituted M-type Co-Ti-Mn barium hexaferrites Ba(1−2x)LaxNaxFe10Co0.5TiMn0.5O19 (0.00 ≤ x ≤ 0.25) were synthesized by conventional solid-state method. The influence of La-Na doping on the magnetic properties was investigated through VSM (vibrating sample magnetometer). The room temperature hysteresis loops show that the saturation magnetization decreases from 55.667 emu/g for x = 0.00 to 44.768 emu/g for x = 0.25 sample. To determine the complex permittivity (εr = ε′ – iε″) and permeability (µr = µ′ – iµ″) in 18.0–26.5 GHz frequency range, a vector network analyzer was employed. Reflection loss (RL) values were simulated from the values of εr and µr acquired using transmission line theory. The minimum RL obtained for the sample x = 0.10 is −45.94 dB (99.997% signal absorption) with an absorption bandwidth of 8.33 GHz for 1.3 mm sample thickness. Thus, the synthesized hexaferrites can be utilised in electromagnetic shielding and radar stealth technology applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline PrCo3-xFex(x⩽1) powder samples were synthesized by high energy milling and subsequent annealing at 1023 K for 30 min. The samples crystallize in the PuNi3-type structure (space group R3¯m) for x<1, confirmed by means of X-ray diffraction. In order to explain the original magnetic properties of these compounds and for the determination of the exchange interaction in theoretical models, the Fe and Co sites and occupancies in the crystallographic structures are required. However, standard XRD can not be used to determine Fe substitution sites, because Co and Fe have too close X-ray atomic scattering factors. Results from neutron diffraction and electronic band structure calculations from our previous works were incomplete or limited. Consequently, we give in this study the characterization of the local structure by X-ray absorption spectroscopy (EXAFS) at the iron K edge. By this method, and if we assume a unique preferential site, it was determined that Fe atoms preferably occupy the 18h site. In order to obtain this result, a coordination sphere around Fe sites of R=5.2 Åhad to be considered in order to find sufficient local differences between the possible sites (18h, 6c and 3b). Furthermore, we provide complementary magnetic properties measurements for PrCo3-xFex (x⩽0.75) such as the coercive field HC, which decreases with iron content from 12 kOe for PrCo3 to 1.5 kOe for PrCo2.25Fe0.75. The magnetization at saturation MS increases from 69 A m2/kg to 89 A m2/kg and the calculated anisotropy field Ha decreases from 15.6 kOe to 11.2 kOe for the same compositions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, superparamagnetic cobalt ferrite nanoparticles (SCFNs) were synthesized by co-precipitation in one-step. The synthesis parameters; reaction time and stirring rate, were varied separately while the other parameters were fixed constant to investigate the effect of the parameters on the properties of SCFNs. X-ray diffraction analysis and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy confirmed that synthesized samples are cobalt ferrite. The magnetization consistently increased with the particle size as the reaction time increased and the stirring rate decreased. While the reaction time was effective on the size of the cobalt ferrite nanoparticles, the stirring rate was also found to have influence on the particle size and thus the magnetization of the nanoparticles. The critical size of cobalt ferrite nanoparticles for superparamagnetic limit with zero coercivity and remanence was found to be around 7 nm and its maximum magnetization value was 41.0 emu/g. When the size of the SCFNs went over 7 nm, the magnetization increased with a small coercivity of 2–5 Oe, which may offer a potential usage in magnetic hyperthermia applications. It was seen that structural properties, especially the particle sizes and corresponding magnetic properties of SCFNs were considerably affected by the parameters of stirring rate and especially reaction time. Therefore, it is seen that SCFNs with desirable properties can be tailored by changing the synthesis parameters and therefore may have the potential to use in biomedical applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we prepared a nano-vehicle for dual targeted (magnetic and ligand) and dual mode (photothermal/photodynamic) cancer therapy. For this purpose, magnetic photosensitive liposomes (MPLs) from 1,2-distearoyl-sn-glycero-3-phosphocholine, dimethyldioctadecyl ammonium bromide (DDAB) and cholesterol were prepared using solvent evaporation/hydration technique to encapsulate the photosensitizer indocyanine green (ICG) and citric acid-coated MNPs (CMNPs). Hyaluronic acid-polyethylene glycol (HA-PEG) was coated to the MPLs by self-assembly of HA-PEG on liposome surface through ionic interactions between negatively charged HA and positively charged lipid DDAB to fabricate HA-PEG-MPLs with ∼220 nm particle size. The HA-PEG-MPLs aqueous solution showed highly efficient photothermal effects as the solution temperature reaches 45 °C in 3 min after exposure to near infrared (NIR) 808 nm laser at 2 W/cm2. The in vitro cell culture experiments after treating human glioblastoma cells (U-87MG) with HA-PEG-MPLs confirmed enhanced cytotoxicity after 4 min exposure to NIR laser. A xenograft tumor model from subcutaneously implanted U87MG cells in nude mice demonstrated accumulation of HA-PEG-MPLs at tumor sites. By combination with successive NIR laser treatment, tumor growth could be prevented and the tumor volume at the end of treatment was 12.7% that of the control. Excellent and consistent anti-tumor efficacy with laser + HA-PEG-MPLs treatment was also demonstrated from the survival rates of animals, in vivo bioluminescence imaging and histology of tumor sections.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.X-band ESR technique has been successfully applied to study S = 1/2 spin chain compound vanadyl diacetate VO(CH3COO)2. Parameter of the intrachain interactions for uniform Heisenberg antiferromagnetic chain amounts to J/kB = −167 К, while the ratio between the interchain (J′ < 0.02 К) and intrachain interactions in this compound reaches a remarkably low value k = J′/J ∼ 10−4. Our findings are in consistence with spin-singlet quantum ground state.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We show results of nanorheological studies of different concentrations of xanthan (non-Newtonian fluid) in water using magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) together with the AC susceptibility (ACS) vs frequency method. For comparison we also show the ACS response for different concentrations of glycerol in water (Newtonian fluid). The ACS response is measured, and the data is modelled using dynamic magnetic models and different viscoelastic models. We study the ACS response (in-phase and out-of-phase ACS components) at different concentrations of xanthan in water (up to 1 wt% xanthan) and with a constant concentration of MNPs. We use MNP systems that show Brownian relaxation (sensitive to changes in the environmental properties around the MNPs). ACS measurements are performed using the DynoMag system. The Brownian relaxation of the MNP system peak is shifting down in frequency and the ACS response is broadening and decreases due to changes in the viscoelastic properties around the MNPs in the xanthan solution. The viscosity and the storage moduli are determined at each excitation frequency and compared with traditional macroscopic small amplitude oscillatory shear rheological measurements. The results from the traditional rheological and nanorheological measurements correlate well at higher xanthan concentration.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, Taguchi method, response surface methodology and regression analyses have been applied to assess the effects of synthesis parameters on saturation magnetisation, Ms of iron nanoparticles produced by hydrogen reduction of iron oxide nanoparticles. The Ms values were obtained from the magnetisation loops measured by a vibrating sample magnetometer. Structural characterisations of the selected samples were done by X-ray diffraction technique and transmission electron microscopy. Orthogonal array L9 with three parameters (temperature, reaction time and H2 flow rate) at three levels (low, medium and high) was used to obtain the experimental trials. Based on the signal to noise (S/N) ratio considering the condition larger is the better approach and the mean response, the highest Ms condition has been found when the temperature is 800 °C m/min, reaction time is 60 min and H2 flow rate is 1000 ml/min. Analysis of Variance (ANOVA) is applied to find out the F-ratio and percentage contribution of each parameter by using experimental trials and S/N ratios. It was found that the temperature was the most significant parameter on the Ms of iron nanoparticles. A confirmation experiment has been carried out by using the experimental conditions obtained from Taguchi method. The Ms of the optimum sample was found to be 217.42 emu/g which was within 95% confidence level with the predicted optimal Ms of 214.03 emu/g. The quality losses for Ms obtained at the highest combinations were 70.7%. In addition, analyses of multiple linear and quadratic regressions were employed to derive the predictive equations of the Ms achieved via experimental design. The predicted values from the developed models and experimental values are found to be very close to each other justifying the significance of the models. Besides, the quadratic interactive regression model provided the best statistical performance with high R2 and R2(adj) values of 100 and 100%, respectively between the experimental and predicted values of Ms. More intensive predicted values were obtained by the quadratic regression models as compared to the multiple linear regression models. Taguchi prediction method was also very successful in the optimization of synthesis parameters for the highest Ms of nanoparticles within the prescribed limit.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Er/Sm-substituted nickel ferrite and Sm-substituted cobalt ferrite nanomaterials were synthesized via citrate-gel autocombustion technique. The diffraction pattern revealed the formation of cubic spinel structure. In addition, the structural parameters such as lattice constant (a), average crystallite size (D) and X-ray density (ρx) were also evaluated. The surface morphology was analyzed using field emission scanning electron microscope (FESEM) and transmission electron microscopes (TEM). Besides, the low temperature magnetic properties were studied using magnetization versus temperature (M−T) & magnetic field (M−H) curves. The obtained results attributed that the NiSm0.1Fe1.9O4 (NSF) and NiEr0.1Fe1.9O4 (NEF) samples exhibited the superparamagnetic property pertaining almost zero value of coercivity (Hc) and remanence (Mr) at 5 K & 300 K. Moreover, the superparamagnetic property was evidenced by zero-field cooled (ZFC) and field cooled (FC) curves. Interestingly, the CoSm0.1Fe1.9O4 (CSF) sample performed the soft magnetic behavior with increase of temperature from 5 to 300 K by possessing certain numerical values of Hc and Mr.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The τ-MnAlC/FeCo system has potential to be applied as rare earth-free permanent magnet, due to exchange coupled between hard and soft magnetic phases as alternative for the development of high energy product permanent magnets. In this work the hard-magnetic phase Mn53.3Al45C1.7 (μ0Hc = 0.37 T of coercive force, Mr = 23.52 Am2/kg of remanent magnetization, Ms = 52.94 Am2/kg of saturation magnetization and (BH)max = 3.89 kJ/m3 of maximum energy product) was mixed with the soft magnetic phase Fe65Co35 (μ0Hc = 0.007 T and Ms = 221.33 Am2/kg) using a solid-state procedure. The magnetic materials were sintered using different ratios of hard and soft magnetic phases: 95:5, 90:10, 85:15 and 80:20; and different sintering temperatures (300, 400, 500 and 600 °C) in order to improve the magnetic properties. The magnetic exchange coupling between MnAlC and FeCo was proved by the hysteresis loop and its corresponding Thamm-Hesse analysis. The best result was obtained for MnAlC/FeCo (95/5 wt%) sintered at 500 °C during 30 min, for which the magnetic properties were μ0Hc = 0.277 T, Ms = 76.43 Am2/kg and (BH)max = 5.57 kJ/m3.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, we precisely calculated the specific loss powers (SLPs) of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) based on dynamic hysteresis measurements. The advantage of this evaluation method is that the intensity and frequency of the applied magnetic field can be varied over a wide range for samples of various condition. The results show that the coercive field and SLP of Resovist® increase by orienting the magnetic easy axes of the nanoparticles. The magnetic field was applied either parallel or perpendicular to the nanoparticle orientation. The area enclosed by the dynamic hysteresis curve was larger when the AC field was applied parallel to the nanoparticle orientation, indicating a greater increase in the hyperthermia temperature. This characteristic originated from the magnetic anisotropy energy of the nanoparticles and is in good agreement with our simulational results. The SLP of a solid sample with an aligned easy axis measured under an AC field of 4 kA/m, which was applied parallel to the axis, was more than two times that of a liquid sample. We also evaluated the SLPs of superparamagnetic 4-nm-diameter γ-Fe2O3 and ferromagnetic 20–30-nm-diameter Fe3O4 MNPs and compared them to that of Resovist®.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ti3SiC2 particles encapsulated by Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 shell were in-situ synthesized via a facile sol-gel method. Effects of Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 shell on electromagnetic properties of Ti3SiC2 were investigated in 2–18 GHz. Moderated complex permittivity and desirable higher complex permeability presented for the Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4/Ti3SiC2 composite, resulting in strong microwave attenuation ability and good impedance matching property. The measured effective absorbing bandwidth (RL < −10 dB) of 5.3 GHz and corresponding maximum RL of −38.6 dB were obtained for the Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4/Ti3SiC2 absorbing coating of 1.2 mm thickness. These results indicate that the Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4/Ti3SiC2 composite may become a new type of microwave absorbent.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We propose an experimental method for the identification of the crystal grain orientation in polycrystalline ferromagnetic materials with Goss texture. The grain orientation respect to the lamination plane is evaluated by a suitable contact-less vector measurement of the magnetic field under rotational polarization. First of all, the fundamental in-plane easy axis is detected. After that, the measured data are numerically processed, taking into account a cubic anisotropy grain model, suitably developed, in order to estimate the orientation of the other two crystal axes respect to the lamination plane. The comparison of the obtained results with Electron Back-Scattering Diffractometry (EBSD) measurements confirms the validity of the proposed approach. Multi-grain and single-crystal test specimens are analyzed in order to investigate the possibility to apply this method as on-line detection system.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The expensive rare earth elements Nd, Pr, Dy and Tb have been extensively used for making NdFeB-based magnets, but the less expensive and high abundant rare earth (HARE) elements such as La and Ce have been over stocked. The marketing expansion of the HARE elements is of much interest in academia and industry to achieve effective and efficient utilization of HARE elements. In this paper, nanocrystalline (Nd1− xLax)13Fe81B6 (x = 0–0.5) alloys were fabricated by melt-spinning method. It is found out that the room temperature magnetic properties of the alloys decrease sharply when La is substituted for Nd up to 20 at.%. However, an anomalous increase in Jr value and improved thermal stability of the alloy ribbons are observed for 40 at.% La substituted alloy while the reduction in magnetic properties is only nominal up to 30 at.%. Furthermore, the Curie temperature decreases from 588 K to 561 K with 50 at.% La substitution, which is higher than the equal amount of Ce substitution in Nd-Fe-B. It is shown by the Henkel curves that the alloy with 40 at.% La has the biggest value of positive peak which demonstrates the strongest exchange coupling in the 40 at.% La substituted alloy. The TEM micrographs indicate that the alloy containing 40 at.% La has more uniform and refined microstructure resulted in the enhanced properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Among nanoparticles, magnetic nanoparticles are the most appealing candidate for diagnosis and cancer therapy. The researchers are tempting to improve the particles properties, including the size, shape, coating, and magnetic behavior or heating characteristics. Core shell type of magnetic nanoparticle is an important property that modulates their internalization via normal and cancer cells. In this study, magnetite nanoparticles (MNP) covered by N-(2-aminoethyl)-3-aminopropyltriethoxysilane (aminosilane – APTES) were synthesized by co-precipitation of aqueous solution of ferric chloride and ferrous sulfate iron salts with ammonium hydroxide as a base and functionalized by APTES to increase the viability and affinity of the particles to the cancer cells. The structural and morphological properties of these particles were characterized by transmission electron microscopy (TEM), X-ray diffraction (XRD) and Fourier transformed infrared spectroscopy (FTIR). 3-(4,5-dimethyl-2-thiazolyl)-2,5-diphenyl tetrazolium bromide (MTT assay) was carried out, to check the viability of the cells treatment with MNP and APTES-MNP. To study the cellular uptake in vitro, two prostate cell lines were investigated: PC3 as a cancerous cell line and BPH1 as a benign epithelial cell line (normal cells). Both cell lines were incubated for 24 h with different concentrations of MNP and APTES-MNP (100 and 500 μg/ml and one untreated sample as control). TEM and flow cytometry (FC) analyses were subsequently carried out to monitor the cellular uptake of MNP and APTES-MNP. FC data revealed an increase in cell granularity following the treatment with high concentration of the particles. Data showed that PC3 cancer cells take up more APTES-MNP with respect to control cells than BPH1 benign cells and in contrast BPH1 cell uptake MNP correlated to control cells more efficient than PC3 cells. The results from FC and TEM analyses demonstrate increasing of affinity of particles to cancer cell line (PC3). In this project we investigated the effect of surface functionalization of NP to affinity of the MNP and APTES-MNP on PC3 cells as a malignancy prostate cell and BPH1 benign cells as a normal cells. This approach may help to optimize the efficiency of hyperthermia for prostate cancer through internalization of particles to the cells or attaching to the membrane.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Bioethanol is a promising liquid biofuel, which can be produced from the wide range of biomass feedstock by the fermentation process with the Saccharomyces cerevisiae yeast. The application of the rotating magnetic field (RMF) is one of the possibilities to increase the efficiency of the process. Therefore, the magnetically-assisted bioreactor equipped with RMF generator was used to perform the ethanol fermentation process with the sugar-rich medium. Moreover, the yeast cells were modified by addition of Fe3O4 nanoparticles. The obtained data suggested that the stimulation of applied cells with RMF did increase the proliferation and the ethanol production process. Furthermore, the calculated maximum specific growth rate and the productivity coefficient showed RMF positive effect on this magnetically-assisted bioprocess. The stimulation was found as ruled by field frequency (connected with magnetic induction of RMF) and it was revealed that the process productivity was higher for experiments with modified cells and the growth rate was higher for the process without the addition of Fe3O4 nanoparticles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Presence of protein amyloid aggregates is associated with many neurodegenerative disorders, such as Alzheimer's disease etc. The effect of magnetoferritin and reconstructed ferritin on the structure of lysozyme amyloid aggregates was studied using small-angle X-ray scattering, atomic force microscopy and thioflavin T fluorescence measurements. It has been shown that both magnetoferritin and reconstructed ferritin molecules affect the size, structure and amount of the amyloid fibrils. We assume that the anti-amyloid effect of magnetoferritin and reconstructed ferritin is due to the presence of iron in solutions but is not associated with the magnetic character of the iron oxide phases, i.e. magnetite/maghemite for magnetoferritin and ferrihydrite for ferritin.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Structural and magnetic measurements were performed on SiO2 films containing near-surface Ni1− xFex superparamagnetic nanoparticles made by low energy ion implantation into SiO2 with the same Ni fluences of 2 × 1016 at./cm2 and two different Fe fluences so that x = 0.47 and x = 0.20. The x = 0.47 films had larger nanoparticles, a higher fraction of ordered moments in the nanoparticle cores, and thinner spin-disordered shells. The nanoparticle core spin-stiffnesses were slightly higher for x = 0.20 and smaller than that expected for bulk Ni1− xFex for both Fe concentrations. There was no evidence for magnetic dipole interactions between the nanoparticles that have been reported in compressed superparamagnetic ferromagnetic nanoparticles. dM/dH was estimated and found to be highest for x = 0.47 where it reached 15 at 300 K and 56 at 100 K. The measured dM/dH is consistent with that expected from a derivative of the Langevin function with negligible demagnetization where larger nanoparticles are expected to have a higher dM/dH.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper Co1-xNixFe2O4 in which x ranging from 0.0 to 1.0 with 0.2 intervals was prepared with different particle size using a co-precipitation method. A single phase cubic spinel structure with an average crystallite size between 24 and 34 nm was obtained. X-ray diffraction, fourier transform infrared spectroscopy, field emission scanning electron microscopy and vibration sample magnetometer were used to characterize the samples. The energy dispersive X-ray analysis was in good agreement with the nominal composition. It was found that the functional groups of Co-Ni spinel ferrite were formed during the combustion process. It was found that by substitution of nickel cation in cobalt ferrite, the saturation magnetization and the coercivity decreased from 52.70 emu/g and 1673 Oe to 22.11 emu/g and 134 Oe, respectively. First order reversal curves were employed to map the magneto-static interactions and coercivity distributions as a function of nickel concentration. Adding nickel shifts the switching field distribution to the lower field thereby softening the samples. The ratio of reversibility increases with an increase in nickel content due to increase in the percentage of superparamagnetism.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Low-frequency/resonance magnetoelectric interactions and power conversion efficiency of magnetoelectric gyrators consisting of compositionally-graded nickel zinc ferrites and lead zirconate titanate with a coil wound around it were proposed and systematically characterized. Grading-induced differences of magnetic moment and remnant magnetization in ferrites with composition of Ni1− xZnxFe2O4 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.3) can create the desired built-in field to decrease the required bias. The samples were characterized in terms of magnetostriction, low-frequency/resonance and power conversion efficiency with varieties of Zn concentrations, reversal sequence and volume ratio. A maximum PE of 62.9% was achieved in the composite of PZT-NiFe2O4-Ni0.9Zn0.1Fe2O4 at H = 10 Oe with volume ratio n = 0.5 under load RL = 700 Ω. With contribution of the desired built-in field, maximum PE of 60% under zero bias was also achieved in similar conditions. These favorable features open up the possibilities of ME gyrators with grading for promising applications in power electronics, converters and wireless energy harvesters without a sacrifice in device volume and modest rise in magnetomechanical efficiency.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Hydrogen treatment technology is developed to recycle the waste Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets in the way of short route, low cost, and high efficiency. In present study, effect of hydrogen pressure on hydrogen decrepitation (HD) process of sintered Nd-Fe-B strip casting flakes (SC) and waste sintered magnets (SM) was systematically studied. Both SC and SM show the approximate HD process, which accelerates with increasing pressure. The surface activation process accelerates with increasing pressure, and almost disappears when the initial hydrogen pressure reaches to 6 MPa. The hydrogen content of SM is lower than SC, and increases with increasing pressure. For the SM, blasting power of HD process decreases with the increase of the initial hydrogen pressure. It provides beneficial reference for recycling waste Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.CoNi binary alloy nanoparticles were prepared by using a polyol method. The effect of the Cu additive (acting as the third element) on structural and magnetic properties of the CoNi50−xCux (10 ≤ x ≤ 40) alloy was then studied by X-ray diffraction (XRD), field emission scanning electron microscopy (FESEM), magnetometry and first-order reversal curve (FORC) analyses. It was found that a combination of Co-Ni alloy and Cu phases is formed when increasing the Cu content by x = 10 and 20. However, for x = 30 and 40, the resulting compound is obtained in the form of a single-phase ternary alloy. Increasing the Cu content increases the separation between soft and hard phases in the FORC diagram, leading to two distinct magnetic phases in CoNi10Cu40. The FORC data showed that the magnetic interaction between particles was reduced when increasing the Cu content. The reversible and irreversible components of the compounds were also estimated. The FESEM images showed the formation of ordered spherical CoNi alloy grains with a diameter of about 400 nm, comprising tight nanoparticles with sizes below 100 nm. Moreover, in the presence of the element Cu, a variation in the nanoparticle size and morphology was seen clearly.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We focus on an in-depth study of the forced dynamics of a ferromagnetic single-domain uniaxial nanoparticle placed in a viscous fluid and driven by an external rotating magnetic field. The process of conversion of magnetic and mechanical energies into heat is a physical basis for magnetic fluid hyperthermia that is very promising for cancer treatment. The dynamical approximation allows us to establish the limits of the heating rate and understand the logic of selection of the system parameters to optimize the therapy. Based on the developed analytical and numerical tools, we analyze from a single viewpoint the synchronous and asynchronous rotation of the nanoparticle or/and its magnetization in the following three cases. For the beginning, we actualize the features of the internal magnetic dynamics, when the nanoparticle body is supposed to be fixed. Then, we study the rotation of the whole nanoparticle, when its magnetization is supposed to be locked to the crystal lattice. And, finally, we realize the analysis of the coupled motion, when the internal magnetic dynamics is performed in the rotated nanoparticle body. In all these cases, we describe analytically the uniform mode, or synchronous rotation along with an external field, while the nonuniform mode, or asynchronous rotation, is investigated numerically.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on the tunable band engineering in α-(Fe2O3)1−X(Cr2O3)X nanoparticles. Nanoparticles were prepared by the sol-gel method and stabilised in the hexagonal crystal structure with R-3C space group. At room temperature band-gap studies have shown the narrowing of the band gap from 2.1 eV to 1.6 eV with Cr addition. Compared to antiferromagnetic α-Fe2O3 nanoparticles, doping of Cr2O3 increases the magnetic hysteresis significantly. Impedance spectroscopic studies have revealed Maxwell-Wagner dielectric relaxation near room temperature. Our results improve the understanding of the structural, optical, dielectric and magnetic properties of Cr-doped α-Fe2O3 nanoparticles and illustrates that these nanoparticles have potential candidate in spintronic, optoelectronic, solar cell and photocatalysis applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Strain-induced martensite (SIM) formation was evaluated upon cold-rolling of a 17.6 wt.%Mn-TRIP steel by means of magnetic measurements, X-ray diffraction, and high-resolution electron backscatter diffraction (EBSD). α′-martensite formation was observed to be dependent on the presence of prior ε-martensite. Upon deformation, the coercivity of the ferromagnetic α′-martensite is characterized by strong magnetic shape anisotropy. Austenite (γ) reversion was evaluated by means of in situ magnetic measurements during continuous annealing. The experimental results were compared to thermodynamic simulations. It turned out that γ-reversion was not completed in the regime where a γ-single phase field is expected, which suggests the splitting of α′ → γ transformation into two stages. The Curie temperature of remaining α′-martensite was determined as being ∼620 °C. Magnetic properties presented an annealing time-dependence within the temperature range of 500–600 °C, suggesting long-range diffusional α′ → γ transformation. With the aid of electron channeling contrast image technique (ECCI), we noticed that the formation of γ-nanograins in the early stages of reversion is sufficient to induce strong magnetic shape anisotropy in this steel. After full austenitization at 800 °C, further in situ magnetic measurements were also used to track the magnetic response of the material upon controlled cooling. Athermal formation of α′-martensite within the prior athermal ε-phase was clearly observed for temperatures lower than 100 °C. Using thermodynamic modeling we also calculated the start temperature for ε-formation (Ms ε). Results showed that ε-martensite is indeed expected to form before α′ which was confirmed in all cases by means of EBSD.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the electric and magnetic properties of nanocrystalline Tb3+ substituted Ni0.25Cu0.30Zn0.45TbxFe2−xO4, with x = 0.0–0.125 mol., step: 0.025 mol ferrites, synthesized by glycine assisted autocombustion route. The structural studies confirm the formation of spinel cubic structure for NiCuZn ferrites with the formation of agglomerated polydisperse grains. The presence of two intrinsic IR absorption bands of spinel lattice at ν1 (760–768) cm−1 and ν2 (650–665) cm−1 for NiCuZn ferrite system confirms the existence of tetrahedral-A and octahedral-B sites over which the cations are distributed in spinel lattice. Complex permeability measurements signified the decrease in the initial permeability due to spin canting and spin frustration by paramagnetic Tb3+ ions. The frequency dependent dielectric constant of NiCuZn ferrites revealed dielectric dispersion behavior in accordance with Maxwell–Wagner model. The incorporation of rare earth element (Tb3+) in NiCuZn ferrite at relatively lower sintering temperature (1173 K), significantly alters the structural and electromagnetic properties of the host material. Therefore, the present Tb3+ substituted NiCuZn ferrite system with moderate electrical resistivity and soft magnetic properties are potential candidate for multilayer chip inductor (MLCI) component applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates the effect of the cobalt addition on the magneto-crystalline anisotropy parameter of some polycrystalline ferrites. Magnetization curves have been experimentally determined at different temperatures on Ni1−xZnxFe2O4 sintered samples with or without cobalt addition. In each case, a law of approach to saturation has been fitted to the measured data in order to extract the anisotropy parameter K1 representative for the polycrystalline material. Besides, measurement of the complex susceptibility and power core-loss up to 5 MHz has been performed. This approach allows a discussion on the role of cobalt addition on the power core-loss mitigation. It has been found that the substitution with 0.02 mol. of Co leads to a small decrease in the K1 values. This evolution is consistent with the rise in the rotational permeability. However, the change in K1 cannot account for the core-loss reduction with Co. Rather, it is confirmed that Co hinders the domain wall displacement and subsequent dissipation up to an induction level that depends on the grain size.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Structural characteristics and magnetic properties of MgxZn1– xFe2O4 (x = 0.25; 0.5; 0.7) nanomaterials prepared by autocombustion, co-precipitation and spray pyrolysis methods were studied. Different characterization techniques are used to study the structural formation of the generated nanoparticles, namely X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning (SEM) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM), infrared spectroscopy (FT-IR) and vibrating sample magnetometery (VSM). In case of citrate autocombustion and co-precipitation methods, the magnetization goes through a maximum at Mg0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 composition, while the dependence on the composition is subtle for spray pyrolysis. An increase in temperature and duration of heat treatment during the synthesis process leads to a particle size growth and to a cation redistribution between spinel sub-lattices. These resulted in a significant increase in the specific magnetization of the particles generated by citrate autocombustion method. The nanoparticles synthesized by co-precipitation method exhibit superparamagnetic behavior with no coercivity at room temperature. Nonetheless, the materials prepared by spray pyrolysis and citrate autocombustion methods are found to possess small coercivity of 30–80 Oe. The highest specific magnetization at room temperature is referring to Mg0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4 nanoparticles obtained by citrate autocombustion method (30 emu/g). The revealed correlations can be used to synthesize spinel ferrite nanoparticles with well-defined collective properties for a wide spectrum of applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.More than 50 diseases are associated with a conversion of proteins or peptides from their soluble functional states to highly organized fibrillar aggregates called amyloid fibrils. Due to the specific physico-chemical properties, specifically designed iron oxide nanoparticles may be an effective strategy for inhibiting the amyloid fibrillization of proteins. The inhibitory effect of three types of iron oxide nanoparticles coated with differently modified dextran on lysozyme fibrils formation was studied by Thioflavin T assay and atomic force microscopy. The size and zeta potential of studied nanoparticles were determined by dynamic light scattering. It had been found that nanoparticles are able to inhibit formation of lysozyme amyloid aggregates in concentration-dependent manner. Our results suggest that size of nanoparticles influenced the extent of their inhibitory properties. Moreover, the most effective nanoparticles were not toxic after 48 h incubation with neuroblastoma SH-SY5Y cell line at concentration close to IC50 values.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Peripheral vascular diseases is one of the main causes of death in the world. It is disorders that cause the blood vessels to narrow, block, or spasm. Here, effects of two inclined rectangular permanent magnets field on heat transfer and flow characteristics of blood fluid in a channel, as a model of straight part of the aorta, has been investigated using FerroHydroDynamics (FHD) principles. Thermally and hydrodynamically fully developed flow is considered at the inlet of the vessel. Governing equations have been discretized using the finite volume method and the SIMPLE algorithm. Simulations have been carried out for different inclination angles of magnets and saturated magnetization. From the results, the magnetic field of two inclined magnets leads to increase heat transfer of blood fluid flow toward the walls. Moreover, major energy loss, arising from mean wall shear stress, is decreased but local or minor energy loss, arising from generated vortices, is increased. Furthermore, the formation of recirculation zones near the wall, where the magnetic drug can be trapped there for uptake to tissue, is observed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A newly developed isotropic Nd2Fe14B/α-Fe nanocomposite magnet was subjected to a series of investigations of its microstructure and magnetic properties. The performance of the optimally annealed sample was found to be Hc = 9.7 kOe and σsat. = 171 emu/g. Moreover, an attempt was made to produce anisotropic nanocomposite magnets by a high-pressure torsion (HPT) experiment performed at room temperature. The microstructural analyses by TEM in 2D and by FIB-SEM serial sectioning in 3D elucidated that the two-phases microstructure is not distorted homogeneously but shear bands (SBs) are formed. It was found that both the hard magnetic Nd2Fe14B and soft magnetic α-Fe phases are distorted significantly near those SBs even though the crystallographic orientations of the Nd2Fe14B grains are randomized therein. The relationships between this microstructure developed by HPT and the corresponding magnetic properties are discussed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic particles (MPs) have good response to external magnetic field. To investigate the motion regularity of MPs in a mcirochannel flow governed by alternating gradient magnetic field, a 3D numerical simulation method is established based on the lattice Boltzmann method (LBM) and the immersed boundary method (IBM). The motions of both a single MP and a short chain of MPs are investigated and each is found to be a superposition of transverse oscillation and longitudinal translation. By performing a simple filtering processing for the original trajectory of MP, it is revealed that the oscillation of MPs affected by alternating gradient magnetic field can be characterized as the simple harmonic vibration. The oscillation frequency of MPs is basically in accordance with the alternating frequency of the gradient magnetic field in the range from 400 to 800 Hz. The larger magnetic field gradient results in the larger amplitude of oscillation. The wavelength of the trajectory is increased due to the increasing inlet velocity of carrier fluid. For the MP chain, both the period and amplitude of oscillation will decrease with the increase of alternating frequency of magnetic field. The turbulence intensity distribution indicates that the turbulence of microchannel flow can be enhanced by the oscillation of MPs thus enhance the mass or heat transfer in the carrier fluid.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We propose the “DRF method” for estimating dosage limits for interstitially administered therapeutic or diagnostic nanomedicines or agents from three characteristic parameters that can be experimentally determined from in vivo data. These are: (i) the dispersion of the injected fluid around the injection site; (ii) the retention of the injected fluid at the injection site; and (iii) the formulation characteristics of the fluid with respect to local and systemic tolerability. We present formulae that allow dose-limit estimates to be made for any preclinical model, as well as for clinical studies. We illustrate the DRF method for the case of iron-oxide-based magnetic fluids, with reference to the published dose limits of regulatory-body-approved magnetic nanoparticles for MRI contrast enhancement, sentinel node detection, iron replacement therapy, and magnetic thermoablation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.According to the World Health Organization, cancer is the second most important cause of death in Europe. Due to its manifold manifestations, it is not possible to treat all patients according to a uniform scheme. However, all solid tumors have one thing in common: independent of the tumor's molecular subgroup and the treatment protocol, the immune status of the tumor, especially the amount of tumor infiltrating lymphocytes (TILs), is important for the patient's clinical outcome – the higher the number of TILs, the better the outcome. For this reason it seems desirable to increase the number of TILs. One way to accumulate T cells in the tumor area is to make them magnetizable and attract them with an external magnetic field. Magnetization can be achieved by superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs) which can be bound to the cells’ surface or internalized into the cells. For this study, SPIONs with different coatings were synthesized and incubated with immortalized mouse T lymphocytes. SPIONs only stabilized with lauric acid (LA) coated in situ or afterwards showed high toxicity. Addition of an albumin layer increased the biocompatibility but reduced cellular uptake. To increase the cellular uptake the albumin coated particles were aminated, leading to both higher uptake and toxicity, dependent on the degree of amination. In the presence of an externally applied magnetic field, T cells loaded with selected types and amounts of SPIONs were guidable. With this promising pilot study we already can demonstrate that it is possible to attract SPION bearing T cells by an external magnet. To sum up, biocompatibility and uptake of SPIONs by T cells are opposing events. Thus, for the functionalization of T cells with SPIONs the balance between uptake and toxicity must be evaluated carefully.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Objective: To investigate the consistency between GoldMag® immunochromatography and immune scatter turbidimetry in hs-CRP detection. Methods: The data of hs-CRP were collected from 78 hospitalized patients, and these patients were divided into fingertip blood group and the venous blood group according to the different blood collection methods. The whole blood and plasma level of hs-CRP was detected by GoldMag® immunochromatography and immune scatter turbidimetry. Correlation analysis was carried out to compare the data of hs-CRP obtained by different approaches. Results: In both fingertip blood group and venous blood group, the concentration of hs-CRP determined by GoldMag® immunochromatography were positively correlated with those found with immune scatter turbidimetry. There was no significant difference in the level of hs-CRP provided by these two different approaches. (P > 0.05). Conclusion: GoldMag® immunochromatographic assay has good uniformity with immune scatter turbidimetry Scatter Turbidimetric Method for hs-CRP detection. Based on the double antibody sandwich method, antibody labeled GoldMag nanoparticles capture hs-CRP from whole blood or plasma and aggregate in test line of test strip. The magnetic intensity of agglomerated GoldMag® nanoparticles collected is measured by magnetic quantitative immunoassay analyzer. The concentration of hs-CRP can be obtained according to the standard curve between concentration and magnetic intensity. GoldMag® immunochromatography is served as an easy operation, high accuracy and stable method.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanoscale heterostructures, like core-shell structures, show attractive microwave-absorption characteristics because of the synergetic effects of their dielectric shells and soft-magnetic cores. A new type of nanocapsules with amorphous C shell encapsulating Heusler soft-magnetic Fe3Si alloy has been designed and synthesized in which Si atoms were doped in the C shell to effectively produce a large amount of Si-C bonds to induce the formation of an amorphous C shell. This further significantly improves the dielectric properties of C shells by enhanced dielectric polarization. These tailored Fe3Si/C nanocapsules, exhibit enhanced microwave-absorption properties because of the desirable impedance match between the amorphous C shell and the soft-magnetic Fe3Si. The optimal Fe3Si/C nanocapsules exhibit a highest absorption intensity of −68.3 dB at 13 GHz and an absorption bandwidth of 4.6 GHz (for RL lower than −10 dB) for absorber thicknesses of 2.1 mm and 1.4 mm, respectively. This new type of nanocapsules is of potential interest for application as novel microwave-absorption material.© 2018 The AuthorsDistorted Heusler compound of D019 Mn3Ge polycrystalline films were studied in terms of their crystalline structures and antiferromagnetic behavior by varying annealing temperature and Mn-Ge composition. Although low temperature growth for 30 nm Mn3Ge showed no diffraction peaks in X-ray diffraction patterns, high temperature growth over 773 K with Mn-rich composition is found to promote the (0001) orientation of D019 Mn3Ge which resulted in the emergence of an exchange bias effect in Co0.6Fe0.4 ferromagnetic layer at 120 K. The exchange bias field of 12 Oe in Mn3.16Ge film grown at 773 K were improved to 61 Oe by enriching Mn composition to Mn3.97Ge. The average blocking temperature was measured to be at 150 K which is not as high as its reported Néel temperature of 390 K in the bulk state, however, further improvements are expected by doping additional transition elements.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Crystals of the KBaR(BO3)2 (R = Y, Gd, Tb, Dy, Ho, Tm, Yb and Lu) rare earth borates were grown by spontaneous nucleation from a KF-B2O3 flux. The crystals obtained were typically well-developed hexagonal plates about 1 mm in large dimension. The crystals were used to study the anisotropic temperature and field dependent magnetization of the materials, which are based on ideal triangular planes of magnetic rare earths. All structures were refined in space group R3-m by single-crystal X-ray diffraction, and in addition to the equilateral triangular rare earth plane lattice, displayed K/Ba site occupancy disorder. All magnetic compounds reveal dominantly antiferromagnetic spin interactions with no magnetic ordering above 1.8 K. With the exception of KBaGd(BO3)2, magnetic anisotropy was observed for other five magnetic members of the family. The results suggest that KBaR(BO3)2 crystals may be of further interest for investigating the magnetic properties of rare earth ions on a triangular lattice.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effects of annealing temperature (1000–1125 °C) and Fe2O3 mass fraction (0.3–0.5) in the initial mixture on the composition of ferric oxide polymorphs within the Fe2O3/SiO2 nanocomposite prepared by sol-gel method were investigated. The structural and magnetic properties of prepared samples were characterized in detail by combination of X-ray powder diffraction (XRPD), high-resolution transmission electron microscopy, magnetic measurements and a local probe technique - transmission Mössbauer spectroscopy (TMS). The optimal conditions for preparation of ε-Fe2O3 rich sample were established and ∼91% of the ε-phase was reached with the characteristic particle diameter of 25 nm. It was observed that with increasing mass fraction of Fe2O3 in the starting material, the optimal annealing temperature decreases, while the width of the particle size distribution tends to increase. The relative concentrations of the four present polymorphs derived from XRD and TMS are in very good mutual agreement.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The M-H hysteresis curves of field cooled CoFe/FeMn bilayers and CoFe/FeMn/CoFe trilayers were studied to understand the exchange bias phenomena in these systems. The measured data revealed that the values of the exchange bias corresponding to a bottom CoFe layer reduced by about 23.5% with an addition of another CoFe layer at the top of bilayer stack. It was also observed that, while this reduction in exchange bias of a bottom CoFe layer (calculated in %) depends on thicknesses of a top CoFe layer and an antiferromagnetic FeMn layer, it is independent of the thickness of bottom CoFe layer. As the strength of exchange bias depends on the presence of pinned uncompensated moments in an antiferromagnetic layer, our observations indicate that the FeMn layer consists comparatively lower amount of pinned uncompensated moments in trilayers. This reduction in pinned uncompensated moments of FeMn layer in trilayers is then co-related with the domain wall suppression in the FeMn layer in CoFe/FeMn/CoFe trilayers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.With the continuous technological advancements being made in the medical field every day, the ability to improve drug delivery uptake in cardiac research is a prominent topic of discussion. Nanoparticles provide the opportunity to improve the efficiency of drug therapy while minimizing chemotherapy side effects through controllably releasing the encapsulated drug at the target site. Mono-disperse Fe3O4 nanoparticles/polystyrene composite nanospheres with a large volume fraction of trapped magnetite and fluorophores were used in an in vivo experiment. In this study, magnetic nanoparticles were successfully delivered into the heart by utilizing magnetic targeting. Magnetic targeting allowed the mono-disperse Fe3O4 nanospheres to be dramatically localized in the heart myocardium. This increased the quantity of delivery to the cardiac myocytes in comparison to magnetic nanospheres without magnetic targeting.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the influence of a non-uniform magnetic field on biomagnetic fluid flow in a duct with a constriction is investigated numerically. The magnetic field is generated by a wire carrying electric current located outside the duct. The biomagnetic fluid dynamics model, which is based on the ferrohydrodynamics and magnetohydrodynamics, is used to study the fluid flow, and a computational grid properly covering the magnetic field is used for the simulation. In this investigation, the influence of magnetic field on biomagnetic fluid flow in various percentages of the duct constriction, and the effect of the magnetic field on the biomagnetic fluid flow in various strengths of magnetic force are studied. The magnetic field is spatially varying, and the magnetic field strength decreases by increasing the distance from the wire carrying electric current which is the magnetic source. The results show that, the influence of the magnetic field on biomagnetic fluid flow is considerable near the magnetic source. Applying the magnetic field with enough strength causes the recirculation areas downstream of constriction to become smaller. In addition, applying the magnetic field has significant effects on the wall shear stress, so that it can decrease the shear stress on the wall away from the magnetic source.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have used polar Kerr microscopy to study the magnetic domain structure in an ultrathin Au/Co(1 nm)/Au layer with perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. We present our demagnetization method of the sample. In the demagnetized state, we observed a dendritic domain structure. We theoretically calculated the lateral domain size in the demagnetized state by using two different models and we saw that the prefactor x=0.389 corresponds to the domain structure observed. We used polar magneto-optical Kerr effect magnetometry (PMOKE) to study the magnetization reversal and to extract an activation energy Ea in zero field and the width of the distribution of the energy barriers σw. We correlated the dendritic domain structure observed with the large value of σw.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nano-powders with controllable particle size, excellent magnetic properties and thermal stability of barium hexaferrite (BaFe12O19) have been synthesized via a co-precipitation/calcination technique. The phase composition, morphology and magnetic/thermal properties of the products were systematically studied. XRD patterns reveal that a long co-precipitation reaction time (5 h) and high calcination temperature (1100 °C) are beneficial for the formation of BaFe12O19 phase and decreasing the tendency to agglomeration. SEM micrographs show that the products show a hexagonal flake-like particle shape and the size are well controlled and maintained at single-domain particle size range area (<460 nm), above which the coercivity will decrease abruptly for the coupling exchange among particles. The products with jHc of 5934 Oe, temperature coefficient of remanence (αBr) of −0.176% K−1 and temperature coefficient of coercivity (βjHc) of 0.0427% K−1 were obtained when co-precipitated for 5 h and calcined at 900 °C for 2 h. A high saturation magnetization of 66.9 emu/g was obtained when co-precipitated for 5 h and calcined at 1100 °C for 2 h, approaching the theoretical saturation magnetization (72 emu/g).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The chirality-dependent propagations of transverse domain walls (DWs) in two types of Y-shaped nanostrips under small driving fields were investigated using micromagnetic simulations. They both exhibit the well DW chirality selection behaviors and the hugely reduced DW transmission fields owing to the specific magnetic charge distributions on both the junction and corners. The DW transmission field even can be as small as 2 Oe. Additionally, the DW chirality can be controlled by applying an out-of-plane field, leading to the use of the Y-shaped nanostrips as logic devices, such as selector, rectifier and amplifier.© 2018We describe the atomic structure and magnetism in Fe nanoparticles (∼2 nm) ebedded in a Cu1−xAlx alloy matrix. Nanocomposite films for these studies were prepared directly from gas phase using a flexible co-deposition technique under Ultra-High Vacuum (UHV) conditions. Fe nanoparticles and the alloy matrix were prepared using a gas aggregation source and MBE sources respectively. Extended x-ray absorption fine structure (EXAFS) experiments indicate that the embedded Fe nanoparticles retain a bcc structure for Al-contents greater than x = 0.13 but, for Al-contents lower than this value, Fe nanoparticles have both fcc and bcc structures. The magnetic moment per Fe atom initially increases with increasing Al-content due to the bcc structure becoming more dominant in the embedded nanoparticles as the Al-content is increased, but then decreases with further increase in Al-content. This decrease is consistent with a modest degree of alloying between Fe and Al atoms at the particle/matrix interfaces.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanocrystalline Fe73.5Cu1Nb3Si13.5B9 ribbon samples possess excellent soft magnetic properties. Three forms of annealing treatment were performed on amorphous Fe-Cu-Nb-Si-B ribbon samples. The microstructure of the ribbon samples is studied using synchrotron radiation XRD. It is seen that upon annealing, a microstructure of nanocrystalline phase embedded in a residual amorphous matrix is achieved. The application of tensile stress (i) at the annealing temperature till cooling down to room temperature and (ii) from room temperature throughout the annealing process till cooling down to room temperature both show a clear difference in the XRD peaks in the directions parallel and perpendicular to the ribbon directions indicative of an induced structural anisotropy. The transition from the amorphous phase to the nanocrystalline phase was also confirmed by the GMI and transverse field anisotropy measurements. The application of tensile stress at the annealing temperature induces an anisotropy similar to the conventional stress annealing process, with about 5% less strain. This could be a method of reducing the brittle fracture problem of nanocrystalline ribbon samples.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Currently, most of the physics-based magnetization models for giant magnetostrictive actuator are complicated in their mathematical models. These complicated models pose considerable challenges for real-time control. Focus on the above issue, we proposed a fitting magnetization model using Arctangent function, as the inverse of the Arctangent function can solve it very quickly. This function was suitable to model the magnetic behavior of giant magnetostrictive actuator serving in an electronic controlled injector or other types of on-off valves. Applicable range of the model was determined through computing the maximum magnetic field. Then the deviations of the proposed fitting model and Jiles-Atherton model under different parameters were studied to verify the computing effects of the model. Then the effectiveness of the fitting model was verified by experimental results. With a high computing precision and a concise form, the proposed model shows great potentials for the real-time control of giant magnetostrictive actuators.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (MNPs) are one of the most promising types of nanoparticles for biomedical applications, primarily in the context of nanomedicine-based diagnostics and therapy. They are used as contrast agents in magnetic resonance imaging and magnetite cell labelling. Furthermore, they are promising heating mediator in magnetic hyperthermia-based therapy, and can serve as nanocarriers in targeted gene and drug delivery as well. In biomedical applications, coating plays an important role in nanoparticle dispersion stability and biocompatibility. However, the impact of nanoparticle surface chemistry on cell uptake and proliferation has not been sufficiently investigated. The objective of this study is to prepare magnetic nanoparticles with inner magnetite core and hydrophilic outer shell of surfactant, protein and polymers that are commonly used in biomedical research. MNPs were characterized in-depth by various physicochemical methods. Magnetic hyperthermia, applied to find out the influence of MNPs coating on heating characteristics of the samples, did not show any correlation between layer thickness and specific adsorption rate. To evaluate the impact of surface chemistry on cell proliferation and internalization, the human lung adenocarcinoma epithelial (A549) cells were utilized. Substantial differences were determined in the amount of internalized MNPs and cell viability in dependence on surface coating. Our results indicate that the surface chemistry not only protects particles from agglomeration but also affect the interaction between cell and MNPs.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The expressions for dynamic (complex) dipolar and quadrupolar susceptibilities are obtained within the framework of the linear theory of irreversible thermodynamics in the Blume-Emery-Griffiths model. Frequency, temperature as well as crystal field dependences of the dispersion relations and absorption factors are investigated for two different phase diagram topologies which take place for K/J = 3 and K/J = 5.0. Their behaviors near the second- and first-order transition points as well as multi-critical points such as tricritical, triple and critical endpoint are presented.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Using the method of density function theory (DFT) in combination with none-equilibrium Green's functions, we investigate the behavior of spin-charge transport through a junction of a naphthalene diimide (NDI) between two graphene electrodes with different molecule-graphene linkers. We observe the obvious effects of spin-filtering and the spin-rectifying when the two electrodes are set in different spin configurations. Specifically, the ratio of spin-filtering can be up to almost 100% and the magnitude of magnetoresistance reaches 105. More interestingly, we find that the apparent effect of negative differential resistance (NDR) in the junction only with the linking benzene under the parallel spin configuration. As the molecule-graphene linker is replaced by the carbon chain under the parallel configuration, the NDR behavior is almost disappeared. Therefore, our result concludes that the different molecule-graphene linkers can remarkably modulate the spin-charge transport property of molecular junction device.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this present study, we made an attempt for the different concentration of rare earth element (REE) Cerium (Ce3+) doped cobalt ferrite (CoFe2O4) nanoparticles (NPs) were prepared by the simple sol-gel combustion technique. Cerium was successfully substituted into the spinel lattice without any distortion. It was analyzed the effect of Ce3+ ions doping on structural, morphological, magnetic properties and antibacterial activities using the various instrument techniques. Powder XRD and SEM along with EDX studies confirmed the pure phase formation Ce3+ doped CoFe2O4 NPs and spherical shaped agglomerated nanoparticles morphology without any other impurity. The well resolved broad peaks in the XRD pattern clearly indicated the nanosized, single phased, cubic spinal nature of these samples. There was a substantial decrease in the crystallite size on doping with Ce3+. A more in-depth morphological study was facilitated using the TEM and SAED analysis. TEM investigation revealed random shaped, sharp edged nanoparticles with a normally facetted morphology. The presence of distinctive diffractions spots on the SAED pattern indicated the formation of nanoparticles that are highly crystalline in nature. The magnetic response of the Ce3+ doped CoFe2O4 NPs was recorded at room temperature (RT) using the VSM technique. The magnetic properties have been seen to be altered by the addition of Ce3+ in the CoFe2O4 matrix. The decrease in the saturation magnetization (Ms, emu/g) with the increase in Ce3+ content rendered the synthesized sample applicable in field of antenna construction. This change will be also suitable for reducing the size of the antenna. The antibacterial activity of Ce3+ doped CoFe2O4 nanoparticles was found to be enhanced with increase in Ce3+ doping level as it cause a reduction in the grain size.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The polycrystalline CoFeMnSi alloy with a potential spin gapless semiconductor (SGS) behavior was prepared by arc melting. The structures, magnetism and transport properties of CoFeMnSi alloy were investigated in detail. The occurrence of (1 1 1) superlattice XRD peak indicates the highly ordered Y-type structure of CoFeMnSi alloy. The saturation magnetization is around 3.49 μB/f.u. and the Curie temperature is about 763 K. The transport properties exhibit a semiconducting-like behavior and the resistivity is about 269 μΩ cm at 300 K. The carrier concentration almost shows a non-dependence of temperature, which is different from that of traditional semiconductor, presenting a typical characteristic of spin gapless semiconductor. The carrier concentration and carrier mobility measured at 300 K are 4.9 × 1020 cm−3 and 46 cm2/V.s, respectively.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, the interaction between spherical magnetic nanoparticles and amyloid fibrils as well as formation of self-assembled structures during drying process of such colloidal system were investigated. The final self assembled structures were observed experimentally by atomic force microscopy, scanning electron microscopy and polarizing microscopy. Our results show that the colloidal composites are self-assembled into flower-like patterns after the evaporation of liquid drop. These observations show that a large scale and well-organized multi-branched aggregates are formed during the process of drying. Moreover, observation by polarizing microscopy under crossed polarizers showed birefringence.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigate ultrafast magnetization dynamics due to electron-phonon interaction in a ferromagnetic Rashba model, which includes spin-orbit coupling and a Stoner mean-field splitting. By computing the reduced spin-density matrix including explicitly spin-independent electron-phonon scattering at the level of Boltzmann-type scattering integrals, we investigate the influence of a time-dependent Stoner mean field on the magnetization dynamics. We find that the dynamical gap increases the magnetization quenching on short timescales and slows down the remagnetization process. We further show how the noncollinear dynamics of electronic spins in the band structure with internal spin orbit fields can be approximated by effective spin-flip scattering matrix elements.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Effect of swift heavy ion irradiation on MgFe2O4 (annealed at 450 °C/3 h) sample prepared by a sol–gel auto-combustion procedure has been studied. Single phase samples were irradiated with 120 MeV 28Si9+ with ion fluence: 1 × 1011, 1 × 1012, and 1 × 1013 ions/cm2 to monitor its effect on the structure, cation distribution, and magnetic properties. Electronic energy loss induced modifications of cation distribution, structural, magnetic properties were examined by XRD, VSM, FE-SEM, and EDS. XRD measurements show the formation of single phase nanocrystalline mixed cubic spinel structure (grain size 31–35 nm). Observed slight changes of experimental lattice parameter with increasing irradiation dose is ascribable to the migration of Mg2+ ions (ionic radius: 0.071 nm) from B to A site with simultaneous migration of Fe3+ ions (ionic radius: 0.063 nm) from A to B site. Sample irradiated at a lower fluence (1 × 1011 ions/cm2) has higher specific surface area (S), is more suitable for catalytic activity. Irradiation leads formation of dead layer, thus affects magnetic properties, via spin canting at surface. Therefore, irradiation can be used to control both structural, magnetic properties. SEM images display agglomerated nano-particles, while EDS pattern confirms the presence of Mg, Fe and O elements in the sample. First time the antistructural modeling for magnesium ferrite is reported to get information on active surface centers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Co30Cu10Pt60 nanoparticles were prepared by a simplified polyol process devoid of any surfactants or capping agents. Thermo-magnetic analysis showed that the addition of 10 at.% Cu reduces the Curie temperature of Co40Pt60 from 492 °C to 435 °C. The incorporation of Cu is effective in reducing the threshold ordering temperature for the A1-fcc to L10-fct phase transformation of CoPt, resulting in coercivity enhancement. Coercivity close to 10 kOe at a lower annealing temperature of 600 °C in Co30Cu10Pt60 demonstrates that high coercivity in CoPt can be achieved in non-equiatomic compositions also. Annealing temperature dependent two phase behavior has been understood by δM studies.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The Curie point of a ferromagnetic material is determined in the framework of the Ising model by Oguchi's method and the random interaction fields’ method. The heat capacity of the system is also investigated. The jump in the heat capacity is calculated at the Curie point. Comparison with known results is made.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Colloidal stability in external magnetic field is crucial for applications of ferrofluids. Here, we introduce a magnetic analysis approach to monitor how rapidly magnetic nanoparticles are pulled out of the liquid in an external magnetic field gradient. The motion of the sedimentation front is deduced from the time-dependent field produced by a column of ferrofluid placed on a permanent magnet. Citrate-stabilized nanoparticles in a homemade aqueous ferrofluid are found to sediment at the rate expected of single nanoparticles. More rapid sedimentation occurs in two other types of ferrofluid, indicating that our magnetic sedimentation analysis method can differentiate ferrofluids with respect to their in-field colloidal stability. Our method is further validated by comparison with time-dependent X-ray transmission profiles.© 2018At the terahertz frequency range, 2D material graphene is the most promising candidate for using as a functional part of magnetooptical devices because of discovered giant Faraday rotation and ability to dynamical properties control. In this paper magnetooptical properties of graphene were investigated. Numerical analysis on graphene-dielectric structure have shown the tunability of Faraday rotation and ellipticity in terms of amplitude and frequency by optical pumping of different radiation power and wavelength. Our work demonstrates alternative way for developing ultrafast optically tunable polarization modulators of THz wave.© 2018 The AuthorsTo aid the optimization and development of Magnetic particle imaging (MPI), an accurate and translatable apparatus and a methodology for the characterisation of imaging quality are required. This requires magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) as imaging tracer for MPI measurements in a long-term stable, defined state, since MNP in liquid suspension might tend to change their magnetic properties over time, e.g. as a result of particle aggregation, sedimentation, or disintegration. To this end, we have developed solid phantoms containing freeze-dried perimag in mannitol for the comparison of resolution capabilities between different MPI scanners. Freeze drying of MNP was determined to be the optimal immobilisation method for maintaining the dynamic magnetic properties of MNP as compared with polymer or starch techniques. Freeze-drying preserves the particle distribution, preventing the particles from aggregation or precipitation. Two different types of phantoms were developed, one (cross shaped) to seek for artefacts within reconstructed images, and one (coil shaped) to test the resolution limit. The resolution limit is determined from the coil phantom by measuring the smallest resolvable gap between the two adjacent tracer regions. Our resolution phantom contained a 2 mm wide channel filled with tracer. By using this phantom, the imaging performance of the preclinical MPI system and a prototype gradiometric separate receive coil installed within the same MPI scanner was determined. We found 2.1–2.2 mm resolution limit using the conventional set-up and 0.5–0.6 mm for the separate receive coil resulting in an improvement by factor four. Additionally, the resolution dependency on the channel wide was tested by a second resolution phantom contained a 1 mm wide channel. The long-term stability of the phantoms will be continuously monitored and improved.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we investigated the effects of heat treatment and lubricant on the magnetic properties of iron-based soft magnetic composites by one-pot synthesis method. Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) revealed that the surface of the coated Fe powder was coated with different thickness of Al2O3 insulating layer. The experiment results indicated that using lubricant in the coated iron-based compacts presented higher permeability, higher resistivity, lower core loss over the wide frequency range compared with those without using lubricant after heat treatment at 773 K. The above effects would be reduced with the increase of the thickness of the alumina coating. As the heat treatment temperature raised from 573 K to 773 K and even higher 873 K, zinc stearate continued to decompose, and its decomposition product carbon reacted with the iron oxide of the thinner coating. As a result, the frequency stability of the permeability decreased especially at high frequencies, the resistivity decreased significantly, and the eddy current loss increased significantly. When the alumina insulation layer became thick, the effects of zinc stearate and its leaving carbon after decomposition on the properties of the pressed magnet decreased.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This work focuses on Magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of doped Gd based manganites; Gd0.7Sr0.3Mn1−xTixO3 (x = 0, 0.1, 0.15) denoted by G, G0.1, G0.15 respectively. Isothermal magnetic entropy change (|ΔS(T)|) shows appreciably high values for the three compounds. For 10 T field, the peak values obtained for magnetic entropy change is 10.4 JKg−1 K−1, 9.6 JKg−1 K−1 and 22.2 JKg−1 K−1respectively for samples G, G0.1, G0.15 at 12.5 K. Interestingly, −ΔS(T) shows a universal behaviour near the transition region at the low temperature. Relative cooling power (RCP) is comparatively high for Gd0.7Sr0.3Mn0.85Ti0.15O3 at low fields, but for high fields Gd0.7Sr0.3MnO3 has comparatively high values for RCP.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have undertaken a systematic study of the effect of Rb+ doping on the X-ray diffraction, magnetic and electric transport properties of the mixed valence perovskites La0.67Ba0.33−xRbxMnO3 (0≤x≤0.1), prepared by the flux technique. X-ray diffraction and structure refinement showed the formation of single-phase compositions with rhombohedral symmetry with R3¯c space group. Magnetization measurements in a magnetic field of 0.05 T confirm a transition from ferromagnetic (FM) to paramagnetic (PM) phase with increasing temperature. The Curie temperature TC decreases from 340 K (x = 0) to 296 K (x = 0.1). The decrease of Tc can be explained by the Mn4+ content increase. Upon Rb doping, the temperature TM-Sc decreases, in accordance with the evolution of TC values (from 340 to 296 K). The electrical resistivity concluded that the metallic part (below TM-Sc) can be explained by the following equation ρ(T)=ρ0+ρ2T2+ρ4.5T4.5, signifying the importance of the domain boundary / grain, combination of electron-magnon, electron-electron and electron phonon scattering processes. At higher temperature (T > TM-Sc) the semiconducting regime, the adiabatic small polarons hopping mechanism (ASPH) was found to fit well.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have demonstrated a simple, scalable, and low-cost method of producing superparamagnetic nanoparticles (SPNs) encapsulated in carbon nanocages (CNCs). These materials show a very high saturation magnetization and have the potential to find applications in various technologies, including a direct drug delivery, supercapacitors, catalysis, etc. Using a facile method, it was shown that via a simple annealing process of precursors based on a mixture of transition metal (TM) (TM: Ni, Co or Fe) salt (acetate) and citric acid, TM nanoparticles encapsulated in CNCs (TM@CNC) can be readily produced. Our study indicates, that Ni@CNC nanoparticles synthesized at temperatures 500 °C–600 °C are in the 3–4 nm size range and show superparamagnetic behavior while the annealing at 700 °C and higher temperatures leads to the ferromagnetic behavior due to a nanoparticle agglomeration through the Ostwald ripening mechanism. Further, the superparamagnetic Co@CNC nanoparticles synthesized at 600 °C show slightly larger, 4–5 nm, sizes but have much higher saturation magnetization compared to Ni@CNC nanoparticles synthesized at the same temperature making Co@CNC more sensitive to external magnetic field and more useful for direct drug delivery. Finally, for Fe-based precursor, the agglomeration occurs at much lower temperatures. The Fe@CNC nanoparticles synthesized at 600 °C are much larger, in the 10–100 nm size range, show only ferromagnetic behavior, and may be used for magnetic nanoparticle hyperthermia in cancer treatment. The magnetic properties of samples are found to correspond to the theoretical estimates of the critical size of single-domain particles in these TM systems.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) applied in magnetic fluid hyperthermia cancer treatment interact with cancerous tissue in various ways. The impact of these interactions on MNP heating efficiency is hard to quantify and strongly depends on the MNP mobility inside the cancerous environment. There, this MNP mobility is inhibited by cell attachment and internalization. In this study, we model this impact and analyze the MNP heating under gradual immobilization of MNP in acrylamide hydrogels with tailored mesh size. Our results confirm a clear particle heating dependency on the state of immobilization of MNP. This state is related to the mean mesh size of the respective hydrogel. From this, the contributions of Brownian and Néel relaxation mechanisms to the overall particle heating are estimated. In fact, the heating efficiency decreases by up to 35% for the highest immobilization state of MNP. This result is discussed in the context of the field-dependent Brownian and Néel relaxation time, showing that the former significantly contributes to the heating efficiency even for small particles under the field parameters employed in this study.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We used the Self-Consistent Harmonic Approximation (SCHA) to study the thermodynamics of the precession magnetization in a two-dimensional isotropic ferromagnet. The SCHA treats the Hamiltonian in terms of the canonically conjugate operators Sz and φ (the azimuth angle) including renormalized temperature dependent parameters to take into account higher order interactions. It is well-known that in right conditions, a dynamic magnetic field is able to provide spin pumping and drives the system to a magnon Bose-Einstein condensation. The magnon condensate is a coherent state that presents minimal uncertainty for the Sz and φ operators. Consequently, 〈Sz〉 and 〈φ〉 should constitute natural fields to describe the model, which justifies the SCHA formalism. The results obtained are consistent with other theoretical and experimental works.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The nano-laminar ceramic Mn2AlB2 belongs to the orthorhombic M2AlB2 system (M = Cr, Fe, Mn), in which Fe2AlB2 was shown to be ferromagnetic near room temperature. Herein, the magnetic state of Mn2Al11B2 is investigated using magnetization measurements, in the 5–360 K temperature range, X-ray diffraction in the 300–800 K range and neutron diffraction in the 1.6–300 K range. From the totality of our results we conclude that below ∼390 K Mn2AlB2 becomes a canted antiferromagnet. The crystallographic unit cell is doubled along the c axis (i.e. a propagation vector of 0,0,1/2) and the ordered Mn magnetic moments are oriented either along the a or the b axes, with a magnetic moment reaching 0.71(2) µB per Mn atom at 1.6 K. This magnetic structure is in excellent agreement with, and contributes to the validity of the recently reported theoretical calculations for the (Fe1−xMnx)2AlB2 system.© 2018We study dynamics of two magnetostatically coupled magnetic vortices excited by spin-polarized electrical current in a nanopillar consisting of permalloy magnetic layers with different thickness separated by a nonmagnetic spacer. We demonstrate three dynamical regimes of the vortices bound motion: damped oscillations, stationary oscillations and a regime of the polarity switching of one of the vortices; the critical currents for each dynamical phase are identified. The structure and trajectory of the vortex core motion in each magnetic layer are studied for the case of the vortex polarity switching in a thick layer. We show that the vortex polarity switching process has a dynamic nature and is associated with a vortex-antivortex pair formation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of a series of Fe-P-C amorphous alloys were investigated. Fe80P13C7 shows the largest saturation magnetic flux density among all the Fe80P20− xCx (x = 7–9) alloys, which is supported by the hyperfine field distribution. Synchrotron X-ray diffraction was performed to explore the underlying structure mechanism. It is found that Fe80P13C7 amorphous alloy has a larger atomic volume accompanied by a larger first peak position value of the reduced pair distribution function compared with those of Fe80P12C8 and Fe80P11C9. The origin of the unusual magnetic behavior of Fe80P13C7 is thought to be the large Fe-Fe bond length.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Measurements of transverse thermoelectric voltage were carried out in Co40Fe60 (CoFe)/Yttrium-Iron-Garnet (YIG) magnetic junctions, using the CoFe film as the spin detector. An unusual dependence of the voltage on the CoFe thickness was observed in the in-plane magnetized (IM) configuration; the junction with a relatively thick CoFe layer (40 nm) exhibits positive signals, whereas the junctions with a thinner CoFe layer (7–10 nm) exhibit negative signals. To find the origin of the behavior, we compare the voltage signals in the CoFe/YIG and CoFe/GGG systems in the IM configuration as well as perpendicularly magnetized (PM) configuration. Furthermore, the anomalous Hall effect was also measured in the Hall-bar shaped CoFe films. The experimental results suggest that the observed thickness dependence of the voltage is attributed to the combination of the inverse spin Hall effect (ISHE) and the anomalous Nernst effect (ANE) in the CoFe layers; the former shows a negative voltage and its contribution gradually increases with decreasing the CoFe thickness, whereas the latter shows a positive and mostly thickness independent voltage. The competition between the ISHE and ANE contributions results in the observed peculiar CoFe-thickness dependence of the transverse thermoelectric voltage.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The determination of the interfacial Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction for perpendicularly magnetized thin layered films is not trivial and therefore needs some experimental efforts to determine its sign and magnitude, especially in exchange biased systems. Here, we modified a method proposed by D.-S. Han et al. [Nano Lett. 16, (2016) 4438], which opens a way to investigate this interaction using conventional PMOKE magnetometry in exchange biased systems as well. Using our approach we demonstrated that the Au/Co/NiO layered system has a strong negative Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction which is independent of the direction of perpendicular exchange bias coupling.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The two-time Green function method is employed to explore the effect of the biquadratic exchange interaction on the phase diagram of a d-dimensional spin-1 transverse XY model with single-ion anisotropy close to the magnetic-field-induced quantum critical point. We work at level of the Anderson-Callen-decoupling-like framework for both easy-plane and easy-axis single-ion anisotropy. The structure of the phase diagram is analyzed with analytical estimates and numerical calculations by adopting Tyablikov-like decouplings for the exchange higher order Green functions in the equation of motion. For dominant bilinear short-range exchange interaction the structure of the phase diagram close to the quantum critical point remains qualitatively the same of that in absence of biquadratic interaction including reentrant critical lines. When the biquadratic exchange becomes increasingly dominant its role appears more effective and tends to reduce or destroy the reentrant character of the critical lines.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.CuAlO2 is among several ternary delafossites in which the electronic bandgap is less than the optical bandgap due to Laporte selection rules. Because alloying is expected to provide band engineering in delafossites, we are investigating Fe-doped CuAlO2. Here, results from the detailed magnetic characterization of the CuAl1− xFexO2 (x = 0.0, 0.01, 0.05, and 0.1) samples, prepared by a solid-state reaction of Cu2O, Al2O3, and Fe2O3, at 1100 °C, are reported. X-ray diffraction (XRD) of the powder samples showed an expansion of the rhombohedral unit cell with increasing x showing that the larger Fe3+ (r = 0.645 Å) is replacing the smaller Al3+ion (r = 0.535 Å). The analysis of magnetization (M) vs. temperature (T, from 2 to 300 K) data in terms of the Curie-Weiss law: M = CH/(T − θ) confirms Fe3+ as the electronic state of Fe with spin S = 5/2 (magnetic moment μ = 5.9 μB) as determined from the Curie constant, C; this analysis also yields a negative θ characteristic of an antiferromagnetic Fe3+–Fe3+ exchange coupling and magnitudes of x in good agreement with the nominal values. The isothermal M vs. H (up to H = 90 kOe) data analyzed in terms of modified Brillouin function involving H/(T − θ) support the results obtained from the M vs. T analysis. The small paramagnetism observed in undoped CuAlO2 is related to the presence of a few percent of CuAl2O4 impurity observed in XRD of the sample.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Finite element micromagnetics are used to simulate remanence, hysteresis and dynamic switching in crescent shaped permalloy caps, a geometry that corresponds to either normal or oblique deposition of films on nanosphere arrays. Oblique deposition breaks the symmetry and favours onion states rather than vortices. It introduces in-plane shape anisotropy analogous to that of an elongated island and increases the in-plane coercivity. In isolated caps, the critical diameter above which the vortex state is the minimum energy state, is D = 123 nm for angles below θ = 20 deg. It increases with θ up to a vlaue of D = 157 nm at θ = 45 deg. Even for sizes for which the onion state is the lowest energy state, vortex states can be stabilized in isolated caps but the interparticle magnetostatic interactions tend to destabilize them driving the system to its ground state. The switching field of onion states can be reduced by 36% using microwave resonance at frequencies approaching the resonant (Kittel mode) frequencies.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetization of a magnetoactive elastomer (MAE) with microparticles of soft magnetic carbonyl iron embedded in a highly elastic matrix has been studied. It is shown that at high temperatures its magnetization curve has the form of a specific hysteresis loop. This hysteresis is attributed to the influence of displacement of magnetized particles in the elastically soft elastomer matrix under the effect of magnetic forces, leading to the change of magnetic interaction between the particles. In this case, there is a maximum in the field dependence of the magnetic susceptibility, the occurrence of which has been associated with the competition between re-arrangement of particles, when they are displaced in a magnetic field, and saturation of particles’ magnetization. When the MAE is cooled below approximately 225 K, both the magnetic hysteresis and the maximum in the field dependence of the magnetic susceptibility disappear. When the MAE material is cooled below the solidification temperature of the elastomer matrix, the displacements of the magnetic particles during magnetization are blocked by the rigid matrix. The magnetization reversal of the MAE is reversible. This means that the shape of subsequent magnetization loops remains constant and the sample returns into the initial non-magnetized state after the magnetic field is turned off.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the enhancement of spin-orbit torque (SOT) in Pt/Co/Pt multilayers with inserting Ru layers. From current induced magnetization switching and harmonic measurements, we have found that both the damping-like and field-like effective fields increased with inserting Ru layers. The variation is firstly ascribed to the enhancement of the effective spin accumulation at the Co/Ru interfaces. Meanwhile, the interfacial Rashba effect has also been modulated, which depends on the direction of the internal electric field gradient at the interfaces. Our study provides an alternative way to modulate SOT.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Recent studies on magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs) used for Magnetic Fluid Hyperthermia treatments have shown that Brownian rotation is suppressed when they are confined within a cell. To investigate this effect we conducted a systematic study of the Specific Absorption Rate (SAR) of colloidal suspensions of MNPs in water and gels at different agarose concentration. SAR measurements were conducted by varying the frequency (f = 110–990 kHz) and amplitude (up to 17 kA/m) of the applied alternating magnetic field (AMF). MNP samples with different diameter (d = 10, 14, and 18 nm) were used. Our results show that Néel relaxation dominates SAR with negligible contribution from Brownian motion for smaller MNPs (d = 10 nm). For the largest MNPs (d = 18 nm) we observed a more significant SAR decrease in gel suspensions as compared to those in solution. In particular, when applying AMFs as the ones used in a clinical setting (16.2 kA/m at f = 110 kHz), we measured SAR value of 67 W/g in solution and 25 W/g in gel. This experimental finding demonstrates that investigation of MNPs properties should be conducted in media with viscosity similar to the one found in mammalian tissues.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Drug loaded magnetic microspheres (MMS) can be magnetically guided to a target area within the body, where the pharmaceutical agent is released passively. For a faster release, the microspheres have to be disintegrated actively, e.g., by an increase of the temperature of the MMS. In the here presented study, poly(lactic-co-glycolic) acid (PLGA) microspheres were prepared. Magnetic nanoparticles with high magnetic heating performance and the drug camptothecin were embedded into the PLGA matrix. Resulting microspheres were characterized by means of dynamic light scattering, scanning electron microscopy, magnetometry, magnetic calorimetry, and UV/Vis spectrophotometry for determination of the drug release as a function of time and temperature. The MMS diameter is about 1.5 µm and the MMS show a content of magnetic material of up to 16 wt% and a drug loading of about 0.5 wt%. The MMS have a specific heating power of 161 W/gMMS, which enables sufficient magnetic heating for enforced drug release from the MMS in tissue concentrations of 2% by mass. Depending on the applied temperatures and the used PLGA type, the loaded drug is released within hours to days and a temperature increase from 37 to 43 °C leads to a significant faster drug release. The principle of magnetically triggered drug release is demonstrated by magnetic hyperthermia induced release of a drug from the MMS.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.L11-CoPt(1 1 1) films were successfully fabricated on glass substrates at 300–400 °C, using Pt(1 1 1) underlayer. Magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy shows a maximum of 1.8 × 106 J/m3 at 350 °C. The mechanism of L11-CoPt ordering after introducing Pt underlayer is considered to be strain- or stress-induced ordering. The effect of CoPt layer thickness on phase structure and magnetic properties were investigated to confirm the ordering mechanism. Perpendicular magnetic anisotropy has been obtained in all CoPt films, while the squareness ratio and coercivity decrease with increasing film thickness, indicating decreased ordering due to the relaxation of strain or stress in thick films.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) have been successfully used as additives for the fabrication of implants such as hernia implants or vascular grafts in order to enable their in-vivo visualization with magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). However, functionality and long term stability of such implants were not quantitatively assessed until now. Reliable assessment of functionality is related not only to the determination of MNP concentration, but also to the impact of aggregation and immobilization of MNP inside the implant material on the MRI signal. In this regard, novel models must be developed which describe the relation between proton relaxation and both MNP clustering and mobility of MNP inside the implants. In this study, we experimentally quantify the transverse relaxation dependence on MNP size and MNP clusters, confirming theoretical descriptions. We identify three MNP size ranges for which different proton relaxation trends occur: One for which relaxivity increases with size (up to approx. 75 nm), a second for which relaxivity is constant (from 75 nm to 130 nm) and a third for which relaxivity decreases (from 130 nm to 220 nm). Further, we describe the impact of gradual MNP immobilization in agarose gels on relaxivity for three MNP types representing either of the identified size ranges. For all MNP types, we observe an increase of relaxivity with agarose content up to an MNP type specific maximum value. The relative rise of relaxivity is higher for MNP with larger sizes. The highest increase of the transverse relaxivity from 240 mM-1s−1 to 1000 mM-1 s−1 is achieved for MNP clusters after immobilization in a gel with 7%(w/w) agarose. The effects of MNP clustering and immobilization on relaxivity are valuable information for the engineering of implants with different contrast properties in MRI. Further, the relation between MNP immobilization and relaxivity values may serve as a basis for future non-invasive assessment of changes in implant functionality by MRI measurements.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Pure and Ag substituted cobalt ferrite nanoparticles (NPs) having the composition (1−x)CoFe2O4: xAg (x = 0.0, 0.2) were synthesized by a novel honey assisted combustion method in order to investigate their structural and magnetic properties along with their antibacterial activity. XRD patters confirm the spinel phase of CoFe2O4 and the presence of silver (Ag) nanoparticles in the spinel network. The incorporation of Ag in CoFe2O4 spinel structure enhanced the size of the unit cell, resulting to higher value of lattice parameter (a) compared to the pure CoFe2O4. The sintering process promoted the growth of the crystallite sizes (D). The crystallite sizes of the synthesized and annealed powders were found in the range of 24–41 nm. From the EDX studies, it seemed that the distribution of Ag nanoparticles was non-uniform. The saturation magnetization (Ms) and coercivity (Hc) of the powders were influenced by annealing as well as with the substitution of Ag. The highest value of saturation magnetization (60 emu/g) was obtained by the CoFe2O4 nanoparticles with the coercivity value 1358 Oe. The saturation magnetization and coercivity of Ag doped CoFe2O4 were less than that of pure CoFe2O4. The present cobalt ferrite nanoparticles and Ag doped cobalt ferrite nanoparticles have shown good antibacterial activities. But Ag doped cobalt ferrite nanoparticles seems to be the potential candidates for effective antibacterial activity. The structural and magnetic results along with the results of antibacterial activities are reported in the present manuscript.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) have been investigated for generating therapeutic heat when subjected to an alternating magnetic field (AMF) and applied for tumor-confined cancer therapy, so-called magnetic fluid hyperthermia (MFH). For application of MFH, a key requirement is the reduction of MNP dosing by maximizing the heat generation within medically safe limits of the applied AMF. Therefore, reliable and accurate predictions of particle heating are required for the advancement of therapy planning. In this study, we compare size-dependent particle heating data from calorimetric measurements to stochastic Néel-Brown Langevin equation Monte Carlo simulations, finding good agreement between them for various AMF amplitudes and frequencies. Within medical safety constraints of the AMF, our simulations predict maximum particle heating for magnetite particle core sizes above 25 nm with effective anisotropy constants K=4000 J/m3 at frequencies of ∼100 kHz and field amplitudes ∼10 mT/μ0. These simulations could help to predict the optimal combination of medically safe AMF parameters and MNP intrinsic properties, such as core size and effective anisotropy, to maximize heat generation and reduce MNP dosing in the application of MFH.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We have performed 59Co zero field nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) experiment at 4 K on CoxCu1-x (x = 0.10, 0.32 and 0.76) nanogranular alloys. The NMR signal arises from Co rich ferromagnetic clusters formed within the Cu matrix. The analysis of NMR spectra shows that the resonance peaks arise from both fcc and hcp phases of Co. However, Co nuclei experience magnetic hyperfine field from Co only environment as well as other environments in which nearest-neighbor (NN) Co atoms are replaced by Cu. Assuming that these two environments constitute the core and the shell of the Co clusters, it is estimated using previous magnetization measurements that the contribution of core dominates in the ferromagnetism of the particles though it occupies only about 20% of the volume of Co clusters even for high Co containing alloys.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In order to study the magnetic properties of a mixed spin 1/2 Ising model and spin 1 Blume-Capel model in a hexagonal nanotube two layers system, we carried out a Monte Carlo simulation with the Metropolis algorithm. By means of the magnetic susceptibility curves, the phase diagram for a finite size lattice is obtained. In association with previous analytic results, an uncommon increase in the magnetization with temperature is described by the existence of an unstable state with a non-zero order parameter.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the present work, the (Nd0.8Ce0.2)2Fe12Co2−xTixB (x = 0–0.6) permanent alloys are prepared by melt-spinning method. Ti addition has proved to result in relevant improvements in the microstructure and magnetic properties. The enhanced coercivity Hcj of 7.13 kOe and maximum energy product (BH)max of 16.24 MGOe with a slight decrease in Br only have been obtained with the Ti content at x = 0.4. Microstructural observations reveal that the significant improvements of magnetic properties originate from the hard 2:14:1 magnetic phase refinement by introducing Ti element. The magnetization reversal behavior and energy loss characteristic have also been thoroughly investigated. The first-order reversal curves (FORCs) suggest that the Ti-doped sample with a higher maximum ρ of the major peak and the flat surface is responsible for the stronger inter-phase exchange coupling and better magnetic performance.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We introduce and exactly solve a spin-1/2 Ising-Heisenberg chain that captures some relevant aspects of the heterotrimetallic coordination compound [CuIIMnII(L1)] [FeIII(bpb)(CN)2] · ClO4· H2O to be further abbreviated as Fe-Mn-Cu. The magnetic backbone of the coordination polymer Fe-Mn-Cu forms a regular alternation of Fe3+ and Mn2+ ions, whereas Cu2+ ions are laterally attached to Mn2+ ions. The exchange coupling between Fe3+and Mn2+ ions is assumed to be Ising-like, while the exchange coupling between Cu2+and Mn2+ ions is assumed to be an anisotropic XXZ Heisenberg interaction. The gyromagnetic factors of all three metal ions are adjusted so as to obtain proper magnetic moment of individual metal ions when they are treated as spin-1/2 carriers. The ground-state phase diagram exhibits four distinct phases, whereas two of them display a quantum entanglement between spin states of Cu2+and Mn2+ ions. It is shown that the magnetization continuously varies with the magnetic field within two quantum ground states due to the mismatch between the magnetic moments and it also exhibits interesting field-driven phase transitions. The degree of quantum entanglement between the spin states of Cu2+and Mn2+ ions is quantified by the concurrence, which unveils that the entanglement becomes optimal at finite magnetic fields within one of the quantum ground states. The concurrence may exhibit non-monotonous dependences on the magnetic field and temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic refrigeration based on the magnetocaloric effect has attracted recent attention due to advantages such as high efficiency and environmental friendliness. We have investigated the structural, magnetic and magnetocaloric properties of Mn2−xSn0.5Ga0.5 (x = 0, 0.3, 0.5, 0.8) alloys prepared using arc-melting and melt-spinning techniques with prospects for magnetic refrigeration. The Mn2−xSn0.5Ga0.5 alloys, except for Mn1.2Sn0.5Ga0.5, have a single-phase hexagonal crystal structure. The Mn1.2Sn0.5Ga0.5 alloy also contains a small amount of MnSn2 impurity phase. The Curie temperature and high-field (30 kOe) magnetization at 55 K decrease with increasing Mn concentration from 306 K and 64.1 emu/g (1.07 µB/Mn) for Mn1.2Sn0.5Ga0.5 to 262 K and 46.7 emu/g (0.85 µB/Mn) for Mn2Sn0.5Ga0.5, respectively. The peak values of magnetic entropy change are relatively small with ΔSM,max=1.7 Jkg−1K−1 for Mn1.5Sn0.5Ga0.5 at 30 kOe. Despite this, these materials show considerable relative cooling power (RCP) along with a wide working temperature range near room temperature and negligible magnetic and thermal hysteresis, where Mn1.2Sn0.5Ga0.5 shows a highest RCP of 102.3 Jkg−1 at 30 kOe.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Multiferroic composites of Zn-Cr substituted cobalt ferrite (Co0.75Zn0.25Cr0.2Fe1.8O4) (CZCFO) nanoparticles and lead-free piezoelectric sodium bismuth titanate Na0.5Bi0.5TiO3 (NBT) having composition (1 − x) Na0.5Bi0.5TiO3 + (x)Co0.75Zn0.25Cr0.2Fe1.8O4 (x = 0.0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75, 1.0) were investigated in this study. Ferromagnetic-CZCFO and ferroelectric-NBT phases were synthesized via sol-gel auto combustion route and solid-state reaction methods respectively. The structural properties of composite materials were studied using X-ray diffraction (XRD) technique. Intense and sharp peaks observed in XRD patterns confirm that both the phases are well crystalline in nature. Two separate phases of CZCFO and NBT are present in composite material without any impurity or chemical reaction among them. The morphology of prepared samples was studied via scanning electron microscopy confirming that composite materials are well-densified and homogenous grain size distribution. The magnetic hysteresis loops of multiferroic composite were investigated by using vibrating sample magnetometer at room temperature. The lead free multiferroic composite exhibiting a large converse magneto-electric (ME) effect at room temperature. The maximum value of ME coefficient (αME = 7.92 kV/cm) is obtained at x = 0.50. Furthermore, electrical properties of nanocomposite material were studied by P-E hysteresis loop and dielectric measurements at room temperature.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In a search for efficient anti-tumor agent, silica-coated superparamagnetic nanoparticles were designed and used in combination with vitamin E derivative as a potential new tool for anticancer treatment. The particles were characterized by numerous techniques, such as transmission electron microscopy and dynamic light scattering to determine the particle morphology and size both in dry state and water, atomic absorption spectroscopy to analyze the iron content, Fourier-transform infrared spectroscopy to confirm the presence of the functional groups, and vibrating sample magnetometry to determine the magnetic properties and content of maghemite. The next aim was to assess effect of the nanoparticles on suppression of experimental mammary gland carcinosarcoma W-256. Strong antitumor effect was achieved only with combined application of γ-Fe2O3@SiO2 and acetate derivative of α-tocopherol (Toc-6-Ac) resulting in 58% of tumor volume reduction. The results were compared with those obtained with poly(N,N-dimethylacrylamide)-coated iron oxide particles described earlier.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic nanoparticles (SPMNPs), with unique physical and magnetic properties that differentiate them from their bulk magnetic materials, have been widely studied for potential applications in biomedical areas. With proper surface chemical functionalization, SPMNPs have found their applications in magnetic hyperthermia therapy, magnetic bioassays, drug delivery, magnetic manipulation, etc. These applications require elaborate tuning of the physical and magnetic properties of the SPMNPs such as saturation magnetization Ms and magnetic core size D. In this work, we present a search coil-based method to directly characterize the Ms of SPMNPs in the liquid phase. The nonlinear magnetic responses of SPMNPs under oscillating magnetic fields are exploited and the induced harmonic signals are used to analyze their Ms and D. Different combinations of Ms and D are assumed and their harmonic ratios R are summarized. Curve fitting shows that the harmonic ratio R=0.74+2.85×109∙D-4.41∙Ms -1.44, with the coefficient of determination R-square = 0.98.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Co and Mn-Co co-doped SnO2 nanoparticles have been successfully synthesized using a simple technique called as citrate precursor assisted co-precipitation (CPACP). Structural and compositional analyses by X-ray diffraction (XRD), high-resolution transmission electron microscopy (HRTEM), Energy Dispersive X-Ray Fluorescence Spectrometer (EDX), X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) and Raman spectroscopy confirmed that Co and Mn ions were incorporated into the SnO2 host lattice without changing the inherent rutile structure. The average crystallite size of the prepared samples were estimated to be in the range of 8–12 nm. In a single Co2+-doped SnO2 sample, the magnetization was observed to increase as the Co2+ ions concentration increased. The transition metal Mn can adjust the magnetic signal of the Co2+-doped SnO2 sample, which is subject to the concentration of Mn dopant. Adding a proper amount of Mn to the Co2+-doped SnO2 sample enhanced the magnetization. As the Mn2+ ions concentration increases, the magnetic properties of the (Mn, Co) co-doped SnO2 nanoparticles gradually shift from ferromagnetic behavior to superparamagnetism. However, the sample Sn0.83Mn0.12Co0.05O2 exhibits diamagnetic behavior when the concentration of Mn2+ ions is doped excessively.© 2018 The AuthorsFirst-order reversal curve (FORC) diagrams are increasingly used as a material's magnetic domain state fingerprint. FORC diagrams of noninteracting dispersions of single-domain (SD) particles with uniaxial magnetocrystalline anisotropy (MCA) are well studied. However, a large class of materials possess a cubic MCA, for which the FORC diagram properties of noninteracting SD particle dispersions are less understood. A coherent rotation model was implemented to study the FORC diagram properties of noninteracting ensembles of SD particles with positive and negative MCA constants. The pattern formation mechanism is identified and related to the irreversible events the individual particles undergo. Our results support the utility of FORC diagrams for the identification of noninteracting to weakly-interacting SD particles with cubic MCA.© 2018Near the Curie temperature TC = 30.3 K, the temperature dependences of the magnetization and heat capacity of a single-crystal ferromagnet PbMnBO4 in the magnetic fields of 1, 3, 10 and 30 kOe are studied. In the strong magnetic fields, both the magnetic contribution to the specific heat and the nonlinearity of the field dependences of the magnetization are maintained up to the temperatures exceeding TC more than twice. It is assumed that in PbMnBO4 the difference between TC, the paramagnetic Curie temperature θ = 49 K and the broad temperature region above TC where the magnetic contribution to the specific heat is significant is due to the quasi-one-dimensional character of the magnetic structure of this ferromagnet. Using both the estimation of TC from the Ginzburg-Landau field theory and the θ value, the total exchange interaction parameters 2J ≈ 40.4 K (intrachain) and z′J′ ≈ 8.8 K (interchain) are determined, with z′ = 4 being the number of neighboring chains. The estimation shows that the Ginzburg-Landau field theory describing the quasi-one-dimensional behavior of PbMnBO4 is well applicable in the temperature range from to T = S2J ≈ 80 K. Above this temperature, the mean field approximation with the exchange parameter λθ based on the paramagnetic Curie temperature θ describes well the experimental temperature dependences of the magnetization in the strong magnetic field and the specific heat is determined by the lattice contribution.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.To overcome the problems of Fe nanowires and obtain an outstanding material for the applications of magnetic recording and microwave absorption. Fe/TiO2 core/shell nanowire arrays were fabricated by a controllable two-step electrodeposition technique using anodic aluminum oxide (AAO) membrane as the template. The influences of annealing on the microstructure, magnetism and microwave-absorption properties of the arrays were studied. It was demonstrated experimentally that the partial crystallization of amorphous TiO2 and the polycrystalline structure of TiO2 originating from annealing enhanced the microwave-absorption properties of Fe/TiO2 core/shell nanowire arrays. We also found that the nanowire arrays with small diameter exhibited more obvious magnetic anisotropy. Our study shows that Fe/TiO2 core/shell nanowire arrays can be used for the applications of magnetic recording and microwave absorption.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This paper investigates the dependence of temperature resolution in magnetic nanoparticle (MNP) temperature imaging on the frequency of an applied ac magnetic field with a custom-built scanning magnetic particle spectrometer (SMPS). The fundamental f0 and 3f0 harmonics are measured with the SMPS while the amplitude ratio of the 3f0 to f0 harmonics is used to determine the spatial distribution of temperatures. Experiments on a three-line phantom filled with a MNP sample are performed in different-frequency ac magnetic fields with a constant strength of 8 mT. The standard deviation of measured temperatures is used to characterize the temperature resolution. Experimental results show that the temperature resolution improves from 0.9 K to 0.2 K with increasing the excitation frequency from 600 Hz to 5 kHz, which is mainly caused by a higher signal-to-noise ratio due to Faraday's law and by a higher temperature sensitivity of the 3f0 to f0 harmonic ratio.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The hexagonal D019-Mn3Ga phase is a non-collinear antiferromagnet with a triangular spin configuration. The Mn magnetic moments, lying in the (0 0 1) basal plane, are slightly canted towards the c axis producing a ferromagnetic component (FMC), which saturation magnetization in bulk samples is 7.7 kAm−1. Here, we report on the epitaxial growth of Mn3Ga epitaxial thin films on MgO(1 1 1), GaN(0 0 1) and MgO(0 0 1)/Pt(1 1 1) substrates with lattices mismatches of −4.77%, 2.1%, and 2.45%, respectively. Structural characterization with reflection high-energy electron diffraction was used to evaluate the critical thicknesses at which relaxation is reached. We provide evidence of the manipulation of the magnitude of the FMC of the Mn3Ga thin films grown under tensile and compressive deformations. The FMC has been tuned from 23.7 to 11.8 and 2.5 kAm−1 for the growth of Mn3Ga on MgO(1 1 1), GaN(0 0 1), and MgO(0 0 1)/Pt(1 1 1) substrates. The modulation of the FMC is explained in terms of the Dzyaloshinskii-Moriya interaction.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.For in vivo applications of magnetic nanoparticles (MNPs), environment viscosity is one of the most important parameters that determines their AC magnetization. In this study, we investigate the effect of viscosity on the AC magnetization of MNPs under different AC excitation field conditions. We show that the AC M − H curve and harmonic magnetization spectrum strongly depend on the viscosity for a small excitation field intensity and low excitation frequency, while they are insensitive to the viscosity for a large excitation field intensity and high excitation frequency. We then show that the difference in the AC magnetization between these cases can be qualitatively explained by taking the field dependent Brownian fB(Hac) and Néel fN(Hac) frequencies into account. The frequencies are obtained from numerical simulations based on the Fokker-Planck equations. Finally, we show that an excitation field with a relatively large intensity and a frequency f that satisfies fB(Hac) « f ≤ fN(Hac) is suitable for the magnetic fluid hyperthermia (MFH) application.© 2018Although the addition of other elements such as Mn to Sm2Fe17Nx compounds can change the magnetic properties, it also decreases saturation magnetization. In order to exploit the advantages of additional elements in Sm2Fe17Nx powder while maintaining a high saturation magnetization, a structure of Sm2Fe17Nx-core/Sm2(Fe,M)17Nx-shell is promising. This is the first report of such a core-shell powder obtained by a reduction-diffusion process. Mn3O4 was mixed with Sm-Fe and Sm2O3 powders followed by the reduction by Ca above 860 °C, and then samples were nitrided and washed after reduction-diffusion process. Core-shell Sm-Fe-N fine powder with a Mn-enriched Sm2(Fe,Mn)17Nx shell was thus successfully obtained. The thickness of the Mn enriched region was about 0.8 μm, and the crystal structure of the core-shell powder was Th2Zn17. The saturation magnetization and coercivity of the core-shell powder were 138.8 A·m2·kg−1 and 1001.7 kA·m−1, respectively. The saturation magnetization was slightly smaller than that of Mn-free Sm-Fe-N powder, whereas the coercivity of the core-shell powder was higher than that of Mn-free Sm-Fe-N powder. In addition, the saturation magnetization and coercivity were higher than those reported for Sm-Fe-Mn-N powder. The thermal stability of the Mn-diffused Sm-Fe-N core-shell powder was improved compared with Mn-free Sm-Fe-N powder.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Spinel ferrite based magnetic materials are preferably used to prepare hard/soft magnets, magnetic data storage devices and recording media due to their excellent magnetic properties. Hence to study the magnetic behavior of nickel, cobalt based ferrites the cobalt doped (Co2+) nickel ferrite nanoparticles with cubic spinel crystal structure are successfully designed via heat treatment method. The formation of single cubic spinel phase of Co2+ doped nickel ferrite nanoparticles is confirmed by X-ray diffraction analysis, and their structural properties, such as lattice parameter, average crystal size and X-ray density are investigated in detail. According to the microstructural study, the morphology of cobalt doped nickel ferrite nanoparticles is observed to be irregular in shape. Based on the thermal behavior carried out by the thermo-gravimetric analysis, it can be postulated that the complete formation of ferrite samples takes place at 600 °C. The hyperfine field parameters obtained by the Mossbauer spectroscopy indicates that on cobalt doping (x = 0.4) additional sextet is obtained resulting into presence of unreacted Fe. The coercivity is increased from 263 to 1608 Oe with increasing Co2+ doping level in nickel ferrite. The Coercivity value is found to be the highest with good remnant magnetization, saturation magnetization and squareness ratio (Mr/Ms = 0.49), indicating the capability of Co2+-doping in improving the magnetic properties of nickel ferrite for magnetic applications such as permanent magnet, magnetic data storage devices and magnetic tapes.© 2018We present studies of structural and magnetic properties of graphene + Fe2O3 composite samples with the magnetic oxide content changing from 0 to 50%. Our studies revealed that irrespective of the cleaning procedure the magnetic behavior of pure graphene samples changed from diamagnetic to paramagnetic for samples made with either acetone or ethanol, respectively. The paramagnetic samples contained a significant concentration of magnetic moments. For all our samples with Fe2O3 at T < 110 K we observed the superparamagnetic blocking. Moreover, due to the presence of Fe2O3 nanoparticles with diameter >10 nm we observed a transition at T ≈ 495 K and another at T > 600 K. The synthesis solvent changes modified the magnetic behavior of our samples resulting in higher effective magnetic moment for the ethanol related samples. The shape and the parameters characterizing the magnetic hysteresis loop change strongly with the change of preparation method and the amount of Fe2O3. Large exchange bias was observed for all our samples indicating the significance of antiferromagnetic surface spin-alignment of Fe2O3 nanoparticles. It is therefore possible to control the magnetic properties of graphene + Fe2O3 composites over a wide range of parameters.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on the low-temperature physical properties of a novel compound Ce11Pd4In9 that crystallizes with the orthorhombic Nd11Pd4In9-type crystal structure (space group Cmmm). The compound exhibits ferromagnetic ordering at TC = 18.6 K and an order-order transition at Tt ≈ 1.6 K, as inferred from the low-temperature magnetic susceptibility, heat capacity and electrical resistivity data. In the paramagnetic region, the electrical transport in Ce11Pd4In9 is dominated by Kondo effect. Below TC, a distinct contribution due to ferromagnetic spin waves dominates the electrical resistivity data, while at the lowest temperatures, the electrical transport and thermodynamic properties are governed by strong electron-electron correlations. The features observed conjointly hint at strongly correlated ground state in Ce11Pd4In9.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the reentrant (RE) state at low temperatures, the functional dependence of magnetization on temperature at fixed magnetic fields, MH(T), in the Cr70Fe30 thin films deviates considerably from the well-known Bloch T3/2 power law, predicted by the spin-wave (SW) theory for a conventional three-dimensional (3D) ferromagnet. Strong departures from the SW predictions are shown to be a manifestation of an anomalous softening of magnon modes in the RE regime. The model that invokes the Bose–Einstein condensation (BEC) of magnons provides a satisfactory explanation for this unusual behavior. The magnon BEC transition temperature, Tc(H), the volume, V(H), over which the condensate wavefunction retains its phase coherence, the chemical potential, μ(T,H), and the average number of magnon condensates in the ground state, 〈n0(T,H)〉 are accurately determined from MH(T) using a self-consistent approach. Reduction in the film thickness from 978 nm to 21 nm enhances the BEC transition temperature at zero field, Tc(H = 0), from 0.1 K to 0.33 K but drastically reduces the phase coherence length of the BE condensate wavefunction and the spin-wave stiffness at T = 0 and H = 0. The variation of Tc with magnetic field has the form that is characteristic of the magnon BEC in a 3D spin system. Regardless of the film thickness, the BE condensate fraction at H = 0, 〈n0(H=0)〉 turns out to be zero at T≃2 K ≫Tc(H=0), as expected. The ‘zero-field’ quantities M0(H=0),D0(H=0),V(H=0) and Tc(H=0) are found to vary with the film thickness as M0(H=0)∼t3/4,D0(H=0)∼t-3/4,V(H=0)∼t2/5 and Tc(H=0)∼t-1/3. These power laws assert that the film thickness is the fundamental length scale so far as the magnon BEC phenomenon in the Cr70Fe30 thin films is concerned.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nd-Fe-B based magnets possess the largest energy product and are essential in numerous cutting-edge applications. We report the bottom up, energy efficient, cost effective microwave synthesis of Dy alloyed Nd2(Fe,Co)14B magnetic nanoparticles. The process included microwave combustion to synthesize Nd-Dy-Fe-Co-B mixed oxides, followed by the reduction of these oxides by CaH2. The influence of Dy substitution on both room temperature and temperature dependent magnetic properties were investigated. For (Nd12Dy3)-(Fe67Co10)-B8 alloy, (BH)max was found to be as high as 12.6 MGOe. The coercivity increased significantly, from 8 kOe to 14.5 kOe, as Dy content increased from x = 0 to x = 9. The thermal coefficient of remanence (α) and thermal coefficient of coercivity (β) were also determined, it was found that thermal stability increased for higher Dy content. Analysis of temperature dependent magnetic properties and comparison with modeling results showed that the dominant coercivity reversal mechanism of these particles was nucleation of reversed magnetic domains.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The preparation of small, monodispersed magnetic microparticles through microfluidic approaches has been consistently challenging due to the high energy input needed for droplet break-off at such small diameters. In this work, we show the microfluidic production of 1–3 μm magnetic nanoparticle-loaded poly(D, L-lactide) (PLA) microspheres. We describe the use of two approaches, using a conventional flow-focusing microfluidic geometry. The first approach is the separation of target size satellite particles from the main droplets; the second approach is the direct production using high flow rate jetting regimes. The particles were produced using a polymeric thiol-ene microfluidic chip platform, which affords the straightforward production of multiple chip copies for single-time use, due to large feature sizes and replica molding approaches. Through the encapsulation of magnetite/maghemite nanoparticles, and their characterization with scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM) measurements, we show that the resulting particles are monosized, highly spherical and exhibit superparamagnetic properties. The particle size regime and their magnetic response show potential for in vivo intravenous applications of magnetic targeting with maximum magnetic response, but without blocking an organ's capillaries.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Planar hexaferrite BaCo2Fe16O27 was prepared by a simple adsorbent combustion method. The BaCo2Fe16O27/paraffin composite with 45 vol% particles was subjected to a rotational orientation process in an external magnetic field, resulting in highly-oriented BaCo2Fe16O27 composite with an alignment degree of 0.88. The oriented composite showed higher permeability in both real and imaginary parts as compared to its random counterpart. Significant enhancement of microwave absorbing performance was obtained for the oriented composite in 8–18 GHz due to the enhanced impedance matching and magnetic loss, displaying much stronger absorption and greater bandwidth (≤−10 dB) than the random composite. Moreover, a thinner matching thickness can be achieved for a given matching frequency through the alignment of easy magnetization planes. The results showed that the c-plane alignment process holds promises for rational design of lightweight magnetic absorbers with planar anisotropy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nano-flake SmCo5 powders with typical flake thickness of 200 nm were prepared by high energy ball milling using Oleic Acid (OA) as a surfactant. In order to remove the surfactant, the as-milled powders were exposed to pulse cold plasma of argon. The effects of the plasma parameters on residual surfactant content and magnetic properties of the resulting powder were investigated. Partial (62.5 at. %) surfactant removal was observed by XPS after treatments of 4 h at 150 Watt average power under an argon pressure of 300 mTorr. In addition, the cold plasma cleaning process led to a little bit of increase of oxygen on the surface. Demagnetization measurements revealed a slight decrease of the magnetic performance after plasma treatment. These results indicate that pulse cold plasma is an effective way for surfactant removal without morphological change and magnetic property degradation of the SmCo5 nano-flakes.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Mössbauer spectroscopy has long been used to calculate the degree of inversion (λ) in ferrites. To perform this calculation in NiFe2O4, it is assumed that the recoilless f-factors ratio of the Fe3+ cations at octahedral [B] and tetrahedral (A) sites of the spinel structure, [Formula presented], is equal to 1 at very low temperatures and equal to 0.94 at room temperature (RT). However, these values were reported for ideal Fe3O4 but not for NiFe2O4, and the physical properties of both materials are very different. In this work, we use a simple method and propose equations for directly determining the fFeA 3+ and fFeB 3+ values at RT relative to the recoilless f-factor of standard metallic iron powder (fFe). NiFe2O4 was synthesized from a stoichiometric mixture of nickel oxide and hematite by combining milling processes and heat treatments. The sample was characterized using X-ray diffraction, Mössbauer spectroscopy, infrared spectroscopy, Raman spectroscopy, scanning electron microscopy, energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy and magnetic measurements. The results of all the characterization techniques confirm the synthesis of NiFe2O4 and the formation of the spinel structure. The lattice parameter of the cubic unit cell of NiFe2O4 was calculated using a crystallographic model and the Rietveld refinement. By comparing the lattice parameters, it was possible to determine the degree of inversion (λ = 0.96) of the spinel structure of NiFe2O4, and it could be established that the sample obtained has a mixed spinel structure of the type Ni0.04 2+Fe0.96 3+ ANi0.96 2+Fe1.04 3+ BO4 2-. Finally, a value of [Formula presented] = 1.09 ± 0.01 was calculated for NiFe2O4 at RT.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticles of nickel zinc ferrite Ni0.65Zn0.35Fe2O4 having an average crystallite size of 42 nm, synthesized by sol–gel method were found to exhibit the highest value of saturation magnetization along with high dc resistivity. The observed variations in saturation magnetization and crystallite size as a function of annealing temperature were elucidated considering the core surface magnetic interactions and the particle shape of the nanoferrite using low temperature in-field Mössbauer measurements and the high-resolution transmission electron micrographs. With the attainment of valuable magnetization and resistivity, the usefulness of the material as magnetic core for high frequency applications has been investigated by studying the frequency dependence of initial permeability. Interestingly, the results support that the material would be suitable as magnetic core up to 18 GHz.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In systems with substantial spin fluctuations, dressing the polarization function by ladder diagram of Stoner (spin-flip) excitations can drastically modify the electromagnetic response. As a case study, we provide the detailed analysis of the corrections to the non-local optical conductivity of both doped and undoped graphene. While the resummation of ladder diagram of Stoner excitations does not affect the TE mode in doped graphene, it allows for a new undamped TM mode in undoped graphene. This is the sole effect of corrections arising from ladder diagrams and is dominated by Stoner excitations along the ladder rung which goes away by turning off the source of spin-flip interactions. In the case of doped graphene, the inclusion of spin-flip particle-hole fluctuations reduces the energy of plasmon mode.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report the magnetic properties of Zn-substituted barium Y-type hexaferrites with the Zn substituent, x, ranging from 0.5 to 2.0 in Ba2ZnxFe2− xFe12O22. After high-temperature annealing and subsequent furnace-cooling, single-phase samples with x = 0.5, 1.0, 1.5 could be successfully prepared in a reduced oxygen atmosphere (PO2 = 10−3 atm) while the single-phase was obtainable only from the sample with x = 2.0 in air. With increasing x from 0.5 to 2.0, both a lattice parameters (≈0.32%) and unit cell volumes (Vcell) (≈0.51%) were linearly increased but c lattice parameters (≈0.12%) were linearly decreased, which is in good agreement with the Vegard's law, indirectly supporting a successful formation of Ba2ZnxFe2− xFe12O22-type solid solutions. The saturation magnetization (Ms) was first increased with increasing x from 0.5 to 1.0 and then decreased up to x = 2.0. Thus, the highest Ms value of 44.7 emu/g was obtainable from the sample of x = 1.0 sintered at 1300 °C for 2 h in the low PO2 of 10−3 atm. These results are attributable to the site preference of Zn2+ ions for the tetrahedral sites of Y-type hexaferrites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The author regrets that a second affiliation is missed to be linked to the author Reham. M. Shabara. The affiliation is as mentioned above. The author would like to apologise for any inconvenience caused.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Using the Czochralski pulling method, we have grown a single-crystal of orthorhombic Ce3RuSn6 that exhibits a ferromagnetic transition. Here we present electrical resistivity, specific heat, and magnetization measurements of this sample in the temperature range from 2 to 300 K. The electrical resistivity ρ displays a -lnT temperature dependence from 20 K to above the Curie temperature TC = 3 K. At TC, ρ decreases, and the specific heat C exhibits a sharp peak due to the magnetic transition. The magnetization measurements reveal that the magnetization M is highly anisotropic, and the magnetic structure below TC is probably not a simple ferromagnetic structure. When the magnetic field B is applied along the b-axis or the c-axis, M shows a ferromagnetic-like rapid increase or an antiferromagnetic-like cusp anomaly, respectively, at TC. Moreover, for B||c, a metamagnetic-like anomaly appears in the magnetization curve at B = 2.5 T. However, for B||a, M does not exhibit a distinct anomaly at TC. The results indicate that below TC, Ce3RuSn6 has a non-collinear magnetic structure and that the magnetic moments are aligned in the bc-plane.© 2018The influence of chromium doping and the calcination temperature on the structural, morphological, cation distribution and magnetic properties of CoCrxFe2−xO4 where x = 0.0, 0.25, 0.5, 0.75 and 1 were investigated in detail. The X-ray diffraction (XRD) analysis using the Rietveld refinement technique proved the nanocrystalline single-phase, chromium doped cobalt ferrite samples. It is observed that the lattice parameter ‘a’ decreases with increasing the chromium concentrations, while lattice parameter gradually enhances with increasing of calcination temperature. The cation distribution was inferred from the analysis of intensity of XRD as well magnetic properties. Magnetic measurements informed that both of the coercivity (HC) and saturation magnetization (MS) overall decrease with increasing chromium substitution. Also, with rising of calcination temperature from 350 to 1000 °C, for un-doped cobalt ferrite sample, MS is increased from 31 to78 emu/gr, respectively. These magnetic behaviors could be explained by the cation distribution and crystallite size enhancement. The HC enhancement for the heat-treated samples until 700 °C can be attributed to the crystal growth within the single domain region, while decreasing HC by further increasing calcination temperature to 1000 °C, is due to the transformation of single domain nanoparticles to multi-domain particles. The reduced hysteresis loops due to decreasing MS and HC with increase in chromium concentration, which in turn lowered the coercive field and softened the material, favoring its application in high-frequency transformers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A series of Li-Cd doped cobalt ferrites CoLixCdxFe2−2xO4 (x = 0.0, 0.05, 0.1, 0.15, 0.2, 0.25) has been synthesized by hydrothermal method in the presence of cetyltrimethylammonium bromide (CTAB) as capping agent. XRD data has confirmed the formation of single crystalline cubic phase with average crystallite size of synthesized samples between 24 and 28 nm. For all the samples the resistivity was found to increase with increase in dopants concentration with highest value of 7.3× 107 ohm·cm at Li-Cd content x = 0.1. Dielectric constant values of all the samples follow the typical Maxwell-Wagner type dispersion due to interfacial polarization and were observed to decrease with increase in frequency, which is a typical phenomenon in ferrites. The coercivity (Hc), saturation magnetization (Ms) and remanent magnetization (Mr) of all the samples increase with dopant content, with maximum values of 936 Oe, 54 emug−1 and 30 emug−1 respectively at x = 0.1. The obtained data with improved coercivity, saturation magnetization and remanent magnetization make Li-Cd doped cobalt ferrites as suitable materials for utilization in transformer cores and transmission lines.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A numerical study of the ground state of a two-layer ferromagnetic bounded film is carried out. The film layers have uniaxial anisotropy easy-plane and easy-axis. All calculations were carried out for films with parameters of ferrites-garnets – Materials that admit a magnetoelectric effect. The ground state was calculated using a three-dimensional micromagnet modeling package OOMMF for rectangular films of different sizes. It was shown that in a film, along with a homogeneous ground state, the vortex distribution of the magnetization is realized. For the vortex distribution, the electric polarization is calculated. It was found that the component of the electric polarization vector of the film perpendicular to the film plane is nonzero. This is due to the presence of the vortex core. The change in the electric polarization due to magnetic reversal of the film by an external magnetic field is studied. It is shown that as the field increases, the polarization modulus also increases to certain field values, and then decreases to zero. As the transverse dimensions of the film decrease, the magnitude of the maximum of the electric polarization increases.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper we attempt to understand the role of tin and carbon in magnetic interactions in Mn3SnC. Mn3SnC exhibits a time dependent magnetic configuration and a complex magnetic ground state with both ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic orders. Such a magnetic state is attributed to presence of distorted Mn6C octahedra with long and short Mn–Mn bonds. Our studies show that C deficiency increases the tensile strain on the Mn6C octahedra which elongates Mn–Mn bonds and strengthens ferromagnetic interactions while Sn deficiency tends to ease out the strain resulting in shorter as well as longer Mn–Mn bond distances in comparison with stoichiometric Mn3SnC. Such a variation strengthens both, ferromagnetic and antiferromagnetic interactions. Thus the structural strain caused by both Sn and C is responsible for complex magnetic ground state of Mn3SnC.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In order to increase the resolution of traditional MFM and extend its applications in the past, we created an Alternating Magnetic Force Microscopy (A-MFM) with a magnetic force modulation by applying an off-resonance AC magnetic field. A new magnetic tip has been developed for A-MFM in this work. Perpendicular magnetic recording medium with 500 kfci recording density is successfully imaged and analyzed by using the new tips coated by 6–15 nm amorphous FeCoSiB-based soft magnetic film. The effect of Si doping to the magnetic film on the A-MFM imaging was studied. It was found that Si additive had no effect on the imaging properties, such as signal-to-noise ratio and spatial resolution (kept at ∼5 nm level). But on other side, Si additive significantly degraded the chemical stability of FeCoSiB film due to oxidation in ambient atmosphere. Surface passivation by metal and boron oxides is considered to have a main effect on improvement of chemical stability of Si-free magnetic coating. The results have shown that Si-free FeCoB-based magnetic tips are appropriate candidates for A-MFM imaging in ambient conditions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The NiCo2 nanoparticles and NiCo2/carbon nanotubes (CNTs) nanohybrids were prepared by a single-model microwave heating and annealing treatment. It was found that the NiCo2 nanoparticles were evenly distributed around with CNTs. As a result, the complex permittivity of NiCo2/CNTs nanohybrids could be adjusted effectively, and achieved a well impedance matching for the microwave absorption. The dielectric loss, magnetic loss mechanism and the impedance matching were also investigated systematically. As a result, the reflection loss (RL) less than −20 dB (99% absorption) were observed at 3.7–16.5 GHz with the thickness of 1.2–4.0 mm; moreover, the maximum bandwidth of the RL values less than −10 dB (90% absorption) was 4.4 GHz (12.5–16.9 GHz), and a minimum RL value of −25.5 dB could be observed at 14.7 GHz with the thickness of 1.3 mm. These performances revealed that the NiCo2/10%CNTs nanohybrids have a great potential to be used as the lightweight microwave absorption material.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.MnTiO3-doped Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 materials were fabricated by sol-gel technique. According to X-ray diffraction and Raman scattering analyses, MnTiO3 was suitable to be used as solid solution in Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 but resulted in distorted structure. The optical band gaps decreased from 3.06 eV for pure Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 to 1.69 eV for 9 mol% MnTiO3 solid solution in Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3. The magnetic properties of Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 materials were tuned from ferromagnetism to combination of ferromagnetism and paramagnetic-like property with varying MnTiO3 concentration. The reduction of the optical band gap and the tunable magnetic properties of Bi0.5Na0.5TiO3 materials were due to the random distribution of Mn cation in the host lattice as a function of MnTiO3 amounts. This work provides a new trend of selecting dopants to induce ferromagnetism in lead-free ferroelectric materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This report presents the structural, magnetoresistance, electrical and thermal transport properties of Aluminium substituted La0.7Ba0.3Mn1−xAlxO3 (0 ≤ x ≤ 0.15) compounds synthesized by solid state reaction method. To obtain crystallographic parameters, the X-ray diffraction patterns are fitted in R-3c space group with Rietveld refinement method. The resistivity and magneto-transport measurements are performed using standard four-probe assembly with and without magnetic fields. The peak resistivity ρpeak is noted at Metal-Insulator Transition temperature (TMI) and lowering in TMI is observed for higher concentrations of Al3+. The resistivity data have been analyzed in two parts. Firstly, in the metallic region below TMI the resistivity data is fitted with three degree polynomial. Secondly, in the semiconducting region above TMI data have been fitted with Variable Range Hopping (VRH) and Small Polaron Hopping (SPH) models. The Seebeck coefficients found to be positive throughout the temperature range (10 K–300 K) with holes as dominating charge carriers. Similar to the resistivity profile, in metallic region the thermo-power is explained with qualitative model based on diffusion, magnon-drag, phonon-drag and spin fluctuation contributions whereas the semiconducting region is explained with small polaron hopping model.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A great variety of human protein deposition and protein aggregation diseases (Alzheimer's disease, diabetes mellitus, cataract, systemic amyloidosis and other) have been associated with the accumulation of amyloid fibrils in different tissues. Therefore, development of the agents able to reduce amyloid deposits represents an attractive strategy for their treatment. We have investigated ability of glycine coated magnetic nanoparticles (Gly-MNPs) to destroy protein amyloid fibrils. The properties of Gly-MNPs were characterized with the aim to identify the optimized conditions for the glycine adsorption on surface of MNPs. It was found that Gly-MNPs have superparamagnetic behavior and their size, isoelectric point and stability depend on the amount of the glycine in the samples. The obtained results suggest that optimal weight ratio (w/w) for the modification of MNPs by glycine (Gly/Fe3O4) is equal to 5/1. The selected Gly5-MNPs1 were used for the study of their effect on amyloid fibrils of four globular proteins, namely lysozyme, bovine α-lactalbumin, insulin and α-crystallin. It was found that Gly5-MNPs1 destroy lysozyme, α-lactalbumin and insulin amyloid fibrils in concentration dependence manner. However, Gly5-MNPs1 were not able significantly destroy bovine α-crystallin amyloid fibrils. We assume that obtained results represent important contribution for rational design of potential therapeutics of amyloid diseases based on nanoparticles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Fe81.5Si0.5B4.5P11Cu0.5C2 nanocrystalline alloy with high Fe concentration possesses a finely uniform nanocrystalline structure and numerous α-Fe crystals with a mean grain size of ∼17 nm based on XRD patterns. Such crystals precipitated from the amorphous matrix. Favorable soft magnetic properties, small value of coercivity (Hc) of ∼4.8 A/m, and high magnetic flux density (Bs) of ∼1.53 T can be achieved by slow heat treatment (heating rate of ∼10 °C/min). In this case, one-step annealing at a low heating rate is truly antipodal to Fe–Si–B–P–Cu alloy. We analyzed the nanocrystallized mechanism during annealing with various heating rates in Fe81.5Si0.5B4.5P11Cu0.5C2 alloy, which inevitably simplified the industrial crystallization process by one-step annealing at a low heating rate.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This article describes the growth of self-assembled spinel-perovskite nanocomposite thin films using a sputtering technique. We explore the effects of annealing and sputtering conditions such as working pressure, Ar:O2 ratio, and sputtering power on the structure, morphology, and magnetic properties of BiFeO3-CoFe2O4 nanocomposite thin films. Vertically aligned nanocomposites, consisting of CoFe2O4 grown as pillars in a BiFeO3 matrix, were observed under optimum growth conditions. The magnetic hysteresis loops of these nanocomposites showed a strong out-of-plane anisotropy originating from shape anisotropy of the pillars and magnetoelastic anisotropy of the CoFe2O4, but the latter was dominant. The physical properties of these nanocomposites were dramatically changed by modulating the growth conditions, which affected the growth rates and strain states. Finally, we provide a mapping that summarizes the structure and magnetic anisotropy changes that occur with growth rate, for optimizing synthesis conditions for self-assembled oxide nanostructures.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The deformation and fracture processes of the Nd-Fe-B magnets during dynamic Brazilian tests were investigated using a split Hopkinson pressure bar (SHPB) with a high-speed photography (HSP) and digital image correlation (DIC). The load and work applied to the specimens were determined with the strain signals of incident, reflected and transmitted wave of the SHPB tests. It was revealed with HSP and DIC that at a load time before the maximal load, some cracks along the loaded diameter on the specimen surface became visible. The localized fracture strains at representable points of the failed area were given by DIC. The tensile strength of the specimens was obtained based on the elasticity theory when the load reached the maximum. The widths of the failed area on the specimen surface at the maximal load were determined with DIC. Furthermore, the fracture work applied to the specimen per failed volume which corresponds to the maximal load was given and could be an energy criterion for the fracture of the Nd-Fe-B specimens. It was indicated that the tensile strength and fracture work of the Nd-Fe-B magnets increase with the increase of strain rate in the Brazilian tests. It was shown that the transgranular fracture became visible in the recovered specimens for the higher strain rate tests.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effects of longitudinal magnetic field annealing on soft-magnetic properties (SMPs) and magnetic domain structure of Fe(82.6-85.7)Si(2-4.9)B(9.2-11.2)P(1.5-2.7)C0.8 amorphous alloys with a distinctly high Fe content of 93.5–95.5 wt% for high Bs were investigated. It was found that longitudinal magnetic field annealing could improve soft-magnetic properties (SMPs) of amorphous alloys effectively, except the one with poor thermal stability. Superb magnetic properties containing a minimum coercivity of 0.8 A/m, a maximum effective permeability of 11 × 103 at 1 kHz and minimum core loss of 0.052 W/kg (at Bm = 0.9 T and f = 50 Hz) were successfully obtained. Domain structures were characterized with a Magneto-optical Kerr Microscope to unveil the mechanism of SMPs improvement. Stripe domains were observed in the annealed high Fe content amorphous alloy ribbons with optimal soft magnetic properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanoparticles of Zn1−xNixFe2O4 (x = 0.0–1.0 in step of 0.2) ferrites are synthesized by microwave combustion method using glycine as a fuel. The structure, site occupancy and ferrimagnetic behavior have been characterized by X-ray diffraction (XRD), Mössbauer Spectroscopy (MS) and Vibrating Sample Magnetometer (VSM). Special emphasis is given to the information provided by each of these techniques concerning the impact of the site occupancy on the magnetic properties. The results reveal the formation of single phase cubic spinel with crystallite sizes in the range of 30–42 nm. The lattice constants and the lattice strains decrease gradually with increasing Ni-content. Two well-defined Mössbauer sextets in the spectra at 78 K belong to octahedral [B] and tetrahedral (A) sites, respectively, confirming the formation of Zn1−xNixFe2O4 spinel. The isomer shift (δFe) values were assigned to Fe3+ ions distributed in both A and B sites. The quadrupole splitting (Δ) values showed also that the orientation of the magnetic hyperfine field (Hint) with respect to the principle axes of the electric field gradient (EFG) is random. The nanosize samples In the presence of an externally applied magnetic field prepared exhibit the hysteresis loops of the ferrimagnetic nature. The value of saturation magnetization increases with introducing Ni up to x = 0.8 and then it decreases. The magnetic data parameters of this structure are discussed as a function of the content of Ni ions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect on the Nd-rich phase distribution of the ingot for hydrogenation-disproportionation-desorption-recombination (HDDR) powders was studied. Coercivity of HDDR powders was elevated to 1.64 T by crushing the ingot into particles and annealing at 800 °C for 18 h. HDDR processed Nd-Fe-B powders blended with Pr-Cu powders and annealed at 580 °C for 3 h were hot-pressed to obtain fully dense magnets. The microstructure evolution in hot-pressed HDDR magnets proved the impact of Pr-Cu diffusion on coercivity that the coercivity of hot-pressed magnets was improved to 1.55 T significantly. Backscatter electron microscopy and transmission electron microscopy observations revealed that the variation in coercivity owing to the diffusion of Pr-Cu along the grain boundary with heat treatment. L-TEM images illustrated the thicker grain boundary layer can pin the motion of the domain wall more effectively, resulting in a higher coercivity in HP magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The aim of this work is to study the La2FeMnO6 double perovskite system from an experimental point of view. The nanoparticles were prepared through the ionic coordination reaction method and have a mean particle size of 36 nm, as determined by MEV analysis. The crystal structure is monoclinic with P21/n space group. The 57Fe Mössbauer spectroscopy (MS) study reveals that Fe ions species have a dominant magnetic spectra at temperatures smaller than 90 K, and above 180 K the spectra are dominated by a paramagnetic component. The magnetization versus temperature (MxT) measurement showed a fast increase of magnetization at temperatures below 130 K and seems to be related to the Fe moments. The M−1 × T data follows a linear trend for T > 591 K indicating a magnetic transition at this temperature. The MS and the magnetic data reveal that for T > 180 K the ferromagnetic signal is mainly due to Mn3+–O–Mn+4 clusters. Studies on AC susceptibility as a function of frequency suggested a cluster spin glass transition at 98.9 K, and the field cooling MxH loops depicted an exchange bias effect below 20 K. Both results indicate the complexity of this system making it of great interest in basic research and practical applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, we have demonstrated a facile and environmentally friendly approach to prepare Fe3O4/Ag nanocomposites (Fe3O4/Ag NPs) by a two-step method. During the preparation process, neither any other reducing agents nor toxic organic solvents were employed. Firstly, Fe3O4 nanoparticles were prepared by co-precipitation and stabilized with the sodium tartrate. Secondly, Fe3O4/Ag composite nanoparticles were synthesized by a simple reflux method, which once more using sodium tartrate as a green reducing agent to reduce the AgNO3 to Ag NPs. The as-prepared NPs were characterized by UV–vis spectrometer, dynamic light scattering (DLS), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), X-ray diffraction (XRD), X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS), and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM). Both the sodium tartrate stabilized Fe3O4 nanoparticles (Fe3O4@ST NPs) and Fe3O4/Ag NPs showed well dispersed in water and had high superparamagnetism at room temperature, which can be quickly actuated by a small household magnet. More importantly, the Fe3O4/Ag NPs exhibited excellent catalytic properties both in efficiency and recyclability for the degradation of methyl orange (MO) in the presence of H2O2 and the composition was unchanged after 5 cycle times.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic property enhancement of alnico, a rare-earth free permanent magnet, is highly dependent on both the initial microstructure and the evolution of the spinodal decomposition (SD) inside each grain during the heat treatment process. The size, shape and distribution of the magnetic FeCo-rich (α1) phase embedded in continuous non-magnetic AlNi-rich (α2) phase as well as a minor Cu-enriched phase residing in between are shown to be crucial in controlling coercivity. Phase and magnetic domain morphology in a commercial alnico 9 alloy was studied using a combination of structural characterization techniques, including scanning electron microscopy, electron backscatter diffraction, aberration-corrected scanning transmission electron microscopy and Lorentz microscopy. Our results showed that casting created structural nonuniformity and defects, such as porosity, TiS2 precipitates and grain misorientation, are heterogeneously distributed, with the center section having the best crystallographic orientation and minimal defects. The optimal spinodal is a “mosaic structure”, composed of rod-shape α1 phase with {1 1 0} or {1 0 0} planar faceting and diameter of ∼30–45 nm. There is also a Cu-enriched phase residing at the corners of two 〈1 1 0〉 facets of the α1 phase. It was observed that grain boundary phase reverse magnetization direction at lower external magnetic field compared to the SD region inside the grain. Improving grain orientation uniformity, reducing detrimental grain boundary phase volume fraction, and the branching of the α1 rods, as well as their diameter, are promising routes to improve energy product of alnico.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, the preparation of nanocrystalline strontium vanadium nanohexaferrites was undertaken using a sol-gel auto-combustion method. The structural and morphological properties were characterized using X-ray diffraction (XRD), Fourier transform infra-red (FT-IR) analysis, and scanning electron microscopy (SEM). The XRD analysis showed that the crystallite sizes (t) of the products vary between 55 and 60 nm, while the SEM analysis confirmed the hexagonal platelet structure of the products. The magnetic hysteresis loops indicated that the synthesized nanohexaferrites exhibit ferrimagnetic-like (FM) behavior. The deduced saturation (MS) and the remnant (Mr) magnetizations, the coercive (HC) and magneto-crystalline anisotropy (Ha) fields diminished as the V3+ content increased. The Ha values are very high, pointing to the hard FM characteristics of the synthesized nanohexaferrites. Except for x = 0.0, the squareness ratios, Mr/MS, are below 0.50, suggesting the presence of multi-domain nano-sized particles for SrFe12−xVxO19 (0.00 ≤ x ≤ 0.1) nanohexaferrites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Low melting point Pr-Al-Cu alloys were employed in grain boundary diffusion for sintered NdFeB magnets. The coercivity of the 7 × 7 × 2 mm magnet was enhanced from 1000 kA/m to 1360, 1615, and 1714 kA/m by diffusing Pr70Al10Cu20, Pr70Al15Cu15 and Pr70Al20Cu10 alloys, respectively, at 800 °C for 2 h followed by 500 °C for 3 h. The optimized microstructure with strip-like grain boundary phase was evident in diffused magnets, which helps to reduce the magnetic exchange interaction between the hard magnetic grains and improve the coercivity. Under the same diffusion process, the coercivity of the diffused magnets decreased with increasing sample thickness, but 27% coercivity enhancement can still be obtained in the magnet with 6 mm in height. A Φ10×10 mm block magnet was diffused by Pr70Al20Cu10 alloy at 800 °C for 2–10 h. Up to 49% enhancement in coercivity was achieved, which confirms the diffusion ability of Pr-Al-Cu alloy. The diffusion behavior of Pr, Al and Cu elements has been analyzed by Fick's law. Based on the diffusion coefficients obtained at 800 and 900 °C, Pr diffuses faster than Cu and Al along the grain boundary. The current results demonstrated that Pr-Al-Cu alloys can effectively optimize the grain boundary structure and improve the coercivity of NdFeB magnets.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The question of creation and identification of the Faraday magnetometer working zone, in which the sample (of small dimensions) to be located, when determining its magnetic susceptibility, is analyzed. This question is still insufficiently covered from the standpoint of mathematical and physical models. There is provided a variant of the Faraday magnetometer (of electromagnetic type) renovation – with pole-hemispherical tips that are providing an unconditional presence and possibility of detecting a working zone of practical stability: both for the gradient and the magnetic force factor. It is noted that the approach to the creation and identification of the working zone must necessarily be based on a specially obtained coordinate characteristic of induction or field density. At the same time, it is acceptable to recognize the result when such a characteristic (usually nonlinear and not yielding to a desirable, even partial, linear approximation) has an inflection. In this case, a linear approximation of its section in the vicinity of inflection is possible, and hence the obtaining of stable (almost constant) gradient values here is possible as well. This is clearly demonstrated by the corresponding extremum of the gradient coordinate characteristic: in its vicinity, the gradient values are practically stable, which corresponds to one of the recognized options of the sample positioning condition. It is shown that in the case of obtaining an extreme gradient coordinate characteristic, there is an extreme form of the magnetic force factor coordinate characteristic – the product of induction or density on the gradient: in the vicinity of the extremum the values of this factor are practically stable, which corresponds to one more of the recognized options of the sample positioning condition. It is determined that for each of the distances between the pole-hemispherical tips the coordinates of the extrema remain practically unchanged - regardless of the current load, and the extrema of the force factor are 30–40% closer to the axis line of the poles than the extrema of the gradient. The effect of this distance on the coordinates of the gradient and force factor (logarithmical increasing dependence) extrema is revealed, as well as on the values of these extrema (power decreasing dependence).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Crystal structure, magnetism, martensitic transition, electronic structure and mechanical properties of Heusler compounds Mg2YZ (Y = Sc, Ti, V, Z = Al, Ga, In) were studied by carrying out first-principles calculations based on density functional theory. All compounds in the cubic phase have an inverse Heusler structure with Hg2CuTi as the prototype. Mg2ScZ is paramagnetic and does not undergo a martensitic transition, while Mg2Ti(or V)Z undergoes a martensitic transition and shows ferromagnetism, which is basically unchanged (or smaller) with the phase transition. Y and Z atoms play major and minor roles, respectively, in the electronic structure, which directly affects the magnetism of the two phases. The calculated mechanical properties indicate that Mg2TiZ is ductile in the cubic phase and brittle in the tetragonal phase, while Mg2VZ has a similar brittleness in both the cubic and tetragonal phases. It is predicted that Mg2TiZ and Mg2VAl (or Ga) are prone to tetragonal distortion.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Several newly designed Zinc-based all-d-metal Heusler alloys, Zn2MMn (M = Ru, Rh, Pd, Os, Ir), have been predicted, and their XA- and L21-type atomic-site preferences, electronic structures, magnetic properties, as well as their possible martensitic phase transformations have been studied theoretically from first principles. For cubic-type these alloys, their L21-type phase is more stable than the XA phase, that is, the two Zn atoms prefer to locate at the A (0,0,0) and C (0.5, 0.5, 0.5) positions in the lattice. Their magnetic state is ferromagnetic (FM), with a large total magnetic moment (> 3µB/f.u), and the total magnetic moment arises mainly from the Mn atom due to its strong exchange splitting. Remarkably, Zn2MMn alloys with a tetragonal martensitic structure can lower their total energies and show more stable behaviour than cubic systems. The energy difference ΔEM is defined as the difference in total energy between the martensitic and cubic states. Δ EM can be tuned by uniform strain, namely, as the lattice constant increases, Δ EM also increases. Moreover, in the case of martensitic-type Zn2RuMn and Zn2OsMn alloys, quite large c/a ratios (1.41, 1.43, respectively) can be found, which are preferable for the transformation strain effect. It is hoped that this work can motivate researchers to look for new spintronic and magnetic-intelligent materials among all-d-metal Heusler alloys.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the present study, we have developed a convenient co-precipitation route using water as a solvent for stabilization of pure La2NiMnO6 (LNMO) nanoparticles. The structural stability of LNMO nanoparticles is achieved at lower temperature (∼600 °C) in relatively short time (6.5 h). X-ray diffraction data revealed a single-phase monoclinic structure with P21/n space group. Distortion in the unit cell is responsible for an overall decrease in the cell volume of LNMO nanoparticles as compared to that of its bulk counterpart. The band gap estimated for LNMO nanoparticles is 2.61 eV which is larger than that of the corresponding bulk system (1.4 eV). Transmission electron microscopy confirms that mean particle size is in the nanoscale range and has spherical morphology. A large decrease is observed in the Curie temperature for LNMO nanoparticles which is correlated with the structural distortion. Magnetic studies indicate that there is very little antiferromagnetic antisite disorder.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.This research is allocated to numerical study of two dimensional laminar forced convective heat transfer of ferrofluid (water and Fe3O4) in the presence of a non-uniform magnetic field in a channel with a sinusoidal corrugated wall. The hydrodynamic and thermal behavior of the ferrofluid is examined using the mixture model and the finite volume method. The effects of an increase in wavy channel amplitude, volume fraction, Reynolds number, and negative magnetic field gradient on the hydrodynamic and thermal behaviors are investigated and discussed. Nusselt number is found to increase as wave amplitude, volume fraction of nanoparticles, Reynolds number, or negative magnetic field gradient increase. The negative magnetic field gradient increases the pump work with a greater effect at lower Reynolds numbers. The results of this research can be utilized to enhance heat transfer in heat exchangers and to increase their efficiency.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Stress measurement is an important field of non-destructive testing and evaluation (NDT&E). This can ensure stability and structural rigidity of workpieces. The challenging task of stress measurement is the properties characterization of the microscopic magnetic, especially the microstructure at different location of grains. The qualitative analysis of magnetic properties variation under low stress inside grain and around grain boundary are difficult to be obtained with a reliable solution. This paper investigates characters of the domain wall inside grains and around grain boundaries under low tensile stress. The domain walls of the silicon steel sheet are captured by the magneto-optical Kerr effect (MOKE) microscopy. The stress changes the magneto-elastic energy and the angle between magnetization and stress. The relationship among domain wall, magneto-elastic energy, the magnetization inside grains and around grains boundaries under different tensile stress is provided and analyzed in details. Magnetization work calculates the energy required for magnetization to quantify the difference of the magnetic domains distribution caused by increment of magneto-elastic energy under different tensile stress in different locations. The difference of magnetization work in these locations is highly affected by the tensile stress. This proposed work has the potential to evaluate the effect of grain and grain boundary on stress measurement.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Studies of magnetic adatoms on surfaces utilize experimental techniques (scanning tunneling microscopy (STM), inelastic tunneling spectroscopy (ITS) and ab-initio modeling methods. Several fundamental issues involved in these studies, being of utmost importance in view of potential technological applications, are critically examined and elucidated. This includes applications of the correspondence principle and relationships between the notions: magnetic anisotropy (MA), magnetic anisotropy energy (MAE), single-ion anisotropy (SIA), zero-field splitting (ZFS) as well as spin-flip energy of tunneling electrons and energy barrier to magnetization reversal. Proper quantum–mechanical relations between the uniaxial SIA constant K and the axial ZFS parameter D valid for the cases D > 0 and D < 0, as well as integer and half-integer spins, including S = 1/2, are derived. These considerations show that direct equating SIA with ZFS is unwarranted, whereas usage of the correspondence principle to justify such equating proves redundant. So-derived improper relations bear detrimentally on interpretation of STM/ITS and ab-initio results, e.g. for Co(S = 1) and Fe(S = 3/2) on Pt(111) yielding K (aka 'MAE') values differing from those obtained from the proper relations by 100 and 50 percent, respectively. Implications of confusion concerning the basic tenets for S = 1/2 systems, classical versus quantum spin approaches, and applicability of the crucial notions for magnetic adatoms are also discussed.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Light-rare-earth-based Pr(Fe1-xSix)1.93 alloys (0⩽x⩽0.1) with pure cubic Laves phase were synthesized by high-pressure annealing method. Si substitution effects on magnetic, electrical and magnetostrictive properties of light-rare-earth-based Pr(Fe1-xSix)1.93 alloys were systematically investigated. It was found that the lattice parameter a and Curie temperature TC of the cubic Laves phase in the alloys increase with the increasing Si content up to x=0.05, which might be ascribed to the preferential occupation of Si in the Laves phase interstitial sites. The magnetization at the maximum available field of 15 kOe, σ15k, decreases monotonically with the increasing x. A significant increase of 67% in electrical resistivity was observed in Pr(Fe0.9Si0.1)1.93 alloy at room temperature. The magnetostriction at the field of 3 kOe of Pr(Fe0.95Si0.05)1.93 is about 542 ppm, which is even larger than the saturation magnetostriction of heavy-rare-earth-based Tb0.2Dy0.22Ho0.58Fe2 single crystal (λs = 530 ppm). The attractive price, lower eddy current loss, together with high magnetostrictive response suggest that the Pr(Fe0.95Si0.05)1.93 alloy might be a good candidate material for the potential magnetostrictive applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Iron oxide (Fe3O4, γ-Fe2O3 and α-Fe2O3) is a versatile material that can be utilized in various spintronic devices. However, there is a need to explore preparation methods that can result in three important iron oxide phases using single route. For this purpose, we here report low cost sol-gel method to optimize different phases of iron oxide with iron nitrate as precursor. Precursor to solvent (water and ethylene glycol) (P/S) ratio is varied in the range of 0.08–0.8 (interval 0.08). Magnetic properties of iron oxide sols show S-type ferromagnetic behavior with coercivity of ∼300Oe. X-ray diffraction (XRD) results, of spin coated thin films, confirm the formation of phase pure γ-Fe2O3, Fe3O4 and α-Fe2O3 at P/S ratio of 0.08–0.24, 0.48–0.56 and 0.72–0.80, respectively. Whereas, P/S ratios 0.32, 0.40 and 0.64 result in mixed iron oxide phases. Formation of phase pure γ-Fe2O3, Fe3O4 and α-Fe2O3 is also confirmed using Raman spectroscopy. High saturation magnetization of 224.09–287.29 emu/cm3, 467.5–490.42 emu/cm3 and 18.31–20.61 emu/cm3 is obtained for γ-Fe2O3 (P/S = 0.08–0.24), Fe3O4 (P/S = 0.48, 0.56) and α-Fe2O3 (P/S = 0.72–0.8), respectively. Increase in saturation magnetization and decrease in coercivity at P/S of 0.08–0.24, 0.48–0.56, 0.72–0.8 is correlated with decrease in magnetocrystalline anisotropy. FC/ZFC curves indicate Verwey transition in Fe3O4 thin films at ∼115 K while no such transition is observed in case of γ-Fe2O3 thin films. FC/ZFC curves for α-Fe2O3 thin films exhibit spontaneous magnetization at low temperatures.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The intercalation of pyridine and its 3-substituted halogen derivatives (L) between layers of nickel (T) tetracyanonickelate provides a beautiful example of magnetic interaction through π-π stacking. The intercalation process results in the formation of 3D solids with formula unit TL2[Ni(CN)4]. In the interlayer region, the intercalated molecules are found coordinated to the axial positions for the metal T (Ni). Neighboring molecules remain interacting through their dipole and quadrupole moments. For a coplanar configuration of their aromatic rings, the corresponding π-π clouds appear overlapped, which makes possible the appearance of a weak ferromagnetic interaction between T metal centers, to form an ordered system of magnetic chains separated about 10 Å. The halogen substituent in the pyridine molecule modulates the π-π clouds overlapping and, in consequence, the magnetic interaction through the chain. Such interaction coexists with a weak antiferromagnetic coupling between T atoms through the CN bridges in the two dimensional system, {T[Ni(CN)4]}∝, but at low temperature, the interaction through the π-π clouds overlapping dominates. This contribution includes the study of the magnetic properties of the layered T(H2O)2[Ni(CN)4]∙xH2O precursor solid where the magnetic interaction takes place through the hydrogen bonding network formed by the water molecules found in the interlayer region. The magnetic properties of both series of layered solids were evaluated from low temperature SQUID measurements complemented with structural and spectroscopic information. The interpretation of the magnetic and structural data is supported by computational calculations on the intermolecular interactions in the interlayer region.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work we show anomalous ferromagnetic behavior in CuO nanowires grown on top of a CuO/Cu2O bilayer produced via thermal oxidation in air at 400 and 500 °C for various annealing times. Our results show that there are strong size effects as well as temperature dependence governing the ferromagnetic-like behavior of the CuO nanowires. Thinner and longer CuO nanowires resulted in higher saturation magnetization values, which may be related to the presence of well-ordered and aligned surface unpaired electron spins and a high concentration of defects. Our results also show a competition between the anomalous ferromagnetic contribution arising from the CuO nanowires and the diamagnetic contribution arising from the Cu2O layer. Finally, the growth axis of the CuO nanowires was determined to be nearly perpendicular to the easy axis of magnetization of CuO.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic particle imaging (MPI) is a tomographic imaging method to determine the spatial distribution of magnetic nanoparticles (MNP) within a defined volume. To evaluate the imaging capabilities of existing MPI scanners, their sensitivity and image resolution limits have to be analyzed. Therefore, precisely defined structures (phantoms) with various tracer concentrations are required to enable comparative studies between existing MPI systems. To support the development of capable MPI phantoms, we developed a method to incorporate different commercially available MNP into a long-term stable synthetic polymer with an iron concentration of up to 200 mmol/l. The properties of each type of polymer matrix embedded MNP were tested by magnetic particle spectroscopy (MPS). For shaping the particle loaded polymer to a phantom, we used 3-D printed molds with a structure cross section of 2 × 2 mm2. The particle loads within the phantoms were then imaged using MPI. The particle-loaded polymer is very suitable for preparation of measurement phantoms that could be visualized by MPI. Repeated shore hardness and MPS measurements up to one year did not reveal any changes in the mechanical and magnetic properties of the used material. In conclusion, we developed long-term stable measurement phantoms for magnetic particle imaging. Further work will focus on more detailed particle loaded structures in phantoms and water based polymers with a more homogeneous particle distribution.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The crystal structure, cryogenic magnetic and magnetocaloric properties in NdFe2Si2 and PrFe2Si2 compounds have been investigated. The NdFe2Si2 and PrFe2Si2 crystallized in the body-centered tetragonal structure with the space group of I4/mmm, and underwent first order magnetic transition from paramagnetic to antiferromagnetic (PM – AFM) around Néel temperatures TN of 8.5 K and 15.5 K, respectively. Under an applied-field change of ΔH = 5 T, the maximum values of magnetic entropy change (−ΔSM max) are 6.4 J/kg·K and 12.4 J/kg·K for PrFe2Si2 and NdFe2Si2, corresponding to relative cooling power (RCP) values of 0.8 J/cm3 and 1.0 J/cm3, respectively. Moreover, under low applied field change and at low temperatures, the PrFe2Si2 and NdFe2Si2 show an inverse MCE because of the existence of the AFM ordering, while under high external magnetic field change, a normal reversible MCE is observed, which is caused by first-order magnetic transition from antiferromagnetic (AFM) to ferromagnetic (FM) state.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present the preparation of a novel microwave absorber based on a combination of two ternary composites of SrFe10Al2O19/MWCNTs/polypyrrole and Ni0.5Zn0.5Fe2O4/MWCNTs/polypyrrole. The hard and soft ferrites are prepared using the combustion method, while the polymer is deposited by in-situ polymerization method on the ferritic core. X-ray diffractometer (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and vector network analysis (VNA) are used to perform microstructural, magnetic and electromagnetic characterization of the nanocomposite. The composite sown in polyester resin exhibits a minimum reflection loss of −34.5 dB at a matching thickness of 3 mm and with a bandwidth of 3.05 GHz. The results also indicate that the total EMI shielding SET in the current composite is mainly due to the contribution of the absorption component (SEA) rather than the reflection one (SER).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The mixed spin-1/2 and spin-S Ising model on a decorated planar lattice accounting for lattice vibrations of decorating atoms is treated by making use of the canonical coordinate transformation, the decoration-iteration transformation, and the harmonic approximation. It is shown that the magnetoelastic coupling gives rise to an effective single-ion anisotropy and three-site four-spin interaction, which are responsible for the anomalous spin frustration of the decorating spins in virtue of a competition with the equilibrium nearest-neighbor exchange interaction between the nodal and decorating spins. The ground-state and finite-temperature phase diagrams are constructed for the particular case of the mixed spin-1/2 and spin-1 Ising model on a decorated square lattice for which thermal dependencies of the spontaneous magnetization and specific heat are also examined in detail. It is evidenced that a sufficiently strong magnetoelastic coupling leads to a peculiar coexistence of the antiferromagnetic long-range order of the nodal spins with the disorder of the decorating spins within the frustrated antiferromagnetic phase, which may also exhibit double reentrant phase transitions. The investigated model displays a variety of temperature dependencies of the total specific heat, which may involve in its magnetic part one or two logarithmic divergences apart from one or two additional round maxima superimposed on a standard thermal dependence of the lattice part of the specific heat.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The variational study of the ground state of the spin-1/2 anisotropic Heisenberg antiferromagnet has been revisited on a square lattice by improving and correcting past numerical results. The Hamiltonian has been implemented on a square lattice with antiferromagnetic interactions between nearest- and next-nearest neighbors. The nearest-neighbor couplings have different strengths, namely, J1 and J1 ′, for the x and y directions, respectively. These couplings compete with the next-nearest ones denoted by J2. We obtained a new phase diagram in the λ-α plane, where λ=J1 ′/J1 and α=J2/J1, whose topology is slightly different of that previously found. There is no direct frontier dividing the collinear (CAF) and the antiferromagnetic (AF) order, rather, the quantum paramagnetic phase (QP) separates these two phases for all positive values of λ and α. The true nature of the frontiers has been obtained by scanning rigorously the relevant points of the λ-α plane.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The consequences of coupling magnetic and elastic degrees of freedom, where spins and deformations are carried by point-like objects subject to local interactions, are studied, theoretically and by detailed numerical simulations. From the constrained Lagrangians we derive consistent equations of motion for the coupled dynamical variables. In order to probe the dynamics of such a system, we consider external perturbations, such as spin transfer torques for the magnetic part, and homogeneous stresses for the elastic part, associated to their corresponding damping. This approach is applied to the study of ultrafast switching processes in anti-ferromagnetic systems, which have recently attracted attention as candidates for anti-ferromagnetic spintronic devices. Our strategy is then checked in simple, but instructive, situations. We carried out numerical experiments to study, in particular, how the magnetostrictive coupling and external stresses affect the nature of the switching processes in a prototype anti-ferromagnetic material.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this article we report the effect of charged impurity doping on the thermal spin-wave excitations of 2D Lieb lattice using the longitudinal/transverse and in-plane magnonic heat transport properties in a systematically Green's function approach and the Born approximation. We present numerical results for XY Heisenberg model. Accordingly, the flow of magnonic current is enhanced depending on the impurity concentration, in which (i) at very low and very high concentrations, in-plane magnon conductivity becomes negative, (ii) the magnon Seebeck coefficient decreases (increases) before (after) a critical impurity concentration for both longitudinal/transverse and in-plane components, (iii) the longitudinal/transverse magnon thermal conductivity increases slightly with impurity concentration, while the in-plane one becomes flat, and (iv) both longitudinal/transverse and in-plane magnonic heat transport efficiencies decrease (increase) at low (high) temperatures with low impurity concentrations, whereas become flat (decrease) at high impurity concentrations. Our results are useful for the implementation of a new spin energy conversion and capable spin-filter devices for the spintronic community.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Electron paramagnetic resonance (EPR) study of the impurity Gd3+ ions in the multi-site SrY2O4 crystal isostructural to the magnetically-frustrated SrGd2O4 compound is reported. Analysis of the angular dependences of the EPR spectra at room temperature allowed us to establish the spin-level energy patterns in the ground states of the Gd3+ ions at the Y(1) and Y(2) sites. Parameters of the spin-Hamiltonian in the frames related to the crystal axes and to the principal center axes are determined.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the search of functional diluted magnetic semiconductors, a study of effects of Mn ions implantation on structural and magnetic properties of AlInN/GaN/sapphire films is reported. Mn ions at 200 keV were implanted into the layers at three doses 5 × 1014 cm−2, 5 × 1015 cm−2 and 5 × 1016 cm−2. The as-implanted samples were thermally annealed and investigated by using X-ray diffraction (XRD), Rutherford backscattering spectroscopy (RBS) and vibrating sample magnetometry (VSM). The structural analysis of the samples indicated that the sample implanted at dose of 5 × 1014 cm−2 and thermally annealed at 750 °C exhibited good crystalline recovery. The ferromagnetism of the samples was investigated by recording magnetization as a function of applied magnetic field. The magnetic characterizations exhibited well shaped hysteresis at room temperature which indicates presence of high temperature ferromagnetism in the samples. The findings of this work pointed out that AlInN/GaN samples implanted with Mn ions at dose of 5 × 1016 cm−2 and annealing at 750 °C exhibited maximum magnetization. On the basis of first principles calculations, it is predicted that p–d interaction is the mechanism of ferromagnetic ordering in the material.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Low-energy magnetic excitation of spin-density wave (SDW) was measured using a single crystal of Cr0.99Fe0.01 by cold neutron triple-axis spectroscopy. Because of the unchanged incommensurate Q and the constant line width in 2.5⩽ℏω⩽6 meV, the magnetic excitation could not be explained with a conventional dispersion of ℏωq∝q. Here, we conjectured the presence of standing waves, which would be excited in local spin matrices. The effectively vertical dispersion was attributed to the longitudinal spin fluctuation in the spin matrices. A series of low-energy magnetic excitations in Cr alloys could be understood with the coexistence of the standing waves and progressive waves such as spin waves.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In order to study the substrate influence in Mg ferrite properties, thin films were simultaneously grown by DC magnetron sputtering on different substrates (MgO (1 0 0) and SrTiO3 (1 0 0)). In both cases samples show high values of saturation magnetization and Curie temperatures above room temperature. While in the case of the sample grown on MgO the hysteresis loops indicate the existence of more than one ferrimagnetic component and lower value of remanence to saturation ratio, the deposited one on SrTiO3 is mono-component and has a rectangular-shape magnetic loop at all temperatures below 300 K. The difference is attributed to different microstructures due to the misfit strain caused by the different lattice constants between substrates and ferrite. The electric transport and photoconductivity properties have been investigated on both samples. Thin film growth on STO presents an increase around 40% of the photoconductance in the near UV range. The photocurrent shows two clear onsets that coincide with the indirect and direct band gaps of STO indicating the important role of this substrate in the generation of photo carriers.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.With the advent of high performance permanent magnets based on the rare-earth (RE) elements such as Sm-Co, Nd-Fe-B alloys in 1980s, the application areas have been extended from the electronics to hybrid electric vehicles and wind turbines etc. However, the advantages of these RE based magnets may be overshadowed by the supply constraints, high prices and environmental issues. Much attention has been paid on non-RE element based permanent magnetic materials as next generation of permanent magnetic materials, due to low cost, large coercivity and high Curie temperatures (working temperatures). A variety of methods are available to manufacture RE-free permanent magnetic materials in bulk, nanostructure, nanocomposite and thin films. The proper scale-up methods to produce magnetic nanostructures with high energy efficiency have still been a significant challenge, which are very important to the development of novel RE-free permanent magnetic materials to meet tomorrow's energy needs. In this review paper, we emphasize to introduce the prospect and status of developments of iron-based RE-free hard-magnetic nanomaterials involving magnetic thin films, nanocomposites and nanostructures.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Recently, we reported the application of magnetic particles as temperature sensors for use in magnetic resonance imaging thermometry (tMRI). In this novel method, the brightness of the magnetic resonance (MR) image changes with temperature due to a temperature-dependent local magnetic field inhomogeneity caused by the dipolar field of the magnetic particles. Ferrites are new and promising compounds for tMRI applications because of their biocompatibility and because their magnetic properties can be varied by changing composition. Earlier studies used micrometer sized ferrite particles in a proof-of-concept demonstration. However, such large particles cannot be administered intravenously for in-vivo use. In this report, we establish the use of nanoscale ferrite particles as temperature sensors for tMRI. Scanning transmission electron microscopy and X-ray diffraction demonstrate the synthesis of 210 nm Co0.3Zn0.7Fe2O4 clusters comprised of 10–30 nm crystallites. Temperature-dependent magnetization measurements reveal a Curie temperature of around 275 K. We conducted nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) and MRI studies of samples with different concentrations of ferrite nanoparticles suspended in agar gel. The relative MR image intensity shows a near-linear temperature dependence. At concentrations as low as 0.12 g/L these ferrite nanoparticles provide sufficient image contrast to determine temperature changes with accuracy of ±1.0 K at 310 K, bolstering the potential viability of this material for bio-medical applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of manganese ferrite doped with lanthanum and gadolinium having compositional formula MnRExFe2−xO4 (where RE = La3+, Gd3+ and x = 0.02, 0.04, 0.06, 0.08, 0.10) synthesized by co-precipitation method have been investigated. The compositional variation of the magnetic properties for each rare earth ion was studied individually first. Then, the variation of the magnetic properties with the substitution of the two different ion having different magnetic moments was compared. Saturation magnetization of non-magnetic ion (La3+) substituted MnFe2O4 was found to be superior to that of magnetic ion (Gd3+) substituted MnFe2O4. The observed result was explained in terms of Neel's theory of ferrimagnetism, distribution of cations and magnetic moment of the associated cations. Law of approach to saturation (LAS) was adopted to investigate the dependency of magnetization on the applied field. A strong dependence of magnetic property on the distribution of cations which is specific to the particular rare earth ion was revealed in the present study.© 2018In this study, a coercivity mechanism has been suggested for exchange coupled soft/hard nanocomposite magnets to estimate the coercive field from maximum domain wall energy gradient at the soft/hard phase grain boundary. A derivable function γ(x) has been suggested near the soft/hard grain boundary to reflect detailed microstructures (e.g. grain sizes of hard and soft phases) and the coercivity has been expressed by the first derivative dγ(x)/dx. Using the model, for exchange coupled Nd2Fe14B/α-Fe nanocomposite multilayer systems, relation between the coercivity and α-Fe layer thickness has been estimated and analyzed by comparing with the results from prior experimental and micromagnetic studies.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report a room temperature (RT) magnetic memory effect induced by pulsed magnetic field in an assembly of Ferrimagnetic (FiM) and antiferromagnetic (AFM) exchange biased NiFe2O4/NiO nanocomposites. After cooling the system at low magnetic field (H = 200 Oe) combined with a series of field pulse treatment at several intermittent temperatures from 400 K to 100 K, the warming-up magnetization curve can exhibit a magnetization memory at the temperatures where field pulse was applied. Based on magnetic memory measured under different conditions, the magnitude of memory effect is revealed to be tunable by different pulsed-field strength and field pulse sequence, and it is insensitive to the low temperature time magnetization relaxation M(t) treatment. The origin of this field pulse driven memory effect can be understood in terms of the multiple distribution of magnetic state with different energy scales including the interfacial exchange interactions from the FiM and AFM phases.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the previous experimental study, we succeeded in verifying that the negative magnetorheological characteristics are observable in a hematite particle suspension, which was predicted by a theoretical study based on the orientational distribution function. The present study further advances the experimental investigation of the negative magnetorheological effect in order to obtain more detailed data of these negative magnetorheological characteristics. The viscosity contribution from magnetic properties has been measured using a cone-plate-type rheometer, located in the uniform area of the magnetic field, under various conditions of the magnetic field strength and the weight percent concentration. It is seen that a contribution to the viscosity of a hematite-glycerol-water dispersion from its magnetic properties, becomes negative and attains to a minimum value, after which the effect decreases and finally becomes positive with increasing magnetic field strength. These characteristics of the negative viscosity are in good agreement with the theoretical prediction that was obtained by the orientational distribution function.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic dilution and NEXAFS spectroscopy were used in the study of iron-containing solid solutions Bi2MNb2O9 (M – Ba, Sr) with layered perovskite-like structure. The analysis of the NEXAFS Fe2p-spectra of iron-containing solid solutions and iron oxides revealed that the studied Fe atoms were mainly in the +3 oxidation state. The study of magnetic susceptibility of the Bi2Ba(Sr)Nb2−2xFe2xO9−δ solid solutions showed the influence of atoms of the second coordination sphere on the distribution, degree of clustering, and intensity of exchange interactions in clusters of iron atoms. It was established that iron (III) atoms exhibited selectivity in filling the cation positions, preferring less distorted octahedral positions. The substitution of barium with strontium atoms led to intensification of the exchange of the ferromagnetic type and to a decrease in the degree of clustering of iron atoms in the solid solutions Bi2SrNb2−2xFe2xO9−δ.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The orthorhombic antiferromagnetic compound CuMnAs was recently predicted to be an antiferromagnetic Dirac semimetal if both the Ry gliding and the S2z rotational symmetries are preserved in its magnetic ordered state. In our previous work on Cu0.95MnAs and Cu0.98Mn0.96As, we showed that in their low temperature commensurate antiferromagnetic state the b-axis is the magnetic easy axis, breaking the S2z symmetry and resulting in a polarized surface state that could make this material potentially interesting for antiferromagnetic spintronics. In this paper, we report a detailed study of the anisotropic magnetic properties and magnetoresistance of Cu0.95MnAs and Cu0.98Mn0.96As. Our study shows that in Cu0.95MnAs the magnetic easy axis is along the b direction and the hard axis is along c. Furthermore, it reveals that Cu0.95MnAs features a spin-flop phase transition at high temperatures and low fields when the field is applied along the easy b axis. However, no metamagnetic transition is observed for Cu0.98Mn0.96As, indicating that the magnetic interactions in this system are very sensitive to Cu vacancies and Cu/Mn site mixing.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of Ni2+ substitution on the magneto-transport properties and the concomitant relationship with the magnetocaloric function of nano-sized La0.7Ca0.3Mn1−xNixO3 (x = 0, 0.02, 0.07, and 0.10) perovskite manganites are reported. All the samples were synthesized using the auto-combustion method. X-ray diffraction analysis studies confirmed the phase purity of the synthesized samples. The substitution of Mn3+ ions with Ni2+ ions in the La0.7Ca0.3MnO3 lattice was also verified using this technique. Rietveld analysis indicated that the volume of the unit cell increased with increasing Ni2+ content. Zero-field-cooled and field-cooled magnetization showed that all samples underwent a paramagnetic-ferromagnetic phase transition, which was concomitant with a metal-insulator transition. A small deviation between the zero-field-cooled and field-cooled magnetization curves was observed when the measurements were carried out in a field of 1000 Oe. The Curie temperature decreased systematically from 264 K for x = 0 to 174 K for x = 0.10. Probably the doping at the Mn3+ sites with Ni2+ ions in the La0.7Ca0.3MnO3 lattice weakened the Mn3+-O-Mn4+ double exchange interaction, which led to a decrease in the transition temperature. The metal-insulator transition also shifted to lower temperatures upon Ni2+ substitution, and the value of the resistivity increased. Different conduction mechanisms were found in different temperature regions. Important physical parameters such as the polaron activation energy were obtained from the fit of the models to the experimental data. Arrot's plots revealed a second-order nature of the magnetic transition for all the samples, which was also confirmed by Landau's theory and universal curves. The second-order character of the magnetic phase transition observed in the pristine La0.7Ca0.3MnO3 sample may be attributed to effects of the downsizing of the particle. Interestingly, a notable increase in the value of the magnetic entropy change was observed at Ni2+ doping levels as low as 2%. The magnetoresistance underwent a great change near the magnetic transition temperature, suggesting a close relationship between the magnetocaloric effect and magnetotransport properties in La0.7Ca0.3MnO3 manganites. Such behavior can be attributed to the spin order/disorder feature, which plays a crucial role in both effects. On the other hand, the value of the magnetoresistance of the pristine La0.7Ca0.3MnO3 sample increased upon Ni2+ doping, which is probably related to the downsizing of the particles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnet-assisted transfection or magnetofection refers to the delivery of nucleic acids to target cells with the help of conjugated superparamagnetic iron oxide nanoparticles (SPIONs) and external magnetic fields generated by permanent magnet plates. The external magnetic field, among other parameters, directly affects the transfection efficiency. However, standard permanent magnet plates generate static magnetic fields which are not as effective compared to time-varying, dynamic fields. In this work, we show a new and novel “AC magnet plate” compatible with standard 96-well cell culture plates, which can be easily adapted for benchtop use in a typical lab setting. We provide full design details, modelling, fabrication, measurement and testing on human embryonic kidney cells (HEK 293) to show transfection improvement. We perform magnetofection under different field conditions and show that with increasing AC content, efficiency of transfection is improved.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report on the novel cycloids that can be realized in epitaxial BiFeO3 films. We found two featured (1 1 0) and (11¯0) plane cycloids in the (1 1 0) oriented BiFeO3 film and considered the action of compressive and tensile deformations on the areas of the cycloids stability. Our findings show that additional magnetic anisotropy induced by the strains allocates cycloids with the definite directions of spin rotation and electric polarization and change the properties of space modulated structures. Until now, it was believed that polarization is linked with antiferromagnetic order throughout the plane of spin rotation, namely it was considered that polarization always lies in the cycloid spin rotation plane. We show that due to the action of epitaxial strains spin rotational plane of the cycloid deviates from the plane containing intrinsic spontaneous polarization Ps.© 2018The high-coercivity Nd-Fe-B magnets with “core-shell” structure grains were prepared by doping TbCu powders and hot pressing after pre-sintering in the traditional powder metallurgy process. The coercivity for the hot-pressed pretreated Nd-Fe-B magnet is obviously enhanced to 28.6 kOe from 24.3 kOe by TbCu alloy doping. The Tb contents at the shell structure of grain in the hot-pressed pretreated magnet is 5.7 wt% while that in the dual-alloy magnet is 3.0 wt%. The enrichment of Tb elements in the shell layer further enhances the anisotropy of the grain surface and effectively improves the utilization efficiency of heavy rare earths. The existence of the hard (Tb, Nd)2Fe14B shell, which can effectively inhibit the reverse nucleation of magnetic domains, contribute to enhance the coercivity with few reduction of the remanence. Compared with the grain boundary diffusion process, this technology can be used to prepare large pieces of high performance Nd-Fe-B bulk magnets without diffusion depth limit.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Surface effects in zirconium dioxide (ZrO2) coated manganese ferrite (MnFe2O4) nanoparticles have been studied by using dc and ac magnetization. The average crystallite size of MnFe2O4 and ZrO2 phase was about 9 and 4 nm, respectively as determined by Debye-Scherrer's formula. TEM images revealed that the nanoparticles are spherical in shape with less agglomeration. Selected area electron diffraction analysis shows two different crystalline species such as nanoparticle's core MnFe2O4 and coating ZrO2, which was in agreement with the XRD analysis. Effective anisotropy constant (Keff = 3 × 1004 erg/cm3) as deduced from simulated ZFC/FC curves is close to bulk value (Kbulk = 2.5 × 1004 erg/cm3) which is due to weak contribution of surface anisotropy. Saturation magnetization showed an increasing trend at low temperatures (more pronounced below 50 K) which is again due to reduced surface spins disorder. Temperature dependent coercivity revealed a sharp increase at 5 K, which is due to the surface spins freezing. The Arrhenius law fit to frequency shift of TB in ac susceptibility revealed weak interparticle interactions. The nanoparticles showed slow spin relaxation in ZFC protocol which signify the presence of disorder in our nanoparticles, however the value of shape parameter β lies outside the spin-glass regime. In summary, non-magnetic ZrO2 coating on these fine MnFe2O4 nanoparticles reduces their surface energy, magnetic interparticle interactions and surface effects, which are not sufficient to establish a spin-glass behaviour.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.A nonmagnetic CoRu alloy was studied as a matching layer for the epitaxial growth of a CoCr22Pt14B4 magnetic layer with hcp (1 1 0) crystal orientation on CrTi-alloy underlayers with bcc (1 0 0) crystal orientation. The CoRu matching layer realizes in-plane c-axis orientation, (1 1 0), of the CoCrPtB layer which has the same hcp structure as the CoRu has, and increases magnetic coercivity due to its magnetocrystalline anisotropy. Moreover, the combination of CrTi10Mo10 or CrTi10W10 underlayer with the CoRu40 layer could significantly improve the (1 1 0) orientation of the CoCrPtB layer and increase the coercivity compared to that of CrTi20 binary alloy underlayer with the CoRu40 layer.© 2018Applicability of the Maxwell relation (MR) to the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) of ferromagnets with the first order transition (FOT) is studied by comparing the MCEs obtained without and with the aid of the MR. For this purpose, we first introduce a phenomenological free energy which gives the FOT of the ferromagnetic system, on the basis of which temperature T- and magnetic field H-dependences of the magnetization, and the magnetic phase diagram in the T-H plane are described. This free energy is also used to derive the entropy change induced by H,ΔS(H), without the aid of the MR. This entropy change ΔS(H) judges those obtained with the aid of the MR in the subsequent calculations. The a priori application of the MR to the MCE of ferromagnets with the FOT, where the MR is treated as done on ferromagnets with the second order transition, is simulated by substituting the calculated magnetization into the MR. The MCE obtained by this a priori application of the MR is shown to exhibit its insufficient agreement with the MCE without the aid of the MR. Especially, the steeple-like shape of the T-dependence of the entropy change and its maximum value going to 0 at H→0 are ascribed to the a priori application of the MR. On the other hand, the straight application of the MR is confirmed to successfully produce ΔS(H) without the aid of the MR also in the case of the FOT ferromagnet. The MR is extensively applied to analyses of the MCEs of ferromagnets which exhibit hysteretic phenomena around the FOT. Even in the presence of the hysteresis in a narrow region around the FOT, the analyses by use of the MR are shown to produce the maximum value of the entropy change and the adiabatic transition temperature change which are close to those in the absence of the hysteresis. Finally, careful numerical calculations in using the MR are also described.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Measurement of extremely weak magnetic fields in double-resonance atomic magnetometers based on resonant optical excitation has been an active area of research in recent years. Magnetometer sensitivity can be improved via detection of higher harmonics of the magnetic resonance, a resonance which has a maximum sensitivity under conditions where the ratio of the amplitude to the line-width of the resonance signal is maximized. Based on the Bloch theorem, we analyze the time evolution of the spin polarization corresponding to each harmonic component of the resonance signal and measure this progression experimentally. Our results revealed that there is an optimal harmonic number for achieving the highest sensitivity. We have shown that the longitudinal and transverse relaxation times of spin polarization can manipulate the harmonics with the best sensitivity while the excitation frequency is detuned from the Larmor frequency.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The metallic Ni–5 at.%W (Ni5W) substrate with sharp cube texture is found as one of the promising candidates used for fabrication of coated conductors. However, the alternating current (AC) loss, partly contributed by the ferromagnetic Ni5W substrate is unavoidable. In this work, we analyzed the evolution of magnetic properties of Ni5W substrates via the cube texture development. The results revealed that the cube texture has an important impact related to size advantage during recrystallization, leading towards the consumption of the deformation and other orientational grains, and hence giving rise to form a sharp cube texture. Increasing the annealing temperature, the grain size is found to be increased. In the fully developed cube-textured substrate, the grain boundary was replaced by small angle grain boundaries (SAGBs). Also the magnetic domain structure was transformed from 180°-structure to a branched one with the increasing annealing temperature. This transformation is dependent on the increase of grain size, particularly, the SAGBs plays an important role in the formation of perfect domain structure. Increased coercivity and hysteresis loss in the fully textured substrate can be attributed towards the ideal cube texture and perfect complex domain structure. Therefore, a potential solution has been proposed to resolve this limitation of the sharp cube texture and increased hysteresis loss in Ni5W substrates.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The crystalline garnet Mn3Fe2Si3O12 and an amorphous phase of the same nominal composition are synthesized at high pressure. The magnetic properties of the two forms are reported. Both phases order antiferromagnetically. The crystalline phase exhibits a Curie-Weiss theta of −37.2 K, with a sharp ordering transition at 12 K. The glassy phase exhibits a larger antiferromagnetic Curie-Weiss theta, of −89.7 K, with a broad ordering transition observed at 2.5 K. The amorphous phase shows a much higher degree of magnetic frustration than the crystalline phase; it exhibits spin-glass behavior and is determined to have an actual composition of Mn3Fe2Si3O13.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Superior corrosion-resistant magnetic graphene foams decorated by Fe3O4 (MGF@Fe3O4) have been constructed through in-situ simultaneous deposition of ferrous ion (Fe2+) induced graphene oxide (GO). Their chemical composition, micro structure and properties were investigated in detail by Raman spectroscopy, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS), X-ray diffraction (XRD), scanning electron microscopy (SEM), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) and vector network analyzer. These 3D porous MGF@Fe3O4 exhibit much better electromagnetic wave (EMW) absorption properties and corrosion resistance than 2D hybrid materials of magnetic metal particles and graphene sheets. The tunable EMW absorption performance can be easily implemented by tailoring their micro structure. Their minimum reflection loss (RLmin) value reaches −64.4 dB at 10.8 GHz and maximum effective absorption bandwidth (EAB) is up to 6.0 GHz from 12 GHz to 18 GHz with a matching thickness of 2.4 mm. After treatment in hydrochloric acid for 70 days, the acid-treated MGF@Fe3O4 still keeps excellent EMW absorption performance with their decrease of saturation magnetization lower than 16%.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetoelectric (ME) nanocomposites is a topic of intensive research due to their superficial potential in spintronic applications. In the present work, the magnetic field controlled electrical polarization is studied in hydrothermally synthesized multiferroic 0.25BaTiO3-0.75CoFe2O4 (BTO-CFO) nanocomposite. This multiferroic heterostructure is combined ferrimagnetic (CFO) with ferroelectric/piezoelectric (BTO) and achieved strain-mediated ME effect, which can effectively mediate magnetic anisotropy. The X-ray diffraction pattern confirmed polycrystalline phases of spinel CFO and tetragonal BTO, for which the compressive lattice strain is made. The microstructural study has evaluated BTO-CFO nanoparticles formation and the value of d-lattice spacing is calculated. The room temperature magnetic hysteresis is arising which depends on CFO inversion degree, and the change in bond-angle/length along A and B-sites. The ferroelectric hysteresis is measured at room temperature, which changed with applied magnetic field, i.e., the phenomenon of reduction in domain wall pinning related with oxygen vacancies and grain boundaries effect. The magnetic field is also influenced impedance spectra to induce magnetoimpedance effect and the positive value of magnetoresistance is obtained. A giant magnetodielectric coefficient up to −27% is obtained at 1 kOe of field. A strain mediated ME coupling enhancement is obtained.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic hyperthermia is one of the most effective methods for treatment of cancer. In this work we discuss synthesis of magnetic iron oxide nanorods (IONRds) and their application for enhanced magnetic hyperthermia. By microwave irradiation the monodisperse water-soluble IONRds with clear morphology were obtained. Magnetic measurements showed that such IONRds have high value of coercivity (141 Oe). Moreover, hyperthermia experiments with synthesized samples were carried out. At the frequency and field strength of alternating magnetic field (AMF) f = 261 kHz H = 20 kA m−1 the specific absorption rate (SAR) and intrinsic loss power (ILP) values were equal to 147 W g−1 and 1.4 nHm2 kg−1 respectively, which confirms the efficiency of synthesized nanorods in hyperthermia applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Surface modification of nanoparticles with various biologically active molecules makes it possible to realize the huge biomedical potential of various nanoobjects. Functionally active particles are usually obtained through stabilization by polymers and subsequent chemical conjugation with biomolecules, such as, antibodies or aptamers. This entails a number of problems, such as non-oriented conjugation, low coupling yield and the inability to easily vary the attached components on demand. To solve this problem, we developed a novel method of magnetite nanoparticles stabilization with simultaneous modification by functionally active protein – Barstar, for subsequent self-assembly of the necessary components with these particles through the interaction of high-affinity protein pair Barnase ∗ Barstar (Kaff = 1014 M−1). Namely, we developed a biocompatible Bs-C-Mms6 fusion protein containing the C-terminal part of the Mms6 (magnetite-binding protein of magnetotactic bacteria) and Barstar (an inhibitor of bacterial ribonuclease Barnase). We obtained stable in PBS magnetite nanoparticles modified with Bs-C-Mms6. These particles can be used for self-assembly with any type of Barnase-containing molecules. To demonstrate the effectiveness of this approach for the development of targeted nanoparticles, we performed a self-assembly of these particles with a fusion protein of Barnase and DARPin9.29, namely DARPin9.29-Bn. DARPin9.29 recognizes the extracellular domain of clinically important HER2/neu oncomarker. We have shown that such particles selectively bind this oncomarker and can be used to detect HER2/neu-positive cancer cells for diagnostic purposes.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Mechanically alloying equiatomic Ni, Co, and Fe powder blends for 9 h resulted in the formation of nanocrystalline equiatomic NiCoFe alloy powders comprised of γ-phase. The crystallite size and the lattice parameter was ∼20 ± 5 nm and 0.3597 ± 0.0005 nm, respectively. The mode of the powders was 3–7 μm. The saturation magnetization (MS) and the intrinsic coercivity (HCI) of the alloy, at 300 K, was ∼136 ± 5 Am2/kg and ∼2.0 ± 0.2 kA/m, respectively. Both MS and HCI, irrespective of the milling media and milling atmosphere, decreased with increase in temperature from 60 K to 300 K. At elevated temperatures (400 K to 880 K), the alloy powders maintained the γ-phase up to 640 K, thereafter it was comprised of γ-phase and α-Fe. In the temperature regime 300–640 K, the percentage decrease in MS and HCI was ∼12% and ∼30%, respectively. The MS and HCI at 300 K, after the magnetization versus applied magnetic field (M-H) run at 640 K, was ∼136 Am2/kg and ∼1.5 kA/m, respectively; while the same after the M-H run at 880 K was ∼154 Am2/kg and ∼1.0 kA/m, respectively. Annealing of the nanocrystalline alloy powders is likely to improve its soft-magnetic properties.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The changes in magnetostructural transition behaviors and magnetocaloric effect with different stress states were studied by controlling the annealing and cooling processes for Mn1− xCo1+ xGe alloys. Water quenching inhibits the structural transition in the investigated composition and temperature ranges, while furnace cooling results in coupled magnetostructural transitions. An additional annealing at an intermediate temperature followed by program-controlled slow cooling results in sharper transition, higher transition temperature, lower thermal hysteresis, higher field-sensitivity, and higher entropy change. Giant magnetocaloric effects were observed at different temperature regions for the samples subjected to different thermal treatments.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The quantum nanomagnets show interesting site-dependent magnetic properties as a function of the temperature and the external magnetic field. In the paper we present the results of calculations for a finite quantum spin ladder with two legs, consisting of 12 spins S=1/2, with open ends. We describe our system with isotropic quantum Heisenberg model and perform exact numerical diagonalization of the Hamiltonian to use canonical ensemble approach. Our analysis focuses on the site-dependent magnetization in the system, presenting magnetization distributions for various interaction parameters. We discuss extensively the temperature and magnetic field dependences of individual site magnetizations. The interesting behaviour, with pronounced non-uniformity of magnetization across the ladder, is found.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the present work we study the effect of the aperiodic exchange modulation on the spin gap at finite temperature as well as the specific heat of the Kondo necklace model in two and three dimensions. For this purpose, we use a representation for the localized and conduction electrons in terms of local Kondo singlet and triplet operators. A decoupling scheme on the double time Green's functions is also used to find the dispersion relation for the excitations of the system. The influence of the aperiodic exchange modulation on the spin gap at low temperatures is discussed in the paramagnetic phase. Moreover, we investigate the specific heat as a function of the aperiodic exchange modulation at low temperatures in two cases: above the quantum critical point i.e., along the so-called non-Fermi liquid trajectory and in the Kondo spin liquid state. We have also compared our results with previous bond operator mean-field calculations.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The 3D printing compatible technology of “ferrite – nonmagnetic dielectric” composite structures preparation was proposed. Composite resonant elements for applications in the centimeter range of microwave frequencies comprising nonmagnetic dielectric BaTi4O9-ZnO and ferrite film made from spinel nickel-zinc ferrite Ni1−xZnxFe2O4 (x = 0; 0.25; 0.5; 0.75; 1) magnetic nanoparticles in the photopolymer matrix were manufactured. Microwave characteristics of the obtained composite resonators with different concentrations of ferrite nanoparticles in the film-forming suspension were investigated. It was shown, that magnetic field makes the influence on the transmission characteristics of composite resonators, namely the operating frequency, resonance linewidth and the resonant absorption level. The developed elements can be used to create the various microwave devices (solid-state oscillators, microwave filters and attenuators) with the magnetic field tunable parameters.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Co2W-type hexaferrite nanoparticles with composition of SrCo2−x(MnZnCa)x/3Fe16O27(x = 0–0.5) were synthesized by a co-precipitation method. The synthesized nanoparticles were decorated on the outer surface of multi-walled carbon nanotubes by chemical method. X-ray diffractometry, scanning electron microscopy, vibrating sample magnetometry, magnetic susceptometer and vector network analyzer were utilized to characterize the structural, magnetic, and reflection loss properties of the nanocomposites. The structural results showed a perfect diffusion of Mn, Zn and Ca ions into the crystal structure of Co2W hexaferrite without forming any secondary phases. The SEM images provide clear information about the size of nanoparticles (50–85 nm) through these samples. The hysteresis loops showed hard magnetic property with enhanced coercivity which reflects that the synthesized particles have almost high magnetic anisotropic field, well suitable for absorbing materials. The coercivity (Hc) increased from 1450 Oe at x = 0.0, to 1650 Oe at x = 0.3, and then decreases to 1320 Oe at x = 0.5. High reduction in the coercivity was detected consistent with the large particle sizes for these samples. Ferrite nanoparticles were decorated on the surface of carbon nanotubes in almost constant distance. The interacting mode was confirmed between magnetic nanoparticles by means of plotting real and imaginary parts of magnetic susceptibility versus temperature at various frequencies. Based on reflectivity measurement, the sample with x = 0.3 showed a maximum reflection loss of −37 dB at the frequency of 9.4 GHz. This sample revealed the best performance with low reflectivity and high absorption broadband (4 GHz) at X-band frequency range.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nickel oxide (NiO) nanoparticles (NPs) are synthesized using the sol-gel method. The effect of annealing atmosphere type, including air, O2 and annealing temperature (TA) on the structural, morphological and magnetic properties of NiO NPs was investigated using X-ray diffraction (XRD), transmission electron microscopy (TEM), and vibrating sample magnetometer (VSM) analysis. For this purpose, NiO NPs are annealed at 400, 500, 600, 700 and 800 °C. The magnetic properties of the NPs change as a result of increasing crystallite size in terms of TA in both atmospheres. These variations are different according to the type of the annealing atmosphere. At lower temperatures (TA < 600 °C), the NPs that annealed in the O2 atmosphere have higher crystallinity, larger lattice constant, and lower magnetization and coercivity. At higher temperatures, the structural and magnetic properties of the samples in both atmospheres are more similar.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this study, within a two-band tight-binding Harrison Hamiltonian and the Green's function approach, the influences of both localized σ and delocalized π electrons on the Pauli paramagnetic susceptibility, heat capacity and density of states of armchair graphene nanoribbons with different widths are investigated. Temperature dependence of the paramagnetic susceptibility and electronic heat capacity are compared for s and p orbitals of every width. In the density of states, an extension in the bandwidth and the extra number of Van-Hove singularities are observed. More importantly, a paramagnetic behavior associated with the π electrons could take place. Finally, a Schottky anomaly for the heat capacity is reported. Overall, in this paper, it was observed that both the σ and the π electrons contribute significantly to the aforementioned quantities.© 2018 The AuthorsA fast and cost-effective way to manufacture complex 3D structures out of numerous materials is the technique of 3D-printing employing vat photopolymerization where a liquid photopolymer in a vat is selectively cured layer by layer under radiation with light. To improve mechanical as well as functional properties different types of fillers can be added to the photopolymer. However, when fillers are added particular attention must be paid according to the quality of the resulting part (e.g. sedimentation, homogeneity, processability) which creates the need for appropriate quality evaluation. The aim of our work was to test the feasibility of printing magnetic composites which consist of photopolymers embedded with MNP. These magnetic composites are intended to be used as long-term stable phantoms in magnetic particle imaging. To assist the development of this novel imaging modality phantoms of defined geometry and magnetic properties are mandatory. With 3D printing of magnetic composites, it is possible to advance the characterization of MPI scanners with defined, long-term stable magnetic composite phantoms and opens an elegant way to print complex structures that could resemble body-like parts containing defined amounts of MNP.© 2018 Elsevier B.V. The correlative influences of calcination temperature and Bi 2 O 3 doping content on the microstructure and magnetic properties of the low-temperature-fired NiCuZn ferrites were investigated. For ferrites with relatively low calcination temperatures, such as 750 °C and 850 °C, Bi 2 O 3 doping easily triggered inhomogeneous grain growth. Controlling the flux amount to lower than the ‘critical’ value, which triggered abnormal grain growth, was preferred to obtain good magnetic properties. For ferrites with relatively high calcination temperatures, such as 950 °C and 1050 °C, flux doping was not prone to stimulating abnormal grain growth. Thus, the optimum doping content could be added when the highest sintered density was detected. With excessive Bi 2 O 3 concentrations, low-temperature-calcined ferrites could produce homogeneous microstructures with a relatively large average grain size. By contrast, high-temperature-calcined ferrites could form homogeneous microstructures with a relatively small average size, which favoured a high Q-factor and was more favourable for high frequency applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic properties of non-grain-oriented (NO) electrical steels are a direct product of their inherent material properties in combination with induced changes due to material processing and external operational conditions such as magnetization and frequency. Chemical composition, grain size and texture are elementary intrinsic factors which determine the magnetic properties. Focus of this study is to improve the understanding of grain size and texture as important factors that affect different loss-components. A strong focus is placed on the frequency dependence and concurrent loss component distribution over application relevant frequency ranges of electrical machines. Due to its impact on the eddy current losses as well as the hysteresis components, the final thickness is additional subject of this study. A total of seven materials are produced on an experimental production line from one alloy. By different production and processing steps, different grain structures, textures and final thickness are achieved. The changes in the materials are attributed to the process variations and magnetically characterized. A loss separation procedure as well as loss modeling is performed and discussed. This work is part of a research field which aims to improve parametric models with low additional computational effort for the numerical simulation of electrical machines. The goal is to improve the accuracy of models with a deeper understanding of the material science.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present spin-wave dispersion in Sm(Fe1−xCox)12 calculated from first-principles. Anisotropy in the lowest branch of the spin-wave dispersion around the Γ point is discussed. It is shown that spin-waves propagate more easily along a∗-axis than along c∗-axis, especially in SmFe12. We also compare values of the spin-wave stiffness with those obtained from an experiment. The calculated values are in good agreement with the experimental values.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Getting drugs deep into the brain to treat cancers, neurological disease, and behavioral disorders is challenging. In this work, we tried to improve the efficiency of intra-nasal transport into the brain via the cribriform plate using magnetic particles. We and others have used magnetic particles for delivering heat, drugs, and genes. We performed experiments with mouse cadavers that received 250-nm-wide intra-nasal magnetic rods intra-nasally under different combinations of magnetic fields. We found that the application of helical dynamic gradients to the particles (i.e., both rotational and linear) improved transport from the nose into the brain, as compared to linear magnetic gradients alone. On histological examination, no tracks were observed to suggest significant damage to the brain during the transport process. We are currently building a system for testing with live animals, with eventual proposed application to humans.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The self-levitation of permanent magnet in magnetic fluid has been widely used in sensors, actuators, dampers, bearings, and lubrication in micromechanical systems. In this paper, the magnetic self-levitation force (MSLF) experienced by a permanent immersed in magnetic fluid is studied, and the formula for calculating the MSLF is derived. To measure MSLF experimentally, a nonmagnetic rod is used to connect the magnet and dynamometer. The experimental error caused by the nonmagnetic rod is studied theoretically, and nonmagnetic Cu rods with different radii are used in the experiments to verify the theoretical analysis. With nonmagnetic Cu rod sticking on the top surface of the magnet, the experimental error caused by the nonmagnetic rod is negligible when the magnet moves down from center of the container. However, the experimental error can't be ignored when the magnet moves up. In addition, the simulation results are in good agreement with the experimental results when the magnet moves down.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The microstructure evolution of FeCuNbSiB amorphous alloys during stress nanocrystallization has been investigated by in situ synchrotron XRD and ex situ TEM. It is found that the average grain sizes in the stress-annealed samples (SA) and without stress (FA) are 8.6 nm and 10.9 nm, respectively. The volume fraction of the α-Fe(Si) phase increases from 7% to 64% for the SA sample and from 1% to 62% for the FA sample after the soaking stage of the annealing process. The grain size also decreases with increasing tensile stress for the different stress-annealed samples. These results reveal that the tensile stress during annealing reduces Gibbs free energy which promotes nucleation rate, resulting in significantly smaller crystallite sizes.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.It is essential to explore two-dimensional (2D) material with magnetic ordering in new generation spintronic devices. Particularly, the seeking of room-temperature 2D ferromagnetic (FM) materials is a hot topic of current research. Here, we study magnetism of the Mn-doped and electron-doped SiC monolayer using first-principle calculations. For the Mn-doped SiC monolayer, we find that either electron or hole could mediate the ferromagnetism in the system and the Curie temperature (TC) can be improved by appropriate carrier doping. The codoping strategy is also discussed on improving TC. The transition between antiferromagnetic and FM phase can be found by strain engineering. The TC is improved above room temperature (RT) under the strain larger than 0.06. Moreover, the Mn-doped SiC monolayer develops half-metal at the strain range of 0.05-0.1. On the other hand, the direct electron doping can induce ferromagnetism due to the van Hove singularity in density of states of the conduction band edge of the SiC monolayer. The TC is found to be around RT. These fascinating controllable electronic and magnetic properties are desired for spintronic applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The present study aimed to evaluate the magneto-optic Faraday rotation of one-dimensional coupled resonator magnetoplasmonic structure by metallic cover layer in each resonator. To this purpose, transfer matrix method was used where SiO2 and Bismuth substitute garnet thin films playing main building block and the gold or silver layer use to reach ((SiO2/Bi:YIG)n/(Au or Ag)/SiO2)m structure; where n and m are considered as the repetition and resonator numbers, respectively. Tamm plasmons related to the phase cancelation in photonic band gap are identified by optical and magneto-optical spectra and accordingly the phase change in the structure. Based on these modes, a wide range of wavelengths is detected by which the figure of merit increases due to the interaction of light with Tamm plasmons and surprisingly the flat optical window in this region in addition to the main resonance. These structures can open a new gate for enhancing performance of the magneto-optic devices.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The 47.5-xFe-28Cr-20Co-3Mo-1.5Ti-xM; M = Nb; x = 0.5, 1, 1.5, 2.0, 2.5, 3.0 (wt%) permanent magnets have been investigated after solution annealing, thermomagnetic annealing and step-aging process. Alloys were prepared by vacuum melting and casting technique. Magnets with improved properties were developed through a modified thermal treatment cycle. Solution annealed specimens depict equiaxed α phase grain size of 250 µm while optimally thermomagnetic treated and step aged magnets yield ultra-fine Fe-Co nanorods (10 nm) precipitates in Cr-Ti-Nb matrix. The Nb addition to 47.5Fe-28Cr-20Co-3Mo-1.5Ti alloy expands the α phase structure by suppressing the nonmagnetic phases at annealed state and promotes shape anisotropy for spinodal phases in final treated samples leading to the improvements of magnetic properties. Spinodal phases preferentially aligned and elongated close to applied field direction and retained strong Goss {1 1 0}〈0 0 1〉 orientations. The 45.5Fe-28Cr-20Co-3Mo-1.5Ti-2Nb magnet reveals Hc of 86.9 kA/m, Br of 1.24 T and (BH)max of 57 kJ/m3. High coercivity and remanence in the magnets are attributed to the ideal shape anisotropy of Fe-Co rich nanorods or nanowires.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Temperature dependent neutron powder diffraction measurements have been performed on the ternary rare-earth alloy Ho1/3Tb1/3Er1/3. A dominant hexagonal closed packed structure is found, with a surface impurity phase that does not have any discernible magnetic signal. Three different magnetic phase transitions have been identified in the sample: (1) paramagnetic to helical k = (0,0,0.18) near T1 = 90 K, (2) addition of another helix k = (0,0,0.34) near T2 = 70 K, and (3) onset of ferromagnetism near T3 = 45 K. There is a degree of ambiguity in the direction of the ferromagnetic moments, but we argue that a c-axis ferromagnetic moment is most plausible. At T = 3.5 K the magnetic moments are found to be mc = 2.83 μB, mab[kc = 0.19] = 3.96 μB, and mab[kc = 0.37] = 3.17 μB.© 2018 The AuthorsThe output power generated by a vibrational magnetostrictive energy harvester depends on several parameters, some of them linked to the mechanical source, as vibration amplitude and frequency, others related to design quantities, like mechanical preload, magnetic bias, coil turns and load impedance. Complex models have been developed in literature to reproduce the behavior of these devices. However, for output variables such as power and voltage, one moves in a space of many variables and it is not trivial to reconstruct an overall behavior of the device. The aim of this paper is to provide a wide picture concerning the device behavior investigating experimentally the output power and voltage as a function of the mechanical and especially magnetic bias, varying the amplitude and frequency of the driving vibration. A galfenol rod (Fe81Ga19) sample inserted in a three-legged magnetizer is utilized to vary the magnetic bias and to provide the flux closure to the sample, while a dynamic test machine provides both the mechanical bias and the driving vibration at different frequencies up to 100 Hz. The paper analysis has highlighted that the output power and voltage depend on the magnetic bias according to an exponentially modified Gaussian distribution. Keeping constant the other parameters and varying the mechanical bias, a family of modified Gaussian distributions is obtained. Moreover, fixing the electric load, the amplitude and frequency of the vibration, the couple of values “magnetic bias – mechanical preload” corresponding to the maximum output power of the device depicts a linear behavior. The results here obtained point out that it is possible to simplify the design of magnetostrictive energy harvesters and to obtain high output power even with permanent magnets providing a relatively small coercive field. The results have been confirmed by using two yokes equipped with permanent magnets on the external columns. The maximum output average power obtained with permanent magnets has been 796 mW equal to 6.5 mW/cm3 with a sinusoidal vibration amplitude of 40 MPa at 100 Hz.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Full potential band structure calculations have been performed on the NiAs (hexagonal), MnP (orthorhombic) and Zinc-blende structures of MnAs1−xPx (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) alloys. The stability of the ferromagnetic state is investigated by comparing the total energies for paramagnetic (P), ferromagnetic (F) and antiferromagnetic (AF) state, where different types of AF state are assumed. The stability of the different phases of MnAs1−xPx (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) is found to depend mainly on the volume and on the amount of magnetic order. It is found that for large lattice constants the ferromagnetic state is favored, whereas for small lattice constants different antiferromagnetic states can be stabilized. In the ferromagnetic state, the structure with minimal energy is always hexagonal, whereas it becomes orthorhombically distorted under pressure. The calculated total magnetic moment can be explained from the large charge transfer of electrons from the Mn cations to their neighbor As and P anions, and the strong p (As or P)-d(Mn) hybridization. We found that a particular Mn-Mn separation plays also the significant role in determining the change from antiferromagnetic to ferromagnetic order in such systems. It is also found a true half-metallic phase for zinc-blende MnAs and MnAs0.75P0.25 when the lattice constant expanded beyond 5 Å otherwise, MnAs1−xPx (0 ≤ x ≤ 1) alloys were found to be metals.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We studied the influence of various point defects such as vacancy, antisite and impurities at different ionic sites in CdO monolayer through the electronic and magnetic properties using density functional theory. Vacancy defect such as Cd, O, Cd/O, antisite defects Cd ↔ O and extrinsic B, C, and N impurity elements are considered in CdO monolayer. The thermodynamic stability of pristine CdO monolayer is studied using phonon band dispersion and that of CdO monolayer with defect is studied in terms of the formation energy. The oxygen vacancy defect OV introduces the indirect band gap of 1.4 eV while Cd/OV showed the metallic behavior. Further, CdV and Cd/OV vacancy defects showed the onset of ferromagnetism with 2.0 μΒ and 1.21 μΒ magnetic moment, respectively. In contrast, the direct band gap nature of CdO monolayer is persistent against antisite defects and also no magnetic behavior is observed. The extrinsic B and C doped CdO monolayer showed half-metallic behavior, whereas N doped CdO monolayer showed semiconducting nature. These extrinsic dopants showed the onset of ferromagnetic ordering with 0.98μΒ, 1.99 μΒ and 0.99 μΒ magnetic moments for BO, CO, and NO defects in CdO monolayer.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We investigate the tunneling magnetoresistance (TMR) of the magnetic tunnel junction (MTJ) comprised of the Heusler alloy (Co2MnSi) and the pinned CoFe to probe the spin polarization of Co2MnSi. From the TMR value thus obtained, we estimate 40% polarization of Co2MnSi, much less than 100% expected for the suspected half metal. Remarkably, upon applying the weak switching magnetic field to the MTJ in the parallel state, our system exhibits a finite open-circuit voltage on the order of several 10μV in the anti-parallel state. We have demonstrated that the reversal of magnetic dipolar field induced by the Heusler alloy as a free layer can generate an electromotive force of the same order and can clearly explain the observed polarity and sample size dependence of the voltage offset at zero bias current.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The unique magnetic properties of amorphous magnetic microwires (AMMW), in particular its interaction with microwaves by means of Giant Magnetoimpedance effect and its magnetostrictive character allow the development of tunable GHz micro-antennas useful as contactless sensing elements with applicability in many fields including biomedical. The possibility of using a single AMMW for this purpose demands the optimization and control of its electrical and magnetic properties in order to adapt them to our needs. In this work we study the changes on electrical resistance and magnetic permeability due to the stress relaxation and to the nanocrystallization induced by thermal treatments in AMMW of composition (Fe2.25Co72.25Si10B15), obtaining important variations in the sensing capability.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Low dimensional artificially engineered spintronic materials can be used to increase the density of magnetic media using energy based magnetic recording. For this purpose, magnetic nanostructures such as patterned arrays with magnetic characteristics having high uniaxial magnetic anisotropy are the new contestants in the field of ultrahigh storage media. In this context, we focus on the synthesis of nano-dimensional magnetic media consisting of Dy and Fe bilayer structured arrays, fashioned in patterned magnetic nanostructures. The dimensional characteristics of these nanostructures were illustrated using field emission electron microscopy and energy dispersive elemental mapping. Room temperature magnetic properties of these nanostructures were first determined through atomistic spin model simulations which led us to configure the experimental hysteresis loop for DyFe bilayer. The deposition of crystalline Dy and Fe through DC and RF sputtering resulted in a soft magnetic behavior as revealed by the characteristic shape of the hysteresis loops exhibiting anisotropic features. Reflection spectra for these DyFe bilayers reveal a decrease in reflectance from ultraviolet to visible region demonstrating high absorption in visible region. The variation in reflectance spectra and squareness of the hysteresis loop reveals that these nanostructures as a viable candidate for magneto-optical devices.© 2018In the present study, magnetic properties and demagnetization processes of Co nanowires with various morphologies (ellipsoids, capped cylinders, and cylinders) are investigated by means of Object Oriented Micromagnetic Framework (OOMMF) software package with finite difference micromagnetic simulation. The results show that the aspect ratio, morphology, and dipolar interactions of the nanowires play a key role in determining the switching modes and hence the magnetic properties. For the Co nanowires with the same morphology and diameter, the coercivity increases substantially with increasing aspect ratio of the nanowires due to the increased shape anisotropy when the aspect ratio is less than 3. For a single nanowire with a fixed diameter of 15 nm and a length of 200 nm, the coercivity of ellipsoids of 14.45 kOe is noticeably higher than those of capped cylinders of 12.55 kOe and cylinders of 11.15 kOe, indicating the considerable influence of the morphology on the coercivity of the wires. The magnetization reversal mechanism of a single Co nanowire is mainly described by a nucleation propagation process, which starts at the ends of the nanowires. For the nanowires assembly, the magnetic moment reversal of some nanowires occurs first, and the rest reverse gradually with increasing applied field and ultimately the reversal of the whole assembly is achieved. This process could be theoretically interpreted based on the nucleation of closure domains at the ends of the wires as well as the subsequent depinning and propagation of domain walls. Meanwhile, the squareness of the demagnetization curve and coercivity of the nanowires assembly deteriorate faster than those of the single nanowires due to the dipole interactions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The present study shows the modification of the insulator state to metallic state with reduction of particle size in (La0.5Y0.5)0.7Ca0.3MnO3 compound by magnetotransport measurements. The decrease in the activation energy as well as increase in the effective density of states near Fermi level is observed with particle size reduction. This modification leads to the decrease in the resistivity in the nanoparticle in the low-temperature regime (T<150K). On the other hand, the temperature dependent dc susceptibility data shows the evolution of the non-Griffiths phase to Griffiths phase with reduction of particle size in the temperature range 100K<T⩽200K. This evolution from non-Griffiths phase to Griffiths phase leads to the formation of large ferromagnetic clusters at the expense of antiferromagnetic interactions which is responsible for the non-Griffiths phase. The presence of the large ferromagnetic clusters helps to create percolation path for electronic transport and is the probable reason for the enhancement of magnetoresistance in this temperature range. On the other hand, enhancement of low field magnetoresistance (LFMR) observed below 100 K has been attributed to the increased spin polarized tunneling (SPT) component due to the increase in the size of the ferromagnetic clusters in the nanoparticle compares with that of bulk.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Thin films of Sr3Co2Fe24O41 hexaferrite were prepared through the chemical solution deposition method using SrTiO3(1 1 1) single crystal substrates. The influence of the annealing temperature and annealing duration time on the phase composition, structural, microstructural and magnetic properties was investigated by examining the out- and in-plane crystallographic orientation, temperature and magnetic-field dependence of the magnetization, and surface topography. The Rietveld analysis performed on the XRD patterns indicates Sr3Co2Fe24O41 being the dominant phase, according to the XRD texture analysis the orientation relationship between Z ferrite and substrate can be expressed as (0 0 l)Z || (1 1 1)STO || and [1 1 0]Z || [1 0 0]STO. The magnetization data show anomalies in the magnetic behavior occurring at temperatures close to the room temperature that are characteristic for collinear to non-collinear spin structure transitions. The magnetic-field dependence of the magnetization proves soft magnetic character of ferrite film together with pronounced magnetic anisotropy, and shows a two-step increase of magnetization at lower fields (≤1 T) before it becomes almost saturated at around 2 T.© 2018A combined dynamics for the spin and lattice degrees of freedom is proposed. For that we couple a Heisenberg spin Hamiltonian via a distance dependent exchange integral and an anisotropic correction to the lattice, where the latter is formed by a harmonic potential. With these extensions the transfer of energy as well as angular momentum between lattice and spins is possible. We test this model successfully by reproducing the Einstein-De Haas effect for a free cluster. On the other hand we find severe differences of the temperature dependent demagnetization dynamics of the new approach as compared to the well-established magnetization dynamics covered by Gilbert damping.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We demonstrate a simple structure including circular shape patterned graphene surface for manipulation of Faraday rotation phenomenon. The patterned structure can be utilized in the building blocks of vast tunable non-reciprocal components. The behavior of the structure is discussed analytically by circuit model approach and verified by numerical simulation. Obviously, manipulation of polarization rotation is attained from the circular shape pattern. Also, we show that Faraday rotation effect takes place at higher frequencies compared to the similar effect in uniform and un-patterned graphene.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The structural, energetic, electronic and magnetic properties of 5d series transition metal atom substitutionally doped blue phosphorene are systematically investigated. It is found that the spin polarized state can be induced in the doped blue phosphorene, except for the Ir- and Pt-doped systems. Spin density and Bader charge analyses indicate that the magnetic moments of the 5d-doped systems mainly originate from the 5d electrons of the TMs, except for the Au- and Hg-doped systems. The electronic structure calculations indicate that the Ir- and Pt-doped systems show semiconducting and metallic behaviors, respectively. The W- and Os-doped systems show dilute magnetic semiconductor properties and the Au-doped system shows metallic behavior. Especially, the Hf-, Ta-, Re- and Hg-doped systems exhibit half-metallic state, which can act as ideal spin electronic injection source of semiconductor. Moreover, the Re-doped system shows the largest magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy (MAE) of −30.25 meV in the present studied systems, and its MAE could be enhanced to −42.97 meV by applying an electric field of up to 1.0 V/Å. Our study demonstrates that the 5d doping could provide various potential applications in spintronics and magnetic storage devices for blue phosphorene.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The experimental data are presented for magnetic susceptibility and electrical conductivity in PrBaCo2O6– δ at 850–1223 K. The decrease of oxygen content at heating is accompanied by formation of Co3+ cations that may simultaneously reside in oxygen pyramidal and octahedral coordination with intermediate and high spins, respectively. The small polaron p-type electron transport is shown to be mediated by the intermediate-spin Co3+ while high-spin Co3+ cations in octahedral environment are excluded from polaron jumps due to the spin blockade effect.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work we report an experimental and theoretical study on the local structure and magnetic properties of Mn3+–O–Fe3+ superexchange interaction for an oxygen-vacant perovskite PrBaMnFeO5+ δ with δ ∼ 0.5. Structural studies were performed by high resolution X-Ray diffraction technique in normal and anomalous scattering, modeled using an orthorhombic biphasic system corresponding to an oxygen-rich and oxygen-poor stoichiometries. Mössbauer spectroscopy showed the presence of two orthorhombic iron sites, one ascribed to a fully octahedral coordination and another, highly distorted, ascribed to a pyramidal coordination, in full agreement with theoretical DFT + U + SO calculations. The samples showed a spin-glass transition at ∼20 K and mainly the presence of Mn3+–O–Fe3+ type-G antiferromagnetic superexchange interactions. However, our theoretical calculations using first principles also suggested that the presence of oxygen vacancies in certain conditions could be possibly promoting local ferromagnetic interactions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Epitaxial Gd1-xCaxMnO30≤x≤1 thin films were prepared by pulsed laser deposition (PLD) on SrTiO3 substrate and their magnetic properties were investigated. Similar in the bulk samples, the field cooled (FC) and zero field cooled (ZFC) curves of the films show a hump and negative value of magnetization at low temperature which could be attributed to the magnetic moments of Gd ions which order in the opposite direction of Mn ions. However, the magnetic hysteresis loop of the films is different from that of bulk samples. In low doped concentrations, 0.1≤x≤0.3, a metamagnetic transition occurs in low applied field at low temperature. At Ca concentration, 0.4≤x≤0.7, the magnetization versus external magnetic field behaves like a soft ferromagnet. In high Ca concentrations, x=0.8 and x=1 demonstrate antiferromagnetic transition in ZFC curve and thus the magnetization shows antiferromagnetic behavior at low temperature. In contrast, x=0.9 displays soft ferromagnetic hysteresis loop with evidence of training effect. It could be associated with the cluster glass peak in ZFC curve for this film.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The polycrystalline Nd0.7Ba0.3Mn1-xTixO3 (x = 0.05, 0.15 and 0.25) perovskite manganites have been synthesized using combustion synthesis method followed by single-step calcination process. Rietveld analysis of the X-ray powder diffraction patterns reveals that the samples crystallize in single phase body-centered orthorhombic crystal structure with space group Imma. The lattice parameters and unit cell volume increase exponentially with doping of Ti4+ ions for Nd0.7Ba0.3Mn1-xTixO3 (x = 0.05, 0.15 and 0.25). The temperature dependence of magnetization measurements reveal that all samples undergo transition from paramagnetic (PM) to ferromagnetic (FM) phase on cooling below room temperature. The values of Curie temperature (TC), Curie-Weiss temperature (TCW) and experimental effective paramagnetic moment (μeff exp) decrease exponentially on the doping of Ti4+ ions. The field dependent magnetization measurements reveal coexistence of FM and antiferromagnetic (AFM) states in the low-temperature region. The experimentally observed saturation moment (μsat exp) of all the samples is lower than the theoretically calculated values and decreases exponentially with doping of Ti4+, due to AFM component in the FM ordering. The negative slope in the low field region of the M2 vs. H/M Arrott-plots for all the samples reveals that Nd0.7Ba0.3Mn1-xTixO3 manganites exhibit a first-order magnetic phase transition. The critical exponents β γ and δ were estimated for Nd0.7Ba0.3Mn1-xTixO3 perovskites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.M-type hexaferrite particles with chemical composition of Sr0.8La0.2Co0.2Fe11.8− xAlxO19 (x = 0.0, 0.2, 0.4, 0.6, 0.8, 1.0) were prepared using sol-gel auto-combustion technique followed by a heat treatment. X-ray diffraction patterns showed the presence of single hexaferrite phase with no detection of other phases for all samples. The atomic ratios obtained from energy dispersive X-ray spectroscopy were close to the initial stoichiometric ratios. The observation of the particles achieved using a field emission scanning electron microscope depicted a transition from multi-domain particles to single domain particles due to Al substitution. The room temperature Mössbauer spectral analysis demonstrated that Al3+ ions preferred 12k and 2a sites. DSC analysis showed that the Curie temperature (TC) increased firstly to a maximum value of 707 K at x = 0.2, and then decreased with further increasing Al content. The room temperature MS and Mr values decreased linearly with Al substitution while HC increased rapidly to a maximum value of 9390.2 Oe at x = 1.0, which was ∼47% increase in coercivity as compared to that of Sr0.8La0.2Co0.2Fe11.8O19. The magnetic results indicated that a small amount of Al substitution in La-Co co-substituted Sr-ferrites can obviously improve coercivity with relatively high saturation magnetization.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Structural and magnetic transformations in the Heusler system Ni54Mn19Ga27 due to different annealing time are studied by X-ray diffraction (XRD) and magnetization measurements. The developing of inter-martensitic and second order phase transition are investigated as a function of the annealing time. Analysis of the XRD data reveals that the austenite state has an L21 structure, whereas the structures of the martensite is a 14M (tetragonal) and the alloy crystallizes in the mixture phase at room temperature. In magnetic measurements, these martensite and austenite phases are ferromagnetic and due to ferromagnetic exchange caused different Curie temperatures for the austenitic and martensitic states in the sample with as prepared, 0.5 and 1 h except 5 h. The saturation magnetization changed from 35 to 68 A m2 kg−1 and the coercivity of these decreased from 1.8 to 0.3 mT as a function of annealing time. And also, the magnetic entropy change was determined to be 2.4 J kg−1 K−1 for as-prepared sample and 5.4 J kg−1 K−1 for 5 h sample. At 2 T magnetic field, the calculated relative cooling power (RCP) values for all alloys were found to be 85.8, 113.8, 120.8, 169.1 J kg−1 as annealing time increase.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The low temperature heat capacity of the ErAl2 single crystal compound have been measured in the temperature 2– 40 K using a modified adiabatic continues heating technique. The magnetic contributions to the total specific heat were extracted using similar but nonmagnetic “lattice blank” which gives a good description of the non-magnetic contributions to the heat capacities. The magnetic specific heat exhibits large anomaly at the highly cooperative magnetic phase transition, which lies at about 12 K. A broad Schottky anomaly was shown centered at about 30 K. The magnetic contributions to the heat capacity of the ErAl2 compound, Cm(T) have been calculated using mean field approximation. The Hamiltonian has been taken to be the sum of crystal field and isotropic exchange terms. A computer program based on the molecular field approximation has been written to calculate the crystal field levels and the magnetic contributions to the heat capacity as a function of temperature in the ErAl2 compound. The critical exponent analysis showed that α′ ≈ α and A′/A ≈ 1.9. The low temperature magnetic specific heats behave as T3/2 in support of the spin wave excitations predictions.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Griffiths phase like behavior has been investigated in details in size modulated Sm1.5Ca0.5CoMnO6 double perovskite, having ferromagnetic entities in the paramagnetic matrix. Temperature dependent real and imaginary part of ac susceptibility confirms that Sm1.5Ca0.5CoMnO6-1150 °C bulk-sample has spin-glass like ordering below Tg ∼ 34.88(3) K. This glassy behavior is attributed to the antisite disorders (∼7.12%) along with and magnetic frustration in the system. However, the ground state of Sm1.5Ca0.5CoMnO6-600 °C nanometric-sample is observed to be antiferromagnetic in nature due to the presence of large antisite disorder (∼53.58%). The observed unusual co-existence of antiferromagnetism with Griffiths-like phase in Sm1.5Ca0.5CoMnO6-600 °C sample is rare in nature. Interesting magnetic spin dynamics and aging effect are also observed in both the compounds suggesting different spin relaxation processes in low temperature regime. The observed magnetism in these compounds can be tuned by nearest neighbor Co-O-Mn and/or Co-O-Co/Mn-O-Mn exchange interactions as well as the next nearest neighbor Co-O-O-Co/Mn-O-O-Mn interactions.© 2018The problem of two interacting electrons moving in a two-dimensional semiconductor quantum dot with Gaussian confining potential under the influence of an external magnetic field is studied by numerical diagonalization of the Hamiltonian matrix. The energy spectrum, the magnetic moment and the susceptibility are calculated as a function of the magnetic field and the quantum dot parameters. The magnetic moment and the magnetic susceptibility are shown to have zero-temperature diamagnetic peaks due to the exchange-induced singlet-triplet oscillations. The position and the number of these peaks depend on the size of the quantum dot and also the strength of the electron-electron interaction. The addition energies of the two low-lying states are also obtained by directly calculating the chemical potential. Besides, the electric capacitance is calculated as well. The theory is applied to a GaAs quantum dot.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Recent work [1] demonstrated high coercivity and magnetic moment in cobalt carbide nanoparticle assemblies and explained the high coercivity from first principles in terms of the high magnetocrystalline anisotropy of the cobalt carbide nanoparticles. In this work, we comprehensively model the interaction between the nanoparticles comprising the assembly and systematically understand the effect of particle size, distribution of the orientations of the nanoparticles’ magnetocrystalline anisotropy axis with respect to the applied magnetic field, and dipole coupling between nanoparticles on the temperature dependent magnetic behavior of the nanoparticle assembly. We show that magnetocrystalline anisotropy alone is not enough to explain the large hysteresis over the 50 K–400 K temperature range and suggest that defects and inhomogeneity that pin the magnetization could also play a significant role on this temperature dependent magnetic behavior.© 2018SmCo5 nanoflakes with excellent texture have great potential applications in high performance nanocomposite magnets, in which the phase structure of the hard magnetic phase is crucial for obtaining large coercivity. Phase transformation from 1:5H phase to 2:17 R phase is observed in anisotropic nanocrystalline SmCo5 magnets when sintering the nanoflakes at 600–650 °C. The phase transformation is interesting because the 1:5H phase is relatively stable according to the thermodynamic and kinetic analysis. The phase transformation results in much lower coercivity of the wet-milled anisotropic magnets when compared with dry-milled isotropic magnets with 1:5H single phase. Analyses of differential scanning calorimetry, thermogravity and energy dispersive X-ray validate that the phase transformation originates from the oxidation of the nanoflakes with large specific surface area during sintering. The results suggest that controlling oxygen content strictly during sintering is necessary for maintaining 1:5H single phase in anisotropic nanocrystalline SmCo5 magnets prepared by sintering the nanoflakes.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Ferrite based hard-soft magnetic nanocomposites with the composition of (100 − x) SrFe10Al2O19/(x) Co0.8Ni0.2Fe2O4, where x = 10, 15, 20 and 30 wt%, were prepared by one-pot sol-gel auto-combustion method. The nanocomposites prepared by this method showed crystallographically two phase behavior, but magnetically a good single phase exchange spring-coupled behavior with high saturation as well as high coercivity. The nature of magnetic interactions in these nanocomposites and their magnetic properties were evaluated in detail using various characteristic methods including vibrating sample magnetometer measurements, Henkel plots measurements, magnetic force microscopy and magneto-optical Kerr effect microscopy. Microstructural evolution showed formation of soft phase below the critical size of exchange length in the vicinity of hard phase. The nanocomposite with 15 wt% of soft phase showed a 10.5% increase in the maximum energy product compared to pure hard phase and reaches as high as 29.5 kJ/m3 that is a high value of (BH)max for this type of materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic characteristics of the ferromagnetic Fe-rich clusters is the key to exploring the hard magnetism of bulk amorphous Nd-Fe-Al alloys, which has not been fully understood yet. In this work, Φ2 mm Nd60Fe30Al30 rod sample was prepared by copper mold casting method. Based on the detailed microstructure analysis, the alloy is actually composed of main amorphous phase and Hcp structured nanocrystalline Nd phase. 57Fe Mössbauer spectrometry was employed to investigate the hyperfine structure of the alloy. Based on the refined hyperfine parameters, the distribution of the hyperfine field of the Fe-rich clusters suggests the typical amorphous structure of those clusters. The M−H loops measured at 5 K for the alloy after field cooling shifts upwards compared with that without field cooling. The reason could be attributed to the fact that parts of the clusters’ moments are blocked by the strong pinning effects of antiferromagnetic coupled Nd atoms, which is difficult to be reoriented under an available applied magnetic field. The present data provides some useful information for understanding the ferromagnetic Fe-rich clusters in Nd60Fe30Al10 alloy.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We studied the Fe−Pd, Fe−Pt and Fe−Cu nanocomposites formed by Fe nanowires embedded in the fcc Pd, Pt or Cu matrix. The Fe atoms form nanowires oriented along the [0 0 1] crystallographic direction. They replace second nearest neighbor atoms in the matrix. By means of varying the distance between the nanowires we arrived to the chemical compositions X15Fe, X8Fe and X7Fe where X stands for Pd, Pt and Cu. The mechanical and magnetic properties of the nanocomposites were obtained by ab initio simulations. We performed tensile and compressive tests along the [0 0 1] direction and compared the results with the deformation behavior of the fcc matrix and the known intermetallic compounds FePd3 and FePt3. It turned out that the maximum attainable stress for the Fe−Pd and Fe−Pt nanocomposites is higher than the stress attainable for the Pd and Pt matrices. The maximum stress increased with the increasing Fe content. The increase was due to the enhanced stability in the nanocomposites described by the C11−C12 > 0 condition. This effect was particularly pronounced in the Fe−Pt nanocomposites. On the contrary, the Fe nanowires in the Fe−Cu nanocomposites do not enhance the stability and strength of the Cu matrix. They even make the Cu matrix more compliant to compression. Regarding the magnetic ground states, the Fe−Pd and Fe−Pt nanocomposites prefer a ferromagnetic configuration where the spins of all Fe atoms are oriented in parallel manner. On the other hand, the Fe−Cu nanocomposites exhibit an antiferromagnetic configuration where the spins of all Fe atoms assigned to a particular nanowire are oriented parallel, but antiparallel to the spins of a neighboring Fe nanowire. The Young modulus E001 along the [0 0 1] crystallographic direction increases linearly with the Fe content in both the Fe−Pd and Fe−Pt nanocomposites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The interface magnetization and its modulation is explored in oxide heterostructures within the framework of density functional theory. In particular, modulation in interface magnetization is investigated in prototype heterostructure SrRuO3|KNbO3(0 0 1) consisting ferromagnetic SrRuO3 and nonmagnetic KNbO3 as the thickness of KNbO3 is varied. The computed interfacial magnetization is found to alternate between a higher and a lower value with increasing KNbO3 thickness in the heterostructure. The average change in interface magnetization is computed to be ∼−60% as KNbO3 film changes from non-stoichiometric to stoichiometric and ∼+60% as it changes from stoichiometric to non-stoichiometric due to variation in thickness. The magnetic moment per interface cell changes from ∼2.27 μB for non-stoichiometric KNbO3 to ∼1.31 μB for stoichiometric KNbO3 in the heterostructure. The modulation in interface magnetization arises due to spin-dependent screening of effective charge of KNbO3 unit cells by accumulated free carriers at the interface. Large modulation in interface magnetization is also obtained for other heterostructures consisting magnetic substructure and ionized planes at the interface. In addition, the alteration in interface magnetization due to ferroelectric polarization reversal in ferromagnetic|ferroelectric SrRuO3|KNbO3 (0 0 1) superlattice is explored. The resulting interface magnetoelectric effect as well as control of interface magnetization using ionized planes may have interesting implications for technological applications.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline rare earth orthochromite LaCo0.5Cr0.5O3 has been synthesized by soft chemical method with the rhombohedral (R-3c space group) structure and physical properties such as magnetism has been compared with the prototype perovskite LaCo0.5Fe0.5O3 (orthorhombic: Pbnm). The magnetic transition is much lower (295 K) than the orthoferrite LaCo0.5Fe0.5O3, although it is also a canted antiferromagnet at low temperature. However, this perovskite faintly resembles the behavior of the parent LaCrO3 (orthorhombic: Pnma), which is reported to be weak ferromagnet at room temperature. The magnetic behavior of LaCo0.5Cr0.5O3 perovskite could be explained by the superexchange mechanism gives rise to antiferromagnetic interactions between the metal cations: Co3+-O-Cr3+, Co3+-O-Co3+ and Cr3+-O-Cr3+.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We present results of experimental studies of magnetic properties, resistivity and magnetoresistance (MR) focusing on MR in high magnetic fields of (Co40Fe40B20)x(SiO2)100−x and (Co84Nb14Ta2)x(Al2O3)100−x nanocomposites near the percolation threshold. The nanocomposite films with x = 47–58 at.% were deposited onto a glass-ceramic substrate by the ion-beam sputtering. The samples consist of metallic nanogranules embedded into the nonstoichiometric matrix. According to the structural and magnetic data a large amount of metallic atoms are dispersed between magnetic nanogranules. With decreasing metal volume fraction the temperature dependence of conductivity changes from lnT behavior, matches a strong tunnel coupling between nanogranules, to the T1/2 dependence below the metal-insulator transition. MR was studied in pulsed magnetic fields up to 20 T at T = 65–300 K. The pulse duration was 11 ms. Negative MR almost saturates with increasing magnetic field but slowly increases or decreases in high magnetic fields. There is an evidence of linear positive contribution to MR above saturation at 65–300 K with the slope (3–9) 10−3% T−1. It was shown that possible reason for positive MR is influence of high magnetic field on the tunnel barrier height and as a result on the tunnel transparency.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline NiMn2O4 samples were synthesized by sol-gel method at 500 °C (S500), 700 °C (S700), and 800 °C (S800). The three samples were then structurally characterized by X-ray diffraction and Rietveld refinement. Results indicate that samples are single phase and crystallize in the Fd3¯m space group with spinel structure. Williamson-Hall analysis shows that samples present different lattice strains. NiMn2O4 compounds show the magnetic transition from ferrimagnetic to paramagnetic at nearly 100 K. Hysteresis loops measured at T = 1.7 K after cooling the samples under magnetic field are asymmetric along the field axis.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We report a Sn-bonded La0.8Ce0.2(Fe0.95Co0.05)11.8Si1.2 bulk composite with improved mechanical and magnetocaloric properties. La0.8Ce0.2(Fe0.95Co0.05)11.8Si1.2 powders with a bimodal particle size distribution were mixed with a binder of Sn powder and hot pressed at a relatively low temperature of 423 K (150 °C). The use of bimodal size-distributed powder can reduce the non-magnetic Sn content. A bimodal particle size distribution of coarse particles (180–250 μm) and fine powders (<45 μm) resulted in particle integrity even after hot pressing. The maximum values of magnetic entropy change (−ΔSM) and adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad) increased from 7.96 J/(kg·K) (2 T), and 2.05 K (1.4 T) to 8.71 J/kg and 2.14 K, respectively, due to this microstructure. The optimized composite exhibited an enhanced compressive strength of 224 MPa and a large (−ΔSM)max of 8.71 J/(kg·K) as well as an excellent thermal conductivity of about 8.05 W/(m·K).© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this paper, the methods to solve the uniformity problem of sulfur (S) element were studied in pyrite-doped Nd-Fe-B sintered magnets. With pyrite addition, the coercivity was enhanced, except for the magnets with pyrite doped by arc melting. Sulphur loss existed during the arc melting process. When pyrite doped by ball milling, the coercivity increased from 1236.3 kA/m to 1327.0 kA/m. The average grain size decreased from 9.10 µm to 7.9 µm. As a drawback, obvious sulfur clusters were formed. Jet milling was an effective way to achieve uniform distribution of S element. In the magnets with pyrite doped by jet milling, clear and continuous grain boundary phases were formed with smaller grain size. Correspondingly, the average grain size further decreased to 6.7 µm. A coercivity enhancement of 13.4% (1401.8 kA/m) was obtained with slightly decreasing in remanence and maximum magnetic energy product.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In this work, we produced Y3Fe5O12 textured films, with thicknesses between 50 nm and 500 nm, onto (1 0 0) Gd3Ga5O12 by magnetron sputtering and post annealing, and investigated the first and second order surface and cubic anisotropy constants using the ferromagnetic resonance technique. The surface anisotropy constants exhibited different behaviors with film thickness, with the first order presenting the usual inverse of ferromagnetic layer thickness. Besides this inverse of thickness behavior, the second order also came up with a constant value. In the frame of spin reorientation transition phenomenon, we evaluated volume and surface contribution to the surface anisotropy. Although the second order cubic anisotropy constant is one order of magnitude stronger than the first order, they did not show any explicit thickness dependence. The second order terms of surface and cubic anisotropy appeared to be essential to allow simultaneous fit of in-plane and out-of-plane angular dependence of resonance field. Moreover, they had to be negative to describe the out-of-plane results correctly. Our results raised critical issues that shall be taken into account when explaining the new and recent spintronics and caloritronics effects in YIG.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Polycrystalline Sm1−xLaxFeO3 (SLFO, x = 0, 0.05, 0.1 and 0.2) samples were prepared by solid state reaction method. The effects of La ions doping on the structure and magnetic properties of SLFO samples were studied by X-ray diffraction (XRD) and magnetic characterization (magnetic hysteresis loops and temperature-dependent magnetic susceptibility). La ions could be successfully doped into SLFO up to 20% without phase transformation. By diluting the magnetic Sm ions with this non-magnetic La ions, the magnetic anisotropy energy of SLFO increased first and then followed by dropping, so the exchange bias (EB) field also increased first and then dropped. Temperature induced spin switching can be observed after zero field cooling procedure.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The article synthesized the Co1− xMgxFe2O4 sample of single phase spinel structure with sol-gel auto-combustion. The lattice parameter increases, the X-ray density and average crystal sized decrease with an increase in the Magnesium content. The average crystallite size increases with an increase in the calcinating temperature. The ferrimagnetic behaviour of all samples is confirmed by room temperature Mössbauer spectra, and the magnetic hyperfine field decrease with an increase in Mg substitution, which can be attributed to the decrease of the A-B super-exchange interaction. The calcining temperature influences the magnetic hyperfine field and the distribution of Fe3+ ions at the tetrahedral A site and the octahedral B site. The saturation magnetization and coercivity have significant change with increasing Mg2+ ions, the decrease in the coercivity suggests that the sample towards soft magnetic material transformation. Magnesium substituted for Cobalt both having preference to occupy B sites (octahedral sites) reduces. Besides that increased particle size with Mg substitution causes increased distance, and reduces magnetic moment of the B sublattice.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We show that the neglect of vertex corrections in the calculation of the dynamic transverse spin susceptibility for disordered systems can lead to qualitatively incorrect predictions regarding spin wave energies and even the stability of the ferromagnetic ground state. We show numerical evidence indicating that the most critical approximation is the neglect of vertex correction in the RPA equation.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Nanocomposites of Ni-ferrite (NF) and Zn-ferrite (ZF) were prepared by mixing them at different ratio and were subsequently annealed at different temperatures. Structural studies showed the appearance of NiZn-ferrite along with the constituent ferrites in the nanocomposite samples with the increase in annealing temperature. Magnetization value increased and the coercivity showed a peak around 750 °C with the increase in annealing temperature. Both the magnetization and coercivity decreased with the increase in ZF concentration in these samples annealed at temperatures lower than 900 °C. The highest magnetization value of 52 emu/g and the lowest coercivity of 40 Oe were observed at 300 K in the nanocomposite sample with NF:ZF = 3:2 and annealed at 900 °C. The observed magnetization value was higher than the expected values whereas the observed coercivity was lower than the expected values in the annealed samples. Grain growth, intergranular interactions, formation of NiZn-ferrite and cation distribution in the spinel structure explain the observed magnetic behaviour in these nanocomposites.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Identification of unusual onset of spin polarization of N(p) states is reported. Full saturation up to 3μB (Bohr Magnetons) is demonstrated within extended two-dimensional carbon networks of CxN (x = 2, 6, 12) hexagonal structures refined based on density functional theory calculations. The cohesive energy is found to increase along the extension of the carbon network which opens perspective to experimental investigations through reactive deposition of thin films. From establishing the energy-volume equations of states of the two carbon rich nitrides done with assuming spin degenerate (non spin polarized) and spin-polarized configurations, the ground state is identified as ferromagnetic in both C6N and C12N. The electronic density of states plots show vanishing intensities at the Fermi level, whence the integer magnetizations. The variation of magnetization with volume points to strongly ferromagnetic behavior.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The thermal convection in a cylindrical container heated by a solenoid and cooled with an oil-based ferrofluid is numerically studied. The temperature and the velocity fields are compared to those obtained with pure oil to assess the benefits of using ferrofluids for cooling systems like electrical transformers. The influence of the magnetic body force on the flow and the temperature in the system is investigated in various configurations. One original result established in this paper is that the changes in the fluid properties due to the presence of nanoparticles, such as viscosity and thermal conductivity, have a significant impact on the heat transfers. A second result is that the use of a ferromagnetic core enhances the cooling.© 2018Indium-doped Ga1−xInxFeO3 (GIFO) with x = 0–0.15 were prepared by solid state reaction. Structural, magnetic and electric properties of the samples were studied. All specimen could be well indexed by the polar Pc21n space group and no phase transition was observed. Saturated magnetization exhibits a maximum at light doping sample of Ga0.95In0.05FeO3 due to the enhancement of the distortion, showing a correspondence with the variation of Fe3+ distribution difference between two forms of sites. Pyroelectric measurements show an increase of polarization after doping. The results indicate that both magnetism and ferroelectricity of GaFeO3 can be optimized by In doping.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The mean field approximation from the Bogoliubov inequality is applied to study the ferromagnetic Ashkin-Teller model in three dimensions. Phase transitions for the stable, metastable and unstable states is observed. From the critical values in the free energy of the model, those transitions are classified. Besides the free energy, magnetization, critical frontiers and tricritical points are obtained. Phase diagram is presented for a better illustration of the phase transitions and its order.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The physical mechanism responsible for Faraday rotation (FR) in magnetic molecules under the irradiation of visible light is under intense investigations. In this paper, a quantum mechanical description of the Faraday rotation is provided based on the electronic transitions between the molecular states. The method is applied on bis[tetrachloroferrate(III)]chloride magnetic molecule showing significant FR under irradiation of the visible light (λ=[450,775]nm) at room temperature. Use of dielectric tensor for the molecule in terms of oscillator strengths between HOMOs (highest occupied molecular orbital) and LUMOs (lowest unoccupied molecular orbital) leads to magnetization curve as a function of frequency. The results are obtained in view of quantitative ab initio simulation of electronic structure in the framework of density functional theory (DFT), and the wave functions are calculated making use of Gaussian 03 software within the scheme of B3LYP hybrid functional approximation. The simulation method works for discrete molecules in acetonitrile solvent and considers effect of the solvent as well. The refractive index and the oscillator strengths between molecular states are calculated using the simulated wave functions and the angle of rotation versus wavelength is presented. Comparison of the theoretical results with those of the experiment justifies reasonably the role of electronic transitions between molecular states which have not been emphasized as a mechanism of Faraday rotation in iron-based complexes.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The effect of multi-axial stress on the iron losses of a non-oriented electrical steel sheet under alternating magnetization is analyzed. Multi-axial magneto-mechanical measurements on a M400-50A grade non-oriented electrical steel sheet are performed by using a custom made single sheet tester device. The measured losses are separated into hysteresis, classical and excess loss components by using statistical loss theory, and the effect of various stress configurations on the hysteresis and the excess loss components is analyzed. By utilizing the statistical lo, an equivalent stress model and a magneto-elastic invariant based model are derived. These models can be used to predict the iron loss evolution under multi-axial stress even if only uniaxial stress dependent measurements are available. The accuracy of both models to predict the multi-axial stress dependent iron losses is found to be satisfactory when they are identified only from uniaxial stress dependent measurements. The invariant based model is shown to be slightly more accurate for the studied material.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.In the present Letter to the Editor the theories of magnetization dynamics for different situations are compared: The fast dynamics close to the adiabatic limit (Gilbert equation), a somewhat faster dynamics (Gilbert equation supplemented by an inertial damping term), and the ultrafast dynamics (combination of Boltzmann's rate equation with Fermi's golden rule).© 2018In the present paper, we studied, ferroelectric/ferrite composite materials, with different ferrite compositions, prepared by solid state sintering method in one step. Lead-Free Sodium Potassium Lithium Niobate (KNNL) as ferroelectric and Nickel Ferrite (NFO) as ferrite material (1-x) KNNL-xNFO with different compositions was prepared. Structural analysis was carried out by X-ray diffraction spectra of the composite, which exhibits Bragg's peaks corresponding to both perovskite and spinel phase. Raman scattering spectra demonstrates the characteristic phonon modes corresponding to mixed phase of perovskite and spinel phase. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) was carried out to investigate the chemical state of composites and Ni was found in mixed state. Frequency dependent dielectric permittivity and dielectric loss at different temperature exhibits the dielectric relaxation phenomenon explained by Maxwell-Wagner polarization, which is thermally activated polaron hopping for 3d- electrons and holes of mixed valanced Fe and Ni. The value of dielectric permittivity and loss increases with increasing temperature and NFO concentration. Room temperature magnetic hysteresis curve exhibits remnant magnetization (Mr) and coercive field value to increase with increasing ferrite composition, a typical nature of the soft magnetic materials.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Detailed analysis of the temperature dependent dc susceptibility data shows the modification from the Griffiths like phase (GP) to non-Griffiths like phase (non-GP) in (La1-xYx)0.7Ca0.3MnO3 (x=0,0.3,0.4,0.5,0.6) compounds with x. The existence of non-Griffiths phase is revealed from the upward deviation of the inverse susceptibility (1/χ) versus temperature plot from the Curie-Weiss behavior for the compounds with x⩾0.5. Whereas Griffiths phase is identified from the downturn of 1/χ versus T plot from the Curie-Weiss line in the compounds with x=0.3,0.4. The increased lattice distortion (with x) decreases the M-O-Mn bond angle and at the same time increase the electron-phonon (e-ph) coupling which in turn decreases the ferromagnetic double exchange (DE) interactions and enhances the effective short-range antiferromagnetic superexchange interactions between Mn3+/Mn3+ and Mn4+/Mn4+ ions above the Curie temperature (TC). The enhancement of this short-range antiferromagnetic (SR-AFM) interactions have been attributed to the conversions from GP to non-GP phase. The increased SR-AFM interactions with Y doping has also been substantiated from the magnetocaloric study.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The magnetic structure and properties of the rare earth intermetallic DyNiAl4 have been determined. Two magnetic phase transitions have been observed at TN = 20.2(1) K and TN’ = 14.6(1) K. Analysis via neutron diffraction has revealed that these correspond to the formation of two distinct magnetic phases, a low temperature collinear antiferromagnetic phase with kC = (0, 1, 0) and a higher temperature incommensurate phase with kI = (0.1745(6), 1, 0.0313(6)). The incommensurate phase consists of a sinusoidal modulation of the magnetic moment along the a- and c-axis directions. In addition, both of these phases have been found to coexist between 14.5 K and 16.1 K.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.We show how to calculate isotropic Compton profiles from sets of profiles along so-called “special directions” in the Brillouin zone computed from density-functional theory calculations, with reference to a recent paper by Bhatt et al. We present the correct formula and demonstrate the power of special directions, highlighting the importance of carefully choosing directions and using the correct weights in obtaining accurate isotropic profiles.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The equiatomic intermetallic alloy MnZnSb with a tetragonal Cu2Sb-type crystal structure (space group P4/nmm) was melted in the resistance furnace in the evacuated quartz ampoule. The adiabatic temperature change (ΔTad) and the isothermal variation of the magnetic entropy (ΔSM) of the MnZnSb compound near to the magnetic phase transition were studied. The ΔTad in a magnetic field up to 1.25 T was studied by the direct method. It was found that temperature dependencies of both ΔTad and ΔSM show a sharp peak near room temperature with a maximum at Curie temperature TC = 317 K. It was shown that there is no temperature hysteresis of the ΔTad in MnZnSb, and the maximum of ΔTad when the compound is heated or cooled is detected at the same temperature. The estimated value of ΔTad in a field of 14 T is 4.5 K. It was shown that near the Curie temperature, the field dependence of the maximum of magnetic entropy change is adequately described by the thermodynamic Landau theory for magnetic second-order phase transitions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The multiferroic materials are multifunctional materials which combine elastic, magnetic and electric properties. New multiferroic materials, namely, multiferroic elastomers, or MfEs, on the basis of polymer matrix with both ferromagnetic (FM) NdFeB and ferroelectric (FE) PZT microparticles were investigated in the work. The magnetoelectric transformation was obtained for the three-phases samples and was investigated for MfEs with different ratios and concentrations of FM and FE particles. Displacement of the first type of particles under external field certainly leads to displacement of the second type of particles – this effect we define as elastic coupling between FM and FE particles. Modeling of the mutual displacements of FE and FM particles in elastic medium in external electric or/and magnetic fields was carried out.© 2018In the paper there are presented magnetic, magnetoelectric, and magnetocaloric properties of the Fe48Rh52-PZT bilayer multiferroic composite close to room temperature. The maximum of adiabatic temperature change as well as the large magnetoelectric ordering around the antiferromagnetic-magnetic phase transition temperature of 315 K for a magnetic field change of 0.62 T is demonstrated. The application of a voltage across the bilayer structure shifts the metamagnetic transition by ∼4 K in cooling and by ∼3 K in heating. The magnitude of the magnetoelectric and magnetocaloric effects depends on the strain/stress in the magnetic layer induced by the piezoelectric one as a result of applying electric field. Such a finding can be successfully employed for controlling of the magnetic properties of caloric materials.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this study we experimentally examine the mechanical stress induced by the striction of hybrid magnetoactive elastic composites in the direction parallel to an externally applied magnetic field. Elastic samples based on a polydimethylsiloxane matrix with embedded spherical magnetic soft carbonyl iron particles, spherical magnetic hard NdFeB-alloy particles as well as on a mixture of the two kinds of powder are under investigations. An effect of the structuring and pre-magnetization of the samples on the stress induced by the magnetodeformational effect is evaluated.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.The torsional deformations of cylindrical bodies with magnetizable elastomers in a uniform magnetic field are investigated. The model of a viscoelastic material, which takes into account residual deformations (a generalization of the Kelvin–Voigt model), is used for a theoretical research. The sample elongation is described by the Mooney–Rivlin model. The dependence of shear and viscosity coefficients and of residual deformations on the magnetic field intensity is determined from a comparison of theoretical and experimental results.© 2018 Elsevier B.V.Calcium phosphates (CaP) based materials are widely recognized as the most suitable matrix for bone tissue engineering. The cationic and anionic substitutions of CaP structure by the elements and groups of biological importance seem to be the effective ways to improve the properties of CaP-based substances to achieve the material's desired parameters. Various analytical and biochemical methods are used for controlling their chemical content, structure, morphology, etc. Unfortunately, magnetic resonance techniques are usually not even considered as necessary tools for CaP inspection. Some aspects of application of the commercially realized electron paramagnetic resonance (EPR) approaches for characterization of CaP powders and ceramics (including the nanosized materials) such as hydroxyapatite and tricalcium phosphates of biogenic and synthetic origins containing intrinsic impurities or intentional dopants are demonstrated. Among them (1) conventional approaches; (2) high-frequency approaches – for measuring small amount of material; (3) pulsed methods – to study size effects, effects of the co-doping by different sorts of ions, to determine the location of paramagnetic centers, etc. The key features and advantages of the EPR techniques for CaP based materials characterization that could complement the data obtained with the recognized analytical methods are stressed.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Strontium hexaferrite single crystals, SrFe12O19, with sizes of up to 5 mm were grown by spontaneous crystallization from sodium oxide based flux. The structural and morphological characterization of the grown samples was performed by powder and single crystal X-ray diffraction and scanning electron microscopy, respectively. X-ray diffraction reveals that all prepared samples are single-phase with magnetoplumbite structure. The unit cell parameters were determined to a = 5.8832(4) Å, c = 23.0361(14) Å, V = 690.51(6) Å3. Magnetic hysteresis curves on single crystals reveal an almost ideal soft magnetic behavior, whereas a ground sample shows an increased value for the coercivity.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic and transport properties of as-prepared Mn2CoGa polycrystalline Heusler alloy were investigated. Results of magnetic measurements were found to agree well with literature data, i.e., the studied Mn2CoGa is a ferrimagnet with magnetic moment of 2.03 μB/f.u. and a high Curie temperature TC = 728 K. Measurements of transport properties revealed that electrical resistivity ρ of Mn2CoGa is anomalously large (∼250 µΩ·cm at room temperature) and demonstrates a complex temperature dependence. Specifically, in the measured temperature interval from 80 K to 375 K, the electrical resistivity is proportional to T2 up to T ∼ 200 K while at higher temperatures ρ can be fitted by ρ(T) = A + B·exp(−CT) expression. These changes in the scattering mechanisms are accompanied by a change of the magnetoresistance sign from positive at T below ∼200 K to negative at higher temperatures.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Superparamagnetic nanoparticles (SPMNP) are used in cell biology for various applications such as subcellular fractionation and for high pure organelle isolation. We simplified previously established methodology with the use of SPMNP for isolation of high pure and high yield plasma membrane from adherent eukaryotic cell line (Thimiri Govinda Raj et al., 2011, 2012, 2016; Tharkeshwar et al., 2014). Here, we show a step by step protocol for SPMNP based plasma membrane fractionation. Our research thus could be used as an alternative method to isolate plasma membrane fraction for cell biology, system biology and immunology research.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Barium hexaferrite pellets were prepared by sintering method and single crystal was obtained by flux technique. The thermal expansion coefficients of Ba0,3Pb0,7Fe12O19 single crystal along a and c axes are 9.9 * 10–6 K–1 and 17.4 * 10–6 K–1. It is in a good agreement with thermal expansion coefficients of pellets. The complicated expansion curve along a axe at 400–780 °C could originate from magnetic disordering near Curie temperature.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The study addresses the role of frequency of the AC magnetic field on heating of La0.75Sr0.25MnO3 nanoparticles. We observe (i) a superlinear dependence of specific absorption rate as a function of frequency at the body temperature and (ii) the presence of a maximum temperature at which the magnetic heating stops. This self-limiting mechanism of the magnetic heating can be used in various applications such as magnetic fluid hyperthermia or catalysis.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The generation of mechanical forces via magnetic fields, the so called magneto-mechanical effect, is a powerful manipulation tool of magnetic nanoparticles inside variable environments. The combination of alternating, static or rotating magnetic field configurations with magnetic nanoparticles allows transformation of electromagnetic to mechanical energy. Such an option renders magnetic nanoparticles, useful in biomedical research, as it is possible to functionalize them to specifically bind to malignant cell membranes and incur cell damages by exerting magneto-mechanical stresses. In order to produce these multimodal fields, a novel magneto-mechanical device was designed, manufactured and thoroughly characterized in terms of field parameters and magnetic nanoparticle properties. It consists of a rotating turntable, on which different magnetic field configurations were established by orderly arrangements of commercial Nd-Fe-B permanent magnets. For each configuration, the field gradients and mechanical forces acting on different magnetic nanoparticles, in terms of size and material, were calculated numerically by using COMSOL 3.5a Multiphysics. Such a device may be further implemented, as a versatile magnetic force performer, on cellular environments, where the magnetic nanoparticles, following external magnetic field variations, may ignite cellular processes.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The influence of hydrogen on magnetocaloric properties of three high purity heavy rare earths (R), gadolinium, terbium and dysprosium is studied. Hydrogenation procedure is performed using high purity hydrogen in a Sievert-type apparatus. In addition to the main α-RHx phase (where x is the hydrogen concentration), appearance of the second phase RH2 or its traces is detected in nearly all hydrogenated samples. In the samples where the main α-RHx phase prevails and only traces of the dihydride phase are found, the magnetocaloric effect (MCE) remains of the same magnitude as in the hydrogen-free samples. With the increase of hydrogen concentration (and with a corresponding increase of the RH2 phase content), the MCE values decrease. Only Gd samples demonstrate the increased Curie temperatures (TC = 291 and 296 K for Gd and GdH0.2, respectively) related to the increase of exchange interactions in the Gd-Gd pairs. At the same time, the Néel temperatures of Tb and Dy retain their values after hydrogenation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The paper deals with a ferrofluid-based valve which can open and close the channel formed by two coaxial cones and a cylinder in the magnetic field of a straight current-carrying wire. Numerical modeling of the ferrofluid valve behaviour for different values of ferrofluid volume, pressure drop and current in the wire is done when the ferrofluid wets surrounding solid boundaries. It is shown that the presence of limiting cones allows the ferrofluid valve to sustain a pressure drop at high enough currents. The maximum pressure drop and the needed current can be obtained for each possible ferrofluid volume.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In this work, a polycrystalline sample of La0.7Ca0.3Mn0.9Co0.1O3 was prepared by solid-state reaction method. The room-temperature X-ray diffraction analysis using Rietveld refinement technique confirms that the sample has a single-phase state with the orthorhombic structure (space group Pbnm). Based on the temperature dependences of the resistance and magnetization, the magnetoresistance and the magnetocaloric effects of the sample have been investigated. Our results pointed out that La0.7Ca0.3Mn0.9Co0.1O3 compound exhibits the maximum magnetoresistance MR = 100% × [ρ(0) − ρ(H)]/ρ(H) = 14.3% near the metal–semiconductor transition with TP = 155 K and the maximum magnetic entropy change |ΔSmax| = 1.45 J/kg·K around the ferromagnetic–paramagnetic phase transition with TC = 188 K under an applied magnetic field change ΔH = 4 kOe. Besides, the changes of the specific heat ΔCP(T, H) for ΔH = 1–4 kOe have been also calculated.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The Monte Carlo simulation of the critical behavior of multilayer structures based on anisotropic Heisenberg model is performed. The analysis reveals aging effects characterized by a slowing down of the relaxation and correlation characteristics in the system with the waiting time. The dependence of aging characteristics on thickness of ferromagnetic films is investigated. The investigation of non-equilibrium critical behavior of multilayer structure which correspond to the nanoscale superlattice Co/Cu/Co demonstrates that the aging effects can be observed in a wider temperature range than for bulk magnetic systems.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.By using first-principles calculations in combination with supercell approach a series of Ni8Mn2Cr2Z4 (Z = Ga, Ge, In, Sn) are studied with partial replacing of Mn by Cr to investigate the effect of such substitution on their structural and magnetic properties. Two 16-atom supercells with different distribution of Cr in the Mn sublattice and magnetic ordering are considered. Crystal structure optimization shows that the magnetic ground state of Ni8Mn2Cr2Z4(Z = Ga, In) alloys is the state with pairwise antiparallel magnetic moments of Cr atoms. While for Ni8Mn2Cr2Z4 (Z = Ge, Sn) alloys is it ferromagnetic state with parallel magnetic moments of Cr and Mn atoms. Based on ground state energies it is shown that martensitic phase can be realized only in Ni8Mn2Cr2Z4 (Z = Ga, Ge) alloys. For the stable crystal structures with associated magnetic order magnetic exchange constants are calculated, to estimate Curie temperatures with the help of mean-field approximation. Obtained results are in qualitative agreement with experimental and theoretical data.© 2017We discuss ways of an improvement of the analytic technique for characterization of magnetic nanoparticles and their chemical transformation to ferritin-like forms after their injection in a living organism by means of measuring and analyzing the Mössbauer spectra and magnetization curves. This is based first on the theoretical achievements in developing models of magnetic dynamics of antiferromagnetic nanoparticles for describing thermodynamic properties of ferritin and related proteins. Generalization of the approach for ferrimagnetic nanoparticles allows one to take directly into account the magnetic nature of nanoparticles in analyzing the corresponding experimental data. Another way is to extend this technique with measuring and analyzing non-equilibrium magnetization curves (hysteresis loops) which allows one to more reliably evaluate time changes in the residual nanoparticles and iron-containing proteins characteristics during biodegradation.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Investigation of the cooling rate effect during heat treatment in air of amorphous magnetic alloys of Fe-Ni-Si-B and Co-Fe-Ni-Cr-Mn-Si-B in states with different signs of saturation magnetostriction were performed to optimize the magnetic properties. It is shown that the increase in cooling rate from 15 to 40 °C/min contributes to the magnetic properties improvement in a state with λs > 0 and their deterioration in a state with λs < 0. This is due to the different influence of induced stresses caused by interaction of ribbon surface with atmospheric water vapor, and their value changes affected by cooling rate change.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A systematic ab initio calculations based on the DFT methodology and Spin-Polarized Relativistic Korringa-Kohn-Rostoker method are carried out to investigate magnetic properties of structure-disordered Ni-Mn-Ga Heusler alloys. In order to generate a complete set of disorder compositions, which will cover the whole area of the ternary diagram of Ni-Mn-Ga, the coherent potential approximation is used. Using our previously calculated lattice constants, the magnetic moments and exchange coupling constants are calculated for the optimized crystal structure of selected alloys. Obtained data from ab initio calculations are used as input for Monte Carlo simulations of Heisenberg Hamiltonian to compute the thermomagnetization curves. The Curie temperatures for the austenite structure of studied compositions are obtained and mapped onto the ternary diagram. The calculated data for Ni-Mn-Ga are in a good agreement with available experimental ones.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work presents a theoretical study of magnetic properties for Fe100-xGax (x = 25, 28.125%) alloys in the framework of first-principles calculations and Monte Carlo simulations. In particular, the zero-temperature ground state properties, magnetocrystalline energy, and magnetic exchange coupling constants for both D03 and L12 structures are calculated. It is shown that for both structures, the magnetocrystalline anisotropy energy change the sign from positive to negative during tetragonal distortion from c/a<1 to c/a>1, respectively. Using the exchange interaction constants within Heisenberg model, the thermomagnetization curves and Curie temperatures for compositions studied are obtained. Calculated data are in a good agreement with experimental ones.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Magnetic properties of trilayer double-exchange biased Si/Ta(30 nm)/NixFe(1−x)(10 nm)/IrMn(tAF)/NixFe(1−x(10 нм)/Ta(30 нм) thin film structures with x = 0.4 and x = 0.75 were investigated. The exchange bias, noncollinearity of unidirectional and uniaxial anisotropy and magnetization in both bottom and top ferromagnetic layers as a function of the antiferromagnetic (AF) layer thickness in the range from 2 to 50 nm were investigated. The obtained effects support the model of ferromagnetic coupling through the antiferromagnetic spacer and the model of rotatable anisotropy contribution at small AF thickness. It was found that usage of low-nickel permalloy in exchange biased systems has advantages of higher magnetization, a higher magnetic ordering at the interface and smaller critical thickness of antiferromagnetic layer to set the exchange bias, though provides a lower exchange bias compared with normal permalloy composition.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.In the given contribution, two examples of applications of glass-coated microwires for biomedical sensing are shown. Firstly, application of microwires for contactless sensing of the intracranial temperature below titanium implants confirms the possibility to sense the temperature with sensitivity down to 0.01 °C. Secondly, application of microwires for monitoring the stress applied on bones after injury or for monitoring the osteomalacy effect is shown. Our measurements confirm that high sensitivity of order of 10−10 s/Pa can be obtained.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.FeNi L10 (tetrataenite) phase has great perspectives for hard magnetic materials production. In this paper we report on synthesis of this phase in chemically co-precipitated FeNi nanopowder by means of a thermal treatment procedure which includes cycling oxidation and reduction processes at 320 °C. The presence of the FeNi L10 phase in the samples was confirmed by magnetic measurements and differential scanning calorimetry analysis.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The structural and magnetic properties of Mn- and Pt-doped Fe-Rh alloys are investigated by first principles calculations. The 16-atom supercell (Fe8Rh8-xZx) with different initial spin configurations including ferromagnetic and two types of antiferromagnetic orders are considered. It is shown that in a case of Fe8Rh8-xMnx, the ferromagnetic spin configuration in a cubic cell is energetically favorable compared to other magnetic configurations. The addition of Mn content stimulates the martensitic transformation from ferromagnetic cubic phase to antiferromagnetic tetragonal one. Moreover, an increase in Mn content leads to increase in the energy difference between cubic and tetragonal phases which is equivalent of increase in a temperature of structural transformation. Contrary, for Fe8Rh8-xPtx, an increase in Pt content results to appearance of stable tetragonal state with the checkerboard-like antiferromagnetic configuration.© 2017Current work is devoted to the study of magneto-optical properties of ferromagnetic metal-carbon nanocomposites that belong to a new class of composites in which partial mixing and the formation of metastable phases between components are allowed. Films of nanocomposites were obtained using ion-beam sputtering of composite target on ceramic substrates. There were three systems synthesized with wide range of magnetic phase concentrations – (Co40Fe40B20)X(SiO2)100−X(1), (Co401Fe40B20)X(C)100−X(2)and (Co)X(C)100−X (3). It is found that the evolution of the TKE spectra for the [(Co)x (C)100−x] system with a change in the concentration of FM granules indicates a transition from amorphous CoC granules to crystalline Co granules in a carbon matrix. The shape TKE spectra for the system2 was weakly dependent on the concentrations x. The difference in the behavior of the magneto-optical properties of the [(Co)x (C)100−x] and [(Co40Fe40B20)x(C)100−x] system is explained on the basis of the composite formation model, taking into account the possibility of chemical reactions of carbon with metals and boron.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The influence of constant electric field on the characteristics of the direct magnetoelectric effect in composite structures with single crystal piezoelectric layers was observed. The effect was measured in the structures with langatate and catangasite piezoelectric layers and amorphous magnetic alloy metglas as a ferromagnetic layer. The value of magnetoelectric voltage coefficient of 146 V/(Oe·cm) was obtained for the langatate-based structure and value of 1.35 V/(Oe·cm) for the catangasite-based structure. For the langatate-metglas structure, electrical field of 20 kV/cm resulted in a change in the generated voltage up to 63%, in the quality factor Q up to 76%, and provided linear variation of the resonance frequency up to 16 Hz. Electrical field control of magnetoelectric effect characteristics can be used to design new magnetoelectric devices.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The influence of partial substitution of Co by Al atoms on the magnetocaloric and magnetostrictive properties of the multicomponent Tb-Dy-Gd-Co compounds with a Laves phase structure was investigated. The samples were obtained by arc melting using of high-purity rare-earth metals. The crystal structure of Tb0.2Dy0.8-xGdxCo2-yAly (x = 0.3, 0.4, and 0.5; y = 0 and 0.1) compounds was monitored by powder X-ray diffraction. The magnetostriction and the magnetocaloric effect in external magnetic field up to 12 and 18 kOe, respectively, were studied in wide temperature range. The Curie temperature of Al-content compounds increases by an average of 20 K, while the magnitudes of the magnetocaloric effect and the magnetostriction slightly decrease.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This work presents a theoretical investigation of the Heusler compound Ni2MnGa with PHONON and VASP software. In particular, in the focus of this study is the role of the atomic disorder in the phonon instabilities that are characteristic for some Heusler alloys.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.This study is the first attempt to apply the two-level Weiss model for the invar alloy to intermediate-valence samarium systems. This model is instrumental in giving a quantitative characterisation of the anomalous magnetic contribution to the coefficient of thermal expansion (CTE) of Sm0.80B6 and Sm1−xLaxB6 (x = 0, 0.10, 0.22, 0.50). A good agreement between the experimental and calculated magnetic contributions to the CTE is achieved for Sm0.78La0.22B6 over the temperature range from 0 K to 210 K. In other systems, a good fit is obtained over shorter temperature ranges. The model parameters and the dependence of the CTE minimum on the level of lanthanum doping in SmB6 are presented.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Frequency dependencies of permittivity and permeability of composites filled with Permalloy powder with various concentrations and shapes of particles have been measured and discussed. The powder particles of various shapes were obtained by mechanical milling of industrial Permalloy powder in organic media. Paraffin wax was used as a matrix for producing the composites. A shape data of the particles were obtained with an electron microscope. The permittivity and permeability were measured in the frequency range of 0.1–20 GHz. It is shown that the shape of the particles changes from sphere to plate with increase of milling time. The change leads to a shift of the ferromagnetic resonance (FMR) frequency and the magnetic loss peak. It is shown that larger damping of the FMR is typical for larger particles. With increase of the concentration of Permalloy particles in composite, the magnetic loss peak shifts to lower frequencies. The measured frequency dependencies of the material parameters are discussed in terms of the theory of composites.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Band structure, Fermi surface, and phonon dispersions of noncentrosymmetric B20-type RhGe are calculated ab initio for the first time and their evolution with increasing pressure is investigated. We consider in detail symmetry-conditioned features of the band structure, as well as pressure-induced changes in the Fermi surface topology, which are expected to affect the thermopower of RhGe. We also report on special calculations of electric field gradients on the Rh and Ge nuclei and compare these results with a very recent 111Cd-TDPAC study of B20-RhGe.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.Langevin dynamics is used to study equilibrium properties of the suspension of magnetic filaments (chains of nanoparticles permanently crosslinked with polymers). It is shown that the filament suspension generally has a larger magnetic susceptibility than the system of unlinked nanoparticles with the same average particle concentration. However, actual susceptibility gain strongly depends on length and flexibility of filaments. It is also shown that in a strong gravitational (centrifugal) field sedimentation profiles of filaments are less homogeneous than that of unlinked particles. The spatial distribution of filaments weakly depends on the intensity of interparticle dipole-dipole interactions.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.We study via molecular dynamics simulations the self-assembled structures formed by supracolloidal magnetic polymers (SMPs). These are small aggregates of magnetic colloidal particles with polymer-like structures that have been permanently stabilized by means of polymer crosslinking. Here we focus on the fundamental structural and magnetic properties of the self-assembled motifs formed by pairs of identical SMPs under different conditions. We observe that the minimum characteristic density at which the self-assembly of both SMPs into a single aggregate becomes dominant is signaled by a maximum in their net magnetization and radius of gyration.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.A new method of studying microwave magnetic properties of metal particles and films is developed. The method is based on measurements with swept frequency under magnetic bias in a coaxial line. Application of the technique is illustrated by the data obtained for two types of samples, washer-shaped rolls of thin ferromagnetic films and composites filled with flake Sendust particles. The treatment of the measured data is performed with an account for sample demagnetization and anisotropy. The values of the anisotropy field and the saturation magnetization of thin iron films are calculated considering demagnetization of the sample. Because of the anisotropy of the composite samples, permeability depends slightly on the length of samples, and the saturation magnetization and the anisotropy field cannot be determined.© 2017 Elsevier B.V.The regular shape of the magnetoresistance as a function of applied magnetic field, R(H), is important for numerous spin valves applications. Nevertheless, in many practical studies the shape of the R(H) curve is unpredictably complicated. We draw attention to the close connection between R(H) and magnetization hysteresis loop and propose a simple technique, which allows interpreting the R(H) features and calculating R(H) curves from known hysteresis loops of ferromagnetic layers, composing spin valves. And vice versa, the shape of the hysteresis loops of the composing ferromagnetic layers can be obtained from R(H) curves. The method is suitable for prompt selection of promising spin valve stacks.© 2016 Elsevier B.V.In Experimental details section the first two lines should be “Polycrystalline sample of LaCr0.8Mn0.2O3 was prepared by the standard sol–gel route. La2O3, Cr(NO3)3·9H2O and C4H6MnO4·4H2O of 99.9% purity were taken as starting compounds in stoichiometric ratio”. By mistake instead of C4H6MnO4·4H2O, we had written Fe(NO3)3·9H2O.